Depth... One well fusioned album with a lot of depth! Mira Niar did know L. Subramaniam would give a strong backbone to her movie - no doubt about that! Like the album "Conversations", have not words to express the brilliance of this one. But the fact I give it 4 stars and not 5 is cause there is no flow to the album. You have other pieces which is not L.Subramaniam, kinda coming in the way of the album. But hey! this guy does know what he comes up with! He sure is not given the due credit. He reminds me of another Mozart - quiet, shy but his Music is power - and we don't really know it - until the maker is gone. Way too much...? Over the top, huh? Let his Music speak..
Another great Slater Film. Having seen parts of this film over a span of the last decade or so, without fully seeing all of it, I noticed this DVD on sale at a huge retailer.. (Rhymes with Ball-Mart), for only $4.88, I couldn't resist picking it up to see it all finally.Was it worth it? Yes. I am a straight married guy, and a huge fan of Christan Slater. I have seen damn near every movie with him in it, and Pump was another classic. Did I love everything about this movie? No. It definately reeks of late 80's references and inuendo. I.E. "Bill and Ted" Clones. The story was very well done, however, it contains 2 major flaws.(1) I am a cop, and I know for a fact the Federal Government, would not send the FCC after a lone pirate station who is not screaming for the downfall of government. But is ranting about the local high school administration.(2) I didn't like the ending. I won't spoil it for you, but just say it could have been better.Overall it was a 4 out of 5. Not bad for a film from 1990.
Would recommend to fans of independent film. Not a big fancy film, but very good for a small independent film. The cast as a whole gave a great performance; Jon Brandis, in one of his last projects, was excellent. I wish this film had been given the wider theatrical release it deserved
The Folksmen Rule!!!. When Chevy Chase came back from Hollywood to host SNL in its second season, the other SNLers were mad at him. (He was the only SNL player with a one-year contract, while the rest were contracted/stuck for five years). Bill Murray represented his SNL crew, and got into a shoving match with Chase.  As they were pulled apart, Murray pointed and yelled, "Medium talent!  Medium talent!"  ("Live from New York" book). That may or may not be a fair assessment of Chase.  But it *is* fair to say that the stars of A Mighty Wind are extra large talents!  They act!  They sing!  They play instruments!  They create real characters!  They improv! They're Collegiate!I've watched this movie many times, and it's as good or better than Guest's other films. The tone is more muted, more realistic, and so you become more involved in the characters. It's an easygoing, relaxed film, except when -- Bam! Fred Willard cuts in as the hyper former child star -- and starts shouting catchphrases from his sit-com glory days! (You *will* remember them for life!)Mitch & Mickey are awesome, and The New Main Street Singers get me hiGHHHHHgggH*Hi*HI*HI*.... But my faves are The Folksmen! Their history is fascinating -- someone should write a book about them! Until then, here's what I know:In 1966, The Folksmen distinguished themselves as the only folk group that never wandered -- with the classic "Never Did No Wanderin'." All the other groups did wandering, but The Folksmen steadfastly refused.(My "creative license" section to follow... for more facts/truth, skip to last paragraph :-) This non-wanderin' didn't go over well with the folk community. In 1986, folk purists were further outraged when The Folksmen allowed "Never Did No Wanderin'" to be used by The White House in the National Campaign Against Wandering. The song opened for this famous commercial:Fade in, with The Folksmen song....Three young teens are leaving an asphalt bike path, and start to walk on an unkempt dirt path that follows a wild creek. Johnny (Marc "Skippy" Price) is hesitant to walk away from the paved path, and into the wild....Beatnik #1: C'mon Johnny, don't you want to wander?Johnny: But what are your goals?Beatnik #2: We don't have no goals right now, dig?Johnny: B-b-but what is the purpose? Haven't you done a cost benefit analysis?Beatnik #1 (eerily): We're just wanderin' man. Just bloooowin' in the wind.Beatnik #2: Don't you wanna.... just wander, man?Johnny (resisting): No! I've got to stay busy! And goal oriented!Peter Graves: When someone asks YOU to wander, just say No.Nancy Reagan: And say it crisply! Don't half-*ss it!That commercial is not on the dvd special features. But the special features *are* packed -- and rival the main movie in entertainment value. The deleted scenes are as good as the ones in the film... including a press conference where Mitch and the Folksmen describe rap music ("a second cousin to folk... with the melody removed and profanity added")... and describe a concert where "someone threw a dog on stage...." (Ozzy fan in the folk world?)..... Plus the full concert footage, all recorded live....  And much, much, more! Buy it, and put it on the shelf with the movies you've seen ten times.
The Antidote to the American Myth. The is one of the best movies I have seen in years.  It has been described as a movie about a dysfunctional family, but I disagree.  On an important level, these people are us.  Do all of us win all the time?True, in a sense, everyone in the family is a "loser."  They do not succeed in that quintessential  "American" way.  The father isn't great at his job, the mother complains because there isn't enough money, the son is colorblind, Olive isn't "pretty" in that beauty contest kind of way, the Uncle is gay, has lost a prestigious job, and is unhappy in love, and Grandpa snorts cocaine to numb his pain.  These do not sound like unusual problems to me, but together, they do make for a lot of really funny and poignant moments.FYI:  This is not a Hollywood Myth about the underdog winning the day.  I say "Yay!"  Aren't you tired of those?I think the movie wants us to ask ourselves what the word "loser" means.  Each person in LITTLE MISS SUNSHINE has failed in some important dream, but are we so enraptured with the American Myth of "success" that we would truly call this family dysfunctional?  The Myth tells us that "anybody" can do "anything" as long as he or she believes hard enough.  I think the movie is saying that the Myth is a dysfunctional myth. The problem with these characters in the beginning is not that they have dreams, but that they are afraid to fail.  Failure in America is a dirty word:  if you can't succeed in America, then where?At the end of the movie, although each character has failed in a significant way, each is a winner in a deeper sense.  And they certainly do not come across to me as "losers" or as a dysfunctional family.  I think they finally are seeing some things clearly for the first time.  This is a movie filled with humor and humanity.  It is a wonderful antidote to a myth that would make us all feel like "losers" when things don't go our way.  I wish there were more movies like this.And by the way, I don't laugh easily at movies.  But I laughed so hard at the end of this movie that my glasses steamed up.
Arkin IS Clouseau. This is one of the better Inspector Clouseau movies. It is not as ridiculously silly as some of the others. Arkin gives a very credible and amicable performance as Clouseau. You can empathize with him and he has a certain charm about him. The plot of this movie is interesting and the villain's plot is quite plausible. Adding to this movie is some very impressive location photography, ingenious title credit animation and a solid and catchy score by Ken Thorne.
"The Honor of God and The King". What a treat for moviegoers to see this magnificent film on the big screen again after 43 years. Originally released in 1964, directed by Peter Glenville and starring Richard Burton as Thomas Becket and Peter O'Toole as Henry ll, BECKET holds up well with time. Based on the play by the same name by Jean Anouilh, the movie is based-- with cinematic license here and there; for example he is a dirty Saxon here-- on the life and martyrdom of Thomas Becket, Archbishop of Canterbury. (Both Tennyson and Eliot produced major works on the same subject matter.) Although many period pieces like this one are visually stunning to watch, as this one is, they often leave the viewer cold, as this one does but in this instance because of superb acting. Henry complains often that he is always cold and that Becket is not warm in his affection to him. This coldness is so real as to be palpable in the theatre.It is a pleasure to watch Burton and O'Toole in their verbal fencing as both actors give as good as they get. Neither actor ever looked or acted  better. The scene where Becket and Henry meet on horseback at the sea and Becket tells Henry that he will never see him again is worth whatever you paid to see the movie. Other actors besides O'Toole and Burton give outstanding performances as well, particularly John Gielgud as King Louis VII and David Weston as the young Brother John, Becket's disciple and attendant.BECKET is about big themes-- honor (Becket: "I am waiting for the honor of the God and the king to be one, my lord"), friendship and love-- and  a film for all seasons.
Ladies Night. I cannot imagine a better "Aida" than this Met production/performance from 1991. The sets and costumes spectacularly reflect the grandeur of Ancient Eqypt, and James Levine is in top form, leading the ever-fabulous Met orchestra and a cast that, if not pitch-perfect, is never less than first-rate.Admittedly, neither Domingo nor Milnes is at their best here.  By this time Milnes had lost a lot of the richness in tone and shading that made him one of the best bass/baritones of his generation; he pretty much wields his voice like a blunt instrument, getting the job done, but not much more.  And while this isn't an out-and-out off-night for Domingo, it isn't one of his best, either.  The performance seems to be taking more effort than usual, particularly the high notes. (His modulation of the final whatever-it-is at the end of "Celeste Aida" is pretty much a metaphor for his entire performance.)The women are, in a word, spectacular.  I've seen Aprille Millo at the Met a number of times and cannot remember being so blown away.  Perhaps by the time I saw her live she was in her decline.  In any event, we're lucky that this DVD has captured what I think is one of the finest operatic performances I've ever seen.  Truly.  Millo's vocal control is astounding (the pianossimos are breathtaking) and her acting no less so (without ever toppling over the fine line into melodrama).  She's nothing short of a star here, well-deserving of the hugh ovation she receives from the Met audience.  And I love Zajick's interpretation of Amneris.  On first glance she's the regal, jealous bitch we've seen in every other "Aida."  But this superb artist takes us deeper into the character.  In modern terms, she's the awkward, dumpy math geek who can't understand why the star-athlete prefers the homecoming queen.  Think Heather Matarazzo in Todd Solondz' "Welcome to the Dollhouse."  Heartbreaking.
FAMILY ENTERTAINMENT. NOW THIS IS A GREAT FAMILY MOVIE. NO NEED TO WORRY ABOUT ANYTHING YOUR CHILD SHOULDN'T SEE. SIMPLY GREAT MUSIC AND ACTING. A MUST HAVE
BATTLESTAR GALLACTICA WAS AHEAD OF ITS TIME!. This is the ten dollar offering of the pilot movie that started the epic series Battlestar Gallactica yes it is true that some of the special effects footage is used too many times but if you watch scenes like where Cylon mother ships get to close the ground lightning then crashes them into Carillon while eluding deception of large pursuing fleet you will realize that part of the reason the Battlestar Gallactica didn't workout is because IT WAS AHEAD OF ITS TIME! The glass doors opening on the Cylon Base Stars and the Cylon's red eyes going back and forth were way ahead of their time in 1978. Some of the props from this pilot/movie were later used in Buck Rogers.
Criterion presents a great package of a great film. Yes, this edition of Bicyle Thieves costs more than hot contemporary releases, but it is well worth it.  You get a classic film along with great reading material about the film and a bonus DVD explaining why this film is a classic. Also, it sits nicely on any bookshelf.  I especially recommend this film to younger viewers as a warning againt allowing society and governments to dehumanize  its citizens (especially the poor).  This film makes you think about what it means to be a human being--something that today's films seem not to do, The Departed, for instance.   Obviously a worthy addition to anyone's film collection.
Good Wayne and Holden film. Decent Civil War film of supposedly true event. Wayne and Holden's characters well drawn. Wayne the troop leader and Holden, his regimental surgeon, clash over appropriate treatment of the soldiers under Wayne's command. Story drags a bit from time to time, but generally enjoyable. Romance is a bit far fetched. But hey, this's a Wayne western, so not a lot of time spent on that. Story is that Wayne made this film in part to finance his project that was in preliminary production, The Alamo.Good transfer to DVD and horses going across wooden bridge will give your surround speakers a work out.
A diamond in the rough. *Spoilers ahead!*Ashes and Diamonds begins on the day when World War II ended for Poland. A day which brought with it celebration but also uncertainty. The war has ended and things are still viscous but like molten rock, this state is temporary. Enter the charismatic carefree Maciek and the serious Andrzej, two Polish exiles who joined the resistance in 1941 when they were fighting the Germans for a free Poland. With the war over, and the Russians invading their country, this was not the victory they imagined. And so they lay beside a country church basking in the sunlit clarity of a warm beautiful day, waiting for the arrival of a local communist party chairman, so they can fill him full of lead and then head for their next assignment. But things are not clear at all and in Maciek's obvious enthusiasm for his job, he executes two innocent men, though he will not learn of his error until later in the 24 hours period during which this film takes place. By that time the clear sky will turn dark with rain and Maciek's resolve to "finish" the job will be severely weakened by the beautiful barmaid, Krystyna, who awakens within him a dormant faith in humanity and the possibility of love and happiness. Ashes and Diamonds is a film that constantly paces back and forth between differing visions of a Post WWII Poland - not surprising since director Wajda had to walk a fine line between his fellow Poles and the Soviet censors. Most of the film takes place in darkness and the characters, like the film itself pace back and forth struggling with an existential anguish that is almost crushing. The enormous weight of responsibility when life becomes more than simply surviving. The decision to act or not to act - both have far reaching consequences. The films emotional core takes place during a masterfully shot scene in a hotel room with both Maciek and Krystnya emotionally and physically naked. Cinematographer Jerzy Wojcik, who graces this film with many unforgettable images, gives us still another and with muted lense dissolves one lovers face into another interchangeably to suggest a coming together of souls. Once carefully measured exteriors are being melted by buried emotion like the way lava changes the face of a mountain. "Don't touch me" remarks Krystnya during a particularly tender moment, but these words are said not as a threat but as a last gasp defensive measure. "I don't want any good-byes or memories to leave behind." Soon the two lovers will sneak out into the night, "God, life can be so beautiful sometimes." Says Maciek with enthusiasm just prior to a downpour that will have them scurring into the shelter of the burned out ash filed ruins of a church, with Jesus on a crucifix hanging upside down above the ruble. It is here that Krystnya reads an inscription from the Polish Poet Cyprian Kamil Norwid which will spur the dormant revolutionary within Maciek into action.From you, as from burning chips of resinFiery fragments circle far and near:Ablaze, you don't know if you are to be free.Or if all that is yours will disappear.Will only ashes remain and confusionWhirling into the void? - Or will there shineAmidst the ash a starlight diamond,the dawning of eternal victory
A pirate you can't help but love. This movie entertained me as a child and still does today. Suzanne Pleshette & Dean Jones are great, but the constant scene stealing (as always) is done by Peter Ustinov. His dialogue works well with the special effects that were available at the time. You might forget for a moment that he's a ghost and then the movie shows the perspective from everyone else. Suzanne Pleshette's character is trying her best not to fall in love with someone that might be crazy and can't help herself. If you enjoy Disney movies, this one will entertain everyone. I love it.
Original, funny, and at times scary, a new take on horror. I was pleasently surprised by this movie when I saw it on the bigscreen, and now I'm happy to have it in my collection.  Michael J Fox's role as a paranormal investigator/ghost trapper with Hired Help is just a very funny concept.  Chi Mcbrie's character I thought made this movie, great comic relief.  Jake Busey did a decent job at being a bad guy.  I have seen this probably 8 times, and still find it funny.  It holds me if I find it flipping through channels.  Nice one to have in the collection.   I only own the original version, worth investing into directors cut to see what has been added
Not just the cookie. The first 15 min of this movie was stragely frighting beyound beleief. Because it is not a horror flick at this point, then it heads into a fairly common wearwolf flick. Very good Flick but not in the Psyco class
The ties that bind--and break. Roger Michell's "The Mother" ranks with "Cries and Whispers" and "Long Day's Journey Into Night" as one of the most unpleasant, profoundly disturbing portraits of a dysfunctional family ever put on film. It is also undeniably brilliant at showing the frayed knots of family loyalty that only need one good shock to break irrevocably. Hanif Kureishi--an old hand at making audiences squirm--tells the story of May (Anne Reid), a sixtyish housewife in a semi-rural English town, visiting her children in London with her husband Toots (Peter Vaughan). Ten minutes into the movie, Toots dies, leaving May totally at a loss. As the film makes plain from the beginning, May's life has revolved entirely for decades around caring for Toots. At first we think the film will be a poignant study of a woman's grief. May doesn't want to go back to her empty house, but her children plainly don't want her around: her son Bobby (Steven Mackintosh) is a cold, self-centered businessman, and her daughter Paula (Cathryn Bradshaw) is a needy, whining neurotic who blames her mother for nearly everything that's gone wrong with her life. We think the story will be about May's learning to stand up for herself and make a new life. (When Bobby asks May not to be difficult, she stiffens and asks, "Why shouldn't I be difficult?") But then May meets Darren (Daniel Craig), Paula's sexy, moody boyfriend and a man half May's age, and from then on all expectations fly straight out the window and land with a crash. I wish the publicity for the film didn't reveal what happens between May and Darren, but even so the impact of it assaults the audience like the punch in the face Paula eventually gives May. If the movie were just about an elderly woman's sexuality, it wouldn't be so shocking; what shocks is May's selfish betrayal of Paula, and the brutal fashion in which Paula discovers it. At that moment we lose all our moorings as an audience, and have no idea who among the characters to side with, if anyone. We still have sympathy for May--as we don't for the patently hateful Paula, Darren and Bobby--but we also gasp in horror at her heedless behavior, and get an idea why her children turned out the way they did. "The Mother" is hard to sit through, and also hard to forget.
it came from outer space. I like the story line of this movie, but most of all I remember watching it when I was a kid of seven. It was scary back then, even with limited special effects and no graphic details. Watching it now was very enjoyable I found myself going back in time. This film is in its own right a science fiction classic.
Dying Young  Moves Us with its Precious Life & Love Conquer All Meaning. I find it refreshing whenever Hollywood puts out atouching love story which involves real life situations.Beautiful performances are given by Campbell Scott & Julia Roberts in this highly insirational film. If you thinkthis is just a depressing movie dealing with a mandying, this is not so.  I found that Victor, the 28 yearold man suffering from leukemia since 18, is a verysharp educated & loving person.  You really cant helpto not only like him but really pull for him as youwatch this film.  It's interesting to see Julia Roberts(Hillary)in a role where she experiences such unconditionallove for a man in his condition.  He is strong yet weak& she is naive but smart.  What I took away from DyingYoung is how Victor & Hillary both share this transition ofexperiencing unconditional love through such an adversesituation. Its very inspiring for us to see how such strong lovecan be such a gift. Two understanding people in love cansuccessfully melt all of lifes fears away by allowing it.It has surprisingly well humorous moments so there is a nicebalance.  I appreciate that this movie is not doom & gloomby showing the human spirit can not be defeated when unconditional love is present.  Victor & Hillaryhelp remind us to live each precious moment in our livesto its fullest. How inspiring
A Murder Wrapped In A Social Message. It Still Holds Up. Perhaps the first of the social injustice movies Hollywood began turning out in the late Forties, Crossfire is one of the few in my opinion which still hold up. That's because the social message, against hate in general and anti-Semitism in particular, doesn't become too preachy and get in the way of the story. Unlike Gentleman's Agreement (anti-Semitism), Boomerang (legal and class injustice), Pinky (racial prejudice) and others, Crossfire tells a taut story first, in this case about a murder, and features some first-rate acting, especially from Robert Ryan.The murder mystery is straightforward and there's little doubt about who the killer is. We know a man named Samuels (Sam Levene) has been beaten to death. We know the suspect, Corporal Arthur Mitchell (George Cooper) is one of four recently discharged soldiers who met him in a bar. We know one of the four is a big, edgy guy, Sergeant Montgomery (Robert Ryan), who laughs too much and likes to verbally poke at people he thinks are weak. The body is discovered, evidence points to Mitchell as the killer and police Captain Finlay (Robert Young) goes to work. One of Mitchell's buddies, Sergeant Peter Keeley (Robert Mitchum) doesn't think Mitchell could be a killer. In a cautious way he starts working with Finlay to establish an alibi for Mitchell, and then to concentrate on Montgomery. One of the biggest issues is what could Montgomery's motivation be. It turns out Montgomery doesn't like civilians, doesn't like "hillbillies," and hates Jews. He's a bigot. When Montgomery complains about "those kinds of guys", Finlay asks, "What kind of guys?""You know the kind." Montgomery says. "Played it safe during the war, keepin' themselves in civvies, nice apartments, swell dames...you know the kind.""I'm not sure that I do.""Some of 'em are named Samuels, some of 'em have funnier names."It isn't long before we realize that Montgomery is a psychopath who hates just about anyone who is different. With Keeley's help, Finlay finally is able to lay a clever trap for Montgomery.Young does a fine job as the cop. He's seen probably too much. He's tired. He's a decent man who relies on his training. "I've been at this job too long," he tells Keeley. "I go about it the only way I know how. I collect all the facts possible...most of them are useless." Mitchum, laconic but alert, makes a nice partner for Finlay. He's ready to stand by a buddy he thinks is incapable of killing, and he really doesn't like Montgomery.Robert Ryan makes you feel uncomfortable from the moment you see him. There's something too friendly about him, something too hidden, something too ready to explode. You're not surprised when he suddenly beats Samuels to death with his fists. The difference between the part of Keeley and the part of Montgomery is, I think, the difference between a role that can lead to a reputation as a movie star and a role that can lead to a reputation as a movie actor. I think it was only when Mitchum took on unsympathetic roles in Night of the Hunter and Cape Fear that many critics realized he was a first-rate film actor, not just a star. By that time, Ryan already had the actor reputation, but major stardom had eluded him.In a smaller part, Gloria Grahame is excellent as a dance hall hostess who might give Mitchell an alibi. With her cat eyes and pouty lips, Grahame always was distinctive. She and Paul Kelly as a man who may or may not be her husband bring an uneasy and almost surreal quality to their scenes.Crossfire is a solid looking noir. The DVD presentation is very good.
a great read for critical thinkers of the Christian faith. this book is a great tool for critical thinkers of the Christian faith.  Ravi Zacharias delivers a compelling although often wordy description of how pluralism has degraded and made a mockery of absolute truth.
Nostalgic :). When an individual buys a movie, it is in order to watch it several times (unless one is a reseller).  So, to buy a comedy to think that one will laugh at the same jokes a hundered times is foolish.The movie is enjoyable due to its excellent cast and quirky humor.  There is nothing overbearing about the movie, which is a nice departure from the majority of movies out there.  Two cast members are now gone.  The plot is simple.  The quirks are clever.  Enjoy every now and again when you miss the 1980s, its actors, and the style of thought you had when you were a kid.****
One of My Favorite Disney Channel Original Movies. This movie was very good!  The actors played their parts well, and the story is entertaining from beginning to end.  It almost makes you want to get into motocross racing!  There was friendship, romance, and of course, motocross, in this well-thought out and family friendly movie.  All the characters were enjoyable and easy to relate to.  Alana Austin was especially good as Andrea, the main character.Overall, I would say this was a great movie!  But I would rather wait for it to come on Disney Channel then buy it.
Give The Devil His Due!. A witch betrays her cult, & is sentenced to wear the Mask of Satan, a spiked facial enclosure bearing the image of The Prince of Darkness. Before her punishment, the witch utters a curse in the name of Satan, that she will continue returning throughout the ages, resurrecting by their sons' blood. She becomes vampyr.The movie begins with a stern warning to the timid & the young, advising that it may be too frighting & disturbing. And so two noblemen {a professor & his apprentice} make their way to the dark castle in the hills. On their way, they uncover the skeletal remains of the Witch, who manages to get a taste of their blood, thus bringing her to life.The castle itself is wonderfully beset with images of griffins, gargoyles, & dragons --- particular of note, a marvellous draconian tapestry adorning an ornate fireplace, which holds, it will suffice to say, many secrets.A Satanic Altar is found deep within the bowels of the castle, where the Vampire-Witch sleeps, & a zombie-like Guardian lurks, who bears the Satanic dragon insignia on his chest.Black Sunday manages to preserve quite an eerie embiance, much like 'The Undead', & will keep you in suspense.
Murky atmospheric Western saga. Robert Altman's "McCabe and Mrs. Miller" is a gloomy, subdued tale of the Old West filmed with magnificent cinematography in the Pacific Northwest.Warren Beatty playing dimwitted gambler John McCabe ambles into a remote burgeoning frontier town nestled in the snowy confines of Washington state at the turn of the century.  He has an idea to build a gambling hall and saloon also housing a bordello.  Soon the stunning Julie Christie, a shrewd opium smoking madam from Seattle arrives in town.  With her sharp business acumen she forges a partnership with Beatty and their business begins to boom.The town receives a surprise visit from the representatives of a mining company who make Beatty a lucrative offer to sell his property for the mining rights.  When he refuses a trio of gunslingers arrive in town to kill him and seize his possessions.The drama plays out in a blinding snowstorm as Beatty is pursued by the pack of gunmen.  At the same time the town church has caught fire occupying the townfolk who are unaware of the conflict being played out.Altman's somber classic is a more realistic portrayal of frontier life than what Hollywood has traditionally churned out previously.  Both Christie who was Oscar nominated and Beatty did fine jobs of acting in their roles
Jason , mother is talking to you. This is my 2nd favorite movie of all time next to "from dusk till dawn". I dont know why but the cop who gets the claw hammer in the head sticks with me. The scene where the cripple takes the machete in the face is friggin' harsh. Jason is the best killer ever
A film you have to fully understand evolution to fully get. Having read tons of books and articles on the subject of evolution I understand this film very much. I know some who understand evolution far less well will certainly be confused by the intricate plot concerning the big E. As for other complaints by amazon reviewers I'll say this:1) I find the acting in this film anything but hollywood-like. This film reminds me a lot of Fatal Attraction and other rather realistic 80's hit films. This movie had very realistic acting.2) The dialogue in this movie has profanity true---but it is delivered in a very sophisticated, educated, and realistic way.Not cheap like in 80's Rambo movies. Realize most of the characters are professors and doctors and such therefore it is extra-cerebral dialogue.3) Blair Brown is much sexier than William Hurt.4) Hurt's character in a big scene goes back to the beginning of mankind and discovers how without love, a little anger, happiness and otheremotions life is unbeliavably drab, indifferent and purely a technicality. That's why he quits the search. Why do so many insist it's a cheap ending?5) Hurt's character quits happily embracing earlier stages of mankind upon realizing that man is not actually, ultimately God and as just a single cell there's no feeling at all, no control, etc for people. People are better off in their current, multi-celled state. Therefore he successfully fights all regressions off in the end (a power he really had all along) because it is no good and this realization makes him appreciate his loving and sexy wife all the more.6) Hurt's character goes to Mexico---not South America like some posters think
Psychological Thriller. This movie did a good job of presenting the trials and tribulations of acceptance. I honestly felt bad for the "badguys" at some points in the movie. The drug dealers were like family, but their actions weren't commendable by far. The money and love provided by the "underworlds" were quick fixes for the things the main character seemed to be lacking. It made me really think how easy it could be to get engulfed in the life of crime if the situation presented itself
Very Funny. I saw this on tv and loved it, so i had to buy it
best Jackie Chan movie ever. Amazing.  I have seen this movie at least a dozen times and it is still amazing.  There is so much action, so much choreography that is impossible to take in every second of it after watching this only once. The Legend of Drunken Master has the best Jackie Chan fighting I have ever seen, but also a good story with a nice plot, good characters and villains, and dubbing that actually isn't too badly done.The story has a good focus on family, and what Wong Fei Hung (Jackie Chan) must do in order to honor his family and his country by stopping thieves from stealing and exporting Chinese artifacts that represent China's history.  Sounds a bit boring but the story develops nicely in the film.  After the first 5 minutes, you may not care because the beginning of the movie has an incredible fight scene promising just some of the action yet to come.  Some of the action scenes mid-way through the movie are so good, they are better than a lot of final fight scenes in other similar movies.  By the time the final fight scene in this movie is over, you may not even have realized that 15 straight minutes passed by.  It really is that long of a scene and it is very, very entertaining.  Chan does not do many stunts in this movie, but rather displays his true and raw martial arts skills, specifically the uniqe form of Drunken Boxing.If you have never seen a Jackie Chan movie and want to start, watch another one of his films first.  This one is so good it might just spoil the rest
Wonderful Film. If you like Robert Altman or Van Gogh, see this movie; if you like Robert Altman AND Van Gogh, buy this movie
ONE OF CHRIS' FUNNIEST MOVIES!!. Besides FRIDAY and RUSH HOUR, this has got to be ONE of Chris' best performances on film or DVD.I bought this movie a long time ago and I'm just getting around to rating it now...THIS MOVIE IS FUNNY and if you haven't seen this movie, I have one question, WHAT ARE YOU WAITING FOR? For Eddie Murphy to put out a GOOD movie? Ha, you'll be waiting for tha rest of your life....GO AND GET THIS MOVIE TODAY
Joe Spinell will give you nightmares, Highly Realistic and scary. "Maniac" is one of those movies that make me want to take a bath after I watch it because I feel gritty.That in itself tells me it was a highly effective, realistically sick movie and did what it was set out to do.Joe Spinell is so good in this movie he had me scared to go into a public ladies room for weeks after I saw it when it came out in theatres much like Jaws and the water and Psycho and the shower. Of course Tom Savini is the master of gore in my opinion and he doesn't disappoint in this film, is it gratuitous?  Sure it is, isn't that why we watch a slasher or horror film to be shocked or scared ? Of course it is.Maniac is so scary and effective because it could really happen, There are really Franks "Spinell's character" out there .  "SHUDDER"
A denture-rattling live performance. This is Faith No More at their absolute best. A smashing live performance that runs thru their pre-1991 hits, culminating with a mind-blowing cover of Black Sabbath's War Pigs. This show is tight, the sound is tremendous.  I've completely corrupted my friends with it, and now they all want copies
...When I was very small... This episode of Star Trek, "The Man Trap" is my earliest memory of what would become a lifelong enjoyment of the franchise. Truthfully, "The Man Trap" terrified me (I was maybe two, or three, although I am sure by that time the series was limping along in it's third season and I was seeing a repeat for the first time); Star Trek was considered "adult programming", and as such I was not allowed to watch it - I used to sneak behind the couch while my grandfather watched it on nights I stayed at their house, then would lay awake in my bed scared by what I'd seen, but excited just the same. Like another space show I enjoyed and was terrified by (Lost in Space), I didn't recognize Star Trek as anything but a world I wanted very much to be in, but remained frightened of anyhow (I was, as I said, very young).
God said to Abraham "Kill me a son". The wind is in the thorn tree.Yep, there is nothing exceptional to this Rambo formula remake. They use all the same clich they probably recycles some of the old Rambo blood and bullets.Now you ask "why we should watch the Rambo rehash?" Well I'll tell you. Because instead of Richard Crenna, you get Tommy Lee Jones and most of his facial expressions; when they are not being hidden behind blood and hair. And instead of Sylvester Stallone, who was very good in "Oscar", you get Benicio Del Toro who can look more like a man betrayed than an old boxer.The story is as old as the hills. L.T. Bonham (Tommy Lee Jones) is called out of retirement to track down a mysterious person or persons unknown that killed some hunters. The person turns out to be a soldier Aaron Hallman (Benicio Del Toro) that he trained to kill. Through a series of mishaps Aaron gets loosed and the inept authorities must compete with L.T. for the retrieval or destruction. However L.T. knows he is to only one to do it.So does Aaron get away so he can kill again?Does L.T. make his first kill or is he really a pusssy-cat?Do the inept authorities realize their limits before it is too late?Do we come away with any new insights?
Love of Love at First Bite. I have likes this movie for years.  When I saw that I could purchase it, I was delighted.  It is a very hard movie to rent.  The comedic, romantic content is refreshing and very humorous.  I would and have recommended this movie to anyone
Unique and Enthralling. From the start, I blatantly refuse to compare this film to Huston's "Moulin Rouge" - these are two distinctly seperate works, and though their subject might be the same, it would be a disservice to the merits of both to place them on the same page.  That having been said...From the great storyline to the rip-roaring dance finale, this is one heck of a movie-musical.  Far, far too obscure, at least in this country - I've told innumerable friends about it, always with the same result - they tell me they've never heard of it.  Well, now that you have, it's very well worth your time to check it out.Firstly, the character development is fantastic.  Jean Gabin shines as the impresario Danglard, Francoise Arnould is wonderful as his ingenue/inspiration Nini, and Maria Felix is devastating as the diva, La Belle Abesse.  As well, look for the glittering talents that surround - the peripheral characters are a delight to behold.  And, of course, the great Edith Piaf makes a brief appearance, as well.Another quality I love about this film is the relatively accurate depiction of 1890's Paris - the costumes, colors and attitudes are well captured.  The truth of the "casting couch" is openly mentioned, and relationships between performers and impresario are depicted with often saddening accuracy.  On a lighter note, the dances are captured beautifully, as well - throughout the film they shine, in rehearsal rooms, dingy bars, and, of course, in the aforementioned finale.Overall, this is a most enjoyable film - and, unlike many "golden age" Hollywood musicals, it doesnt' shy away from the ugly truths of life in the theatre.  Well worth a viewing - and very well worth purchase
Five stars for 1988, "No, thanks" to 2005. Here's my favorite Peckinpah. I'm throwing my two-bits to the 1988 version, which is slower, more elegaic, quietly building power. Dylan's words over Slim Pickens' death scene make that moment too literal in the 2005 edition, the words repeating what we know (it's a great song on its own, separated from the scene). The 2005 version re-edits the scene of Garrett and the prostitutes in a heavy-handed, PC way, and snips out a great image of one of the women staring hard into the face of the uptight marshal (where we're trusted to draw our own conclusions). The film gains enormously from the drained color of the 1988 version, presenting a gray world of desolate choices between one kind of death and another. With the color re-saturated in the 2005 edition, the film tends toward a naturalistic western, which is not in keeping with the ennervated, intangible feeling of the violence. Plus the 2005 cut deletes the line Pat Garrett says to the marshal at the end, "What you want, and what you get, are two different things." The way that line is said makes it just as compelling as the more famous one from "Ride the High Country," "I just want to enter my house justified."On its own, I did like the added scene of Garrett at home with his wife. In a minute or two you could get a whole picture of their marriage. But, even so, I didn't feel it was necessary to the film; you can surmise without it that Garrett has sought respectability by settling down, the kind of woman he would marry and the degree of honor (albeit his womanizing) he would bring to that pact. It is still a very good scene, it makes all those qualities particular, but in my view it does not justify re-editing the film or really belong with the mood and structure of the whole. It could have made an extra instead.
A Classic 80's Movie. Nicholas Cage and Deborah Foreman star in this great movie from the 80's about a girl from the Valley and a guy from Hollywood.  Foreman stars as Julie, a valley girl who, along with her boyfriend Tommy (Michael Bowen) are the most popular couple at Valley High.  However, Julie is getting bored with Tommy because she thinks he's ignoring her.  So, she breaks up with him (on a mall escalator, no less).  After the break-up, Julie and her friends Samantha (Tina Theberge), Loryn (Elizabeth Daily), and Suzie (Michelle Meyrink) head to the beach.  It is here that Julie gets her first glimpse of Randy (Cage).Unfortunately for Julie, she and her now ex-boyfriend Tommy are both supposed to go to a party at Suzie's house.  Randy's friend Fred overhears the plans for the party, and he and Randy plan to crash the party.  Sure enough, Fred and Randy show up uninvited at Suzie's house, but Julie is immediately intrigued by Randy.  The two start talking, but Tommy and his thug friends interfere and throw Randy out of the house.  Now very mad, Randy and Fred go back to the party.  Randy waits in the bathroom for Julie to come in, and the two decide to leave together.  Julie convinces Samantha to come along.Randy takes Julie "over the hill' to Hollywood and shows her some of his favorite places to hang out.  The sparks soon begin to fly between Randy and Julie, and they start going steady, much to the disgust of Julie's friends.  Their relationship goes along very well for a while, but one night at a sleepover, Julie's friends tell her that she must make a choice between them and Randy.  They convince her to get back together with Tommy and dump Randy.   Julie goes along with it, and starts to be very mean to Randy, but does she really feel that way, or is she just covering up her true feelings for the sake of her friends?  Will Julie and Randy get back together, or will Julie do what her friends want her to?This is a great movie.  I've seen it several times on VHS, and I was thrilled to find it on DVD. Nicholas Cage and Deborah Foreman are great in their roles as Julie and Randy.  The supporting actors are very good as well.  This movie was released when I was in high school, so it brings back a lot of memories for me.  The great 80s music played throughout the movie is a huge plus, too.I give this movie my highest recommendation. The story is excellent, and the acting is very good.  Take a trip back to the 80s with this great movie.  "Its awesome"
A classic that ranks among the greatest of black comedies. It is easy to understand why they changed everything but the bare premise of this movie for the 1984 remake.  After all, the 1948 original staggered beneath the weight of massive burdens.  Its star performer not only consented but actually seemed to delight in delivering precisely articulated dialogue in long blocks, one after another--and all at crackling pace, too.  Worse, Preston Sturges' clever, witty script plainly assumed that his audience possessed both general knowledge and willingness to pay attention for whole minutes at a time.  Worst, Sturges' plot satirized both movie stereotypes and audience expectations.Those 1948 audiences, for good and sufficient reasons of their own, did not turn out in droves nor did they shell out much money to see "Unfaithfully Yours."  The 1984 production team did their very best to avoid that dismal fate by jettisoning Sturges' near-perfect script, ruthlessly dumbing everything down and shrinking the film to fit the talents of twinkly little Dudley Moore.(Rex Harrison to Dudley Moore, what a falling off was there!)Harrison plays British conductor, Sir Alfred de Carter, whom the script clearly expects the audience to identify with the real conductor, Sir Thomas Beecham.  The initial satirical thrust at  audience expectations is that de Carter turns out to be a super-egotistical prima donna rather than the smooth, lovable and--yes!--twinkly Sir Thomas.  By a series of satisfactorily ridiculous plot developments, Sir Alfred becomes convinced that his beautiful and much younger wife is having an affair with his assistant.Sir Alfred has a high comedy encounter with a detective played by Edgar Kennedy, one of the finest second bananas in movie history.  The detective does his level best to convince the wronged husband to ignore or forgive his wife's little failings, lest he lose far more than he can ever hope to gain from shallow, trifling revenge.  In the course of the scene it becomes clear that the detective had not taken his own advice in the past and now bitterly regrets it.  This is a wonderful scene, and probably Kennedy's last hurrah on the screen, for he died shortly thereafter--a perfect mixture of hilarity and wistfulness.The egotist brushes aside the warnings of the detective and transforms himself into Othello's younger brother.  Before, he had been over-generous and almost too-eloquent for belief with his loving words; now, he sneers and derides.  If he does not quite get around to demanding that his bewildered wife hand over a handkerchief, it is only because time is short and he has a concert to conduct.The performance begins with an overture by Rossini.  The up-tempo music puts the conductor into a manic mood and his mind turns to a plot in which he murders his wife and casts damning suspicion on his rival.  The elaborate machinations of the murder scheme satirize whole flocks of creakily overblown films from "The Bat" to "Philo Vance and the Kennel Murders."  The second selection is the music of the pilgrims from Wagner's Tannhaeuser--a downer after Rossini.  The conductor's imagination shifts from murderous revenge to world-weary forgiveness as it satirizes the emetic nobility of films such as the often-remade "Four Feathers."  Finally, a Tschaikovsky piece  moves Sir Alfred's thoughts to grim competitiveness.  He will challenge his younger rival to a game of Russian roulette with his wife as a reluctant witness--think of about half the films made by John Barrymore or Doug Fairbanks, Jr.After the concert, the conductor rushes off to his home to prepare for his elaborate murder scheme, only to come hilariously crashing against the harsh reality of ruthlessly hostile mechanisms, cheerily incomprehensible operating instructions and painfully fragile chairs.In the end, the conductor's wife offers an explanation that allows him to dismiss all his suspicions and return to his original state of (illusionary?) wedded bliss.With brilliant performances, crackling dialogue, smart plotting and fine physical gags, "Unfaithfully Yours" ranks with "The Ladykillers," "Kind Hearts and Coronets" and "Monsieur Verdoux," the best of black comedies.Five stars.IDLE SPECULATIONS: Good as it is--and it is very good--"Unfaithfully Yours" might have been better still.Rex Harrison, however brilliant he may be in the dialogue scenes, is not by any stretch of the imagination a physical comedian.  Even though screen credit is given to a conducting coach, Harrison is painfully stiff as a conductor and as often as not behind the beat of the music he is supposed to be conducting.  And the physical comedy sequence is weakened by the obvious substitution of a stunt double from time to time--not to mention the obvious fact that Harrison's record player is far funnier than he is.  In 1948 there was an actor of the right age, one who who could have gotten away with the conductor's dialogue and would unquestinably have been side-splittingly funny while conducting or going two falls out of three with the demon record player--Charlie Chaplin.  Now THAT would have been something to see!Then there is the script.  The film ends on a subtly false note.  As "Unfaithfuly Yours" stands now, Linda Darnell's innocent wife neatly explains away every suspicion; she leaves not only her own virtue unblemished but also that of her unpleasant younger sister who throughout the film had been positioned as the eventual fall girl.  At the very end of the film, the fully reconciled conductor and wife turn away to depart for a happy evening on the town.I think that the studio or even Sturges, himself, cut a final  scene to conform to the nervous dictates of the Film Code.  I think that as the happy couple and their friends leave the hotel, they were intended to pass by Edgar Kennedy, the detective who had striven so hard to preserve the de Carter marriage.  I think that Darnell and Kennedy were intended to make eye contact in shared acknowledgment that the pack of lies they had concocted to reassure Sir Alfred had worked.  Then, at last, the conductor's straying wife would indeed have been Unfaithfully His
One of the greatest episodes. This was one of Stargate SG-1's funniest episode ever. You get to finally see The FURLINGS for the first time, too bad it took 200 episodes. (And too bad they may not be real).If you're a Science Fiction fan you'll love the Burns that go around in this episode. Especially the Star Trek and Farscape burns which were Hilarious. This is the perfect 200th episode for those loyal fans that stood by and watched every episode for the last decade.
"Sometimes its not enough merely to teach. One has to punish, as well.". Few films come along that I watch and say "Yeah, that's exactly right.  That's exactly how I feel."  The Magic Christian is one of them.  Its a perfect satire of our culture and perfectly relevant today as it was then.  Peter Sellers and Ringo Starr are well-suited to each other in this off-kilter satire of a billionaire looking for everyone's "price".  Why?  To prove a point.  To punish as well as teach.Some may disagree with me, but I think the movie outdoes the book by some miles.  (...)  In fact, we have TV shows dedicated to just this fact.  Don't people eat bugs on Fear Factor or Survivor?  Do horrendously awful things for that all-mighty dollar?  Yes.Sir Guy Grand, a grand guy (Sellers), and his adopted son Youngman Grand (Starr) commit the ultimate heresy by faking a gigantic luxury liner for the cream of society only to mess with their heads with gorillas, Christopher Lee in full Dracula gear, and Yul Brenner in drag singing "Mad about the Boy" to Roman Polanski.  In short, this film is dangerous and brilliant.(PS to the reviewer who mentions the Beatles.  John isn't in it, its a double ... and Paul isn't singing, he just wrote the song for Badfinger.)Unfortunately, I can't give it a five for two reasons.  1.  Much of the dialogue is ADR'd and Sellers can't give quite the subtle performance he might have done ala Strangelove (another Southern writing project.)  2.  The DVD is pretty much a slap-dash full screen copy of the crappy version that was out on VHS for years.  I hope one day they put out a good version.
A Case Involving an Intriguing Lady!!. +++++This movie is based on the story "The Disappearance of Lady Frances Carfax" (1911) written by Sir Arthur Conan Doyle (1859 to 1930).Sherlock (Jeremy Brett) reads letters sent to him by the vacationing Dr. Watson (Edward Hardwicke).  In these letters,  Watson is especially intrigued by the antics of Lady Frances Carfax (Cheryl Campbell) who is vacationing at the same place he is.There are three things in particular found in these letters:(1) A wheelchair bound major (Julian Curry) saves a drowning Lady Frances.  Afterwards she is "resentful of her rescue."(2) An "unknown horseman" (Jack Klaff) appears and his appearance is upsetting to Lady Frances.(3) Lady Frances' prominent brother (Michael Jayston) visits her.  A loud argument ensues between sister and brother.Sherlock from Watson's letters alone suspects something is going on.  He decides to go to the place Watson is vacationing.  When he arrives, it is discovered that Lady Frances has disappeared.Brett (as usual) does a good job of capturing the essence of the famous gumshoe in his performance.  Curry and especially Campbell also give good performances.Finally, the costumes, background music, and cinematography are quite well done.In conclusion, this is a good movie to watch even if you have read the story it's based on!!(1991;  50 min;  British drama;  made for TV;  full screen)+++++
I love this movie. This movie came out when I was twelve and I have been in love with it ever since. It brought me, a rural farm kid, the magic of Leonard Cohen, Concrete Blond, Was (Not Was),The Beastie Boys, and all of the other wonderful musicians who grace this film. It also brought me Christian Slater in a role that I would later relate to in a big way as a teen. In short, for reasons all sentimental, I love this film. It may not have cohesiveness in the same way "Heathers" does but it has heart and that is something that teen movies seem to lack these days. So watch this flick and be grateful that you are no longer in high school. I know I do
First and Best Doper Flick!. Very enjoyable to those with a Stoney point of view...and even sober folks such as my pop can enjoy this one....There is no mind blowing plot, all these fellas want is to score some smoke, now can't we all relate to that struggle??  Check this out!!!  And also try "Nice Dreams" & "The Next Movie"!  "Still Smokin'" & "Corsican Bro's" are for the hard core fans only...they totally blow.
A missing baby new-year... and no Santa?. This is a must for anyone having young children. Children of all ages should enjoy this cartoon for the Christmas season. Children always like to watch any cartoon about Santa and Rudolph. Not only are you getting one, but three Christmas cartoon classics. I may be an adult, but I still like watching these classics myself
A classic. This is a horror sci-fi masterpiece just watch it...This film reminded me of videodrome and the fly and a little bit of eraserhead it might not be up there with them but its a classic for sure
Brian Regan. First heard his stand-up on CD when I worked at Borders a few years back.  Sometimes he gets a bit carried away (a lotta comics tend to, though), and his comedy comes across dopey, yet easy to relate to.  Clean (no naughty words or uncouth situations here!), family-fun comedy (dirty or clean, as long as a comedian can deliver to the audience well, then he/she is funny in my eyes)
Great acting and deep emotions make this a must see!. This film is very moving. It will remind any viewer not to take their loved ones for granted. The film gets you thinking about how to prepare and makes you ask yourself, how will I react when I lose the love of my life. Enjoy
Excellent movie!. One of Jane Austen's best.  The actors could not be any more perfect.  Who can resist a young Laurence Olivier, and the beautiful Greer Garson
Witty, funny movie gets the "special" treatment. It takes a loan shark leading the way to make Hollywood honest. "Get Shorty" returns in a new 2 disc "Collector's Edition" DVD just in time for the sequel "Too Cool" which will be premiering in theaters in March. Translating Elmore Leonard's novels to the screen can be a tricky business luckily both screenwriter Scott Frank and director Barry Sonnenfeld are both up to the task with an inventive dark comedic film. Chili Palmer (John Travolta) heads west to collect a debt from down-and-out B-movie producer Harry Zimm (Gene Hackman). When Harry can't pay, Chili opts to help him make a movie about, well, Chili Palmer. The catch is that Chili and Harry need a star to make their movie viable. Chili quickly finds that the film business shares a lot in common with the world of organized crime. Chili romances B-Movie queen Karen Flores (Rene Russo) an ex- of Harry's and persuades film star Martin Weir (Danny DeVito) to star in the film but not before running into a Cadillac of very funny mishaps along the way.  Featuring a great performances from Dennis Farina as the clueless Ray `Bones' Barboni, Travolta, Hackman, Russo, DeVito and a pre-Sopranos James Gandolfini, "Get Shorty" positively sparkles with wit and energy.Sporting a new high definition transfer "Get Shorty" looks simply marvelous. With a sharp looking transfer showing a minimum of digital artifacts and no analog flaws, "Get Shorty" deserves the deluxe treatment. The image has amazing depth and an image sharper than Chili's aim. The colors practically leap out from the screen brighter than Harry Zimm's blindingly white teeth from the moment the pink and blue titles pop up on the screen until the moment we hear "cut" at the end. With blacks richer and darker than Chili's stolen coat, MGM has done a superb job of translating this modern classic to DVD. The crystal clear sound comes across with more presence than B-Movie queen Karen Flores' screams.Extras are exceptionally good in this "Special Edition". It's like having seconds of a terrific desert; while no one really needs it, it's great to have just the same. We get a number of notable extras as part of this rich meal. The second disc has three featurettes on different aspects of the film, the deleted "Graveyard Scene", outtakes, the "Get Shorty" party reel, a documentary from Bravo Channel on the making of the movie and a sneak peak at "Be Cool". "Get Shorty: Look at Me" opens the book on how Elmore Leonard came up with the plot for "Get Shorty" and developed the idea. DeVito, Travolta, Hackman, Russo, Sonnenfeld and other key cast and crew participate in this featurette on the production of the film. Full of clips from the movie to illustrate the points made throughout the featurette, it's a great summation of the greatness of this film. It's a 30 minute love fest reminding fans why they love this movie so much. The 20 minute "Get Shorty: Wise Guys and Dolls" focuses on the fun, complex characters of the movie. "The Graveyard Scene" featurette allows Sonnenfeld to comment on the single deleted scene of the movie included the hilarious, well, graveyard scene. Featuring a funny cameo with Ben Stiller, Sonnenfeld clearly regretted cutting the scene but Sonnenfeld couldn't find a place for sequence where it fit. The behind-the-scenes stuff and interviews last longer than the actual scene itself. "Going Again" features footage from outtakes and a discussion from Sonnenfeld about the technique of using long takes, pulling out the best bits and putting it together to make magic. The sneak peak for "Be Cool" promises that the sequel to "Get Shorty" promises to be as funny as the first film. Set in the music business, it may not be more than a promo piece for the film but it gives viewers enough of a taste to rope `em in.Bravo's "Page to Screen" documentary featuring Peter Gallagher features plenty of interviews with critics, other writers and focuses as much on how Elmore Leonard comes up with the material in his books, writes them and, once again, takes us behind-the-scenes of the production of the movie. The real treat is hearing from the real Chili Palmer discussing the "reel" Chili Palmer and Leonard's character. The "Party Reel" mainly consists of bits and piece of cut footage and behind-the-scenes stuff nothing earth shattering or all that funny. In addition to the "Get Shorty" theatrical trailer and we get two promos one for "Fargo" and one for "The Good, The Bad and The Ugly". My only complaint is the MGM "promo" opener that they put on ALL of their DVDs. It's annoying and, unfortunately, there's no way to pass it by. It's a pretty minor issue but the fact that it's on all of their DVDs makes it a real pain.A dry, witty commentary by Barry Sonnenfeld highlights this disc. The only drawback is the lack of participation of Travolta, Hackman, Russo and DeVito. I realize they have busy schedules but it would have been a real highlight and perfect addition to this DVD.A hip, funny comedy that continues to deliver in spades, "Get Shorty" looks terrific, sounds great and has some terrific special features. This is an example of a re-release that's worth upgrading. Definitely worth owing on DVD and purchasing a second time if you love the movie. This IS the version to own.
Best Special Effects Ive Seen In A While. I Will Give The Film 5 Stars For The Awesome Special Effects Story Line And Fight Scenes...If Your Into Really Good Special Effect Fight Scenes This Is What Your Lookin For !!!!1 Also Try There Sequal " The Storm Riders " Which A Great Movie Also !!!!! WTG Guys !!!
another good nicholson film. this is the story of two navy lifers who are given an assignment of transporting an 18-year old,for a petty theft,to prison.one of the lifers feels pity for the kid and decides to show him a good time before he has to serve his 8-year sentence.the prisoner it turns out has not experienced much and the 2 show him what he's missed all within a 5-day period.jack nicholson puts in yet another great performance,while otis young and randy quaid put in credible performances.other people make appearances like carol kane as a prostitute and look for a gilda radner before her saturday night live days,in a brief apperance.this is a very good film but i wouldn't say it were great,for no particular reason other than it not being that interesting of a story nor a film that i would want to watch over and over again.it definitely is worth seeing though,at least for nicholson fans
Interesting Film. I found this film very interesting and thought provoking.  It is the perfect movie to watch on a dark raining night.  Scary and it reminded me of a gothic tale of old.  Loved the costumes.It is also a perfect movie for a "movie" club, to discuss
I loved it. What a great movie. good time you have watchign this one.Its a one of a kind movie.if your a star wars or star gate fan like my girlfriend, you will truly like this movie. its the only sci-fi movie with ''sad'' part in it. really good movie suited for nearly anyone. watch this one with your girlfriend rather then your beer drinking pals.
Unique Time-traveling Tale from Germany. People like me who lived through the fall of the Berlin Wall (1989) but were a little too young at the time to be paying much attention will like this blast to the past. Much of the wit is summed up in one of the scenes (which is only seen in the deleted scenes) when the lead character's friend mentions his situation is a little like the delicate situation in "Back to the Future" (a big hit that was just reaching the Eastern bloc at the time the movie is set). The tale revolves around a boy who has to keep the past alive for the sake of his mother's health and it illustrates both the excitement of those who experienced the west for the first time and the betrayal (in this case felt by his mother) of those who upheld the former regime. It's a clever look at social change in general and a bit of history that hasn't yet been seen often in film. I loved it
dumb humor. if your into dumb humor...or watching artie lang trying to act in a PG 13 arena....this is a good bu
The Rainmaker. It's a good story- it keeps the pace moving, and inserts nice little scenes of humor.And the best part? It's so close to the actual book.
Love italian. I just love this movie from the Scenery to the story. Real poetry
Doctor Who and the first Download. Doctor who materialised without his Tardis on this, my first timelord download in the amazon unbox, which is much larger on the inside than it appears on the outside.For a very reasonable sum, $1.99, my family and I were able to enjoy the first Third doctor adventure after his regeneration, where he encounters the Nestene Conciousness.The down load took only a few minutes although I had some considerable difficulty installing the microsoft program. thanks to the good people at amazon tech support I was able to obtain an alternative download from the gates empire itself which allowed me to enjoy our rental.a great experience and will not be the last. easy to navigate and fun for all the family. someone should tell the timelords on gallifrey about unbox and perhaps they could get rid of all the old type 40 tardis'
Space Adventure. Great movie, good actor's within, a real fun one for us who like the space type movies, worth to be added to your collection
Una pachanga musical!. Si usted es aficionado a la cultura chicana, la msica swing de los aos cuarenta, o de los artistas Edward James Olmos o Lalo Guerrero, esta es la pelcula para usted!  La pantalla se enciende con una avalancha de msica, baile y drama.  La cinta lo lleva a experimentar una noche con el Teatro Campesino del dramaturgo Luis Valdez.  Luzca su mejor tacuche!  Dele brillo a esos calcos!  Pngase abusado que la pachanga va empezar. Simn, carnal
Halloween fans love them all!. Sure it is no where near being as good as the original, but as a fan of the Halloween's I love them all including this somewhat cheesy attempt to keep the story going.  If you are going to believe that a man can be shot and blown up and all that other stuff and can still live on then you cannot complain about this flick.  Plus it has great comedic one liners that will make you laugh.  My opinion is that is still better than half the crap they make nowadays
wanda's opinion. This is one of the greatest movies I have watched. I know I have probably watched the movie twenty times in the past. It  has heart and compassion. It is absolutely one of the best I have see
When The Truth Hurts. What happens when little Max Reede (Justin Cooper) blows out the candles on his birthday cake and wishes his Dad couldn't lie anymore? Fletcher (Jim Carrey) an unscrupulous lawyer (is there any other kind?) happens to be Max's father. When the birthday wish becomes reality things quickly begin to fall apart for poor Fletcher. After all, what good is a lawyer who can't lie? One thing is certain, Fletcher is about to discover how much the truth can both hurt and heal.First let me say that I'm not generally a Jim Carrey fan. I find his films inane, vapid and predictable. That along with his excessively loud, over-the-town acting style absolutely drives me crazy. With that said, I must now confess that I've found one exception to that rule. That exception is the unrelentingly hilarious 'Liar Liar.'All the things that drive me insane about Jim Carrey somehow work wonderfully in this film. It also contains a cast of some of my favorites; Maura Tierney as Fletcher's ex-wife Audrey and Cary Elwes as her new love interest Jerry. I also have to mention the very sexy Krista Allen makes a brief but memorable appearance as the 'girl in the elevator.
I enjoyed the season premeir emensely. I enjoyed this series premier tremendously and am looking forward to watching the rest of the series.  Enterprise started before I had my PVR and was either on at a time I was unable to watch it or I never made time.  I watched one episode of Star Trek the Next Generation yesterday and it peaked my interest in watching some Star Trek episodes again.  Rather than watch episodes I've already seen, Enterprise looks like a great way to enjoy Star Trek episodes.As far as privacy concerns mentioned in other reviews, if you're paranoid, the internet isn't for you.  Keep your private things private, and not on networked computers.  Hopefully Amazon will remove reviews that do not at all pertain to the show they are attached to
AWESOME FEEL GOOD MOVIE!. THIS MOVIE IS AWESOME!  I WISH MORE PEOPLE HAD A CHANCE TO SEE THIS IN THE THEATERS!  I LOVED IT SO MUCH AFTER SEEING IT OVER MY FRIENDS HOUSE I BOUGHT IT HERE.LOVE :
Bloody amazing. When you consider the physical condition Olivier was in, his performance is pretty damn good. The supporting cast are mostly excellent, with Diana Rigg a standout as a venal, vicious, voracious, yet strangely feline and alluring Regan, and Dorothy Tutin not far behind as a grabby and lustful Goneril. Leo McKern is the definitive Gloucester
Great Movie. This movie is top-notch hilarity, this is a must-own for Sandler fans or slapstick comedy fans. This movie is a classic in many ways and has a lot of firsts for later Sandler movies(like Rob Schnieder). A great movie, has almost non-stop laughs, I recommend it
Rare Laserdiscs-dvds Movies Collector. Wild Style's one of my greatest movies ,I Own the dvd And you Should too...you wont regret addin' it to your Collection :
Used to teach. I used this movie as part of my Hispanic Heritage Month (october) lesson in the classroom.  We did a study of Jaime Escalante and Salvador Dali.  The children really enjoyed the movie.  We just watched the classroom scenes (teacher's version of editing for content and time), while I explained what was happening.My class loved it and so did I
Can I Have A Turn On Top?. Paraphrasing, this is what our hero asked the Devil, and what the Devil asked God, and what got him into this mess. Too many good moments to miss, this is a nearly perfect movie. Its never mentioned in the recap of Stanley Donen's work, but it should be. Sadly, no commentary, but the extras described on the DVD seem to be well worth it. Excuse me now, as I am going to contribute to the Fund for Depraved Criminals in memory of the great artists who made this joyful film
The Batman/Superman movie is really good!. The Batman/Superman movie is really good! Batman/ Bruce Wane comes to Metropolis to make a business deal with Lex Luthor. Bruce Wayne is also in Metropolis becuase he wants to date Lois Lane. This story creates tension between Bruce Wayne, Clark Kent, and Lois Lane. Meanwhile the Joker and Harley Quinn are free and they make deal with Lex Luthor to get rid of Superman! This is great animated movie! Bruce Timm did a good job with the story and characters! Highly Recommended! A
A lot of fun!!!. I'm a big fan at the serie and I enjoyed it agai
"When The $@&% Did We Get Ice Cream?!". "The Ringer" is the kind of movie where, upon a quick glance, most people would assume is made strictly to shock and offend. Considering the infamous Farrelly Brothers ("There's Something About Mary," "Me, Myself & Irene") stand by as producers, one could imagine the many cheap-shots this movie would take. Surprisingly, though, it doesn't. And despite the restrictions the movie gives itself, it's quite funny at times. And despite a somewhat predictable plot, it's actually a bit heartwarming and sentimental.Apparently, I'm in the minority of people who actually enjoyed this movie. Then again, I tried not to keep my expectations up too high. For starters, this isn't exactly a Farrelly Brothers movie, so don't go in expecting that type of humor. Sure, it shows up at times, but "The Ringer" is more conventional than those movies. Johnny Knoxville (from "Jackass") is perfect as Steve, a reluctant participant in the Special Olympics, coerced by his uncle Gary, played by Brian Cox ("Manhunter," "Red Eye"). Steve is forced into the games in part to pay off his uncle's bookies, but also to be able to afford surgery to replace the three severed fingers of the man he hired to mow his lawn. The plot does get a bit ridiculous at points, and you can see Steve's happy-ending with Lynn (Katherine Heigl of "Bride Of Chucky"), a volunteer at the Olympics, coming miles away. But despite all that, the movie does a good job carrying a message without being condescending or losing it's sense of humor.If you look at the cover of the DVD or read any reviews and feel the urge to be instantly offended, don't. "The Ringer" is quite well-done, and actually features many mentally-disabled actors in prominent roles. And if that's not enough for you, it's also flat-out funny. It's simply a good comedy with a decent story and an interesting and original angle. Just don't take it too seriously
Beautifully photographed-gets medieval on your *ss. I tend to agree with the high praise here, but I have a few thoughts to add.  First off, every shot is beautifully photographed and there are some simply amazing tracking shots. In that sense, this is an "art" movie if there ever was one, perhaps reflecting it's (alleged) subject matter. Little of this seems flamboyant for its own sake. Another aspect worth note is the medieval "feel" of the movie. At times it really seems as if someone took a film camera back 700 years or so. Oh, and it should be mentioned what tremendous testicles Tarkovsky must have had to take as his subject matter, in early 1960's Russia, a renowned medieval icon painter. This had to be a mighty thumb of the nose to the Soviet state and arguably an act of subversion.Pacing is slow, but no more glacial than movie like 2001, or Once Upon A Time In America, say.But here's the brass tacks for the novices to know: this movie is episodic to say the least, and the only film I know of wherein the title character takes a lengthy vow of silence. When the vow is finally up, the movie seems to lose interest in Andrei altogether, and he becomes a background figure.  But it's here, finally that Tarkovsky shows what he can do with a straight ahead narrative--although that narrative isn't about Andrei. It's about the young son of a newly deceased bell maker, who insists that his father has told the secrets of bell making only to him. It'll mean his head if he's b.s.-ing, and we as viewers aren't sure.  And here's where the movie picks up pace and emotional power.  How much this power relies on the two previous not-too-seemingly-connected hours is hard to say.Oh, and Vladimir gets sacked. Convincingly.There are images and scenes that will stick to your ribs. It will help if you're already interested in art, religion, Russia, or splendid cinematography.  Or bell making, come to think of it. If one of your neighbors begins a medieval smelting process in their back yard, odds are they've been inspired by this film
AN ACE TO YOUR FACE. Lionel Barrymore shines in his interpretation of Stephen Ashe, a brilliant but alcoholic lawyer who succeeds in defending dashing gangster Ace Wilfong (30 year-old Gable) on a murder charge, only to find that his free-spirited daughter, Jan has fallen madly in love with his client...........Jan, a fun-loving socialite is only too eager to dump her aristocratic boyfriend for the no-good gangster. Barrymore's legendary courtroom scene is still powerful and deeply moving today. Remade as THE GIRL WHO HAD EVERYTHING in 1953. Based upon the novel by Hollywood columnist Adela Rogers St. John,(she based the story on her own father) this was Shearer's seventh talkie feature and it's astonishingly modern for 1931
Great. This is a very fun show and i enjoy watching it. i bought all the episodes available and they all worked great! its good to pay less to view
This is the lesson that should be learned by everyone!. I think mankind needs to learn to stop taking the lives of everyone and everything for granted. Would it be difficult to get children to watch a cartoon? Should we make kids watch this world wide? The governments should be forced to watch it to realize that what they have done or allowed to be done was not so great either. The end feels close, doesn't it
I'd throw the drowning man a life preserver.... Just finished watching this DVD.  I'm still trying to figure out what I saw.... I guess I'll have to watch it again with the director's commentary set on.  It's a little confusing but I gave it 5 stars.  Why?  I wasn't sure myself, I just knew I loved it being a huge Dylan fan.  Read the other reviews here and realized why... as some others have mentioned.  Director Larry Charles has done a superb job in filming the musical scenes.  The camerawork creates a small intimate cafe feel.  His band is outstanding and Bob is in his natural setting when he is performing.  The cast of Goodman, Bridges, Cruz, Lange, & Wilson deliver fine performances.  If you aren't a Dylan fan you may not like this movie, but then, you wouldn't be reading reviews of Masked & Anonymous, would you
One of the Top Three Movies of the 90's. It's hard to describe what a great movie this was because there's so much that's great about it. Christian Slater's a nerd during the day and runs a pirate radio show at night, he's like Clark Kent and Superman. He enables the teens to be themselves and lead their own lives, and ultimately causes the reversal of educational discrimination at his new school. Pump up the Volume is the kind of movie that will give you goosebumps. You'll want to go back in time and relive high school all over again.
HG WELLS. This is an amazing service! For only 2 bucks i can watch what i like for the moment. In this case it was HG WELLS. Great biography
Love the new download!. I wanted it for my collection, however you can sift through all the youtube stuff and end up with the same video for free if you want to do the work
Classic James Cagney Performance In One Of The Landmark Gangster Films Of the Depression Era. Few performers have become so identified with one particular type of role as James Cagney did with the gangster genre and even though in later decades he proved his ability in many diverse areas of screen acting his tough guy playing in early classics like Warner Bros Studios hard hitting gangster story "Public Enemy", is what stays in the mind.
Absolutely wonderful. especially for the hopeless romantics.  James Caviezel shines as a man obsessed for revenege.  The character arch of Danets youthful and unspoiled trust in people and friends to an elighted and educated man with a thirst revenge alone is a joy to watch.  No, it's not exactly like Dumas' classic novel, but it succeeds in being both a guy movie and a chick flick with its political politics and sword play along with a man scorned by love.  Guy Peace also puts in a great performance second to his wonderful Momento.  Highly, highly recommended
Madchester Madness. One of the best casts in a long long time, great british comedians such as steve coogan, peter kay, rob brydon, simon pegg. A very funny movies, based on a true story about tony wilson the founder of the hacienda ( a famous nightclub in the 90's in manchester UK), this movie is a must see for people into punk and dance
Passive-aggressive behavior & effects, fabulously acted. Books on passive-aggressive behavior often refer the reader to the 1944 movie Gaslight, where passive-aggressive behavior and its effects are splendidly acted by a cast of old time movie greats.  The term "gaslighting" (attempting to drive someone crazy by hiding things and other psychologically coercive behavior originates from this movie.)  Set in Victorian England, husband Gregory Anton (Charles Boyer) uses a variety of techniques to convince his wife Paula (Ingrid Bergman) that she's crazy.  Smooth-talking, intensely romantic Gregory does a fine job of sweeping Ingrid Bergman's character off her feet and convincing her to marry him after only two weeks.  They move into the Victorian townhouse she inherited from her famous opera star aunt who had been murdered there when Paula was a teenager.  There the self-absorbed Gregory uses a variety of psychological tricks to drive Paula crazy-tricks still in use today like isolating her from visitors, commenting under the guise of concern that she's tired and forgetful, hiding jewelry, etc.  He even tries to make her think the house is haunted.  Ingrid Bergman does a brilliant job of playing the distressed Paula who increasingly doubts her own sanity and is driven to the brink of nervous breakdown.  Gaslight showcases Bergman's acting better than Casablanca filmed two years prior.Bergman and Boyer are helped by a fine cast of supporting actors.  They have an intensely curious busybody old woman neighbor, played by Dame Mae Whitty who snoops on them as much as she can while she gardens or feeds the pigeons.  She reminded me of Angela Lansbury in the television show "Murder She Wrote."  Whitty, born in 1865, was a London stage actress beginning in the 1880s who found Hollywood success in her 70s!  Another fine supporting actress was the feisty cockney-accented young maid.  My friend with whom I watched the movie (whose review appears elsewhere on page) and I were sure we had seen her somewhere before in a variety of roles.  Turns out she was a teenage Angela Lansbury in her movie debut--a role that earned her a best supporting actress nomination and showed that this woman was born to act!  Another fine supporting actor was Joseph Cotten who played Scotland Yard investigator Brian Cameron.It's really a tossup as to whether to give this movie four or five stars.  I'm giving it four stars only because the movie has a slow beginning setting up the story that some modern movie viewers might find a bit boring.  No spoilers, but this is one movie where it's well worth sticking around for the second half and the ending.  You will be well-rewarded for any boredom you may have endured during the first half.  :-)
"Sandy, do you wanna get laid?". "Carnal Knowledge" (1971) directed by Mike Nichols with Jack Nicholson, Art Garfunkel, Candice Bergen, Ann-Margret in an Oscar nominated performance as a sex kitten who wants to marry Nicholson's Jonathan, and Carol Kane and Rita Moreno in the small roles is one of the movies that made 70s so memorable. It is also the movie that keeps reminding me why I love Jack Nicholson of his early years and how grand he was without his "Jackness" which he has developed during all these years. Sandy (Garfunkel) and Jonathan are two college friends and like every straight young (and not too young) man in the world they are obsessed by girls and move from one relationship to another in the course of almost thirty years. Nichols and Jules Feiffer who wrote the play and later adapted it for the screen let us look inside the minds and souls of two educated upper-middle class white males and to learn their very intimate thoughts and secrets concerning their plentiful dysfunctional and joyless affairs and it is not a pretty picture - "Boys begin life not liking girls, later they don't change, they just get horny." The film is honest, uncomfortable, "very slick, very clever".
Both movies worth the individual price. First of all, Sherlock Jr. is a classic.  Even if you've never heard of it, you know of it.  It's the famous movie where Keaton plays a projectionist who falls asleep during the movie and dreams about entering the frames.Now whether you're an arthouse fanatic, a comedy geek, or someone who just likes to be entertained, this movie is perfect for you.  It contains nothing that makes it seem pretentious, and yet its brilliance is so readily apparent it's understood by anybody.  This is certainly a film for everyone, any era, any age.Our Hospitality isn't nearly as great, but it's still wonderful.  The ending scenes with the waterfall are bound to make anyone gasp out loud, and the movie as a whole hurts you with laughter.  Definitely a good movie, and definitely worth the price.Put them together on one DVD, and it's basically a good deal even if it wasn't only about $25.  Only if you're one of those people who gets really obsessive about the formatting of the DVD, beware that the interactive menues are a bit odd.  Nothing to get frustrated over, just odd.--PolarisDi
Kinda Cute, But. . . . . . The traveling plot seemed like a take-off of 'Trains, Planes, and Automobiles' - traveling from NY to Savannah vs traveling from Chicago to NY. Same sequence: airplane delays, then train occurrence, then bus, then jalopy-type car. But, since I totally enjoyed the Steve Martin movie, I also enjoyed 'Forces of Nature'. The writer even threw in some weather and fire, same as 'Trains, Planes, and Automobiles'. Because of the similarities, I rated it four stars instead of five.I thought the movie was cute and I like both Sandra Bullock and Ben Affleck. I saw the movie as being typical of infatuation with a good-looking person to whom we've been thrown together with for a brief unlikely encounter and of indecisiveness prior to the marrage ceremony , but Ben was, indeed, committed to his fiance and to his future, which was a positive attribute on his behalf.Unlike some other reviewers who stated commitment was void, I felt it was very much stated in this movie, in spite of other's around them having their own relationships fall apart.Sarah's life was to be her son and her relationship with him - to build it up after some years of absence. The movie ended correctly. Everyone got what they wanted.Gail Gupton, Author: 'The 31-Day Diet of Spiritual Enlightenment', and 'Seekers of Truth'.
Great Service. We thought the tape was in excellent condition and the delivery service was very efficient
If you build it, SHE will come!. First of all, I really need to ask, WHAT ON EARTH WAS SO BAD ABOUT THIS MOVIE?!?!? This was quite simply the Moulin Rouge! of the 80's. The acting may have been a little cheezy, but it wasn't all that great in Moulin Rouge! either. People need to understand that this is a MUSICAL and musicals aren't necessarily known for their great acting performances. They are noted for their brilliant choreography, songs, and stage settings, which I felt both "Moulin Rouge!" and "Xanadu" contained. Moreover, the story in "Xanadu" wasn't all that incoherent and reminded me a lot of "Field of Dreams" when Kevin Costner is inspired by a voice from an invisible muse to build a baseball field. So, while some of the criticism of this film is justified, I feel much of it is not and it took way more of a beating than it should have. One has to remember that there have been many films made which were raked over the coals by critics, yet the films became enjoyed by many later on
Love the new download!. I wanted it for my collection, however you can sift through all the youtube stuff and end up with the same video for free if you want to do the work
Better than a cup of coffee!. I really enjoyed this video. I am very sluggish in the mornings and don't really have the time for a full workout because of my hectic schedule. What was so appealing to me about this video was that there was a short segment for each morning that I could find time to complete before rushing out the door. It gives me the extra pick-up that I need before a long day at work. Also, I really liked the fact that I didn't need to rewind the tape after I was finished with my segment for the day. I thought the concept behind the video was very clever and perfect for my lifestyle. Thanks Ann
it was good..but not Jet's best.. it was an ight movie..had lots of action, pretty gory compared to other Jet li movies.. the movie has a cheesy plot..but the action covers it all.. the fighting in the movie cant be compared to that of Fist of legend (wich in my oponion is Jet Li's best work) but its still adds up to great action..one things for shure, this aint really a hard core martial arts movie..theres is alot of shootings..stabbings, killing..gory scenes and sum distrubing scenes..pretty dark for a jet li movie..thats why i kina understand the "R" rating.. the swearing is really fun too..because the movie is dubbed horribly..but its still ok..like when they say muther effer..in one scene a crime boss says " we better get that muther effer" lol i laughed,,there is really corny lines through out the movie..i guess it gives it comic relief..as the movie is a little too serious...the hip hop in the movie also pissed me off, they actually thought it was kool to slip sum rap tracks in the background..well it made it annoying... some simple music woulda been good., overall the movie is good, hell even ma dad liked it..dont think..Jet li has made better crap then this..if u wana waste time n watch a movie..watch this....ight im out..peac
Lit my candle. Not following the recent Broadway scene very much, I wasn't really aware of what a sensation "Rent" was several years ago when it debuted. I became more aware of it when it was satirized in the Southpark picture "Team America" and after my church intergenerational choir sang the show's "theme" song "Seasons of Love". Then one of the kids that I worked with in a local musical said Rent was one of his favorites, so I was a first-weekend attendee at the theatre. The story is important as it depicts gays, lesbians, drag queens and drug addicts as real people struggling with life, love (and AIDS) just like so-called "normal" people. Being in the rock style, the songs aren't necessarily "toe-tappers" that you end up whistling on the way out of the theatre (though "Seasons of Love" comes close, particularly if you've sang it at least two dozen times, and "La Vie Boheme" is a showstopper--the plot is supposedly based on the opera of that name), but overall the music is very exciting and integral to the story. The cast moved almost en masse from Broadway to Hollywood--Wilson Heredia, a Tony winner as drag queen Angel, should have contended for an Oscar as Supporting Actor. I've read that there was some concern about mainstream Hollywood director Chris Columbus (Home Alone, Harry Potter I and II) getting the job, but I don't see that the picture suffered for it--maybe some unconvincing special effects are the worst of it. As a rock opera, it takes some time to get used to having almost all the dialogue sung rather than spoken. Overall another solid four star film----definitely recommended to fans of modern musicals, to those in marginalized communities, and to those with art in their souls.P.S.  Afterwards I got hooked on the soundtrack CD for a few weeks (months?) but that's another review
a great pegan to the original "nosferatu" and a very original take at the same time. the whole movie can be summed up in two words klaus kinski!! his take on the "nosferatu"(vampire) is one so removed from most vampire movies that it really is strikeing in its tone. our vampire is one who has been one for so long that most,if not all,of the human qualities he had are long gone and he is little more than an animal(like the rats he keeps,and looks very much like). he never lets you take your eyes off him once you meet him!! he looks alone and lost in the castle when we see him and the only time we see any life(pun intended) is when he see's harker's wife's picture and in the last scene he has with her! if you get into it this tale will keep you glued to the set long after it ends! a very good film and the transfer is great
FANTASTIC. Me and my godchild love it.  I remember reading Babar as a child and now I love watching the movie as an adult.  There is the most wonderful fun song in this movie possibly titled, &quot;I can take good care of me.&quot;  I can't get the song out of my head.  The artwork looks just like the book which is neat in a historical sense.  The story values family, friends, and community.  There are a couple of scenes some children may find disturbing, including; Babar's mother's death, a fire where someone is in danger, a baby almost being eaten by a crocodile, and a nightmare with witches and spooky creatures.  My godchild who is only two was not bothered by it, though I know some children may be.  I definetly recommend it.  I think they have a good price on it too
Best of the BEST IS TOP NOTCH !. I will make it Short!  Because I know people don't like long Reviews.This was one the best karate movie of all time. Realistic it is the best movie.The Real Raw Emotion in the movie was shown.  It shows exactly what athletes like this go through.My Favorite Scene is when tommy lee is not kicking the bag hard, and his Coach Says DAMN IT TOMMY what the hell is wrong with you. We going to Korea in 2 weeks.  Then Tommy Wakes up and rememebered what happened to his brother in the ring when he didn't prepare. And Kicks the bag so hard the guy Hold bag falls over.  It meants so much more though than a hard kick.I won't ruin the the whole movie.  HIGHLY RECOMMEND IT.Jubril[...]Teenage Business Phenom
LOVE IT...I never tire of  Xanadu. "Xanadu"  I Love this movie, not only is Michael Beck beyond hot but Olivia Newton John is a delight to watch and hear as well.The soundtrack is infectious as is the movie itself.Gene Kelly is an added bonus even at his age he can still dance as effortlessly  as if it were "Singin In The Rain".The production numbers are so over the top that it gives the movie camp and cheese appeal and it's just plain ole fun.The chemistry between Beck and Newton John is great, is it silly? Yes, but it's a gem.I watch it at least 3 times a year and never get tired of it. Actually it becomes more endearing.I rank it in my top 5 musicals of all time.
in a class by herself. when it comes to Action Films,Sex Appeal&amp;Drama Pam Grier gives it all.these films represent A WOMAN AHEAD OF HER TIME.WOnder WOman,Charlie's Angels Combined ain't got Nothing on PAM Grier.She is all of that all  ROlled into one.these films Showcase Her in Action.Very  Bright,Sharp&amp;Sexy.She is Very Underrated.SHe is Long Overdue
Poker Players Only?. There seems to be mixed reviews about this movie. One either likes it or has very little if any response. I'm a poker player and I loved the story and the cast is excellent. If you like poker as well as suspense, I believe this film will be very satisfying to you. If you don't fit that description, it's still worth a look
SWEET REVENGE. EVIL DEAD's director Sam Raimi, Tim Burton fave composer Danny Elfman and Oscar winner Frances McDormand contribute to elevate this comic book style vendetta drama.  Liam Neeson (Oscar nominee for SCHINDLER'S LIST) plays a mild-mannered scientist who is attacked by a bunch of thugs after incriminating documentation held by Neeson's girlfriend McDormand.  Left for dead, he manages to get resuscitated by cameo Jenny Agutter, and he embarks on continuing his experiments which dealt with reconstruction of human skin.  This also includes vengeance on the men responsible for his attack.  Neeson's performance is a little over the top (think Vincent Price) but McDormand is very good as the girlfriend, and Colin Friels and the irrepressible Larry Drake (two time Emmy winner for LA LAW) shine as the nasty villains.  Directed with flair by the accomplished Raimi, DARKMAN is one of the earliest vendetta flicks and it still packs a pretty good punch.  Watch for Raimi fave Bruce Campbell in a cameo at the end
Beautiful Film. Most likely this review will not be very helpful to anyone, but I wanted to comment on how beautifully done this film is.  I am a long time U2 fan and had seen Rattle and Hum, but didn't get around to purchasing the DVD until late 2005.  The fact that the music is wonderful is a given, but the cinematography is just astounding.  I love how you get to see everything from every point of view.  You get to see what the band sees on and around the stage, including the breathtaking sea of fans.  You get to see what the fans see -- the spectacular lighting and silhouettes.  You get to hear what the guys think and feel off-stage as well as on.  And of course you get the passionate music.  The film is as beautiful to watch as it is to listen to.  I couldn't ask for more
Kiss Me Kate 1953. When two squabbling ex-marrieds are cast as squabbling  Renanaissance romantics in a musical "The Taming Of the Sherew 1952" , life imitates art , art imitates life -and it all proves no musical comedy imitates KISS ME KATE , the backstage / onstage delight from the 1948 Broadway smash and featuring 14 peerles Cole Porter (1891-1964) songs . Howard Keel (1919-2004) and Kathryn Grayson (1922- ) are the tangeled twosome So in Love despite her i hate men flashpoints . Ann Miller (1923-2003) adds heat , razzle-tap-dazzling .Zesty Choreography by Bob Foss (1927-1987) and Hermes Pan (1909-1990)Under George Sidney (1916-2002) nible direction . So brush up your Shakespeare and Enjoy . Kaste wont just Kiss you . Shell floor you !. DVD includes vintage documentary shorts : Mighty Manhattan and New Yorks Wonder city , the pure digital transfer in high resolution and enjoy both movies . Highly recommende
manical suspense that only CAINE can provide!. in this low budget thriller starring michael caine as an ad exec who's worked worked all his life to please everyone around him finally sees his chance to better himself in a job promotion only to be passed over by a  younger more ambiotus rookie. confused and distraught on the subway ride a  penhadler bothers caine for money and pushes caine to his breaking point  and in act of rage caine pushes the man in the way of subway. Now knowing  this rage he uses well planed accidents to his fellow collegues and his  nagging wife, and try to maitain his way back up the corparate ladder.  Michael caine is back in the saddle of his villious persona, great film  unitentally funny it really is quite a &quot;shock&quot
It knocked me out of my chair. Being that this film was a parody of "The Most Dangerous Game" (1996) [says, TLA Video] and John Woo's (yes, him) "Hard Target" (1993) ["The Pest" (1997) most closely resembles "Hard Target", which did win awards from Academy of Science Fiction, Fantasy & Horror Films, USA].  It most likely is inspired and adapts from both films--both serious films while this was a farce and satire.  Perhaps not politically correct if analyzing those "Quacky" and karaoke scenes?Some would say too much emphasis on bodily humor, but this is a film about hunting--the outdoors--where men (& women) squat and use pheremones ["Father, I feel funny"] to attract prey!John Leguizamo vs. Jean-Claude Van Damme?  Does it get any funnier?It goes on the shelf next to "Beyond Therpay" and "Sibling Rivalry"
Profound Beautiful but little known film-Ellen Burstyn at her best. This is one of the most spiritual and beautiful films ever made, and it is by far the best work by Ellen Burstyn who doesnt get the recognition of a Meryl Streep but is every bit as good. For some reason this film has never been released on DVD, and it is a shame as the film is timeless, and offers a most beautiful depiction of the human spirit.Perhaps the most conservative religious viewers may be a bit challenged by the film, but it offers a true test of human tolerance, and perhaps the best view of love ever put on film. It is a must see film, and the more people that see it the better the world will be.I was forever touched by the film
You gotta shop at Huckabees!. Crude language, Wild philosophy taken to an extreme.  The attitudes and language are what makes this movie rated R.  Even though it may seem like all fun and games, and you may not want to say otherwise, you know it's more than that.  Looking at the title, it sounds like it could be another comedic happy go lucky film.  Right about the comedic part, but so wrong on everything else.  There are hearts broken in ways you wouldn't have imagined, two Huckabee models and "everything else Huckabees."  Jason Schartzman plays the main character, and I found out that he's the drummer in Phantom Planet, a great pop band!  (I hear he's arrogant though, and this fact only would enhance it.)  Dustin Hoffman and Jude Law are in it.  Mark Wahlberg is truly convincing in this one.  If you like South Park, Daria, or any kind of toilet humor, this movie may just be for you
Not My Favorite Madonna, But Worth It. Dont get me wrong I love Madonna. She beautiful, provocative, talented, and all those things. But this is my least favorite concert, the concert was in support to her racy album Erotica and it was around the time her infamous but 5 star Sex Book was released. She had a few lows during the concert (i.e. Like A Virgin,Vogue,and La Isla Bonita) but she performed her new hits with style and originality! Deeper and Deeper, Erotica, Bye Bye Baby,Fever, Why Its So Hard, and Rain. Madonna was working her bottom off it seemed during the elaborate show. The Girlie Show was splendid, again not one of her best such as Drowned World or Confessions Tour. But would would defiently recommend this its a great item to have for any fan and its an exotic show to be watched. Many will LOVE! Its very racy in some seens, it should be for kids 13 - 15 and up (recommended).
A very human story of love and parenthood. Ok, I'll start off by saying that I'm straight, and have loved this movie since the 80's.  It's wonderful!  Fierstein is so great and Ann Bancroft is the quintisential Jewish Mother, and, in my opinion, basically steals the movie.  Harvey gives a great commentary on this new edition, but if you haven't seen it yet, watch the movie without the commentary first, and then watch it again.  You'll laugh; you'll cry; you'll sing along.
The best romantic comedy drama of the 90's!. People may say that My Best Friends Wedding was the best romantic comedy of the 90's, but I have to say that this one is my all-time favorite! Julia Roberts is great and banked a lot of bucks for the movie studios, however The Cutting Edge proves you don't need big-name stars for a film to excel on all levels. You can read what this film is about already, I just wanted to say that if you have overlooked this or if it is not in your collection already, you are missing out! 5 stars
Informative. Nice little video for my Zen during my long wait at the doctor's office.  Confucius overcame many difficulties
makes my buns hurt. i had this on VHS and enjoyed it very much.  The dance routine can be tricky at first, but it gives your brain something to think about instead of "I hate exercising." the routine is really fun to do (reminds me of jr high dance team).  total body work out leaves muscles happy and a little sore.  results are good
Fab, mostly. Universal released the title in summer 2003 and returns with a "collector's edition" at the same price. The main upgrades are Dolby 5.1 audio and an audio interview with Astrid Kirchherr, the German photographer who took the Beatles' first publicity shots. The anamorphic widescreen images (1.85:1) seem about the same as on the 2003 disc, good but sometimes grainy. Other extras, duped from the old DVD, include a director's commentary, a pair of deleted scenes and various interviews that tend to repeat material. Packaging is a lot classier than on the old DVD."Backbeat" takes the time to let its bogus Beatles perform entire numbers, mostly soul covers. The real music came from a "grunge" supergroup put together for the film by producer Don Was. The new 5.1 audio sounds sensational, with a vibrant and musical surround stage.Director Iain Softley ("K-PAX") tells how he spent six years researching and writing the project, inspired by stylish photos he saw of Kirchherr and her lover Stu Sutcliffe, the Beatles' first bass player. The "Backbeat" script was based on her recollections; it focuses on the couple and jealous guy John Lennon.This might not be a Beatles film, but there's an undeniable thrill when, late in the story, the Paul McCartney character switches to his trademark German bass and the fabled front three wails on "Please Mr. Postman." The film's downer ending gets drowned out by the joys of "Twist and Shout" and the promise of Beatlemania
Nostalgic :). When an individual buys a movie, it is in order to watch it several times (unless one is a reseller).  So, to buy a comedy to think that one will laugh at the same jokes a hundered times is foolish.The movie is enjoyable due to its excellent cast and quirky humor.  There is nothing overbearing about the movie, which is a nice departure from the majority of movies out there.  Two cast members are now gone.  The plot is simple.  The quirks are clever.  Enjoy every now and again when you miss the 1980s, its actors, and the style of thought you had when you were a kid.****
Pure Awesome. This movie was awesome on every level. It had a great cast, great story, and great effects. The transfer and sound on this dvd is top notch as well. If you enjoy old monster movies you'll love the Black Scorpion
Not for everybody. This movie certainly is different. I must say right off the bat thought it is not for everybody. It is the story of a woman who after WWII is checking into a hotel with her husband and comes to find that the porter is or was a concentration camp officer who had used and mentally and physically abused her. But its not that cut and dried. Here is where it gets a little weird. Seems that her 'porter' had developed an almost effection for here and strangely she for him even though she was put thru by him and with him a living nightmare. It is almost like the Stokholm Syndrome of the victim becomes sympathetic to their captor. They become drawn to one another and basically fall in love with one another but because of their past have a strange masochistic and sadistic way of expressing it. There is also a subplot of him protecting her from an Odessa or De Spider type organization of ex-Nazis who after finding out about her want her 'taken care of'. He cannot of course go along with this and does everything he can to protect her.Again this movie is not for everybody and some may not 'get it'. I must say though that this movie is not porn in anyway and is not graphic in that way whatsoever. It is a strange love story that is like nothing else I have ever seen. Check it out and keep an open mind.
The Way things should be. "Anne of Green Gables" shows how a combination of love, honesty, hard work, tolerance and integrity is the perfect mix for bringing out the best from the potential in anyone, even in a non-traditional family. It's an incredibly refreshing break from today's society, where lying and manipulation have become almost a norm in much of the world we know
Possible #1 comedy. I believe this is easily in the top 5 comedies of all time.  The lines are classic and Farley is hilarious.  This is the kind of DVD I could watch over and over.  Farley's lines, vocal tones, facial expressions, body language, dancing and delivery just can't be copied!  One of a kind!  Too bad he is no longer alive
The best historical war drama from the Far East. I have seen many historical war dramas from Far East (mainly China's) and most of them are not only historically inaccurate but have a strong bias toward the enemy.Yi Soon Shin, however, is a rare exception.  Not only is the drama very historically accurate but it is also very comprehensive in detailing the meticulous battle planning of the admiral that leads to each victory but also the political in-fighting between the Chosun political factions (and the second-guessing nature of the king) which causes his eventual death.Also, the special effects are great.  The battle scenes (whether on sea or land) are realisitic and of outstanding quality.The only problem that I can find is that the DVD has not placed sufficient focus on the contribution of the Ming China.  Then again, this is not unexpected since this is a Korean drama focusing on the great admiral.Also, the entire selection should have 104 episodes.  I don't know why it stops at 101.If you want to have a more comprehensive knowledge on the subject, try Samuel Hawley's Imjin War (which portrays Yi Soon Shin more accurately by quoting original sources).Any who is only intered in the fighting may also want to check out Stephen Turnbull's Samurai Invasion (which has more colorful maps and detailed description of battles from the Japanese perspective).Lastly, anyone who is a fan of samurai warfare may want to check out Shogun:Total War by Creative Assembly (now in Gold version).
Serious Science Fiction Shocker. Tuesday is Soylent Green Day.That ominous statement is delivered in the film as a kind of TV advertisement, an informational message aimed at the desperate denizens of an utterly socially ravaged world not so far removed from our own.  Tuesday is a day they can look forward to because they can get Soylent Green.  Considering the dismal nature of this future society, it's something which is sadly believable.This film remains one of the more starkly realistic and disturbing portrayals of a future in which people have almost nothing of their own - including food and shelter.  They have little human dignity left either.  This is not the glorified future of Star Wars with blinking lights and merry talking droids and wise teachers over flowing with hopeful messages.  It's a dirty, ridiculously over crowded nightmare where people treat each other as little more than cattle and even love is a dangerous luxury.Charleton Heston plays a cop investigating the brutal murder of a powerful business man.  In his quest to find the truth, he uncovers a thing so shocking it takes away loved ones, nearly robs him of his own sanity and leaves the viewer with such uneasiness it approaches the dark tone of a horror movie.However what makes Soylent Green so powerfully unsettling is that so much of the fictional story could indeed come to pass.  Indeed, this cautionary tale is even more timely now than when it debuted back in the 1970's.  If you're looking for a sci-fi romp through a colorful world of zippy space ships and wacky alien races, look elsewhere.  This is hardcore uncompromising science fiction which will stay with you
OH MY SWEET GOODNESS - AN IRRESISTIBLY IRRESISTIBLE COMEDY. Green Card is a MUST MUST MUST. One man is foreign and wants a green card to get into the United States, and a woman wants to become a landlady, but must marry first. So what do they do to get what they want? They marry - THEN fall in love. You'll howl with laughter and literally pummel your fists to death with this movie - because Green Card is THE irresistibly irresistible  comedy...
My man Dr Smith is a riot in this episode. Dr Smith and the Robot go hog wild, switching personalities and swapping insults.  This is a great episode
If Only.... Sometimes you watch a film and it inhabits you.... it gets under your skin. Ballad of a Soldier is such a film. And sometimes a work of art provides an affirmation of what you've always believed. This too is the case with this remarkable, deeply moving film from Kruschev's Soviet Union.The camerawork is exceptional, the black and white tonality is exquisite, and even though the tale told could be minimalized by labels such as corny and manipulative and obvious, at heart it's a classic story of love desperately trying to survive in the midst of madness. It's riveting - you can't take your eyes off the screen - and it's compelling, in that during this film (and for days after it) the most important thing in your heart will become the hero's reuniting with his love. Deeply moving... and I don't know if I will ever forget this performance by the shimmering Zhanna Prokhorenko.The tragedy of this remarkable film is that it could have been used as an instrument to teach the American people they were being sold a lie by their government. That lie, endlessly hammered into our heads in grade school and junior high, was that "The Russians don't value life like we do."  We were taught to view the Soviets as grey, unattractive potato-like people in shabby clothing who wanted to conquer Main Street America, though it was never really explained to us why they would ever want to do that, especially after losing over 22 million of their own citizens in the last war... (oh I forgot, they don't value life like we do.) We were taught there was a missile gap...with JFK claiming that the Russians had thousands of missiles aimed at our back yards...  which we now know was an enormous and conscious exaggeration (sound familiar?)If every American had had the chance to see this film in the early Sixties and had mustered up the inner strength to speak truth to power, the contemporary history of the United States and the world just might have been different. You could have shown this film to an audience of farmers and their families in Kansas in 1960, and that audience would have seen themselves on the screen. And they would have wept as they left the theatre.The Soviet people were not our enemies. Their government definitely at times was our adversary, but the demonization of the Soviet people by our leaders and our media was and remains absolutely unforgivable, a historical sin.A brilliant, heartwarming and sad film, with a profound lesson not too late for the learning.
Awesome Episode!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!. Scooby Doo rocks!  This was an awesome episode, and an awesome way to download some of the earlier episodes of Scooby.  Fun stuff, and an inexpensive download
One of the BEST movies EVER; a cult classic. I consider the plot, the actors, the acting, the special effects and believability to be all top-notch grade A1 quality. I never tire of watching this movie whenever i flip through channels and see it on-- i have to stop and watch it. The cast is hot, the inuendoes are cool, it has a range of emotions-- for years, i thought the games came after the movie and was surpised to find out there were games of the same name. There is a good mix of seasoned, experienced actors and medium-to-new ones, and the general tone is serious, believable, punctuated with joy and sadness and suspense. It is hard not to cry during a couple parts, when someone dies, or is rejected because of their religion, even though they try to hide it, and i have even seen it soooo many times, and still shed a tear (when someone nice gets picked on in the movie). The loyalty and sacrifice evident in the film is uplifting and inspiring. It's one you get mad or frustrating if u miss the beginning, not because it is hard to catch-up or follow, because it is pretty easy to follow, but beacause if you mis the beginning then you know have missed some good opening scenes and a few bits of detail that only add to the beauty of this tapestry. This is an ultimate classic good one, that far outshines Starship Troopers any day of the week. I think they should have made a sequal (and they probably should advertise those games; i found all but one or 2 of them on sale to try out- AWESOME; can't wait). Definitely a movie you might want to watch every few months, like the Breakfast club or one of the Star Wars movies, or Star Trek. Beautifully conceived and executed. This movie makes you feel like you are there, and a part of the great, desperate mission to save Earth. Suspenseful parts, and ending too. Excellent script, acting, and emotions. I can't believe someone would not like it
Another good CSI:NY. Though CSI:NY is most least favorite of the three CSIs, they still manage to make a good one sometimes.  This is one of those good ones
Great Episode. This is the first episode where we really see the heart of Tony in his dealings with a teenager struggling with the horrible death of his father. A must see
no title. Another movie with sniffling and Kleenex.  Tom Hanks, as I foresaw in "Big", is absolutely superb.  Another comic, like Robin Williams and Bill Murray, with marvelous depths.  And yet the movie is not really about a man with AIDS, as all the critics say it should be, and then berate it because it isn't; it's about society's reaction to gays and AIDS, a much broader subject.  On that scale, it delivers well.  We don't need detail scenes of Tom Hanks and his lover, or his facing the disease, or any other of the nitty-gritty the critics said was lacking.  I think they missed the point entirely.  Washington was society, and his slow progression from homophobia to understanding is what Demme is trying to say to the audience.  And, increasingly, I am thinking, we should be out there, living life, helping people, instead of watching them on a two-dimensional screen.  Maybe movies really distance us from life, instead of imparting more knowledge.
COOL FLICK. This rocks!!! Well acted, Good Sound Track and the one thing I also love is it has that 80's feel even though it came out in the early 90's. My favorite thing is at the time there was nothing like it!!
Most Notorious Record Label Ever. If you're a fan of Tupac, Dr. Dre, Snoop Doggy Dogg, etc., you should watch this documentary on tha record label that made them (except Tupac). The documentary tells the story of the label from before it was even created, to its demise. It contains footage of Tupac, Dr. Dre, Snoop Doggy Dogg, Tha Dogg Pound, and interviews with other DeathRow artists such as Jewell, RBX, Pretty Ricky, etc. It talks about the conflict between Ruthless Records and DeathRow, rooting from the problem between Eazy E, Jerry Heller, and Dr. Dre., how Dre and Harry O (Michael Harris) helped to start DeathRow, how criminal lawyer David Kenner was involved, Suge Knight, Tupac, when Dre left DeathRow, and everything else that happened with the label. It's a really interesting and informative documentary, and I strongly reccommend it to any fan of hip hop
BRAVO!. Pretty Village, Pretty Flame provides a rare glimpse and an objective account of the war in Bosnia-Herzegovina in the 1990's.  The movie tackles the brutality and complexity of a war that has repeatedly fallen victim to distortion and propaganda by different parties with different agendas (both direct and indirect "players" with a high stake in the Balkans).  The cast have truly outdone themselves with their performances, which are extraordinary to say the least!  All the actors, without exceptions, give it their 100% and it really shows (the chemistry is AMAZING)!Very well written and very well presented, the movie is without a doubt worth watching and one to seriously consider adding to your movie collection!
The last picture show review. A fine picture about life in a small Texas town. Easily a classic if they would give the added footage back to the directo
Its more than a sci-fi comedy !. Gremlins 2 should definately be considered a superior sequel. Everything about this movie is top notch and for B-flicks that usually is not the case. Even the critics who despised the first Gremlins gave this movie good reviews. So much creativity was put into this film that it surprises me Spielburg didn't return to the project(Joe Dante did return). Everything from character development, stage settings, the music, and overall story were well thought out and you can tell that the actors enjoyed playing their parts and had a good time on the set. Gremlins 2 by no means takes itself too seriously. The first portion of the movie gives you the impression that it will be rushed though it doesn't end up that way. Four of the characters including Gizmo return from the first Gremlins and the gremlins themselves are designed a bit differently though it is definately for the better. Regarding my comment on the creativity of this movie, you must see it for yourself. This gremlins sequel (superior sequel, mind you) gets the DVD treatment it deserves like Terminator 2 did in terms of bonus features (okay, Terminator 2 had alot more but you get my point). Each feature is worth viewing and there are also some easter eggs a.k.a hidden features. At first I hoped for a Gremlins 3 but I don't see how it would rank up with this one. Even if you happened to not care much for the first Gremlins, you still should give Gremlins 2 a look. I honestly know someone who didn't care too much for Gremlins but told me they really enjoyed the sequel
Awesome!. I can watch this movie over and over....But who couldn't with Christian Bale in it!The gun battles and fight scenes are great.It is a must have
A great addition to the farm. I bought this toy for my son to go w/ his Animal Sounds Farm. It's a great addition for the farm. He loves the toys and the video.
2274 my  phat white uggly old 36 year sandled man foot!. I was an innocent babe of "6" when this movie came out and only just discovered it, ironically when I was 30 back in 2000.  Ha!  Asside from the appearence of people(plasti-face surgury done right,) most LESS intelligent people, in particular a real life plasti-face on some Fox show that had so much "stuff" on her face and body she could barely speak(though had nothing to say) is the reality of it.  You cannot be someone you aren't and if you do you run the risk of being Frankenstien's monster.  She was(in real life).  My brother's college classmate wanted a big chin over his mousey face and so now has a  plastic pile-o-crapola under his neck Ha!  for being so stupid, I say.  this movie is actually a walk in the park compared to what is happening today and shows the "future" is sooner than one realises.  The nasty nineties(which I adored) became the neat-n-spiffy 21st century.  Sharply ascending zippers and high-strung people who struggle to hide thier uggly character(el demon).  That is New York City(git u rope!)  Of course this movie-show(a coloaklial 70's term) is in a "Ultra" modern environment(nowadays that is an obsolete term replaced with "Post" Modern). with a method of escape in the rural countryside of hell.  The domes(remenscent of Dr. Who's Genisis of the Daleks, Kalide Citedel) is a beautifully done symbol of the future that is not the Earth we know today(or America we knew in 1970+)  Typical 60's/70's mentality of actually HAVING a place to escape from the hum-drum pretty boiez school but what evah!  Farienhieght 451 playes out exactly the same. In reality, their will be no escape from a totalitarian scociety, those in charge are too cleaver and the rest of us too stupid.Duh End
A classic offbeat western. This is one of my all time favorite western movies.  I recommend it to Paul Newman fans and western fans.  Notable for first appearance of Victoria Principal
Probably the Best Drama Series Ever Made. I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out
Incredibly Moving. I originally saw this IMAX movie in Hawaii, at the Polynesian Cultural Center 3 years ago...and bought the soundtrack, always hoping to get the DVD.  Much to my amazement, the movie was included for my PC as one of the features for Windows XP.  Anyway, the music, narration, and footage is breathtaking, I left the IMAX theatre feeling physically off-balance because of the motion of the seas and the ocean, and so moved by the magic of it all that I was teary-eyed the rest of the day.  I ended up at Sunset Beach on Oahu's NOrth Shore that evening watching the sunset and had the beach to myself. It is one of those days that you will never forget in your lifetime, it is still so vivid, and watching this DVD brings every cell in me back to The Living Sea and the beaches of Hawaii.  Absolutely moving and breathtaking...even when watching on the small screen vs. the IMAX screen.  You will not be disappointed
Uncle Buck Rocks!. Uncle Buck is absolutely hilarious, and no better actor then John Candy to play this role! Uncle Buck is a Slobby, Unorganized, Middle-Aged Man, and is asked by his brother to stay over his house, so he can take care of his 3 kids, while he and his wife are out of town visiting her sick father. Even though Uncle Buck seems like a careless slob, we get to see his paternal side as we see how he actually really cares for each of these children. Best scenes are the ones where he has to look after the oldest child who is a rebellious teenage girl, also starring in this film is a very young Macaluay  Culkin and Gaby Hoffman as the 2 younger children. This movie is a classic, and I totally recommend it! Not to mention that it's a John Hughes film.
Laugh out loud funny. I've seen Stephen Lynch live, in this Comedy Central special, and heard his audio cds.  Live is by far the best experience but this video is a close second.  The live audience really enhances the experience.  This is some truly funny stuff
upwardly mobile. I'm no longer in the target audience for this movie.  I realize that.  I checked out this DVD not as a lame attempt to convince myself that I'm still young and hip.  I actually was interested because I heard it was the first American major motion picture to feature Asian characters as the leads but not stereotypically, not utilizing the Asian ethnicity as a comic device.  Not as comically impish cartoon characters, not as martial artists or wise sages.  Also, I really like White Castle burgers.I wasn't disappointed.  The lead characters are two Asian American men who have reasonably well-developed, three-dimensional characters.  That was refreshing.  However, I wouldn't say this movie is free of stereotypes.   The Asian women in this movie are definitely in the mold of the church-going, hard-working but ultra-dorky Asian.  And, in fact, all the women in this movie are stereotypes of one sort or another.  Come to think of it, even the Asian men in this movie, outside of the two leads, are stereotypes.  I'm thinking of the budding entrepreneur asking Harold for a letter of recommendation, and also of Kumar's hard-working doctor father, forcing Kumar into a series of fixed medical school interviews.  And the two Jewish stoners.  And the white, racist skateboard punks.  But, okay.  Little steps.Some of the humor in this movie really worked for me, such as Harold and Kumar inexplicably happening upon a lion in New Jersey, and riding it to their next point of adventure.  Some of the humor is vulgar, gross-out humor that didn't work for me.  I'm not opposed to vulgarity and gross-out humor when it is in the service of good comedy ("Borat" being the most obvious recent example, or the "Blazing Saddles" campfire scene being a more classic example) but here it felt like it was in lieu of comedy.  Cheap laughs.  Again, though, it probably worked, in the theater, on the intended audience of inebriated adolescent boys.Not great but I'm glad I saw it.  An overall thumbs up.  I also appreciated some of touches on the DVD, such as the backdrop of Harold and Kumar sitting in the car during the main menu, which is not a still from the movie but a good twenty minutes of the two of them sitting there driving, occasionally asking each other what is taking the viewer so long to make a selection.  Once you realize it's not on a short loop, you're obligated to sit and watch it and see how long it can go on.
Another kids movie being underrated by the adults. Wow some people take children's movies too seriously. I own Harriet the spy and i still love it the same since it came out and i think it is a Nick classic. If you think about it its a shame the new generation of kids have to grow up without movies like this. Harriet the spy does have a few things in it that seem like its not for children but if you pay attention and watch it to the end it also teaches you to appreciate what you have and plenty of other good morals. The movie description is a bit simple and complicated at the same time Its about an 11 yr old that wants to be a writer but her spying is her writing actually its more like shes exploring and writing everything she sees. You cant just read reviews about the movie you have to see it cause some of the reviews dont do this great movie any justice. The acting is great and the story line is very original and thought provoking. If your a parent and you would like to know if this is a good movie for your kids well im tellin you it is. I was 8 when it came out and it has made me look at some things differently. This is a great movie and you shouldn't let your kids miss this and this definitely will teach children to appreciate good friends and more important good parents. I'm sorry if this review doesn't help or give a good movie description but this is a very underrated movie that will leave a good impression on kids not a bad one
JASON  &  THE  ARGONAUTS. Very  good  fantasy  movie.  Excellent  special  effects.VERNON   KESTLE
Great for all fitness levels. I am 50 and have done some form of exercise since I was 25 years old.  For about a three or four year period I got lazy and gained about 50 pounds.  One day I was sitting around feeling sorry for myself and saw the Leslie tapes (1, 2, 3 and half hour walk package).  I ordered and, to make a long story short, it gave me the incentive to exercise and have fun.  Before I knew it, I lost 45 pounds and am probably in better shape than I have been since my 20s.  I now walk, do stepper, work out with weights, watch what I eat and do Leslie's tapes at least once per week.  I do a combination of the one mile and three mile.  That four miles goes by quickly and it is fun!!  I just recently ordered Leslie's 'I Can' tapes from Amazon and can't wait to use them
"If they want a witch, I'll give em a witch.". This movie touched me in so many ways. To see the talented Sigourney Weaver play the part of Dian Fossey is a treat. The raw emotion conveyed when "Dian" goes after Vanvecton for having stolen a baby gorilla still gives me shivers. You can see the fury portrayed in Weaver's eyes.
I Want to hold the baby!. I love this DVD it is so funny you get to see thumbsons watching the movie(s). I love thumbtanic that is a LOL. I love the Sex Change Booth. I thought that was funny.Thumb was was funny Bunhead was picking her "nose"  and When black helment head man said Luke I am your... MOTHER!!!!THUMBS UP!!!!!!!!!BUY THIS DVD TODAY!!!
The art of gore. I've seen a lot of really bloody, disgusting, sleazy, icky, and all-round untidy films in my day, and they've worked and failed on every level. What sets Riki-Oh apart is its incredible originality with how far it's willing to take things over the top.Take a film like Cabin Fever, which thinks that the very idea of sleaze is enough to drive a feature film. We watch, bored and annoyed, as characters we don't care about rot and vomit blood on each other. The misconception that blood is enough to drive a story made Cabin Fever the most unbearable filmgoing experience I've ever had.Now take a film like Riki-Oh, which puts forth the effort to come up with new and inspired ways to torture its characters. My personal favorite was the guy who tore out his own intestines to strangle our hero. The assistant warden gleefully comments, "Oscar, you got a lot of guts."Like many Chinese films, it exists to expose the evils of capitalism. It shows a dark vision of the future in which prisons are a privatize enterprise ("like parking lots"). The cells aren't locked, and murder seems encouraged. At one point, you have to wonder if this is how our prison systems are actually perceived.This might not be the smartest propaganda film in history, but that's exactly what makes it so entertaining. It pushes on relentlessly, so involved in the filmmaking and violence that it never bothers to try to make it about anything else. It's everything that a great exploitation film should be
There are no other cases. This is the case!. That was Paul Newman's response to Jack Warden, as Warden massages Mr. Newman's back and tries to assuage him by telling him there will be other cases. ( Pardon me, I always wanted to use the word ASSUAGE in a review ).I live in Connecticut, and my wife and I drive thru Westport regularly, on our way to Trader Joe's. I know exactly where Mr. Newman lives,( I'll never tell ) and I always kid to my wife," I wonder what Paul is doing today? " Then I jokingly say that maybe we'll see him at Trader Joe's ( grocery store ) or at Mario's ( great place for lunch or dinner). Of course if I ever did actually meet him, I'd be stammering and babbling just like Jackie Gleason used to do in his old Honeymooner's television show. But enough of my dreaming. So, how was the movie? Sometimes there are events or moments in a movie that stay with you for a long time. In this movie, those times were: " There are no other cases..This is the case! " and the confrontation Mr. Newman had with the judge, when he proclaims, " I know about you! " as he taps his fingers on the judge's desk. Classic moments.If I ever had a chance to become an actor, and had my pick ofacting coaches, one of them would be Paul Newman. I'm not sure how he does it, but somehow, after watching him on screen for a few moments, I forget he is Paul Newman, and believe he is the character he is portraying.I guess that's the " magic " of great acting. They make it look so effortless. And now onto Jack Warden. He is perhaps one of the most under-rated actors in history. A great performance from a great actor.Back to Paul Newman. The next time you watch one of his movies, watch the pauses...the times when he's not speaking. It's the entire package that makes an actor great. It's the phrasing, the reaction, the eye movements, the pauses and how long he holds them. ( Sure the director has a lot of input too)- but just watch him. What you are witnessing is a STAR in action. As I write this ( June 29, 2006 ) Paul Newman is 81 years old. He may be a little slower, a little more wrinkled, but his acting just gets better with age. ( Watch Empire Falls ). I truly hope he makes more movies. And who knows, perhaps one day I WILL run into him at Trader Joe's or Mario's place. And in true Jackie Gleason form, say to him, " Hubba, Hubba, Hubba. "And that, my friends, will be no act.
Buuuuuuuddddddy. Before yesterday I had seen just about every Pauly Shore movie but this one.  This has to be one of Pauly Shores best works.  Yea he's cheesy looking back on these movies now but as cheesy as he is it makes me laugh and I had a good time watching the flick.  If you have never seen this older movie, give it 2 hours of your time.  Youll be amused
"Alright ladies....lets play the name game ". Reform School girls is an over the top woman in prison cult classic that is FUN FUN FUN to watch. I watched this movie 100's of times growing up in the mid 80's, and it still pleases today. Wendy O Williams is completely mesmerizing to watch, although her acting is pretty bad to say the least. Still the film manages to entertain with its completely unbelievable premise. I love this movie. Pat Ast and Wendy O Williams make this movie what it is, and why Sybil Danning got the DVD cover I'll never know (she's barely in the film).Pat and Wendy (both who have since passed) make great villains though, and are thoroughly enjoyable to watch over and over again. If you like low budget, entertaining prison films with lots of women, violence & nudity, then you will love Reform School Girls. The soundtrack is pretty awesome too, and showcases W.O.W's real talent as a musician and performer.CHECK OUT THE DVD COMMENTARY! IT'S PRETTY FUNNY AND ENTERTAINING TO LISTEN TO!
In the true spirit of Len Deighton. thoroughly enjoyable. Caine is the aged Palmer in the spirit of Len Deighton's working class spy. Cliche, yes!  but who would want otherwise
What happened to this edition?. What happened to the Backbeat Special Edition? Did it ever come out? I had preordered it from Amazon but it never shipped -- it went from preorder to "out of stock" on the supposed release date. Was the release delayed? Amazon should update their information on this item
How True It Is. I saw this film in New York City (where else) and will buy the DVD since this is one superb film. I doubt if anyone can see this film in any of the Red States, nor would they understand it; not that it's so complex. Actually I have a friend in a similar situation who deserves to see this film. Although he is not into foreign  films, he would immediately relate to Bunel's tale. I am sure many of us have suffered a similar fate, although we might not have been given the opportunity to throw water on them. Beautiful film! I am surprised that one person did not relate to it
I wish we could give 6 stars - &quot;a really big shoe&quot;. I taped these performances on my old monaural reel-to-reel back in 1964. The recorder and tapes are long gone, but the memories of a time when four &quot;twenty-something&quot; guys in suits could be considered revolutionaries still stands out in my mind as a golden age. Like it was yesterday, I remember John wrestling with his microphone, Ed admonishing the audience about their behavior, I even remember the other acts we had to sit through to get to the Fab Four. What a time capsule! The image quality and sound will blow you away - much better than what we ever received over the air back in the day. You even get a choice of monaural or surround sound - sharp. This CD set is a great treat for anyone over a certain age (the break point may be 50 years old/young, I imagine). Kids today may find it difficult to understand how one band could generate this much excitement and energy but if you were around in '64 and you saw them live you know! Buy this with confidence and throw in the DVD of a Hard Day's Night - both are a must have for any Beatles fan. Now if I could only fit into my old Neru jacket, life would be perfect
If this one doesn't touch you... You're pure ice. The film, while admittedly not ringing true in spots via dialogue or circumstance, is nonetheless engaging, touching, and emotionally draining. Some of the points it touches on are so dead-on it's scary. Acting-wise, it's Ted Danson's high point. He'll likely never top this performance, but it's enough to leave the world even if he leaves acting tomorrow. Lemmon and Dukakis are tremendous. YOu've read the plot in other reviews; just see it and get ready for an emotional jolt
Makes me laugh when I see the box!. I will make this short.  Aykroyd, Candy two men who are hilarious together is of course hilarious.  The story is about a man who loves his family and is a middle class man going on vaction.  His relatives decide to join him without letting him know.  The relatives are totally diffren't from the family they join and seeing them mingle is a riot.  I say get this movie because everyone I know who has seen it all say the same thing  "I love that movie, it is one of the funniest movies I have ever seen.
Great. Given as a xmas present. My daughter was very happy. Thanks for the speedy delivery
One of the best 1980's B movies!. Private school for Girls is a really Cheesy B movie from the 1980's starring Pheobe Cates (who starred in such greats as "fast times at Ridgemont High" and "Gremlins") and Matthew Modine (star of the classic "Vision Quest). This movie is certainly one their worst, but for B movie fans it's phenomenal.One of the best scenes (other then the topless Betsy Russel horse riding scene) is the shower scene. One of the guys sneaks into the girls locker room and hides in the sauna. The song "I love candy" comes on and the girls come in for a shower. Everytime I hear that song I think of private school for girls. I own the VHS and I have already pre-ordered the DVD version. Hopefully it will remain un-cut from the original.
Animagic Holiday fun from Rankin/Bass. Another stop-motion Animagic hit from the holiday entertainers, of Rankin/Bass Studios, the kings of holiday TV specials. This 1 hour show was released for the first time on April 6, 1977 on ABC television network. The storyline is very similar to "Santa Claus is Coming to Town", from the same studio - and by that I meant that part of the story explains all the traditions of Easter and how they began, such as why we eat chocolate bunnies, or why we color eggs. The show opens with a newsreel showing kids asking these questions.  Fred Astaire reprises his role as the singing mailman S.D. Kluger and gives a great voice performance but he has a bigger role this time. He has traded in his snowmobile mail truck for "the little engine that could", voiced by Robert McFadden. In the story we go back in time to the beginning of the children's Easter traditions to answer these questions, to a hidden town called "Kidville". There is a scary bear named Gadzooks who hates holidays, and he is similar to the Winter Warlock character. A rabbit named "Sunny" grows up to be the Easter Bunny and bring joy to children, making great friends and allies along the way. He is voiced by Skip Hinnant, who voiced "Pogo" in a special from another studio. He befriends a lonely young King, named Bruce, who is being controlled and bullied by his tyrannical Aunt Longtooth.We have come to expect good music in these holiday specials and they did not disappoint. There are 6 songs total with music by Maury Laws and lyrics by Jules Bass including the catchy, "Someone's Got to be First", along with "Big Rock Candy Mountain", the inspiring "Somebody Will Love You, If You Do", and "The Easter Bunny is Coming to Town Today". Fred Astaire sings "All You Have to Do is - Think Can Do". There is a hilarious song by the Hendrew Sisters, "What Came First, the Chicken or the Egg?". This very colorful special has terrific character designs by Paul Coker, who did the same for most of the studios products. The look of the film is, well, very Easter... They just did a great job capturing what the visuals should be for the kids.This show is the 3rd and last of the Easter themed holiday shows made by the studio. In 1971 they made an hour long Animagic TV special for ABC, "Here Comes Peter Cottontail", about the selection contest for the Easter Bunny, and it actually travels through time to all the holidays. In 1976 they made a half hour traditional cel animation special "The First Easter Rabbit" for NBC. As you know, Rankin/Bass Studios brought us such beautiful holiday TV classics such as Rudolph the Red-nosed Reindeer, Year without a Santa Claus, `Twas the Night Before Christmas, Nestor the Long Eared Donkey, The Little Drummer Boy, Frosty the Snowman, Santa Claus is Comin' to Town, Mouse on the Mayflower, Cricket on the Hearth, the Stingiest Man in Town, Rudolph's Shiny New Year, and more. They also made non-holiday films such as the Hobbit, and Flight of Dragons. It is incredible that one company was responsible for all those TV specials, 95% of the ones we see every year. Their work includes traditional hand drawn cel animation, stop-motion Animagic, and live action. Little Golden Books Publishing owns the rights to almost every show the studio made, and have done a commendable job re-mastering them and releasing them on DVD. I hope this comes out on a restored DVD too; I have bought all the other Rankin/Bass that has been released on DVD.
Judith Brown & Pam Grier!. What a combo. 'Ladies in Prison' movies is the best idea next to breast  implants, and we all know Pammy don't need those. Nudity, violence, one liners, sex, and the great cat-fights. Pam is the star, but Judith don't take no back seat! When farmer man wants to feel Pam's melons through the bars, he get's more than what he bargained for. Talk about plowing. All these characters pop up again and again in the 'Pam Prison' series. SOmetimes she the prisoner, sometimes the warden, and sometimes the revolutionist. Why does every 'woman in prison' film have to have a revolution anyway??? Well no matter, Pam and Judith like I said are a pair that can't be beat
Like others wrote... ...This is THE best hip-hop(with break dancing as a main point.  Krush Groove is THE best for just the music side) movie ever!  REAL rappers, REAL break dancers, both mixed in with actors who probably did not know any rap music at all.  It is an authentic dipitcion of the hip-hop world at that time.  "Breakin" is a Hollywood Beat Street knockoff, but good in it's own right.I won't go into the story, but I see that they did not put surround sound on this one yet.  Another interesting note:  I own the original one that came out on DVD some years ago.  That cover had Rae Dawn Chong on the cover.  I assume because she was the biggest star and at the time they did not think hip-hop would sell.  Now as you can see, they make sure that hip-hop is the main focal point for trying to sell it this time around
this is a good movie. A guy name Tobie who is from China he is fighting a bunch of chinese guys but they don't want to kill him cause he's too valuable to stop him they aim for his feet. Britney Murphey character is too crazy in this movie she owns a hotel until it got destroyed by the bad guys
A great gift for a little boy!. My 4-year old son loves watching this movie with his Dad.  This movie is heaven for boys of all ages.  Space ships and all-American heroes.  What can be more fascinating?  And the sound track is very upbeat and romantic at the same time.  My "boys" keep humming the melody
I AM TOTALLY A GROUPIE OF THIS MOVIE. I ABSOLUTELY LOVED THIS MOVIE. I STUMBLED UPON IT LATE ON HBO ONE NIGHT AND HAD TO HAVE IT. IF YOU ARE FEELING A LITTLE NOSTALGIC FOR THE SEATTLE SCENE THIS IS DEFINETLY THE MOVIE FOR YOU.
Awfully Funny. After accusing each other of infidelity, Jerry and Lucy impulsively decide to divorce. They have to wait until the divorce is final, but in the meantime each begins to date other people. Lucy dates an oilman from Oklahoma and Jerry has great fun doing everything he can to ruin the romance including telling her how much she'll like Oklahoma's night life compared to New York's.  Lucy gets her revenge by pretending to be his sister when Jerry dates a rich socialite. When they're not trying to sabotage each other's relationships, Jerry and Lucy are fighting over the custody of their dog, Mr. Smith."The Awful Truth" is one of the funniest screwball comedies that I've ever seen. Cary Grant and Irene Dunne are a delight as the feuding couple who truly deserve each other. There are many laugh out loud scenes in this movie - including when Jerry thinks Lucy is having an affair with her voice teacher and bursts in on what he thinks is the two of them; an off-screen fight between Jerry and said voice teacher; Jerry's date with a nightclub singer, and many many more. There are plenty of double entendres and sight gags to keep you laughing. From the very beginning you know how the movie is going to end, but it's a lot of fun getting to that ending."The Awful Truth" is awfully funny.
Groundbreaking Achievement. Franco Zefferelli's 'Jesus of Nazareth' has many boasting rights.  Authenticity and loftiness are presented at the right moments; the acting is good throughout; and the stirring crowd scenes genuinely bring the New Testament to life.  (Especially considering it was a television mini-series, the craftsmanship was impeccable.)Robert Powell has a hypnotic presence as Jesus, but some of the supporting cast are even better.  James Farentino plays rough like few Peters in cinematic memory, and Michael York presents passion without overdoing it as John the Baptist.  Anne Bancroft, however, shines brightest as Mary Magdalene with a particularly well-rounded before and after performance.Being a leap forward with scenes that unfold quickly without lingering too long (mostly) and important scenes that cling long enough, 'Jesus of Nazareth' is a landmark movie.  (Although in places, it should be conceded, their interpretations explain too much--even when some of the historical context is often excellent.)  Particularly because  they never shoot a scene that seems like it's in a studio, Zefferelli's 'Jesus...' is a true achievement. (Also starring Laurence Olivier, James Earl Jones, Ernest Borgnine, Anthony Quinn, and many others.
One of the most powerful documentaries ever made. To start off, the "criticism" that this film is "too one-sided" or has "an agenda", demonstrates a lack of understanding of what a documentary is and does.  Documentary filmmakers ALL have agendas; they have a point-of-view and must engage viewers emotionally or they fail in their task.I saw "Hearts and Minds" in college in about 1977.  The campus auditorium was packed with mostly sympathetic "liberal" college students, with the exception of about half a dozen uniformed military clearly present to ridicule the film and voice their opposition.  As has been mentioned in other reviews, a stunned silence gripped the room at the end of the film, as the parade clown shouting "Come on!  Smile!  Get happy!" pranced into the fade-out at the end of the credits.  The only sound was the audible sobbing coming from the military protesters.  We as an audience stayed to talk to them and to help them deal with the emotions they were experiencing.  It was one of the most amazing experiences I've ever had at a movie.  It forever burned the power of film into my mind.Of course, the filmmakers have an anti-war agenda.  Of course, the film is harshly critical of a government that, in its view, sent a generation off to an un-winnable war and basically forgot about them and the horrific experience they endured.  The film is compassionate and caring about the soldiers in the Vietnam war while being unmerciful in its presentation of the politicians and upper-echelon bureaucrats who perpetuated the war.  ("Are you really asking me this goddamn silly question, Mr. Davis?" asks presidential advisor Walt Rostow, almost rolling his eyes, when asked to explain the origins of the Vietnam conflict.  This embarrassing, pompous moment might have been edited out of a less courageous film, but director Peter Davis is taking no prisoners.)The portraits here of heroes, victims, villains and cads, are incisive and powerful.  An earlier reviewer criticized the film for using the interviews with the parents of a deceased soldier.  The parents are proud of their son, proud of President Nixon (even though an on-screen disclaimer notes that these comments were made pre-Watergate) and seemingly proud of the way he died.  They have clearly chosen to be a part of the film voluntarily, so when the mother breaks down at a fond memory of her son, the audience does not feel pity, but rather great compassion for these good people who have been lied to, and whose son died for the lie.Of course, a film could be made to show the noble intentions of our involvement in the war (or you could just rent the John Wayne movie "The Green Berets"), but it is fairly universally granted that the Vietnam War was a tragic, shameful episode in American history.  This film, made and released at the moment of America's withdrawal from Vietnam at a time when support for the war was at its lowest, captures that feeling of depression and anger.  It is a film of its time and should not be criticized for that.Neither should it be missed
It was Jessica all along!. Hey guys! We are not plugging this movie well enough. If my wife didn't give me this for a birthday or something and I wasn't just in the mood to watch something different this evening I would have never picked up on this great little movie. We need to get the word out! My take: agreed this is a great team to pull this off. The non-surprise ending could have been so hoaky but they actually did it in a way I was glad Becky finally got left out of it. Let her find her own match if there is one. But I see a whole lot of depth in the whole point of this comedy. It is all true! None of this was a con. That is the beauty of it. The beauty of it is the con. This is so true in so many ways, and we love it and know we do. So the movie is not just cute, not just funny. It has a very serious point about life to make if we just see it. Didn't someone say something like "Heaven is all around you, you just don't see it"? You need the right story and things will be well.
Just as great as the TV episodes. The great thing about this "movie version" is that all the original voices of Clifford (John Ritter), Emily Elizabeth, Cleo, and T-Bone are exactly the same as the Clifford episodes on TV. Basically, it is a longer version of a regular Clifford episode but they've added a few new friends and some songs here and there. Speaking of, the songs are actually upbeat and a bit catchy.  But NOT so catchy to where I find the tunes stuck in my head for hours........unlike some other kid movies (i.e. - Thomas the Tank Engine) where they play the same droning chorus over and over and over again. This movie is a great compromise because my 2 and a 1/2 year old son LOVES it, and after watching it with him numerous times now, I still like it too.
Bitterly funny indy film about love and lust. This is a terrific little overlooked film,  worth watching with your mate especially if you're having problems!  Themes of jealousy and lust and friendship are mined by a top rate ensemble cast-  Tilly and Stolz  especially have a great believable chemistry-  and features standout cameos  by Parker Posey and Joey Lauren Adams. Obviously made on a shoestring  budget,  this film dares to go to those uncomfortable places in  relationships that we all experience,  but rarely see in films because of  the big budget studio whitewashing. Worth a look or two
One of sandra's best films.      16th april 2004. Ben affleck is one of my best actors, and so is sandra bullock. I really enjoyed this film,it was kind of funny on the aeroplane at the begginning of the film. The plane goes all wonky due to a bird flying into the fan of the plane. Ben hits sandra on the head with a laptop and it is so funny. It is quite unusual to other films and that was why i liked  it really. HALF ROMANTIC AND BRILLLLLLLL FILM
Great on Many Levels. This is one of the great Westerns: strong cast in every role, straighforward plot, glorious locale, and lots of hard riding and fast shooting.  For fun, see it as the middle film in a trilogy of Viet Nam-related Westerns.  "Magnificent Seven" is first (all ideology and victory assured), "Ulzana's Raid" is third (everybody's burnt out and savage and nobody wins); "The Professionals" in the middle.  A wicked, wealthy Texan (Ralph Bellamy in the same kind of hat LBJ used to wear when he was on the ranch pretending to herd cattle) hires a small band of highly skilled, experienced professionals (think Green Berets) to rescue his wife (the Viet Namese peasants) from the wicked Jack Palance (the VC).  They do the job, but it turns out the wife really loves her "abductor" and prefers him to the Texan, so the professionals return her to her lover and her home, and, "going native," go back with them.  Or you can skip all that and just enjoy the hell out of this fabulous movie
Pretty good despite cheesy title. It's 1961; the USSR has finally finished its nuclear powered submarine and is ready to deploy it off the East coast of the United States for the purpose of...brinksmanship? But hold on, there is a problem; the Soviet Union is staffed with incompetents!!(one of communism's most odious flaws is that it does not inspire the common man to excel). The menacing black submarine is doomed from the get-go. It leaks, and it is cobbled together with substandard parts. After heading out to sea, there is a problem with the nuclear reactor and several men must go in for repairs wearing only chemical suits because the warehouse was out of radiation suits. The men receive lethal doses of radiation, but unfortunately the doctor doesn't know anything about radiation sickness...he is only giving them aspirin. Before long radiation begins to permeate the ship. The entire crew is in danger. The officers are of two minds - some want to save the crew at the expense of letting the submarine fall into the hands of the Americans, while others want to save face for the Soviet Union even if it means a lot of men will fall sick or die. As the submarine becomes more and more disabled, as men stumble from the reactor room vomitting and shaking, as the commanding officer repeatedly refuses help from a nearby American destroyer, as the submarines's food supply is deemed too contaminated to eat, the dread of the crew is really palpable. This movie was very suspenseful because I had no idea how it would end. Definitely worth your time
Classic James Cagney Performance In One Of The Landmark Gangster Films Of the Depression Era. Few performers have become so identified with one particular type of role as James Cagney did with the gangster genre and even though in later decades he proved his ability in many diverse areas of screen acting his tough guy playing in early classics like Warner Bros Studios hard hitting gangster story "Public Enemy", is what stays in the mind.
Prisoner of the Mountains. The movie brought the Chechan Conflict into perspective for me. Two Russian soldiers, a seasoned fighter Sasha and a new trainee Vanya, are captured by a Chechen Soldier  Abdul. Abdul hopes to trade Sasha and Vanya for his son  who had been imprisoned by the Russian army. As the characters of the soldiers and the villagers develop, the Chechan and the Russian Soldiers come to appreciate one another.The movie was great. I am not into war movies but this movie had an actual story line and a great ending. I give the movie A-.
Enjoyable Movie. Very cute movie with a good story line and moral.My kids have watched this many, many times.Has "catchy" songs for the kids to sing along with.I have recommended this movie to other Moms to purchase
Plot twists I didn't see coming. Morgan Freeman as Alex Cross...Doesn't get much better than that.  Monica Potter ...well, look up cute in the dictionary..Her picture is there.  Anyway, this had some serious plot twists that somehow all seemed to make sense as they got tied together.  Morgan Freeman continues to demonstrate that he is one of the best actors in film today.
Wow!!!. Possibly the most powerful documentary ever! Never could I imagine in the U.S.A., the most developed country in the world, i'd see people working or living in the same conditions as these people were in Harlan county. What impressed me the most was how strong the strike workers' wives were to join their husbands at the picket line. The scene were they defiantly blocked the road with their vehicles and refused to allow the scabs/picket crossers to pass, especially with guns drawn at them brought tears to my eyes. Two thumbs up! A++
Brian Regan. First heard his stand-up on CD when I worked at Borders a few years back.  Sometimes he gets a bit carried away (a lotta comics tend to, though), and his comedy comes across dopey, yet easy to relate to.  Clean (no naughty words or uncouth situations here!), family-fun comedy (dirty or clean, as long as a comedian can deliver to the audience well, then he/she is funny in my eyes)
A fast-paced, different type of thriller. 15 Minutes is worth the money.  It probably will not be the number one DVD in your collection, but you're sure to go back and watch it from time to time.  This film gives an interesting, if not frightening, look at the role mass-media play in our country's daily life.  We don't think about it, since we are living it... but this film gives us a view of someone who might not be used to the faced paced, 24-hour news cycle lifestyle that most of us live today.At the center of the movie's plot is a greedy, slick breaking-news style anchor who is given the 'gift' of being the only personality in town to have the near-realtime footage of a string of murders, as they are being committed.  He has a moral pause, only for a second, before he unabashedly trumpets the news to the entire world.  The rest of the movie deals with the minds of the killers and the techniques used by the authorites to catch them.  All in all.. not the best movie out there.. but worth the money.
A+ movie. The movie was very good from start to finish.  The acting was great, and the movie was full of suspense.  Don't let the cheap price fool you.  It's worth watching
Scorsese Over All!. I didn't think much of the Woody Allen segment (although he's one of my favorite filmmakers) and I hated the Coppola piece but I'm still giving this one 5 stars because of &quot;Life Lessons&quot; which in the first of three short films in this collection.  No other movie that I can think of better illustrates the creative thought processes of the artist (Nick Nolte) or their sense of lonely isolation.  He cannot live without women and even hilariously tells his young assistant, and I quote from memory, &quot;I don't know anything about love?  I was married and divorced four times before you were even born!&quot;  Nolte is tortured by his desires and his isolation but even lust will not allow him to compromise his artistic integrity.  When Arquette pleads with him concerning whether she has any talent or not, Nolte refuses to lie to appease her.  Instead he elects not to answer her question which infuriates her even more.  Although he is downtrodden throughout much of the film the ending is a happy one.  I own the VHS and have seen the 40 minutes of &quot;Life Lessons&quot; at least seven times over the years.  I highly recommend it
A raw look at the "fab 5". Before The Beatles changed the world of music, they were a scruffy rock 'n' roll five piece. Lennon and McCartney were already writing music together but Lennon spent much of his time hanging with fellow artist Stu Sutcliffe. Lennon talked his pal into spending the money from the sale of a painting into buying a bass guitar and suddenly "The Silver Beatles" had a new bassist--albeit one that couldn't play any instrument but that soon changed.This terrific film chronicles the early days of the band in Hamburg before they broke it big and the strong friendship of Lennon and Sutcliffe. Ian Hart virtually steals the film from Stephen Dorf (who's also quite good)capturing Lennon's swagger and sarcastic wit in full stride. Directly Ian Softley focuses more on the duo of Lennon and Sutcliffe than the rest of the band chronicling their friendship. Sutcliffe never lived to see Lennon and the rest of the band achieve their dreams of going to the top and conquer the world. It's a fascinating glimpse into the past and it's clear that Softley did quite a bit of research to make this marvelous film. Hart had played Lennon once before in "The House and Times" a film that portrayed a supposed homosexual fling between Lennon and the band's manager Brian Epstein.Most of the performances capture the essence of the The Beatles even if they don't always look exactly like the people their playing. The duo Hart and Gary Bakewell at least resemble Lennon and McCartney. While Softley claims he was trying to capture the raw sound of the band in the beginning (which I'm sure he does), my only complaint is that the singers don't sound all that much like Lennon or McCartney. Still, the supporting musicians drawn from members of REM, Afgan Wigs, Nirvana and other groups do create quite a sound.The big difference between this and the bare bones release of a couple of years ago are all the extras: We get Ian Softley's "Sundance Channel Interview"; an interview of Softley and Hart discussing the making of the film; an audio interview with Astrid Kirchherr (with old photos of her, Stu and others along with footage from the film to illustrate what she's saying); two deleted scenes; footage of "the band" of actors rehearshing; audition video shot for the movie; behind-the-scenes photos and an audio commentary from the director. Univeral has done an exceptional job in remastering the video and audio.It's a terrific package. I'm glad that this drama has finally made it to DVD in such a deluxe presentation. Take a trip into the past and rediscover what made The Beatles so special to begin with in "Backbeat"
Drop in on a dying culture. If you are interested in Gypsy music and dance this is an incredible look at the culture, sans boring narration blah blah. Because Mr. Gatlif had unprecedented access to these relatively unspoiled groups of performers, the viewer feels like a traveler on the Gypsy Trail, starting out in India,through Egypt, Turkey and through the Balkans, ending with a lively village Flamenco scene. I wish that they had continued into England and Ireland, but that is a minor quibble. Each scene goes directly into the performances, with so much feeling and joy. Not to be missed
An Antti Keisala Comment: A Nine-Film Retrospective About Love - Resnais. With WKW's "In The Mood For Love" I anticipated this comment a little.I am like any other and really enjoy most films when they find soulmates from others, and watching them accordingly gives them richness that most likely was not intended by the film-maker. Of course, we tend to make up things that weren't intended by the film-maker, either. But that takes the fun out of it. These are also fun as retrospectives to watch during a holiday or weekend, and they also expose to some fine film-making. This retrospective and a commentary series deals with women, love and cinema, and has nine films, of which this is the first in chronological order. Of course, I am like any other who wishes to write something that's endlessly complicated and hard to understand. No worries, there, my friends: I write fiction. Ironic film-noir, where even the writer doesn't know what's going on.So. First, there is the preconception about French cinema and how it understands love, women and sex. Everybody knows how it is, and as such everybody knows how silly it really is. It isn't how the Spanish are creating a sexual narrative: everything, including the characters, creates an empty vessel to be filled up not with introspection that could reflect into our own souls but with matter that comes from cultural dynamics. When I think of French films in general I think of journalists. And that isn't a good thing.What this means is that not after this nor before Ameli anything that the French made was cinematically beautiful, not their women nor their love, apart from Rohmer, because it doesn't mesh with their means. This is a comment that's too polemic to be taken without slight irony. I will most likely deny it in a timely fashion. At least the Sensual and truly hyper-intelligent Rohmer makes me wish I had steered away from ultimatums. And I will. But what is so amazing is that Resnais is truly the kind of an intellectual you might connect to the French New Wave, and this film might put off many just because of its seemingly avant-garde feel. And let me tell you, that to think this film as a new wave film is missing the point, much like much of the New Wave missed the point. This film is about itself, and making itself just as it is about making of itself, but not in the conventional means. Indeed, there is an actress and there is an architect, two very introspective and cinematic figures, yet just as 'Marienbad' goes deeper than any other French film in revealing the film's function in contrast to memory, the catalyst in this film is love, and it is war and fear that is used as a wrapper, not the self-referential material. I find the focus on the subject of love and sex as the true center of creating an abstraction sensually fluid, as if the film had a soul of its own. This film has a soul and heart of its own. Think of a love letter become conscious of itself, writing and reading itself.These are groundbreaking ideas that the New Wave wished to tie into a reality. Resnais wished to go the way of dreams and reflections, and memory. And even if we care nothing about that, this really could be a profound experience. But to be interested in the subject... this is everything, everywhere. And it's love that is driving us into and out of the bomb.The next step would be Mikio Naruse's 1960 film Onna ga kaidan wo agaru toki, that is, 'When a Woman Ascends the Stairs', not as layered a film as this, but it has fluid camera work, very much anticipating WKW, and yet it is something that differs from the most fluid 'Marienbad'.With best regards,A
Riveting and disturbing. Hearing the -- and I cannot think of a more appropriate word for it -- bigoted assertions of the deaf-community individuals regarding cochlear implants for their children, I was consistently reminded of instances we've seen wherein some parent would assert, "I only had a high school education, and that has been good enough for me.  No kid of mine needs to go to college."  I wish the deaf community well, and their thinking requires a tremendous deal of exercise
"Intriguing". This was a great movie. Kept me in suspense. Buy it.
Great Place to Learn about the Older Jazz. This series is fantastic.  Many reviewers have criticized it as being dogmatic in its pandering to earlier styles of jazz while panning later ones.  This criticism is valid to some degree.  I think it provides a great service, howerver, despite its shortcomings.  I loved jazz since I was a child, and started buying jazz records in the late 1970s at the age of about 19.  Nobody in my family had a great appreciation of this music. At that time it was somewhat difficult to get a handle on the development of jazz through the swing period to the fusion period at that time.  The older stuff was generally out of print, etc.  Learing about bop was like an archeologist looking at shards of pottery.  So a documentary like this is great in this instance; it advanced my knowledge of music before my time unbelievably. I would recommend this highly.  It was also nice to watch the documentary with my elderly parents who grew up in the 30s and 40s.  It was great to share this with them.  I could not believe that they wanted to continue into the bop period watching the series (I always thought they hated my records like that).  Finally, being from New Orleans, and surviving Katrina, it was great to see the New Orleans culture treated with such respect.
Great classic for a great price. With a cable modem, took about 1 hour and 15 minutes to download Unbox, install the program and download the episode.  It's a great download speed considering the file is 803 mb.  I was able to still use my computer, IE 7.0 and RealPlayer, so the download is not a resource hog.  The menu bar includes a link to shop for more Unbox titles, which I found very convenient.The quality is great, but the video stutters in Unbox.  Maybe because it uses 3 applications when playing video?  I chose to watch the episode on Windows Media Player 11 and I had no problems at all.I've bought and watched 3 episodes, all with the same results.  Fast and unobstrusive download, great quality and low price.  Just use WMP, or another player that can handle wma files, to watch.
Charming classic... I remember this movie from my childhood.  I remember seeing in theaters when it was first released back in 1977 and I remember it being a huge hit.  Now I'd like to purchase it on DVD but I kind of hesitate to, because I haven't heard many good things about the quality of this DVD issue, not the film, the DVD.After seeing some screenshots online I am shocked to find the film deteriorating far beyond it's original brilliance, I remember it being sharp, bright and colorful.  After having seen Robin Hood four years before, the animation used in The Rescuers looked so refreshing and lively and above all, well-done.  However, it seems that lines have thickened, colors have faded and the entire print has become subject of artifacts and scratches.  Shameful.  It seems so unfair that up to this day, films that are even less than [...]are getting massive restoration undergoings while other, older movies are left to rot to this kind of state. Disney, is it so much to ask that you should treat all your timeless classics equaly?  They all deserve it.  Yes, all, even The Black Cauldron, Oliver & Company or One Hundred and One Dalmatians.Well, that's all I'd like to say for this film.  I will not have to think twice about purchasing it as soon as the DVD release is what it trully should be
The story of king david. I didn't hear much about this movie, but just recently I saw this movie on cinamax to see pretty much see propably DMX's last performance.Altho I didn't like his characters in hollywod action blockbusters Exit Wounds, and Cradle 2 the grave, because they were bad, one selling drugs the other a thief, but tried to make them good, it was just plain out stupid.But in this film, you get to see the reason why DMX would be considered to be called Dark-man-X because in this movie he plays one baaaaad dude, and his performance was unbalievable.  DMX gets a serious role, and just exceeded my exectations.Also nice performances by Michael Ealy as a man filled with nothing but revenge and sorrow, David Arquet, the man who uncoverd David's past via his documentery, and Cliftion Powel, the man King David owes.This movie is dark, gritty, and a movie that shouldn't be slept on, especially by fans of X.  Anyone who is tired of all these fake hood movies like state property or Hot Boyz should definitly take a look at this gritty film.peac
Good Movie if not compared to book. If you are a fan of the book "Girl" you will probably not enjoy this movie.  The movie leaves out much of the detail in the book which presented a more together, engrossing, and character-rich story.  If you can watch the movie as a separate entity from the book, it is enjoyable.  The strong point of the film is the excellent cast of many indie film stars like Selma Blair.  Portia De Rossi from Arrested Development also has a role in the film.  The film still presents a coming of age story that doesn't take itself too seriously
One of the best movies ever made, one of the best DVDs ever made. "Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" is one of the best films ever made and Fox has recently released a fitting two disc DVD edition of the film. Fitting because the DVD is one of the best I have ever seen.Directed by George Roy Hill and written by William Goldman, the God of screenwriters, "Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" stars Paul Newman, Robert Redford and Katharine Ross. How could a film with this pedigree be anything but good?What you may not realize, or know, is that this film made Robert Redford the star he is today. Paul Newman, already an established star having appeared in "Hud", "Cool Hand Luke" and "The Hustler", among others, was a bankable star and the film was made because he agreed to make it. Initially, he wanted to play the Sundance Kid, but eventually settled on the role of Cassidy. Robert Redford was not new to film, but he was nowhere near the icon he would become. He had some early success which was followed by a few clunkers. The pair became a match made in heaven and would go on to appear in more films together. On screen, they appear to be friends, much like their characters, and this adds to the charm of their relationship.Redford clearly recognizes the influence this film had on his career. His famous film academy and film festival are named after his character in the film.Butch and Sundance decide to rob the mail car of a train owned by a powerful rail baron. Butch is tired of the work and wants to retire, but he needs one or two big scores to set him up. After blowing up the rail car, they run off with the loot and hide out in a small town, at a brothel they frequent. Meeting up with the rest of their gang, they quell a revolt and decide to do one more job. They will rob the same mail car on the same railway, on its next run through the area. It is the perfect crime, no one would suspect the same train being robbed, so it will probably be loaded with money. After blowing up the car for a second time, they notice another locomotive speeding towards them and a crew of men on horseback alight from the car and give chase, chasing Butch and Sundance, and their two accomplices, for days, across many terrains. Finally, they realize the rail baron has hired a famous Indian tracker to help a band of men, including a former sheriff who is now a famous bounty hunter, catch the duo. After the chase, they return to the home of Ella (Katharine Ross), the Sundance Kid's girlfriend. Tired, they decide to leave the country and travel to Bolivia and begin robbing banks there.As I watched this DVD of "Butch Cassidy", two things quickly became apparent. This film is virtually timeless. With the lone exception of the song "Raindrops Keep Falling On My Head", the film could've been made yesterday, the images are so clear. The second is that the DVD print is one of the most beautiful transfers I have ever watched. The cinematography by Conrad Hall (who would later work on "American Beauty" among others) is simply stunning and brings out all of the rich detail of the landscape. Everything is crisp and clear, when it is supposed to be, colors are bright and vivid, it's just beautiful to watch. It doesn't hurt that the stars are two of the most handsome men to ever appear in film, at the prime of their careers, and one of the most beautiful women to ever co-star. How did anyone get past all of that eye candy?The key to becoming fully invested in this film is William Goldman's screenplay. He introduces the characters in action, we learn as we go, and they are almost always moving, or doing something. Goldman fills their mouths with witty dialogue, showing us how their relationship works, and they are instantly likeable to us. This is basically a love triangle with Ross' Ella playing the go-between. The two men have a very close friendship, enjoying each other's company. But Cassidy loves Ella as well, even appears slightly jealous until he realizes his friend is the recipient of this woman's love, so they get along. Then, there is the famous chase. The railway baron's men chase Butch and Sundance for days, taking up a significant chunk of the film. But this scene proves to us how committed the two men are to each other and makes their future trek to Bolivia all the more believable. We have to believe there is a real threat and these men never let up on the chase, if they catch Butch and Sundance, they will be killed. As soon as they reach Bolivia, Goldman has a lot of fun with the characters again, exploring their relationships, rebuilding them in a way, and making them light hearted again. It is almost amazing to watch this film because if a studio executive were presented with the same screenplay today, it would probably not be made. It doesn't hit plot points at pre-determined pages, it tells an unconventional story, and we never actually see the villains. Goldman had the luxury of writing this film during a period in which studios were still able to work with somewhat unconventional screenplays. Of course, they wanted to make money as well, but they still considered film an art form.George Roy Hill is an underappreciated director. I think a large part of this is because many of his films are very humorous. Comedy is not as highly respected in Hollywood as drama, even though making a good comedy is much more difficult. So I suspect the humorous elements of most of his films made him less respected in Hollywood, but when your films are as good as "Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" and "The Sting", you deserve some respect. He made his share of duds, but when he passed away a few years ago, Hollywood was robbed of a talent ready to make at least a few more classics.During this period, big screen Westerns were becoming unpopular. Perhaps the dearth of television westerns was keeping the public out of the theaters, but this genre was considered risky at the time. Recent films starring Burt Lancaster and others were failing to light the box office fire. The second disc contains a new "Making of" feature including interviews with Newman, Redford, Ross, former studio executives David Brown and Richard Zanuck and more. Zanuck reveals that he took a real chance in greenlighting this film, but fought for it all the way. He also haggled with Hill and the filmmakers, in an attempt to keep the budget under control; he became concerned when the film was projected to cost about $7.5 million (consider the average studio film now costs at least $125 million). But the film would go on to be a big hit. Such a huge hit the filmmakers followed this with the equally popular "The Sting".The second DVD also contains some archival interviews with the stars, some trailers and more.In the "Making Of" documentary, they discuss the inclusion of the song "Raindrops Keep Falling On My Head". People fought against it but Hill and composer Burt Bacharach felt it would be the perfect accompaniment to the scene of Butch and Ella riding a new-fangled bike through her barn yard. It does work, but it is clearly not a fit for the period depicted in the film, and is the most dated element within the film today. It just seems silly today."Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" is a superlative example of the treatment all classics should receive on DVD. This is a film every DVD library should have
I've got a Jones for Love Jones. This is one of my absolute favorites and if you have never seen you must.  A beautiful love story that shows you love never fails!  Lorenz Tate and Nia Long were excellent and Isiah Washington delivers a memorable performance as Savon. Loved the movie so much I even named my son SaVaughn
Doris Does It Again. Without the charm of Day,this film would fall flat,however it is not the case with this musical.Doris plays showgirl Ethel 'Dynamite' Jackson,who is mistakenly offered the chance to appear in a cultural show in Paris.(Her  letter was mixed up with Ethel Barrymore's) It is up to a bumbling  Politician to rectify the situation,and he finds her in the show 'It Must  Be Good',and he is smitten with her. She ends up going after all,and they  get married on the boat to Paris,despite his being engaged to his boss'  daughter. The songs include 'April In Paris,'It Must Be Good',and 'Paris  May Oui'
A DVD of Memories. This item is another hurricane replacement item.  Lord of the Dance is the single greatest live dance performance ever caught on disk.  It graps you and does not let go untill the final note.  If you have not seen it live this is as close as you ever will get
WHOA!!   NOW AVAILABLE IN THE USA!!!. Heads up to all John Wayne/John Ford fans!!3 GODFATHERS is now available on DVD exclusively in Target Stores (not available online)- just was browsing this week's ad (12/18-12/24/2005) and nearly fell off my chair to see it advertised as a "Target Exclusive" for only $9.99!!  What a great holiday surprise! (Target is also exclusive carrier of Gable's MOGAMBO) - Hope the DVD gets wider distribution after the '05 holidays but I know where I'm going tonight with 10 bucks!  Hope this was happy holiday news to you all
Bring tissues!. You'll need them, because you're going to laugh as hard as you cry. I loved the books as a girl, and I adore this movie, and the sequel as well. While no book and movie can ever folloiw one another EXACTLY, it keeps so strongly to the story I almost had to go back to figure out which details they left out. Megan Follows did a terrific job as Anne, and it was a great acting challenge as well, as Anne grows from about the age of 12 to 16-17 in this movie, and Megan Follows was 15 or 16, I believe. Yet her ability carried her through as a very believable 12 year old. The rest of the casting was inspired. The characters looked and acted almost exactly like I had always imagined them. Anne is human. She gets mad, she gets hurt, she acts or speaks before she thinks, and this makes her believable to any child, or any one of us who's ever done something like that. Welll worth owning, and showing to anyone who'll watch.
just a minor correction. Mrs. Kennedy was not trying to help the Secret Service Agent when she crawled out onto the trunk.  She was trying to recover part of her husband's skull that had blown back onto the trunk.  Which by the way indicates that he was shot not from the school book depository behind him but from the front right
Great opening sequence with Drew Barrymore. I'll keep this review short. Scream is probably one of the best teen slasher films to come from the 90's forget Urban legends and I know what you did last whatever this is probably the only good one, the story was original and refreshing it was written by Kevin Williamson and directed by Wes Craven the film cleverly poked fun at the horror genre and made interesting observations like the characters not turning around when the killer is right behind them, the film also reffrences alot of other horror films like Halloween, The howling ect. anyways the film was brilliant but its to bad the sequals sucked and Wes Craven couldn't make a decent or good film after this, what the hell was he thinking when he did Cursed and Red eye!!?
God's tender mercies. Excellent film. Wonderful acting.  Outstanding script about grace and redemption.  One of my all time favorites
Pink not Blue. One of the better old comedies that Cary Grant is true blue even if his sub isn't
Set it Off. I have never seen such powerful female characters before, each one had their own dynamic personality and tragic reason for entering a life of crime by robbing banks. It is bascially non-stop action and excitement but this film still makes room for a little romance between Pinket and Underwood
4-star hotel. Basically a filmed play - but so what?  It is a production.  So was "Driving Miss Daisy" a play with just three actors.The essence to the play is the end - Danny DeVito's "soliloquy" to the younger salesman about being self-righteous.  This requires the build-up of (verbal) events prior to this.  A good lesson for all of us.Essentailly a 4-star hotel.  5-stars are for "Dances With Wolves" and the like..
Labyrinth - fantasy and fun. The Labyrinth is a delightful movie of fantasy and fun for all ages to enjoy.  This has always been one of my favorite films, and going back to it as an adult only makes me enjoy and appreciate it all the more.  Jennifer Connelly gives a superb performance as Sarah, the main character, whose baby brother is taken by the Goblin King (David Bowie in one of his best characters - who ironically gives an often sensitive and human performance while being fanciful and fantastic at the same time; he wrote and performed all the music, which is also some of his best work).  Sarah must leave her world of make-believe and enter the very real and deceptive Labyrinth to save her brother in time before he's turned into a goblin.  Along the way, we encounter a large cast of Jim Henson's puppet-creatures, some of which become Sarah's friends and helpers in her journey.  The puppets are so believable that you soon forget that they are not real people.  The movie is filled with magic, both on and off screen.The film is supplemented on this DVD with a "Making-of" documentary - an original feature, narrated largely by Jim Henson himself - made during the actual production of the film (released in 1986).  Such a documentary makes one appreciate even more what goes into a movie like this and how complex the creatures are - what goes into their creation, how they operate, and how they interact with the sets and other characters (especially in this case with the live actors).  It's a lot of fun to see this "inside" look, and more than anything gives a real sense of who Jim Henson was and how much this all really meant to him.  My favorite quote from Jim Henson in this documentary was when he said (about his inspiration and motivation when he makes a movie), "When I go see a film, when I leave the theater... I like to be happier than I was when when I went in, I like to leave with an up feeling, and I like a picture to have a sense of substance, to be about life and the things that matter to me," - a wonderful sentiment to remember in this day and age.Lighthearted, fun, fantastical, funny, beautiful, exciting, and more "real" than many of today's "realities" - extremely enjoyable and uplifting.  As an added bonus, Monty Python member Terry Jones wrote the script (and is interviewed in the documentary).  Cheryl McFadden (Star Trek: TNG's Beverly Crusher) also did all the choreography in the film (for both humans and puppets). :-
Golden Oldie. In the days of the Arcades there was a good movie that came out (and funny enough had a great Arcade game) called Krull. Now mind you, I really had no idea what this movie was all about before i saw it (when i was a whole bunch younger) just saw the 5 bladed "glaive" and was sold but now as an adult i find i still like this movie and it reminds me of a true dungeons and dragons style adventure then almost any other movie (including those terrible scifi D&D movies ugh) it starts off with a prince and of course a princess yes been done before many many times but then in come the Slayers and from then on its a totally different experience. with such ultimate favorites as the Emerald Seer, The Widow of the Web and the Cyclops and of course the shapeshifting (a bit daft too) wizard with some very strange habits (i dare not tell you so as not to ruin it) but this is a classic movie and it will be good for generations to come.Pros: cool effects (for the time) good story well done plot and themescons: may be a bit too old for some and not flashy enough. but remember it is a tad old.its a 5 star easily some may not agree but judge the movie on its merits and not against those of today and anyone can see the care and detail that made this movie great
Epic Korean Drama. Koreans honor their greatest military hero in this epic drama which takes place in the late 1500s. The career and tactics of this Admiral are still studied at the U.S. Naval Academy, and doubtless those of other nations. The screenplay is based on a couple of novels, so there is some fiction, but the life of Yi Soon Shin was well documented, so there's plenty of fact supporting the story.If you are not familiar with Korean Drama, it's good to keep in mind that  this is not a Hollywood product, but they do very well with special effects and such considering the non-Hollywood budgets involved, and it's easy to see past all that and enjoy the tale being told.It's a long series, but presents an epic with power, depth and dimension and well worth watching it unfold through each and every episode.It would be great also to see KBS make other dramas available for viewing through Amazon, such as "Seoul 1945".
Movie & book a great mix. This was a book club selection and I had a hard time with the language while just reading, so I got this movie and it made the written language much easier to follow.  Great story.  Wonderful cast.
A missing baby new-year... and no Santa?. This is a must for anyone having young children. Children of all ages should enjoy this cartoon for the Christmas season. Children always like to watch any cartoon about Santa and Rudolph. Not only are you getting one, but three Christmas cartoon classics. I may be an adult, but I still like watching these classics myself
Absolutely riveting!. No this isn't Courtney of Friends, but once you get past that - this is MUST WATCH TV!  While the show has content that can be shocking, it is so well written and edited it all fits.  It is definitely a sequential drama and makes much more sense watching the episodes back to back.  That fleshes out the characters so you start to care about and understand them.  Courtney shows her acting chops best at those moments when she is silent and lets her expressions say it all because sometimes her dialog is a bit stilted.  The best character is the functional schizophrenic photographer, Don Konkey.  He is exhibits an endearing combination of weirdness, loyalty, insight and sweetness to become the break-out star of this series.  If you only watched one episode and wrote this one off - go back and watch a few back to back and you may just find yourself addicted.
Beautiful Funny Movie...Great Grusin Score!. After revisiting this Beatty masterpiece, I agree with everything in the other reviews.  This is in my top 10 movies and definately number 1 or 2 in romantic comedies.I must mention the musical score by Dave Grusin.  Although Grusin has done tons of great stuff, for some reason the haunting melodies of Heaven Can Wait have always stuck with me through the years.  Absolute perfection!  I don't believe a soundtrack CD is available, but Grusin has revisited the themes from Heaven Can Wait on his "Cinemagic" (full orchestra) and "Now Playing" (solo piano) CD's.  I highly recommend both.Beatty hit a home run with this one...the writing, acting, directing and cast all perfect.  The great soundtrack is just icing on the cake.  Enjoy
A Great Ballet In A Brilliant New Light. Hold on to your lids, kids, a traditional Swan Lake this is not. Matthew Bourne, probably Britain's greatest younger choreographer, has reset the old and great ballet into a tale of British royal satire, repressed sexuality and just plain human longing for comfort and protection. And if you've heard about this version, it is definitely not all male; there are plenty of female dancers around. The Swan Queen, however, is now The Swan King. The corps de ballet who form The Swan King's court, traditionally delicate swan maidens in white tutus, are now bare-chested, muscular male swans with mean, dark-shadowed eyes, twitching heads and hair combed to a dark point down their foreheads. They wear something like feathered leggings from waist to knee.The traditional Swan Lake story has the young prince encountering an enchanted princess, human by night, a swan by day, who can only have the spell broken by true love. The prince swears his devotion, but is tricked by the sorcerer into thinking another is The Swan Queen. He realizes his mistake, but it's too late. He rushes to the lake, finds The Swan Queen and joins her in death but reunited in love.In Bourne's version it is Britain in the Fifties. We meet the young prince as a fearful child, dominated by his unfeeling mother, the Queen, and manipulated by the Queen's evil press secretary. The lonely boy finds comfort only by imagining a brave swan who will protect him and look over him. Ten years later the prince still is dominated by his mother, who has scarcely aged. He thinks he loves a young woman who is considered unsuitable by the Queen. She announces she will hold a ball and introduce him to proper candidates. Eventually in a drunken, repressed rage, he finds himself on the shores of a park lake. As in a dream he encounters The Swan King and the King's court of male swans. The ball is held, but the press secretary introduces the Queen to his own son, who looks just like The Swan King. The Queen announces she will marry him. The prince strikes his mother, he is confined and apparently operated on. In a delirium he encounters the real Swan King again, who protects him from the male swans who have appeared around his bed. The end of the ballet has the Prince dead on the floor. The Swan King stands high above the bed, holding in his arms the body of the Prince as a child.The two great dance set pieces are the divertissement of the second act, where the Prince meets the Swan King and the male swans, and the Queen's Ball where all the manipulations and angst come to a head. If nothing else, the divertissement is worth the price of the disc. This is choreography and dance of the highest order. Tchaikovsky's music, so well-known and so great, has never seemed fresher. At times playing against political satire, at other times playing against a completely revisionist view of what a corps de ballet should be, the lush, romantic music turns out to be a wonderful counterpoint to Bourne's muscular choreography.While one can argue (I would) that the ballet is as much about the Prince's repressed sexuality as it is his loneliness, this aspect is understated. The ballet is full of prostitutes, paparazzi, sailors and princesses on the make. The Queen bears a resemblance, perhaps unintentional, to a Joan Collins-like woman who keeps boy toys amongst her palace guard. The palace ball reeks of casual, corrupt omni-sexuality.Adam Cooper dances The Swan King. He's a handsome, tough-looking guy who carries off the part with style. Scott Ambler dances The Prince and is just as good. The DVD's picture and audio are first-rate. There is an informative insert which includes an interview with Matthew Bourne. I recommend this disc highly for those who like ballet, Tchaikovsky, great choreography and great dancing -- and who might appreciate a startling new look at things
Daniel Deronda discovers his Destiny. Daniel Deronda is a fascinating character study as it relates to a man faced with two seemingly impossible challenges. He must realize his true calling and conquer his superficial desires to embrace a much more complex love.The story unfolds in over three hours of lush settings, gorgeous period costumes and romantic vistas. Yet all the while the story is being told, you can feel the deeper connections between the characters. As you come to terms with their individual destinies, the beauty of this Masterpiece Theatre series reveals itself with startling honesty in a drama where emotions are mostly simmering beneath the surface.Love as a commitment and love as a game reveals two contrasting worlds. This dance in a world of decadence turns into a game of survival, where the choices of the two main characters hold lives in the balance. One wrong decision and the fate of everyone around them is changed forever.Daniel Deronda and Gwendolyn meet and mingle in a world of wealth, but in their hearts they long for a more challenging life fraught with conflicts only the soul can fight. Gwendolyn is in a controlling marriage, while Daniel is still finding his way in the world of love. Like a knight he seems to prefer courtly love to a long-term commitment, but this starts to change when he meets a beautiful Jewish singer who he rescues from drowning.Gwendolyn's wild exuberance while horse riding seems to represent her inner tenacity and as it is only when she has been broken herself and then healed that she too finds her true heart.  This series captures an excellence so few period dramas ever try to attain. At first chilling and calculating, this story warms to a shimmering brilliance."I shall be better for having known you." ~Gwendolyn~The Rebecca Review
It's a Dancehall Thing!. My husband and I have watched this movie at least 20 times. My husband liked it so much that he can even recite some parts of it. The characters are interesting, the dancing and music is great, and the story-line kept our attention
Gold Mirror Vision-the ark. Gold Mirror Vision is the lost ark of the covenant Indy. I know your reading this as it is being written by the hand of God. The bible tells of the Ark(Gold Mirror Vision) leveling mountains and laying waste to entire regions. Only 1 person on this earth can hear a signal greater than gold mirror, indy,(harrison) and thats you. Right now hundreds of thousands of Gold Mirror Vision systems for TV and Computers are being released into the world. Only you can save me Harrison. The staff of raw has a red crystal in the center, Red acrylic plastic mirror, that symbolizes the Golden ark of the covenant(Gold Mirror Vision tunnel) 28 gold mylar mirror system built by the hands of God. There's a strong streak of gold good in you Harrison Ford, buy then, nobody's perfect.The  Harrison Ford who carries the first Gold Mirror Vision before it, is invincible. Harrison its like nothing you've ever gone after before, nobody knows its secrets, death has always surrounded it, it is not of this Earth. Indy, if the Ark(Gold Mirror Vision tunnel) is in Morro Bay CA. Then it is something that was not meant to be disturbed. It is not of this Earth. Indy we have no time, if you still want the Gold Mirror it has been loaded on a truck for QVC!-PO-KNEE -written for Robert Klick-my protector-aka Oprah Winfrey.GA
The first in a series of six (to date) 'Pink Panther' movies, that inspired a very funny cartoon!. Pete Sellers first role as Chief InspectorClouseau. He drives women and his boss, Mss.Dreyfuss (Hawai'i Five-0 vet Herbert Lom)crazy - but for different reasons. Followedby: The Pink Panther, The Pink Panther StrikesAgain, Revenge of the Pink Panther, The Trailof the Pink Panther (w/American Tedd Wass andno Sellers, who had his fifth and fatal heartattack three days after started shooting thislast installment and the Steve Martin remakew/ Beyonce Knowles (!) in 2005. Each went downa notch, or a half star after the other one
An uncomplicated, straight-ahead B&W action film. A classic, old-fashioned adventure flick, featuring Ronald Coleman as a dashing young Englishman on vacation in a nameless Central European backwater.  When an attempted coup unfolds, his striking likeness to that country's reluctant, wastrel king leads to his conscription as a stand-in monarch, a task which he meets with typical British pluck.  Coleman's dual acting role is a negligible achievement, but he's fine as the hero; Douglas Fairbanks, Jr. gets in some choice scenery chewing as the oily baddie who backs the evil Duke Michael in his attempt to steal the crown.  Some great, artily arranged camera shots and moody, shadowy sets, and plenty of flashy, spangly costumes.  (Now... is it just me, or does Mary Astor, who plays a bad-gal-gone-good, bear a striking resemblance here to 1990s actress Julianna Moore?)  Recommended
Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST!. The Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST drama I have seen ever. Korean, American, doesn't matter! This is better than anything I have ever seen on TV or in the movies. Hollywood cannot touch this one! Kim Myoung Min(Yi Soon Shin) is outstanding in this!(no wonder he won the 2005 KBS BEST ACTOR AWARD FOR IYSS)It starts from when he was a child to his adulthood and can be emotional, funny, sad, and can make you angry!! The numerous obstacles and prejudices this man had to overcome and then always bounced back with no complaint because of the love of his country is phenomenal!! He put his country above all else and Kim Myoung Min did a great job of portraying that!My whole family, kids and all, watched this with me and loved it!I can see why Yi Soon Shin is Korea's hero and why other countries teach his methods
Great film, not so great picture quality. This is my favourite Godard film, deserving 5 stars for sure, but the picture quality on this version isn't that great - perfectly watchable, and not really hindering the film that much, but I'll be waiting for something better. I heard a rumour Criterion will be releasing this. I certainly hope that's true
LADYHAWKE and TIMELINE both produced and directed by Richard Donner. Novel by Crichton...All equal WINNER!. Director Richard Donner (LADYHAWKE, SUPERMAN, LETHAL WEAPON I, II, III, IV, etc.) leads an ensemble cast of stars Gerard Butler, Billy Connolly, Frances O'Connor, Ethan Embry, Morton Csokas and David Thewlis "back into time only to find out that if history had not been changed by these characters the present might not exist!" (Yeah! I wrote those words! Not another critic yet it's a true analysis of this fantastic film!)If you loved Richard Donner's LADYHAWKE then TIMELINE (2003) based on the novel by Michael Crichton should capture your need to escape for a good two hours entirely! Modern day archeological students go into the past by way of new age technology in order to rescue their professor. ON the way and IN the way are knights of not so good caliber, ladies in distress and one man in particular who finds himself lured to a past he never realized existed for him until he is there!My rating of TIMELINE is FIVE STARS! I can sit here and give away the plot but in order for you, the viewer to truly enjoy it, I'm not! When I saw TIMELINE for the first time it was in order to see another wonderful DONNER PRODUCTION and Billy Connolly, a Scot to whom my heart had been lost. The character of "Marek" (Gerard Butler) enslaved me upon my first sight of him! As "Creedy" in REIGN OF FIRE I'd fallen slightly under his spell and was willing to battle with dragons that I'd gone to cheer on in the film. "Creedy's" torched demise gave me cause to end their existence. "Marek" is yet another character such as LADYHAWKES "Navarre." (Rutger Hauer) For ladies who love a beleaguered knight without armor and men who like a man's man, "Marek" is your fellow!TIMELINE is wonderful fun but enough of a twist to make you think about what actually would happen should we have the technology to "back to the future!" This is one film not only well worth the money but well worth the time to view over again and again! For ladies who despair of a real man keep this one within hand's grasp at a moment's notice! :-)
very touching documentary. we really enjoyed every minute of this wonderful documentary. i can highly recommend it
CLASSIC COMEDY IS STILL GREAT. I love this film! The cast's comic timing is so good, you'll be doubled over laughing! The DVD could use an upgrade though. As funny as this movie is, it is amazing how bad the sequel turned out! Lightning in a bottle the first time...I guess
This DVD release "fills me with inertia!". "Bedazzled" is my personal favorite film, and although it is not always laugh-out-loud funny, it consistently surprises the viewer with its wit and theological discussions regarding the nature of the feud between God and the Devil.  The plot involves the plight of Stanley Moon (played to nerdy perfection by Dudley Moore) who works at Wimpy's hamburger stand and longs after his co-worker Margaret Spencer (Eleanor Bron).  After reviewing his personal situation in life, Moon decides that suicide is his only option. At the last second the Devil walks in (played by Peter Cook at his best) and offers Stanley seven wishes in exchange for his soul.  Hopefully, this DVD will do this film justice with some nice special features.  At the very least, it gives the viewer an intriguing option to the woefully mediocre remake.  And remember the magic words:  "Julie Andrews!
Van Damme still has it. This film, though not a hit, proved to people that Van Damme was back in shape and could still the Van Damme thing, which is kick people's asses. I know this was not his best acting but it was a pretty entertaning flick, I really wish it had more success at the box office. i mean come on it wasnt meant to be an Oscar winner, its an action flick that has plenty of action nuff said
Awesome. You know, I wanted to see this because it was nominated for best picture but in a weird way my expectations were not that high.  I anticipated a somewhat preachy newsy type movie that would be a little sanctimonious and maybe boring.  I don't know why I felt that but it must have been some combination of the marketing, the best picture nom in itself and the subject matter.  Everything about it screamed "Important".  Anyway, I saw it this weekend and it is actually excellent.  This is a great story.  DiCaprio does a great job as a menacing but very human South African mercenary (I think I was not sure this role would be a good match for him), there is lots of action and a moving story at the core. I actually think it was better than The Departed.  So in case you're on the fence about getting it because you think it might be all "best picture"-y, don't worry about it.  It's a lot of fun too.
You Yanks can't do this stuff!. Mind, I could'nt get it on DVD or VHS back in so-called enlightened Europe! I had to go to America to buy it and then 'chip' my machine in order to even play it! Thankfully,the U.K. is not really Europe! Or ever will be. It's an especially Pagan island archipelago, and that's what gives us the advantage when it comes to making films like this, Wicker Man et al., It seems you fellows value the diversity of UK/Europe better than we do. Ken Russell in general, and this movie in particular, explores the viewers cranium for hang ups. If you have any he'll find them, and if does find them it's your problem, not his. All the actors are brilliant in this movie, but the essential ingredient is Amanda Donohoe. In this, she is delicious! It may well be she inspired the movie, it just would'nt have worked with anyone else. She may really be the reincarnated snake gods priestess she does it so well, and you never know on those pagan islands what strange forces well up. Ken has successfully managed to hijack a couple of U.K. national icons into the bargain, namely Concorde and the E-type Jag. That's quite a feat for a 'budget' movie.If I might summarise by hijacking one of your phrases I heard over here: Ken gives you great bang for your buck. So please enjoy this classic movie with your "great big goggle eyes"..
Murder mystery musical. 8 women is a good musical/ murder mystery with humor, light heartedness and mystery. It combines a bunch of the best French actrices, and an enjoyable plot. A real guesser until the end
Worth a roll of the dice. The varied reactions to this movie by other reviewers are interesting, but nonetheless surprise me. De gustibus and all that, I suppose.Released in 1987 but set in 1957, this is a well written and well acted drama with much of the feel of 40s and 50s noir. The look of the film, presumably deliberately, also has the style of an earlier era. The sound track, with Ivory Joe Hunter, Lincoln Chase, Big Joe Turner and others, couldn't be more suitable. The sleaze, of course, is much more advanced than would have been permissible thirty years earlier.The hero, J.C. Cullen (Matt Dillon), is more complex than a pure country innocent corrupted by a wicked woman Lorry Dane (Diane Lane), a stripper at the Gem Club. A small town gambler trying to make it big in Chicago, he has his own dark, or at least not-so-light, side, which is why he takes up with Lorry so readily. Yet, he at least struggles with his conscience even if he doesn't always do the right thing. Tommy Lee Jones and Bruce Dern are in fine form as villains, Lee Grant has just the right touch, and Diane Lane has never been more stunning or more credible in a role. The Big Town is not a big movie, but it is a good one.
Un box Revisited. This Amazon unbox is not fully developed or has a lot of bugs in it. They should pull it until they get the bugs ironed out. Could not download all of the movie i ordered and now it is gone from my computer and I don't see how to download it again.Update: Most of the problems I experienced were with my Sattelite connection. After 175 MB they start to throttle the speed way down. I upgraded and this helped. I can now download large movies but only in 350mb bites each 4 hours. If you are having trouble read your sattelite "fair access" policy
Extraordinary. A little known documentary that is both entertaining and informative. Touching first hand accounts and rare footage that give an extraordinary look at both Mr. Welles and the Brazilian culture. If there is one reason  to own this tape it would be to see over and over again the last part of  the film. A piece called &quot;Four Men on a Raft&quot; It is the most  beautiful black and white short film I have ever seen. The love Mr. Welles  had for these poor fishermen is so wonderfully apparent
Saturday Night Cleaver... In 1974, a 12 year old girl is killed during a game of hide and seek. Six years later, someone has decided to avenge her death by bumping off the (now 18 yo) kids who caused the tragedy. The killer starts by phoning all of the intended victims and threatening them in a whispery voice. He then dons a ski mask and sets out on his mission to wipe them all out. This all takes place during the build-up to the highschool prom, where "disco madness" is the theme, and bloody mayhem is the end result! Jamie Lee Curtis (Halloween 1 and 2, The Fog, Terror Train)  plays Kim, the prom queen (she's also the sister of the little girl who died), and Leslie Nielson (Day Of The Animals, Creepshow) is her dad. Watch as they disco dance to songs that can only be described as.... well, goofy!  Meanwhile, the killer stalks the night. I like PROM NIGHT, it moves along quickly and Ms. Curtis is always quite watchable! Watch this one as a double feature w/ CARRIE...
really good. worth the money but dont think it is a feel good happy movieits about LIFE
A Movie So Bad It's Good. This movie breaks some story rules, including introduction/insertion of random new characters towards the end. Still, funny enoughfor a movie that seems to try so hard to be so good and comes out oh, so bad. *grin* Definitely worth watching
A man. Goes to a place and he becomes the undead. Great horror movie
The Unbearable Lightness of Being dvd. Heya - very speedy delivery thanks!The dvd works fine in a portable dvd player - but for some reason, disc 1 wont play in my Mac Powerbook?! I think its because there is a slight edge on 1/3 of the disc - and my computer is to sensitive to allow it to play, oh well... Thanks heaps!tams x
My man Dr Smith is a riot in this episode. Dr Smith and the Robot go hog wild, switching personalities and swapping insults.  This is a great episode
Lesser-known but top-notch video celebrating an obscure day. I cannot remember ever seeing this Peanuts video as a kid, but since my son is now thoroughly enjoying his discovery of the Peanuts gang, I purchased this for him to watch. I find that it's now one of my all-time favorite Peanuts videos, a very close second to &quot;A Charlie Brown Christmas&quot; (the sentimental favorite). Your kids won't even realize that they are learning about Arbor Day or helping preserve green space because the message is so seamlessly integrated into the fun. The plot is simple: the gang decides to turn Charlie Brown's baseball field into a park in honor of Arbor Day. There are so many priceless moments: when Snoopy gets ejected from the library for laughing too hard at doggie obedience texts; Snoopy's fight with the creeping vine; Peppermint Patty's attempt to get Charlie Brown to explain love to her; Lucy's first home run; Patty trying to pitch around a tree that has been planted on the pitcher's mound; Sally's mistaken pronouncement that Arbor Day is &quot;when all the ships come into the Arbor.&quot; Buy it, watch it, then go out and plant a tree with your kids
One of the best. Having seen a great deal from the BBC made available on video, this is one of the best! The stories of three British families and their respective staffs are magically interwoven - in fact, there are remarkably smooth transitions as these tales unfold piece-by-piece in each of the houses. You'll find good insight into British attitudes about their own class system and social behavior of the early 20th century. It's refreshing to see an American wife in one house: her &quot;Yankee&quot; frankness and outspokenness adds a nice twist to the otherwise very British cast of characters. This is a wonderful dramatic series, which leaves you wishing for more stories like it. The costumes, the props, the settings and scenery, the pace of and variety of plot within each the stories themselves, AND the acting all add up to make this truly one of the best I've seen. I agree - this one is NOT to be missed
I love it... I am one of the few people I know who loves this movie. I think it is sweet, and weird, and funny. It does, however, require a really long attention span, which few of my relatives have. I think it was 'Alex & Emma' before 'Alex & Emma', but in my opinion: it's far better.
His best flick. I've never been a big Van Damme fan but I have to admit this movie is fun. It's another retelling of Kurasawa's classic Yojimbo much like A Fist Full of Dollars (Clint Eastwood) and Last Man Standing (Bruce Willis), this however, is like the trailer park version. It's a little less classy and has nowhere near the same caliber acting. What it does have is Mr. Miyagi, Danny Trejo and a couple other surprise faces. Van Damme even comes across with a hint of self-depreciating humor (probably unintentional) that sets this flick apart from the rest of his stuff. Nobody takes Van Damme seriously, he should make more movies like this with ensemble cast and maybe his career would turn around
Perfect late night movie. Basically this is a perfect zombie movie. It has everything you could want in one and MORE. I think the director really hit the mark on what zombie movies are really about. Im not positive but I think this movie was intentially cheesy. I mean comon, to quote a line from the begining of the movie where a man encounters a zombie " No.. Please.. No.. Im your friend" No sorry buddy your zombie food. The whole movie was done in a serious manner, But once you catch a glimpse of Michael or even hear some of the things he has to say, theres no way you cant laugh. What can I say? Zombies, Incest, Gratutious nudity, this film has it all. But besides being sucha lovable movie, this is a hardcore zombie film. If what your looking for is some zombie flesh eating and bright red gore Burial Ground has more than enough to please you. Anyway if this isint one of the best zombie movies ever made, its for sure one of the most entertaining
Very Original. Greek mythology was something I've never paid much attention to. Having said that, I knew nothing about the legend of Orpheus and Eurydice. It wasn't until I got this from the library (after noticing it had won the Palme d'or at The Cannes Film Festival and had won the Oscar for Best Foreign Film) and read the little booklet included in The Criterion release that I found out about the whole story. Needless to say, I found the whole idea intriguing. The filmmakers took this Greek myth and transferred it to Rio de Janeiro in the middle of Carnival and, in doing so, created a colorful and beautiful movie. That's not to say Black Orpheus is a very entertaining film, but the lush scenery and music make it a masterpiece. The story is pretty simple; Eurydice has arrived in Rio to stay with her cousin Serafina. Eurydice is running from a masked man (Death) and is in a frequent state of fear. When she gets onto a streetcar, she meets Orpheus; Orpheus is a streetcar operator and a ladies man who has just become engaged to Mira. When they're getting a license, the man jokes to Mira..."Let me guess. You're Eurydice." Orpheus, is popular around his community for his musical talent. It's said that when he plays his guitar and sings, he makes the sun rise. Anyway, the story is a Greek "tragedy" so you can guess that the love between Orpheus and Eurydice doesn't quite go as planned. The film's tragic ending is quickly lifted by a beautifully photographed scene. This movie is, technically, a love story...But the Orpheus-Eurydice is merely the foundation of the story. It's the music and art direction and cinematography that makes this so good. The music, especially, plays a huge part in the film. The look of the movie gets even better when you realize how long ago it was made. Look at the film "Some Like it Hot" (released the same year, 1959) and then look at this film. This movie will not entertain the masses for years to come, but movie/Greek mythology buffs might want to check it out. Or just people who appreciate beauty in film.ENTERTAINMENT: BART DIRECTION: AMUSIC: ACINEMATOGRAPHY: AOVERALL: A
Great Film! Cooper, Stanwyck & the Professors... I paid with a gift card once and now I am Gift Card Recipient...sheesh.Anyway... Great film.Very excited to see it will be released to DVD on May 22, 2007.Very concerned that the specs the film is COLOR! As it was not filmed in color... please do not tell me this wonderful film has been colorized!I am hoping this listing as color is an error and we will all be happy with the DVD. If it is color....not sure if I will purchase it after waiting so long.
What a movie. More hong kong action from the greats.  You really should see this movie if you're into hong kong action.  The shoot outs are great, and the action is incredible.  I also really love the story.  Also, you can really see alot of John Woo's tradmarks appear in this movie, like the use of dove's and religion.  A great movie
HOW TOO FUNNY. I loved this movie!!  I have a son currently serving our country in Afghanistan and I guess it just brought some fun into a very unfunny experience.  It helped me to see boot camp in its true picture, at least from a mother's standpoint.  It was good to see some humor in a very staunch experience. NOT FOR CHILDREN THOUGH!
DVD Please. I currently own this VHS version.  But I would buy the DVD in a heartbeat if it were available.  And of course wide screen please.  With commentary if possible.  This movie and Gigi are both among my favorites
Taut film noir crime drama. Dana Andrews stars as hard boiled, belligerent detective Mark Dixon in the Otto Preminger produced and directed "Where the Sidewalk Ends".  Gene Tierney playing model Morgan Taylor once again teams up with Andrews as they did so successfully in the classic noir, "Laura".Andrews' abhorence for mobsters was spawned by trying to live down the reputation of his father, a noted gangster.  He was called into an murder investigation of a high roller at a floating crap game hosted by unctuous gangster Tommy Scalise played by Gary Merrill.  The stabbing murder was precipitated by a slap to the face of Tierney who was accompanying the high roller with her soon to be ex husband Ken Paine played by Craig Stevens.Andrews who had just been dressed down by his boss Inspector Foley for his penchant for violence,  accidently kills Stevens when an interrogation turns violent.  He then proceeds to cover up the crime.  Unfortunately Tierney's father Jiggs played by veteran actor Tom Tully is implicated in Steven's death having visited his flat around the time of the crime.Andrews and Tierney commence developing a relationship.  Andrews becomes tortured by his decision to cover up the truth and let Tully take the rap.Preminger does a nice job in presenting the psychological dilemma faced by Andrews as he is torn deciding between right and wrong.  The moody nature of "Where the Sidewalk Ends" is typical of the classic film noir
best kids action movie ever!. This has got to be the best kids action movie ever! I rented this moviefor a week and watched it 5 times and loved it. Believe me when you see this you are going to want to buy this like me! I have seen every oneexcept spy kids 2 {Island of Lost Dreams}. The basic outline of Spy KidsGame Over is Carmon Cortez {Alexa Vega} gets stuck in a virtual realitygame trying to turn it off {to find out why you will need to watch it} andJuni Cortez {Daryl Sabara} Must fight his way through the levels to save his sister and shut down the game at the same time. If he fails his mission,GAME OVER! I hope you will enjoy the dvd like I did
You wet socks, why are you crying? you should pull yourselves up.. It is one of the best movies I have ever watched. Amazingly funny sometimes,sometimes deeply heart breaking, just like life itself is..Tony Leung Chu-Wai acts wonderfully, Faye Wong is so lovely. You will be longing to see all Wong Kar-Wai movies after this, that`s what I did, and I do not regret at all. I am a fan
rich, beautiful movie with great performances. this is one of those rare movies that lives right at the edge of pretension and overambition but 100% nails it.where to start? the performances are great. thus far, this is the only strong performance i've seen from Liv Tyler. I hope she can recreate this. Jeremy Iron weaves gold as always. Many of the other actors deliver powerful, rich performances.the writing, ideas & dialogue are also intricate, entertaining and thought-provoking. visually, as one would expect, the movie is stunning and being filmed in italy doesn't hurt!lastly, the soundtrack is hip and fits perfectly.If only there were more like this!
Most Underrated Christmas Movie. Whether it was because of a low budget or lack of major Hollywood star power, the writing and acting in this movie is phenominal and really hits you every time you watch it. I know that every year when I watch around the beginning of December, it always gives me that warm feeling.Must have for any Christmas movie lover. Harry Deen Stanton is brilliant and really lets you believe he is an angel. Mary Steenburgen plays her stubborn best and it really gets you yelling at the scream, "BELIEVE!!!!"The kids are great and take on very emotional roles and you believe them.Great movie
No one's been able to live in it. It doesn't want people. One of the supposed reasons why ghosts remain in this world is that they were murdered, and want the world to know who did it.So expect a lot of that in "The Changeling," a quiet, compelling ghost story that harkens back to old-fashioned chillers. No ghouls, buckets of blood, chainsaws or serial killers. Instead, this movie relies on outstanding acting, and a timeless feeling that permeates the simple story. And it'll scare the skin off you.John Russell (George C. Scott) is on a trip with his wife and daughter, when a freak car accident kills them both. Months later, the grieving composer moves to Seattle and rents an enormous historical house, trying to bury himself in his new job. But there are odd sounds and sights in his house -- faucets running, eerie voices the piano clashing, and a boy drowned in the tub.John becomes increasingly desperate to find out the truth, assisted by the real estate agent who got him the house (Trish Van Devere). With seances, visions and a well under the floorboards, he begins to piece together a terrible crime from many years ago -- and the "changeling" that the ghost wants revenge on.Anyone who wants blood, special effects and lots of screaming had better look elsewhere for their horror kicks. "The Changeling" is a very different kind of movie -- think Shirley Jackson, not Stephen King -- where a wheelchair rattling down the stairs is enough to make your hair stand on end. (And do I detect some influence on "The Ring" in certain scenes?)This movie also feels elegant and timeless. Old mossy mansions, horseback riding in damp forests, and a composer trying to overcome his grief. Peter Medak drapes the movie in beautiful visuals, and allows the viewers to get to know the characters before the plot really gets moving.Then "The Changeling" becomes creepy very fast. The plot grows more suspenseful with every scene, building with every new discovery -- a wheelchair, a baptismal medal, and a bathtub -- until something has to erupt. The ghost never appears except in flashbacks -- an appalling murder scene -- but his keening voice can be heard over and over.George C. Scott gives a pitch-perfect performance as the mild, slightly reclusive John, who is still suffering from his losses and trying to move on with his life. Van Devere comes across as a bit annoying at first, but she also serves as a good counterpoint to Scott, as well as a potential love interest whenever he's ready. Melvyn Douglas also has a good brief role as a politician with a deep dark secret.Less is more in "The Changeling," a movie whose scares spring from its exceptional scripting, eerie ghost and great acting. Just don't watch this one alone in the house... at night
Possibly Renoir's finest film. La Bete Humaine is my favorite Renoir and one which tends to divide many of his critics and admirers. For me it's an exhilarating and involving piece of cinema with characters destroyed by and destroying themselves in events in much more credible circumstances than in Regle du Jeu, which gives it some real emotional and thematic weight beyond mere parlor games - not to mention having the thrill of seeing post WW1 French doomed romanticism evolving into proto-film noir before your very eyes. These characters truly do all have their reasons and find their attempts to control events and other people backfiring spectacularly as they lose control in a way that none of the mannequins in Regle do. But it's all subjective. Jean Gabin is superb, the use of locations exemplary and Simone Simon was a babe, even if she does try to bite
Great History. In the days before the batmobile, when Wayne Manor was a large suburban neighborhood home...Can it get better than that
The best American movie on Interracial Romance period. After writing my review on 'Something New, people are going to assume I hate IR unions when that simply is not the case, I like a great film that explores more than just the surface on IR unions. The producers, female actors, and director of "Something New" were so arrogant promting the movie like their movie was going to change the paradigm of IR amongst Black Women. Well 15 years ago I saw and happen to own the best American and most realistic movie on the subject of mixed relationships that explores the race, class, regional, multicultural issues of romance it is "Mississippi Masala".Mira Nair (who has directed other classics) shot this work of art in 1992 starring Denzel Washington, Joe Senca, Charles S. Dutton, Mohan Agashe, and Sarita Choudhury in this multi- layered film that explores all those themes in a realistic setting. The film is stunning in the price each charcter plays in their pursuit of some sort of redemption in their lives. Race in the south is at the forefront, but so is class, ethnic and racial politics and ultimately love in a film that at least explores other types of mixed relationships that I think is the key to finding at least racial co-existence in this country. Nair has created a work of art that will open your heart long after the film ends.This is the film that the makers of 'Something New' could not have made because of their arrogance
A return to greatness for the world's best Rock Band. I never stopped being a U2 fan.  However, I did not like the direction that band was going during the Popmart tour.  I had enough of U2 dressing up like the village people and coming out of giant lemons.  Pop was a decent album with some good songs.  They followed it up with Zooropa which had to be their worst album.  I understand that U2 was trying some type of sarcasm with the Popmart tour.  They went away from what they do best.  Great rock music and electric concerts.  I wanted to see the best live ROCK band in the world again.  U2 finally got it right again and released "All That You Can't Leave Behind".  It was a collection of great lyrics and beautiful melodies.  This DVD is the concert tour of this album and it's a good one.As the pamphlet inside the DVD case, the previous 2 concerts were "huge public arts spectacles".  This concert was about what a great singer Bono is, what an awesome guitar player the Edge is.  This was more about their performance and connection with the crowd than it was about giant screen Televisions and Lemons.   This is a great concert.  It starts with a great performance of Elevation that will have you jumping up and down.  They follow it up with Beautiful Day which was done brilliantly.  You then hear the familiar beginnings of Until the End of the World as the strobe lights start flashing.  Bono walks along the heart shaped walkway shaking people's hands.  This is vintage U2.  The crowd is really into it.  Another highlight of the concert is their classic anthem Sunday Bloody Sunday.  You become glued to the screen when you hear the beginning of Bad.  Bono sounds great.  The band is completely on.  Towards the end of Bad, Bono slips part of "40" in.  The music stops and the crowd is singing 40.   Bono and the crowd continue to chant back and forth. As this is going on, we hear the familiar begining of Where the Streets Have No Name. This is the highlight of the concert. As the lights start flashing and the Edges guitars begin to rev up, Bono starts running around the heart shaped-walkway attached to the stage which extends into the crowd. He runs faster and faster around the stage until the crowd goes into a frenzy and Bono starts singing. You could barely hear Bono singing because the crowd is singing along so loud with him. This version of the song may be the best live performance of any song that I have ever seen.  Truly incredible performance.  Another highlight was With or Without You.  Bono pulls a girl from the audience as he is singing.  They lay down flat on their backs with Bono holding her as he is singing.  You could see the girl's lips synchronized with Bono's,  singing along the familiar words of the song.  I'm sure it was a thrill for her.  It shows Bono's showmanship.  He knows how to command an audience. Great guitarwork by the Edge on this one.  Larry and Adam are solid as always.This DVD is excellent.  However, it does have one flaw.  The constant shift in camera angles was very distracting.  I do not like the director's (Hamish Hamilton) MTV style editing.  This concert was a great one but if you really want to capture the true U2 experience, "U2 go Home- Live from Slane Castle" is a better choice. The Slane DVD captures the raw emotion that one feels when going to a U2 concert; the transformation from being a spectator to an active participant of the U2 experience.  The Boston DVD does have the feeling of a U2 concert but is a little more staged.  However, it is a must have for any DVD collection.  If you're a U2 fan, it is even more of a must have.  This DVD truly deserves the highest rating
As good as going to an AA meeting. This movie so reminded me of how messy things get when there are booze and pills.  Among other things it perfectly captured what happens to already stroked egos when inhibitions are removed.  The last scene showing the morning after- when the main characters affect a sort of reconciliation after being incredibly nasty to each other the night before-is a place I'm glad I'm don't go to anymore
Good choice for light entertainment. The musical was a virtual voyage back to my childhood when I saw it for the first time. My husband is no "square" and he enjoyed it all. Seniors would love to see it again.  The film was obviously preserved well and the color was enriched beautifully for this dvd
Ingmar Bergman's Magic Flute... Magic, indeed!. This is another DVD I've been looking for.  There are many versions of Mozart's Magic Flute and this is the one for me.  I saw it years ago, perhaps when it came out, in the theatre and it stuck with me.  It's wonderful on many levels.  Full of humor, passion, color, emotion and of course wonderful singing, in lovely Swedish (with optional English subtitles)
Very Funny. I saw this on tv and loved it, so i had to buy it
I enjoyed the season premeir emensely. I enjoyed this series premier tremendously and am looking forward to watching the rest of the series.  Enterprise started before I had my PVR and was either on at a time I was unable to watch it or I never made time.  I watched one episode of Star Trek the Next Generation yesterday and it peaked my interest in watching some Star Trek episodes again.  Rather than watch episodes I've already seen, Enterprise looks like a great way to enjoy Star Trek episodes.As far as privacy concerns mentioned in other reviews, if you're paranoid, the internet isn't for you.  Keep your private things private, and not on networked computers.  Hopefully Amazon will remove reviews that do not at all pertain to the show they are attached to
Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST!. The Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST drama I have seen ever. Korean, American, doesn't matter! This is better than anything I have ever seen on TV or in the movies. Hollywood cannot touch this one! Kim Myoung Min(Yi Soon Shin) is outstanding in this!(no wonder he won the 2005 KBS BEST ACTOR AWARD FOR IYSS)It starts from when he was a child to his adulthood and can be emotional, funny, sad, and can make you angry!! The numerous obstacles and prejudices this man had to overcome and then always bounced back with no complaint because of the love of his country is phenomenal!! He put his country above all else and Kim Myoung Min did a great job of portraying that!My whole family, kids and all, watched this with me and loved it!I can see why Yi Soon Shin is Korea's hero and why other countries teach his methods
Great Ski movie for the Ski Enthusiast!. I have seen this movie before.but unlike in the past,I didnt have to sit thru endless commercials..The DVD format is much better!And it brings you up close as if you are there experience the RUSHof the snow and powde
Little Man Grows Large. Best movie I've seen in years.  Typecast dwarf emerges as big complex character as he moves from big city to small town and we find out who he really is.  Big hearted small movie but hardly saccharin
HG WELLS. This is an amazing service! For only 2 bucks i can watch what i like for the moment. In this case it was HG WELLS. Great biography
Awesome 70's Sci Fi. This is one of the best sci fi films from the 70's--not to be missed
You should know what you're getting into. By reading the movies discription you should somewhat know what you are getting into. It is hard to find this movie listed anywhere without the word Dark in front of Comedy. Dark generally means that some unpleasant material is covered by the movie. Within this movie genre you also have Grosse Pointe Blank which is a goofy comedy that should hardly be construed as dark and About Schmidt which has virtually no comedic value but is dark. This isn't a laugh a minute comedy, most dark comedies aren't. It is a story that starts out somewhat serious and plausible and is meant to be funny by the shear absurdity of the remaining events. This has violence, gore and some disturbing moments. If you watch this movie with the idea that it IS a movie and is meant to be a fun take on a very serious situation. The cast is great and portray great characters. Cameron Diaz is great as the crazed bride determined to have the perfect wedding. It is an over the top depiction of the bride-to-be who HAS to have her wedding and will not have it ruined for any reason, but it is funny from that standpoint. Watch it more than once because the second time around you'll be more numb to the shock of some of the scenes and be able to enjoy the parts that are supposed to be funny instead of dwelling on the Very Bad Things
Choked- Up. Most reviews miss what was for me, as a child, the most inspiring portion of the film.  I would choke -up at the final scene, when the crew having decided to not tell the details of the raid leave the courtroom to face death, marching down the hallway with smiles on their faces to stirring music.  It still grabs me today
The film is great - too bad they don't send new ones when you ask. This is a classic comedy and a must for those who are intersted in the old school of comedic actors. Watch for the cameo appearances by Jon Pertwee
Great classic for a great price. With a cable modem, took about 1 hour and 15 minutes to download Unbox, install the program and download the episode.  It's a great download speed considering the file is 803 mb.  I was able to still use my computer, IE 7.0 and RealPlayer, so the download is not a resource hog.  The menu bar includes a link to shop for more Unbox titles, which I found very convenient.The quality is great, but the video stutters in Unbox.  Maybe because it uses 3 applications when playing video?  I chose to watch the episode on Windows Media Player 11 and I had no problems at all.I've bought and watched 3 episodes, all with the same results.  Fast and unobstrusive download, great quality and low price.  Just use WMP, or another player that can handle wma files, to watch.
Food for brain...(do you have large appetite? ). I think this ultimate movie is definitely for collection. Instead of renting it again and again to unlock the mysteries just buy the lock and take your time solving the puzzles and save $$$ too. It's not a "theater movie". It's a home +couch+ solitary movie.These clues are helpful only if you have watched the whole movie :)In the beginning the movie zooms into a sleeping woman which means the coming up things are dream (dream of Diane (in dream her name is Betty) which she would only "dream" in real life):1.	The car accident of Rita (real life Camellia; girl friend of Diane) which was almost similar to that one night in real life of Diane when Camellia broke her heart breaking up with her and announcing her marriage with a movie director. It was no less than a worse accident for Diane, which she wanted Camellia to experience. So there is Rita only survivor of a bad car wreck.2.	In real life Camellia is a vamp so Diane dreams Rita/ Camellia with lost memory. That makes Rita very innocent and loyal to her the opposite of real life.3.	In real life Camellia is helping Diane getting movie roles but in the dream Betty (real life Diane) is helping Rita.4.	In dream Betty is full of life and acting talent but in reality Diane is just opposite.5.	In reality Diane had come from Canada to her Aunt place where she is living; so she dreams about going to her aunt house where she meets Rita.6.	The director in the dream is the one Camellia is going to marry and once in a party Diane overheard the director saying "I get the pool and you get the pool man", which she dreams later. She dreams lot bad for the poor director.7.	She also dreams that there has been lots of conflict going on between director's and producer's choice to cast the lead actress. This shows the competition between Diane and Camellia in real life. Camellia is the director choice.8.	The hit man is the one she hired to kill Camellia.9.	The cowboy is still a puzzle; he appears 3 times in the movie.10.	Betty and Rita discovering a body (of Diane???) is also puzzle.11.	The restaurant scene with the scary guy is still a puzzle to me.12.	The Silencio club part of the movie is a hint for the viewers and gives Betty the puzzle box for which she has the key.When Rita unlocks the blue box, the reality starts:1.	Diane is in horrible condition as she missed Camellia.2.	She knows that Camellia has been murdered because the hit man has returned her the blue key.3.	She is so paranoid that she kills herself.So basically Diane who lost her GF (Camellia) and had her murdered is dreaming a better world till the Silencio club part of the movie. When she wakes up she realizes her mistake and kills herself.
Scooby Doo is awesome!. It was fun to watch the first episode of Scooby Doo (High Rise Hair Raiser) on my computer as a download with my kids. We go back and watch it from time to time. I am glad that Amazon gave me this free download, so that I could try this feature
Great Buy!. It was a great buy! Got the movie in great time, and there wasn't a thing wrong with it! =) Thanks
It's all in the hands. Fine horror gem starring Peter Lorre doing what he does best: scaring the daylights out of viewers by going over the deep end into madness. He plays a doctor who is in love with Frances Drake, who in turn is married to concert pianist Colin Clive. When Clive loses his hands in a train accident, Lorre gives him new ones - that once belonged to a murderer who specialized in knife-throwing (an idea copied later most memorably in BLACK FRIDAY). Lorre schemes to get rid of Clive by killing Clive's stepfather with a knife and then getting Clive to believe he was the one who did it. It comes close to working, but Drake interferes and when Lorre attempts to strangle her, Clive saves his wife by, yep, tossing a knife right into Lorre. Lorre is perfect in his role, and when he finally snaps and goes into that hysterical laughter - wow! But Drake and Clive are excellent, too, and everything about the production, from the script to the editing, is done with care. Definitely worth a watch
He's broken our window!!. The thing I like about Jeremy Brett's series of Sherlock Holmes adventures is not only his brilliant performance as Baker Street's famous &quot;unofficial&quot; Consulting Detective, but it is probably the most accurate production of Sir Arthur Conan Doyle's novels.    This is probably the best and most enjoyable story in Brett's final series as Sherlock Holmes and his performance is in top from. He seems very comfortable in the role and the result is an accurate and eccentric performance. Much like the way Conan Doyle originally wrote the character. In this one Holmes and his friend and colleague Doctor John Watson has received a message from an elderly woman about a strange bid to purchase her estate from a mysterious buyer. Soon Holmes and Watson find that the purchase is connected to the woman's deceased grandson who was writing a manuscript before his death that may have something to do with this mystery buyer's desire to buy her house.     If you have never seen Jeremy Brett's performance as Sherlock Holmes, this is a great video to start out with. And if you remember watching Sherlock Holmes on PBS in your childhood and wish to reaquaint yourself with the series, make this video your first purchase. He is, in my opinion, the definitive Sherlock Holmes
Not just a cartoon!. This is a brilliant film! This is the first of what I like to refer to as The Disney Modern Classics (along with Beauty & the Best, Lion King and Aladin). A very touching story set to inspiring music makes this a true gem of cinema. Ursula rocks as one of Disney's most over-the-top and exciting villians
Classic  Romance. It is a real pleasure to see the widescreen format rather than the usually shown pan & scan.
Heads-Up for Adoptive Families. I didn't know what this movie was about until we sat down to watch it with our 3-year-old son, who was adopted from Russia.  I didn't know it would involve an orphan girl, an orphanage, adoption, etc.  This isn't the central theme of the movie, but it does exist.  For my son's age, it ended up being appropriate and fine.  In fact, we talked a little about the little girl wanting a Mommy and Daddy - and that she wanted to be adopted.  So that was a good topic for us to talk about.However, I didn't like the topic of other children being adopted because they were prettier or whatever...  it makes it sound like a child's worth is only based on their specific qualities, instead of an unconditional love that a parent has for a child.  And the orphanage topic could be disturbing for some children who did spend time in an orphanage.  But in the end, the little girl was adopted and got a Mommy and Daddy!  It made me want to cry.  :)Aside from these more serious details... it was a great story!  :
Best Picture? Absolutely!. This film represents the end of a time when witty dialogand insightful writing had a chance to make it to the bigscreen. Even though there's an unmistakeable feeling ofwatching a play on film, the crispness of the dialog and thetight editing make you yearn for a return of intelligence tothe movies.Bette Davis is superb as the magnificently self-absorbed starof Broadway and Anne Baxter underplays the role of Eve, theviscious starlet on her way up. Marilyn Monroe as the vapidbeauty and George Sander (who won the Oscar for best supportingactor) are delightful. Celeste Holm does a wonderful, subtle,low-key job as the self-effacing playwright's wife.The image and sound quality on this DVD are excellent, and it'seasy to see why it won the Oscar for Best Picture.--Lynn Hoffman, author of THE NEW SHORT COURSE IN WINE  andthe novel bang BANG. ISBN 978160164000
Finally  a cartoon that teens and adults can just enjoy. This is one of the best idea's in movie history and what's good about it is they got Adam Sandler. If your looking for an animated movie to laugh at and not fell like a little kid get this movie is for you. What's good about this is it's funny and the animation is real good to. The one part you can enjoy most about this movie is it is PG-13 which is rare these days, people want to trip about it mostly parents and when that comes up you wonder if they ever heard of something like rating meaning they tell you who it's for and everything cause it says it on the box it's not for children. This is defiantly a movie to pass the time and escape with they guys who wrote this were daring which is a real good thing. I really enjoy PG-13 cartoon movies cause it can be fun and have a reason for it's humor and it dosen't have to hold back. This is a real good movie so go and get it.
The best historical war drama from the Far East. I have seen many historical war dramas from Far East (mainly China's) and most of them are not only historically inaccurate but have a strong bias toward the enemy.Yi Soon Shin, however, is a rare exception.  Not only is the drama very historically accurate but it is also very comprehensive in detailing the meticulous battle planning of the admiral that leads to each victory but also the political in-fighting between the Chosun political factions (and the second-guessing nature of the king) which causes his eventual death.Also, the special effects are great.  The battle scenes (whether on sea or land) are realisitic and of outstanding quality.The only problem that I can find is that the DVD has not placed sufficient focus on the contribution of the Ming China.  Then again, this is not unexpected since this is a Korean drama focusing on the great admiral.Also, the entire selection should have 104 episodes.  I don't know why it stops at 101.If you want to have a more comprehensive knowledge on the subject, try Samuel Hawley's Imjin War (which portrays Yi Soon Shin more accurately by quoting original sources).Any who is only intered in the fighting may also want to check out Stephen Turnbull's Samurai Invasion (which has more colorful maps and detailed description of battles from the Japanese perspective).Lastly, anyone who is a fan of samurai warfare may want to check out Shogun:Total War by Creative Assembly (now in Gold version).
When Comes The End Of This Movie?. This is a very tedious movie about a female rancher played by Jane Fonda who is trying to eek out a living. At the same time she is trying to atone for fornicating with THE BAD GUY which broke her daddy's heart.So she kinda has her hands full. Then James Cann arrives all shot up and she has to be a nurse too!Then the two of them along with their elderly ranch hand try to drive cattle and make a good sale.This movie is only redeemed by the wonderful performance of veteran actor Richard Farnsworth who I understand started his career as a stuntman. J.R. Ewing's Daddy is also in thus movie with the unlikely name of "Julie"
A pure Western with a great score... "Gunfight at the O.K. Corral" derives from one of the most celebrated shoot-outs in Western history in Tombstone, Arizona, on October 26, 1881... The semi-legendary confrontation had made of Wyatt Earp and Doc Holliday, men of exceptional quality..."Gunfight at the O.K. Corral" has some of the Sturges virtues, but not all... It doesn't however disappoint when it comes to the crunch--the gunfight itself... This is magnificently staged... It probably equals anything that law and order movies have produced in set-piece battles...The film also focuses on the friendship between Earp and Holliday and the good will of two different kinds of men... Earp, is an honest lawman with authority, and Holliday, a gambler with a 'real big hate for the law.'The two characters are powerful, strong, and at the same time compassionate, with respect and dignity... Holliday's character as the black sheep, is much more interesting than the straight marshal who is at the same time the lawman, the judge and the jury.' The main assets of the motion picture are Lancaster and Douglas, two great stars conscious of their potentialities with excellent ability...Douglas is impressing and brilliant as the troubled sick Doc Holliday and Lancaster is confident, solid and likable as Wyatt Earp... The mirror scene, in the beginning of the film, is great: Douglas, cool and steady, is ready for action observing carefully in the mirror the sharp feature and narrow steely eyes of Lee Van Cleef who is so anxious to kill him with a small gun hidden in his left boot...Fine performances by a first-class cast heighten the interest: Rhonda Fleming is ravishing as the redhead lady gambler; Jo Van Fleet is very effective as the jealous lady, torn between Ringo and Holliday; Earl Holliman is good as the naive deputy who 'picks up the hardware as soon as the cowboys hit town;' John Ireland is unforgettable with his slight stoop and menacing walk; Lyle Bettger is strong as Ike Clanton, the organizer of the toughest bunch of gunslingers; Dennis Hopper is difficult and rebellious as the young Clanton who can't take the advice of the marshal; and Jack Elam is threatening as the tall and lean man with an evil leer...Dimitri Tiomkin's great score back up the "Gunfight at the O.K. Corral," a pure Western, magnificently photographed by Charles Lang in VistaVision and Technicolor...John Ireland has been twice on the losing side of the Corral incident... The first time as Billy Clanton in John Ford's "My Darling Clementine."
Nostalgic Simple Love Story. This movie is great - full of surprises and delightful scenes between a young British women and the rough jungle man she falls in love with.  There  are many funny scenes characteristic of traditional British humor, as well  as witty dialogue and lovely scenary and costumes.  This movie made me wish  I were a kid again and could still get away with watching only Disney  movies.  Also, Jason Scott Lee is absolutely gorgeous
The Grey Zone. This is a film for those who seek reality without discounting the blackest realities imaginable.  Based on a true story, this film takes you inside Aushwitz and lets you know heroes and others personally.  It gives you a reality I would certainly have never imagined, even though I have worked with torture survivors from around the globe for several years.  I originally saw the film in IFC and immediately purchased it for my very limited DVD collection.  My collection does also offer comedies, etc., and movies like, "Truman."  But this movie is real and moving and unforgettable, and a part of history that must never be forgotten.  I feel it is very important, regardless of some misgivings that it is an absolutely non-fictional tale.  The author was really there; I believe he did his best to show us the story he lived
Director's extra's alone make this DVD worthwhile. My wife is a fan of Ryan Gosling and Rachel McAdams and asked me to purchase the DVD. In addition to the movie, the Director's comments on the making of the movie, deleted scenes, etc.,in the Platinums series are all very worthwhile attachments to this "fairy tale" love story
Superb. "Backbeat" is an excellent portrayal of the Hamburg phase of the early Beatles, and succeeds on every level.  Although purportedly intended primarily to tell the story of "fifth Beatle" Stuart Sutcliffe, the focus quickly shifts to John Lennon who (as in real life) dominated the music and lives of the early Beatles.  It is as much the story of Stu and John as the story of Stu and Astrid, and explores the dynamics of both complex relationships.  Still, it is a fascinating look at the early Beatles, who paid their dues by playing in some of the rough Reeperbahn bars in the pre-fame years.  The cast is excellent, and were obviously chosen for their talent rather than their resemblance to the characters they portrayed.  The music is also excellent, and complements the story perfectly.  In all, "Backbeat" is an entertaining journey through the world of the early Beatles, and is well worth purchasing for repeat viewings.
ZIGAZIGA-AH. This movie changed my life. The Spice Girls, as we all know have made huge strides in the feminist movement. And this movie just goes to show how when five girl friends stick together and work through each other problems they are able to save to world from a borish mundane pop scene. All I have to say in regards to them is GIRL POWER!!
The Ten Commandments:. "Decalogue" (1987) directed by Krzysztof Kieslowski, heartbreaking, thoughtful, dark films - well written, masterfully directed - with great attention to the smallest details, and wonderfully acted.Decalogue 1 - "Thou shalt have no other gods before me" - The first film in the series is one of the most powerful. Amazing performance by Wojciech Klata as young Pawel. Made me think if we all, the prisoners of our PCs are as guilty as Pawel's father is.Decalogue 2 - "Thou shalt not take the Lord's name in vain" - Dorota (Krystyna Janda) is torn by the most difficult choice a woman has to make - between two lives.Decalogue 3 - "Thou shalt remember the Sabbath and keep it holy" - as in all episodes I've seen, the acting is very good - this one features Daniel Olbrychski as a family man who was forced to leave his wife and children on Christmas Eve and try to help his ex-girlfriend to find her missing husband.Decalogue 4 - "Honour thy Father and Mother" - Girl's mother died right after childbirth, leaving a letter for her. Father seals letter in a second envelope, "Not to be opened until my death." The girl opens and reads the letter which leads to unexpected complications between father and daughter -their relationship would never be the same.In astonishingly disturbing, depressing, and powerful Dialog 5, "Thou shalt not kill" , a cruel young man (Miroslaw Baka) wanders through the streets of Warsaw in search of a random victim whom he will murder in cold blood. He will be arrested, put on trial, found guilty and executed. Did he deserve his punishment? Yes. Was his execution the legal murder? It depends on how each of us looks at the capital punishment debate.Decalogue 6 - "Thou shalt not commit adultery" - One of my favorite episodes - a tale of a 19-year-old shy and quiet postal worker who peeps on (and later stalks) his beautiful, free-spirited neighbor. They meet later with tragic consequences. Fascinating and very clever.Decalogue 7 - "Thou shalt not steal" - A young woman (Majka) kidnaps her daughter (Ania) from the child's grandmother (Ewa, Majka's mother) whom the girl thinks is her real mother. Ewa who never felt close to Majka sees in Ania her real daughter. There are no winners in this tragic family war.Decalogue 8 - "Thou shalt not bear false witness" -deals with the guilt associated with the Holocaust, attempting to reconcile the direct victims and those who were not bad or cruel people but were too frightened to do something to help. An American woman returns to Poland to face a famed lecturer who during WWII refused to help her, a 6 year old girl at the time, to find a hiding place from the Nazis.Decalogue 9 - "Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's wife" - This is a story of the words misinterpreted, the important phone calls missed by a second. The loving couple has to deal with the serious problems that include the husband's impotence and the wife's infidelity. She loves her husband and does not want to leave him even after she learns the sad truth about his condition. She wants to end a strictly physical affair with a younger boyfriend. Her husband does not know that and the tragedy of errors just about to happen... Decalogue 9 is also interesting because in it we first meet the main character of Kieslowski's later film, "Double Life of Veronique." Roman, the hero of Decalogue 9 is a heart surgeon and works in the hospital. One of his patients is a young, full of life girl who loves to sing and has a heart condition. Her favorite composers are Bach, Mozart, and Van den Budenmayer (a fictitious Dutch composer whose music is written by the regular Kieslowski's associate, Zbigniew Preisner).Decalogue 10 - "Though shalt not covet thy neighbor's goods" - is about two brothers who have not seen each other for over two years and meet for a sad occasion - on their estranged father's funeral. Well, it was not too sad because their father never had been too close to them - his obsession and the love of his life was his stamp collection - one of the best and most valuable in Poland. Along with the collection, the brothers inherited their father obsession for stamps and even though they desperately need money, they try to expand the collection, delving in the underworld of devoted philatelists and shadowy dealers (sometimes, there is not much difference between both types) who have known very well about the priceless stamps. Will the brothers be able to expand the collection or to sell it with great profit and live happily ever after? How much and what are they willing to pay for a small piece of paper? You have to see Decalogue 10 to find out. I just will tell you that Kieslowski is always in control here and for such a small amount of time, only 50 minutes, there is so much action, characters development, so many unexpected and original plot turns, such excellent exploring of human emotions and drives that it would (it should, it did for me) keep you riveting to the screen.
hans christian andersen. Was a christmas present for my neice she loves the old Danny Kaye movies so it was the perfect addition for her collection
I don't own many movies, but this is a must-have!. My husband and I do not own many movies, but this is one we bought right away.  It is the type of movie that you need to see more than once to absorb all the intricate details.  If you enjoyed movies like "Pulp Fiction" and "Memento" because of the non-linear progression of time, you will love this film.I was skeptical of an Aston Kutcher movie because of his previous silly comedies like "Dude, Where's My Car?", but he is a first rate dramatic actor in this film.The infinifilm features are also fun if you enjoy things like deleted scenes and "what was the director thinking?" type explanations.Love it
Love Triangle Thriller. Tangled is a smart and edgy thriller with a talented young cast.A college student, David (Shawn Hatosy),wakes in a hospital bed to tries to recall the events leading to his severe injuries to a detective (Lorraine Bracco) who is investigating the disappearance of David's girlfriend Jenny (Rachael Leigh Cook). David's tells his story is told in flashbacks.When Estranged best friends david and Alan (Jonathan Rhys Meyers)meet again they end up fighting for the affections of david's crush jenny. The mysterious Alan wins her heart but soon his love for jenny becomes a obsession David must help her threw Alan's dangerous behavior but still also still tries to help Alan. But than things goes terribly wrong.This movie is exciting hip,edgy,sexy thriller you get sucked into the plot as the truth is revealed you see the truth behind the obsession.I give this **** four Stars
Glad Disney Took A Chance. I'm not in the habit of reviewing movies, but I'm making an exception for this one because my kids love this movie, and it is my favorite Disney outing to date (though I also enjoyed Tron, Dinosaur, and almost anything from Pixar).  This fast-paced, re-imagined version of Robert Louis Stevenson's classic story is watchable for many reasons, but I enjoyed the great voice acting, the Brandywine School inspired backgrounds, and the interesting hybridization of futuristic elements with 18th century technology (I'm glad Disney didn't play it straight with this one).BONUS: The most artful combined usage of traditional and CG animation to date!Two pieces of music contributed by John Rzeznik of The Goo Goo Dolls make a great soundtrack greater.
Informative. This was my first download and it was "free".  The download performed well.  "The Mystery of Edgar Allan Poe" was informative.  It ran up to 50 minutes. This was a Unbox Video Download. It started with the typical intro and ended with the credits. Some individuals did not get a complete download so i included my experience with the Unbox download.  i hope the review was helpful. ty
This film begs a question... With all of usual aforementioned accolades here, I saw the film as part of the university film series. As a deaf individual from Germany, I felt lot of empathy here associating with the issues of defining the deafness, medical intervention, respect for the deaf community and identity, and so forth.At some points in the film, a pressing matter bothered me so much. I wonder why the parents and their parents didn't receive the counselling to deal with their emotional ramification of the deafness as well as their profound and deliberating insecurity assocating with the deafness. The film illustrated the glaring omission amongst the families so well that the counselling was no-brainer...The hearing mother of deaf parents seemed to be so utterly devastated and in grave turmoil upon hearing a sound clip of how a deaf child might hear with hearing aid. Her 'shock-and-awe' facial expression and trembling body language were more suited for death of a child rather than over the deafness. Upon the first response of their deaf son to the sound after the surgery, her hearing husband reacted as if he had been given a not-guilty verdict.The hearing parents of deaf son pestered and nagged on and on about their wishes for their deaf grandchildren to function as 'hearing ersatz', conspiring the family members against each other. That poor deaf girl was more confused about her identity and her place in the society. If she could choose the phrase from Shakespeare, it would be 'alas, woe is me' and 'to be (deaf) or not to be (deaf), that is question'.The most tragic part was that little girl with cochlear implant. When the deaf family visited her to learn about the cochlear implant, the girl was perceived as a medical curosity rather than as an individual. She sat there the whole time, presenting her implanted device whilst her mother desribed the procedure, discussed about the device, and like.It is same for the classes that the deaf parents and their deaf daughter visited. In the class where the oralism (speaking and lipreading along with hearing aids or cochlear implants) was a de regueur method, the children seemed lifeless and lacked the energy of typical children. In the deaf class, the children were burst with energy and engaging.The bottom line is that the film compels the need for counselling for the families affected by the deafness. We have so many resources where the parents can draw from our experience and learn what work and whatnot. Some states in the USA have laws requiring the collaboration between the parents of deaf children and state agency or programme. That collaboration specialises in providing the unbiased resources and supports as to ensure their success in raising the deaf child to lead the autonomous and fulfilling lives.That sort of collaboration works well in Denmark and other Scandinavian countries as well as in USA.FDA certifies the cochlear implant as 'elective surgery' in same category as breast augmentation, rhinoplasy, etc. In other word, the deafness is neither a life-threatening condition nor a detrimental condition affecting the quality of life. We have so many choices of medical devices to support our participation in the greater society. For instance, the people can choose wheelchair, electric wheelchair, crutches, arm crutches, walkers, canes, and like to support their mobility.Cochlear implant does not correct the deafness like the eyeglasses or contact lenses can. It is also fraught with so many contradictions and tragic outcome. I have seen it too often to wonder whether the cochlear implant is even legal procedure or a proper medical device. Oftentimes, the parents were misled to think the cochlear implant is the answer to the deafness when in fact many well-proven methods work much better for the deaf in long run
Real people. Human drama and feelings, disregard for stereotypes, great photography, action with reaction and great lesson in self acceptance is but a few of the elements that makes this a great classic.  Made me think of my social role and position in life just like Crash did
Hepburn Thriller. This is a classic that is as great today as it was the day it was released 40 yrs. ago. They don't make them like this anymore and that is a shame! A great cast of actors combined with a great script and soundtrack make this a edge of your seat thriller from start to finish! "Wait Until Dark" means just that! View this gem in the evening for premium enjoyment! Shut off the phone & turn up the surround sound! All you need now is popcorn & someone to grab hold of! Enjoy! Caligula24
Nice soap opera. I liked the mini series. Acting is good. Scenery lovely. Costuming is superb. Gives the viewer a real feel for the place and time.Unfortunately there are some things I don't care for. Both sides, if there's a character in one family there is another in the other just like that person. Some of the relationships are somewhat stale. The main villein is really two dimensional.Both the southern main character and his northern counterpart fall in love with women socially unacceptable to their society. The northerner falls in love with and marries an irish catholic lass. The southerner falls in love with a girl who turns out to be the daughter of a harlot and an Octeroon (One african great grandparent). I would have prefurred something more open since history reveals there were quite a few gentle relationships between southern white  men and women of african decent which would spare the audience this soap opera stuff.Great scenerey. Wonderful scenes. Wonderful authentic costuming.Just pathetic as sopa operas are.
a lyric tale of two exiles. Music is the center of Thewlis' world and it is the center of the movie. You'll appreciate your sound system during this film because it is made up of music rather than dialogue or stunning visuals. Although Thandie Newton is certainly a stunning visual.This movie stands out because it is so absolutely like no other, not even Bertolucci's previous efforts prepare you for it. Thewlis(you might remember from Naked)plays the decadent westerner(all Bertolucci lead roles are that)we are asked to pay attention to. Thewlis does not demand you pay attention like Brando does rather he is so quiet and mysterious you can't help but pay attention. Only when he plays piano do you find out how much is going on within him. And what music(the piano is the third major presence in this movie). Thewliss and Newton come from different sides of the world and neither is perhaps very satisfied with the place from whence they come, both exiles, and each is very curious about the other. Many times the camera is on one at a time while each wonders about the other in the next room. It doesn't sound like much but it is drama of a very peculiar sort. Two humans,two cultures perhaps, slowly coming into contact. Very strange and very powerful movie. You may as well order the soundtrack too
THE BEGINING OF ONE OF THE MOST BEAUTIFULL CONTEMPORARY STORIES. Before the Beatles, Before Lennon-Mcartney there was Lennon-Stucliffe two working class boys from Liverpool that loved each other like brothers , Lennon wanted to conquer the world with his rock and roll band music and Stu wanted to show the world his art, however Stu accepted Lennons invitation to make a brief gig in Hamburg with the band , Stu purchased a bass with the money he won seling one of his pieces, immediatelly the five guys entered a whole world of hardcore German scene with cavarets , bars, strip shows, gruppies, alcohol and illegal substances but in the middle of all that Klaus Vooorman and his friend Astrid two avant-garde artists introduced themselves to the band one night at the club they were playing , Stu and Astrid were immediatelly hooked up by each other causing the friendship between Lennon and Stucliff were even more fractured due to the discrepances in interests booth friends had, Astrid influenced Stu and intruduced him in to this environment of painting, literature, photography and fashion very different to the rock and roll concept his four friends liked, Astrid were responsible for the historic registers of the Beatles beginings in Hamburg due to her pothograpys and later were the inspiration of the stetic concept the band adopted in hair style and wardrobe , The guys get a record contract and Stu choosed the love of Astrid instead of the band dreams, It was difficult for Lennon who depend emotionaly on Stu, but it was wrotten on Stone the path the band had to follow and the story that we all know, Stu died briefly afterwards by a brain hemorrage and the fab five became four , to be honest we couldnt imagine The Beatles in a different way.HM
"Fall in behind the Major". You can read all about the behind things that went on during the making of this movie, so lets talk about the movie itself.I remember watching this movie as a child and loving it. I know that this isn't what Peckinpah wanted us to see but even in the form most of us have seen it the talent and strong direction make even this "flawed masterpiece" one of the great westerns and great movies period. Now after all these years they have found the missing scenes and we can see(at least as close as possible) the epic western that Sam wanted. With these new scenes,soundtrack(Sam hated the old one), and using his notes, the movie comes alive again and even better than before. Now if you are like me i loved the old soundtrack(yes it's corny and i hate to say it,but i do love it)not to worry as you can choose which one you would like to hear. With extras glore this is one of the better extended version discs out there. nothing is over looked and now "Major Dundee" can take its place beside "The Wild Bunch" as one of the best films Peckinpah made!!
Facing the inevitable. "When a man knows he is to be hanged in a fortnight, it concentrates his mind wonderfully" - Samuel JohnsonMichael Keaton gives an effective and heart-felt performance as Bob Jones, a young, successful PR executive married to a beautiful woman (Nicole Kidman) who is expecting their first child.  The bottom falls out of his life when he is diagnosed with a fatal illness, and only given months to live.  He is forced to exam his life that he's really just been rushing through.  Bob Jones not only has never stopped to smell the roses; he hasn't even noticed that they are there at all.'My Life' is a realistic portrayl of what must go through one's mind when one is brought up short by such stunning news.  Although the topic is certainly depressing, it is something we will all one day face.  This is how one man deals with the terribly bad hand he has been delt.  Especially poignant is the fact that not only won't he probably be around to help raise his child, but he might not even make it long enough to see his child born.  Heart-wrenching.In several pivotal scenes, Jones decides to hope for a miracle, and visits an Asian healer (Haing Ngor who starred in 'The Killing Fields')who tells him that he has too much anger and hurt in him.  Jones resists the whole notion of exploring how he got to where he is, at least for a while.  His anger at his family is one point of anger he must struggle with.Keaton does an excellent job here.  We see flashes of the actor we saw in 'Mr. Mom' and earlier movies, sort of a lovable, good-hearted guy with a funny edge to him.  His Bob Jones evolves slowly and realistically from a man who is stunned and angry, to a man determined to let his child know who he is.  Ngor also plays the right note as a practioner who can't cure his patient, but perhaps can help him in his last journey.A potentially maudlin, down-beat subject is handled with just the right amount of empathy and gentleness and with a light touch.Highly recommended.  Very highly recommended if you've had such a scare, are living with a terminal illness, or have had a loved one deal with such issues
WONDERFUL!!!. This is a great movie!!!!  I loved the music, dancing, and the intense chemistry between the actors.  I especially enjoyed the handsome, sexy Chayanne!!!  He's an excellent singer, dancer, and actor!!  He and Vanessa looked amazing together.  I prefer this movie to Dirty Dancing.  If anyone wants to see and hear more of Chayanne, he's in a new commercial, and has realeased a new video from his latest album Cautivo, which has gone multi-platinum!
This is the best TV show I have ever watched!. This show has something for everyone. Characters you will fall in love with by the end of the pilot, gunfights, swordfights, fistfights, shipfights, guys scarier than anything in latex, and the best fast-paced dialouge on this end of the 'verse. One of the cleverest TV shows out there (eat your heart out, LOST).
wonderful family program. Christy is one of my favorite tv series of all time.  It is second only to Life Goes On.  Kellie Martin shines as always.  This particular episode is especially touching to me because it centers around my favorite holiday, Thanksgiving.  In "The Sweetest Gift" Christy and the people of Cutter Gap rise above their trying circumstances and learn to give thanks for the blessings they do have, the most important one being each other. Christy's father becomes terribly ill, but due to her faith and determination, he gets well. This series is definitely geared more to the female crowd, but I think boys under 12 would enjoy it too.  If you haven't read the book Christy by Catherine Marshall, please do.  It will definitely add to the enjoyment of the film. All of Mrs. Marshall's books are good.  I cannot believe this show didn't last longer on tv. Hollywood must have thought it was too wholesome.
The time comes for some to fade!. The elusive behavior of those golden years better known as the sweet bird of youth is depicted with a reality sense and certain melodrama touch .The early years between Tea , Sam and Coles are frenetic rapture. And the triangle works out till the time comes for them.Ten years pass away : Coles has found Claire ; Tea is happily married and is owner of a beautiful restaurant and Sam still has not found her bliss . From here to there she has walked in mirror circles.Casually there will be a reencounter among Coles and Sam. And certainly they will revive their past and furious sexual meetings. But somehow this spell does not work out.The ancient emotive memories still permeates the soul of Coles. He definitively has not grown up and still pretends to play in two stages. He like Narcissus, only loves himself and the rest of his affairs work out as a secure support for his disastrous self stem.As you know, the domain in love falls back in whom loves less. But this last experience with Venus will define for Sam a crucial cross road. Coles still has not learned anything about the sensible difference between the sex by itself and the love as a whole.The film bets hard but the wager did not go far beyond the door of the dark room. Somehow this film remitted me to a much more mature work in the last eighties: The woman in flames.Something happened with this movie in which you can feel the ending is not absolutely natural. It seems after you decided to break the rules, you insisted in going back obeying the moral principles instead of walking to the tragic consequences, because I think this picture had all the basic ingredients for a moral fable but also a tragic ending: was there fear perhaps to follow this road?Good performances specially of Mark Ruffalo. Excellent camera work and memorable angles shots with perfect illuminating. Interesting plot but it promised much more than what it offered.
Easy Come, Easy Go. simply marvelous to see him, the history very funny, but sincerly marvelous to see hi
Martial Arts Filmography. This is an excellent video for collectors and enthusiasts.  Those who plan to learn martial arts, should look elsewhere though.---http://www.geocities.com/bjjamaltaOfficial Web Site of the Bushido Ju-Jitsu Academy (Malta). The longest established Ju-Jitsu Organisation in Malta, for serious practitioners interested in Ju-Jitsu and self defence techniques
'Everyone was burnt by the sun of the Bolshevik Revolution'. Clearly one of the most visually stunning, intelligent, sophisticated films about life in Russia during the Stalinist years, BURNT BY THE SUN is an experience all lovers of fine filmmaking should see.  Directed and starring Nikita Mikhalkov who also co-wrote the screenplay with Rustam Ibragimbekov, this film allows us entry into the inside stories of Russia under Stalin.  It is an emotionally devastating tale.On the grounds of his dacha in 1936 revolutionary hero Colonel Kotov (Nikita Mikhalkov) cavorts in his sauna with his young daughter Nadya (Nadezhda Mikhalkova) and his elegantly beautiful young wife Marusia (Ingeborga Dapkunaite). Outside on the lawn is the rest of Kotov's family in a peaceful, sun-drenched summer garden, drinking, singing, and blissfully enjoying life in the country. On the vast horizon is a group of men assembling a balloon to honor Stalin, and a group of army tanks treads onto the wheat fields threatening to destroy the crops.  The townsfolk workers run for Kotov to rescue the situation, underlining the fact the Kotov is their hero from the revolution, much loved and respected.  Abruptly onto the scene comes the handsome young cousin Dimitri/Mitya (Oleg Menshikov), an ex-lover of Kotov's wife. He ingratiates himself with Nadia and the rest of the family as a pianist and singer, but there is a note of evil lurking.  Kotov understands the threat that Mitya's arrival indicates, that he has been betrayed and has become one of the many to be purged by Stalin.  But the life in the dacha remains leisurely and elegant until the fateful end when Mitya's mission is fulfilled.  The film ends with phrases telling us about the destinies of Kotov and his family up to the end of the purge after Stalin's death.The story is history: the telling is art.  Blest with a cast of extraordinary luminosity, Nikita Mikhalkov directs this tale of repression with style and leisurely pacing, such as allowing for moments at table when one of the grandmothers sings an aria from Puccini's 'Madama Butterfly', an aria whose text foreshadows the future of the story.  It is this contrast between the residual classy elegance of Russia before the revolution and the gritty reality of the cruelty of Stalinism that makes the film so resonant.  The cinematography by Vilen Kalyuta and the musical score by Eduard Artemyev  enhance the film immeasurably.  In Russian and French with English subtitles.  Highly Recommended.  Grady Harp, March 06
Informative. This was my first download and it was "free".  The download performed well.  "The Mystery of Edgar Allan Poe" was informative.  It ran up to 50 minutes. This was a Unbox Video Download. It started with the typical intro and ended with the credits. Some individuals did not get a complete download so i included my experience with the Unbox download.  i hope the review was helpful. ty
One wof the best horror MOVIES of ALL-TIME. OKAY let me start,the opening scene is a classic we all know it the killer asks Drew Berrymore "What's your favorite scary movie?" then 10 minets later she's done.i LOVE IT this scene has so much suspence and so does the rest of the movie!this movie is so good!go buy it
Love Atlantis. I think this was a great spin off from stargate sg-1 which was starting to get stale even though I love watching it still.Love being able to download them all, just wish they'd get updated quicker!Honestly, when I left 2 weeks ago I saw the last episode available and I've missed the next 2
Informative. Nice little video for my Zen during my long wait at the doctor's office.  Confucius overcame many difficulties
Great Episode. This is the first episode where we really see the heart of Tony in his dealings with a teenager struggling with the horrible death of his father. A must see
Not your run-of-the-mill film: eccentric, with a great cast of wacko characters. Dinklage is spectacular in this film. It's a pity that the roles in Hollywood for small people are so limited (and ordinarily so stupid: elves, munchkins, jesters.)--Dinklage outshines most of his contemproraries and this is likely to be one of the few big, serious roles he will ever be given. (Maybe CG will get to the point where films will incorporate special effects that are the reverse of the "hobbitizing" done in the LOTR movies--turning Dinklage into a Cary Grant!)This film has a great set of oddball supporting characters, too: an overly needy hotdog seller, a spaced-out artist mourning the death of her son, a train-loving elementary school kid, and a very young (and newly pregnant) librarian "hottie." Dinklage plays the irritable Fin, who has inherited a decaying train station in rural New Jersey from a friend. Fin plans to move to the out-of-the-way spot and live in complete isolation. He soon runs into a wacky cast of characters (in some cases literally; Olivia, the artist, runs him off the road twice in one day) who won't leave him alone. Each has their own emotional baggage and their own peculiar hurts and disabilities. Against all odds, the motley crew become friends. The plot summaries for this film make it sound like a sapfest, but this movie is far from it. It is sort of "touching," but in a of burr-like sort of way: prickly, a bit odd, and it sticks with you for a long time after
AWESOME!!!. this movie is one of the best i've seen in years... if you're tired of the typical hollywood action films and prefer pure psychological suspense and highly surprising endings, then u gotta see it! the special effects are pretty cool also, and for those who think the characters' actions or the plot itself makes no sense, this is mainly SCI-FI ok? nobody said it could happen in real life! i highly recommend it =
Sergeant York is among my top 10 favourite movies!. This movie is among the top 10 of my favourite movies of all time!It not only honours the life and achievments of the great Christian man Alvin York, it honours many truths of the Christian faith, God's power to to transform sinners, the virtue of forgiving your enemies, putting God before man, the virtue of earning an honest livelihood.Though it does all this, it is not a "preachy" movie, it simply tells the amazing story of a simple farmer who becomes the greatest hero of WW1.Other movies in my top 10 include: It's a Wonderful Life, Forrest gump, Shawshank Redemption, To End All Wars, Les Misrables.
One of the great performances in the best film about monastic life ever made. Audrey, without Givenchy, and only a portion of her face visible, few lines and much conflict gives one of the great performances.  The depth of the movie, the richness, amount to a great piece of art.  Certainly, the movie is not "fun," but it attests to a time when a movie about the struggle with faith could be a blockbuster
a must see classic movie. This movie is great in several ways - all Audrey hepburn fans would love it.  She shows that her talent is more than just a beautiful face.It is also a front runner, because it shows the artistry of a great filmmaker, who can build suspense and tension merely with the use of light, of staging, without resorting to the cheap tricks of excessive violence.  The film's use of light and shadow is amazing. The timing of the characters exits and entrances is like watching a finely tuned play.  ( this was a play actually.)   This one will have you on the edge of your chair. The famous ending scene will take your breath away every time, even if you've seen it before! When Suzy's husband finally gets home and realizes what has happened, his reaction is lame - they should have rewritten that one. But that is only 2 minutes, so don't let that keep you from watching this one.  Rent this movie for your teens who like suspense thrillers - they will enjoy it.
Oh Yes. 'The Killer' is rightly considered one of the greatest action movies ever.  Personally, my vote for greatest action movie would have to go to 'Aliens', but 'The Killer' definitely isn't far off.  The main reason 'The Killer' is so fantastic is because Woo understands what an action movie oughta be.  It's not about the explosions or car chases, though an action movie certainly can benefit from these things.  It's about the shooting.  Lots and lotsa shooting.  And this movie's got that.  And yet, it's got a lot of human interest, and it's even kind of touching, at times.  (Though the stuff with Jenny's blindness is perhaps a bit too melodramatic.)  Yun-Fat's Jeffrey is pretty much the ultimate action hero, as he gets the standard action hero mix just right:  He's tough and ruthless enough to be really cool, but still has enough of a heart that you can like him personally.Perhaps the next greatest key to 'The Killer's success is the fantastic pacing.  Most action movies have all the good violence stuffed into a couple scenes, and much of the rest of the movie is actually pretty boring and uneventful.  'The Killer' avoids these flaws by being pretty fast paced, and not making any of the individual action scenes prior to the climax too long.  The  action's never far off, and no seen is ever dragged out longer than it needs to be.  That and, again, it actually has character's worth caring about, unlike most action movies, so the non-action scenes are actually of some interest.Though Woo's style is immensely influential, none can match it.  Though he cites a number of influences, he could most basically be described as Peckinpah taken to the next level, with the countless edits, multiple angles and alternation between slow motion and regular speed that that description implies.  Also, he manages to ratchet up both the gruesomeness and the elegance in these scenes simultaneously.  And, finally, he manages to make the scenes as frantic and as wild as possible without losing any coherence.  (Take note, modern filmmakers.)  Personally, I think the first shootout may be the best one, though it perhaps just makes the biggest impression from being first.  The closing one is perhaps slightly too much, but it's still quite awesome.  Also the scene between Jeffrey and Sydney, just after he's been betrayed, ahh, fantastic, particularly the major reversal.  Best moment in the film.Ehh, action movies are too hard to review.  Just remember, this is an action movie taken back to the basics (i.e. the shootout) but taken about as far as possible at the same time.Grade:
Sibling Rivalry... Duane Bradley (Kevin Van Hentenryck) checks into the hotel Broslin in NYC w/ his incredibly deformed, psychic, and psychotic brother, Belial. Together, they plan on hunting down and killing the quacks who surgically separated them years earlier. This is done in gorey detail, with splashes of hysterical humor tossed in! I especially enjoyed the demise of Dr. Kutter (check out her identical twin nurses). Actually, this movie is about the love between two brothers and the jealousy / anger that develops when one of them falls in love. There is a certain warmth beneath all that goo! Along the way, we are treated to many scenes of mutilation and depravity, as only Frank Henenlotter can deliver (The last 15 minutes or so are downright disturbing)! I think BASKET CASE is a classic, and recommend it to anyone w/ a taste for the outrageous and bizarre...
Great classic for a great price. With a cable modem, took about 1 hour and 15 minutes to download Unbox, install the program and download the episode.  It's a great download speed considering the file is 803 mb.  I was able to still use my computer, IE 7.0 and RealPlayer, so the download is not a resource hog.  The menu bar includes a link to shop for more Unbox titles, which I found very convenient.The quality is great, but the video stutters in Unbox.  Maybe because it uses 3 applications when playing video?  I chose to watch the episode on Windows Media Player 11 and I had no problems at all.I've bought and watched 3 episodes, all with the same results.  Fast and unobstrusive download, great quality and low price.  Just use WMP, or another player that can handle wma files, to watch.
A Great Christmas Story. My daughter read this story in 2nd grade and now as a young working professional enjoyed it all over again.  There is a lesson to be learned by both young children and adult viewers alike.  I recommend this as a story to be shared with families at the time of year when our attention turns to how many and how much, but this story jolts us back to the real spirit of sharing and caring
The best historical war drama from the Far East. I have seen many historical war dramas from Far East (mainly China's) and most of them are not only historically inaccurate but have a strong bias toward the enemy.Yi Soon Shin, however, is a rare exception.  Not only is the drama very historically accurate but it is also very comprehensive in detailing the meticulous battle planning of the admiral that leads to each victory but also the political in-fighting between the Chosun political factions (and the second-guessing nature of the king) which causes his eventual death.Also, the special effects are great.  The battle scenes (whether on sea or land) are realisitic and of outstanding quality.The only problem that I can find is that the DVD has not placed sufficient focus on the contribution of the Ming China.  Then again, this is not unexpected since this is a Korean drama focusing on the great admiral.Also, the entire selection should have 104 episodes.  I don't know why it stops at 101.If you want to have a more comprehensive knowledge on the subject, try Samuel Hawley's Imjin War (which portrays Yi Soon Shin more accurately by quoting original sources).Any who is only intered in the fighting may also want to check out Stephen Turnbull's Samurai Invasion (which has more colorful maps and detailed description of battles from the Japanese perspective).Lastly, anyone who is a fan of samurai warfare may want to check out Shogun:Total War by Creative Assembly (now in Gold version).
The fall & rise of Darth Vader. I love this film - it's my favorite next to Star Wars: The Empire Strikes Back! I have to admit that I had a thrill watching the emergence of Anakin Skywalker's darker self, Darth Vader from his knighting under Darth Sidious a..k.a Supreme Chancellor-turned-Galactic Emperor Palpatine to his fiery fall-out with Oki-Wan Kenobi far off. No wonder he's my all-around favorite character besides Luke Skywalker & Han Solo in addition to Princess Leia! I also enjoy reading the current novels, but I wish there'd be more plenty on Darth Vader in between the Episodes!!
"You're just like them!". With a cast as strong as this one theres no wonder the film was a hit...I found myself wondering how they got all of these big ticket actors to sign onto the same film and then it hit me...this is most likely the film that launched a lot of their careers.  The story is a brutally honest one about racism in Mississippi in the year 1995.  A young black girl, ten years old, is raped and beaten by two white red-necks and when the young girls father (Samuel L. Jackson) takes revenge into his own hands and murders the two men resposible he's arrested and a trial is held.  The film revolves around this mans lawyer mostly, Jake (McConaughey) as his family and practice is placed under fire by a newly reformed KKK as his home is scortched and his partners are harassed and his wife and child are forced to leave town for their safty.  The film calls into account morality over law...whats right and wrong isn't always black and white and not so easily determined.  Acting on all fronts is strong, but it's Jackson who proves to be the light in this film as his tortured father suffers with every breath as he recounts what his baby went through.  Kevin Spacey, Sandra Bullock, Oliver Platt, Keifer & Donald Sutherland, Ashley Judd and Chris Cooper all give brilliant performances in this powerhouse of a film that benifits from a great script and a steller cast
A Feast for the Eyes. The mid-1980s was a banner time for E.M. Forster fans. Two of his novels, "A Passage to India" and this, "A Room with a View", were successfully and wonderfully adapted for the big screen. ("Howard's End" would come a few years later.)Forster had a genius for developing characters and for showing the awesome and sometime awful complexities that arise when people interract. James Ivory, thanks to a brilliant casting director, had the right actors to bring these characters to life on the screen: Helen Bonham Carter, Maggie Smith, Simon Callow, Julian Sands, Daniel Day-Lewis, etc. What this permitted Ivory to do was to focus on another equally important element in film making: to give us something beautiful to look at. The shots of a small Engish village, the lusty Italian countryside, the polish of an upper class English garden are nothing short of breathtaking. It enhances the romance, heightens the humor (especially when an English minister decides to skinny dip with a few parishoners in a hysterical scene), and convinces us that this was how life was for these remarkable characters.One of the Merchant-Ivory's best collaborations, this dvd also comes with some insightful commentary and a unique look at E.M. Forster's life. I recommend it highly
Un box Revisited. This Amazon unbox is not fully developed or has a lot of bugs in it. They should pull it until they get the bugs ironed out. Could not download all of the movie i ordered and now it is gone from my computer and I don't see how to download it again.Update: Most of the problems I experienced were with my Sattelite connection. After 175 MB they start to throttle the speed way down. I upgraded and this helped. I can now download large movies but only in 350mb bites each 4 hours. If you are having trouble read your sattelite "fair access" policy
Twisted Love Story. This movie is definitely a different kind of love story.  It really surprised me the first time I saw it.  It's a very honest movie that deals with issues that other movies rarely touch on like self mutilation and masochism.  I think that the actors were very convincing and that this movie is worth every penny.  I don't want to spoil it, but it's a must see
The perils of disconnection. Suicide Club is truly a Japanese statement. I enjoy Japanese films for the interesting glimpse into a psyche strongly influenced by a world of forced detachment and often unfeeling behavior. Often, Asian films address the disconnected feeling associated with a fast-paced, demanding industrialized society. Suicide Club normalizes the emtional pain of suicide into a 'what the heck' fad. Asian horror often delves into the forbidden. Viewers eagerly, though painfully, peek as if watching a train wreck. There is a statement. I've never seen an Asian film that didn't have one. That disconnection resulting from society's demands is paramount in this film. The presentation can be compared to the unconventional shocks and cold emptiness of A Clockwork Orange. NOT for children
Yellowbeard an under-rated film. Yellowbeard is a pirate film with a monty python feel.  Good film
The GREATEST documentary EVER!!!. I've been a fan of Death Row Records since 1992, when they dropped the LEGENDARY album The Chronic by Dr.Dre, and later Snoop's LEGENDARY debut album Doggystyle. Everything was all good until situations, planned or unplanned, caused the company to spiral out of control and crumble. Due to the legal problems, Dre leaving the company, and all things related caused Death Row's unfortunate and untimely demise. Now, normally I would review what's on the DVD, so what I'll do is basically talk about how AWESOME and REAL this dvd is, as opposed to giving aways what's on the dvd. The way the rise and fall of Death Row is told here by Suge, Dre, Snoop, Nate Dogg, and others in nothing short of amazing. We start in the very beginning to when NWA was formed in the mid 80s to the end when Dre left the company. All of the information here, I knew some of it before I saw it for the first time. But the information told here that I DIDN'T know before surprised me. @ times during this film, it's SO intense that you just can't help being captivated by the content. Don't believe me? In addition to the individuals telling the story, look @ the eyes of Lydia Harris and Simone Green. As you look @ their eyes when they tell the parts of the story, you're immediately drawn into the emotions of the storytelling. Also, all of the pieces of information are blended together superbly. NO history and incident is forgotten here, and you receive everything you could possibly know about the rise and fall of Death Row Records. Overall, I HIGHLY RECOMMEND this dvd to any fan, long time fans, new fans, etc. You won't regret this purchase, and like me, after the first viewing, you're going to view this dvd repeatedly. It's just that good.LONG LIVE DEATH ROW!!
Mr. Incredible. Great movie!Delivery of the order came in good time.This 2-Disc Collector's Edition comes with some interesting extras.I found the offtakes/blubbers to be in bad taste, but the rest of the extras were worth seeing.Personnally I would avoid watching the extras that describe the making of the movie.  Although it is interesting to watch, especially for those wanting to go into the movie making business, I find that it then takes away from the enjoyment of watching the movie itself.  Just my personal preference.  No doubt others will have different opinions
Warm and fuzzy. This one has one of those touching endings where you get to see that even Booth has a heart...well, more so than we already know.  The ending got me, I got misty over it.  Enjoy with someone you love
Into The woods - DVD. The Quality of the DVD was excellent. Even th DVD Case was in excellent condition
"Even the creator takes sides". This is the creation of the poem to engrave drama in the hearts of man, which culminates in the 18 day war between the noble Pandava princes and their scheming cousins, the Kaurava kings that decides the fait of mankind.We see how free will and fait can co-exist. Notice that Krishna has an agenda that may or man not be that of the other players in the game. Even in the 18 day war every rule is broken every value is destroyed, leaving no difference between whom is good or who is evil, who is an enemy or who is not. As Krishna does throughout the movie we see that the only way the Pandava can win is to use any means.The essence of the Mahabharata was encapsulated in a 9 hour play by Peter Brook. Then the play was adapted to this six hour visual media presentation. Visually and melodically stunning this presentation is so well presented that you hardly realize the effort that went into making this representation reflect the true Mahabharata.Mahabharata literally means Great (Maha) India (Bharat), yet its meaning is the story of mankind as one would see that mankind started in India.There are other film and book versions of the story some better some not as good however this is a brilliant work and should not be missed.In book form I suggest as a good starting place "Mahabharata" -The Acclaimed new rendering of an immortal epic of war and destiny. Retold by William Buck.Also do not over look "The Power of Myth" -- by Joseph Campbell, Bill Moyers.
South Pacific is Terrific. I was most pleased with the new upgraded, remastered quality of this classic musical. The color and content were beautiful and clear. The extras were every interesting and entertaining. Worth the great price
Mark the Shark. Great insights; worth the time and money; wateched it many times and always see something ne
Perfect love makes perfection in all. I find it odd that when reviewing the reviews of this film that people seem to either give it perfect or abysmal scores.  The dichotomy of opinion is probably a direct result of the skill and immense power of Leconte's images, (especially those that his chosen actress affords us).Leconte is a master and quite possibly the greatest living auteur currently making films.  His movies often contain a refreshing difficulty that gives one hope that images still mean something, that film is still worthy of being explicated, that someone still cares enough to think that much without being overly clever such as the Coens and Anderson.  I shouldn't say still.  I should say is and will be, as Leconte is on a different level than any who has ever worked including Kieslowski (the master of images).  I enjoy how Leconte has said that although it was his second period piece he approached the film as if that had nothing to do with it, learning from "Ridicule".  I should point that out I have no problem with "Ridicule" and the fact that it is a period piece has a great deal to do with the presentation, but I can see what he meant.  Like I said, I enjoy the statement, but I should also point out I'm a jerk.Binoche and Auteuil are two of my favorite actors and this film shows them at their virtuosic best.  They deliver amazing performances of a truly passionate couple who both hold unconditional love for the other which in itself contains ultimate trust of decision and character.  Possibly more Auteuil's for Binoche's but the sympathy generated by his character fuels her as an equally sharing partner, making any difference negligible.  There is a third character, Neel, but he is there only to accentuate the relationship between the other two.The movie, quite simply is about unconditional love and what it means to love unconditionally.  There is a subplot of equal merits (mainly concerning Neel) about the belief in redemption, and what it truly means to believe in redemption.  In short it is about the consequences of action through belief, more so out of the love for another than those of moral ground or stance.  Some people are not willing to accept the belief that actions can or should occur solely out of sympathy for another.  Some people will never allow themselves to love unconditionally.  Some people will not understand or even like this film.Binoche deserves a prize that doesn't yet exist for her most exquisite performance.  Leconte deserves recognition for what he has done and what he has given us with this film, certainly one of the best I have ever seen.
Another classic to love. I remember seeing this film when I was 12 or so with my Mom.  It left an impression and I knew I would have to add this to my classic movie collection.  How I enjoyed watching Judy Holliday's performance, she was unique with a wonderful sense of comedic timing.  Anyone who collects classic comedies should add this to the list
Jason and the Argonauts. I loved it as a kid and I still love it as and adult.  The special by effects by Ray Harryhausen are still excellent after all these years!  This movie is what got me to read Greek mythology as a kid
Obsessive obsession. To love that deeply that you constantly obsess about every aspect of your lover's life is maddening, literally.  This couple appears to have a bond way beyond this earth.  The heat generated by them almost melts the screen.  This is a wonderful torrid love story.
Worth every penny. This is a very enjoyable documentary. Ordinarily, I don't watch movies a second time. But this one is so good, I purchased it. This film follows two surfers from 1960s America as they travel around the world in search of the perfect wave. They are gentlemen. It is interesting to see the world welcome them -- Americans from a kinder, much less-vulgar era. Even though it is now forty years old, the production value is high. The soundtrack, commentary, and beautiful scenery all contribute to a very well-made film. Forty years later, people continue to buy this movie
Season 2. Stargate Atlantis is great. I like the idea of downloading the episodes, but put in all the seasons. Why leave out season 2?
Great Movie about Dysfunctional Family at Christmas. What can you say about the ultimate dysfunctional family. King Henry keeps his wife locked in a castle miles away and only lets her out on Holidays. It's a great Christmas Movie... Think I'm nuts? Watch the film. You can't beat Peter O'Toole and Kate Hepburn duking it out over which of three unsavory Son's will take over the realm. It was a terrific play, and translates well to the screen. Killer dialogue. The DVD it's self was a good widescreen transfer. Nothing major in the Extras category, but a solid DVD of a terrific Movie. I wish they'd hurry up and put out Becket
My Kind Of Movie!. I would like to say, I like this movie! I have always been the All-American type guy who likes the excitement of a good revenge film. This one is a dandy! The actors bring the characters to life and the beauty of  the landscape where it was filmed is nice. Not only did i enjoy watching  the film, but i was in it playing the part of a trucker in the diner scene  and a neo-nazi at the stone quarry scene. I must say it was a joy working  with Director/Star Phillip Rhee, the cast and crew. They were a top notch  act. If you get a chance to rent or buy this movie, do so. You won't be  disappointed
Superior drama that shows how it's done. One of the best things about this film is found in the details. When Judd Hirsch, as the patriarch of a family constantly on the run from the FBI, throws a couple of vegetables to his son played by River Phoenix, the director, Sidney Lumet, doesn't use that old cut trick--one hand throwing, another hand catching. He actually has River catch the stuff that's thrown to him. When River plays the piano, Lumet doesn't cut away from the keyboard to show the actor's face, then cut again to the sight of hands playing. He shows River playing the piano. It's a real pity River's not here anymore. He had gallons of talent.This is a film whose emotional base is rock solid because the characters are flesh and blood, with real feelings--warmth, dignity, fear, and hope--that give the story tremendous depth and substance.One sidenote of interest. The young actor who plays the younger son in the family, Jonas Abry, was coached for this film by my mother who is a children's acting coach. (He does a great job, if I do say so myself!)Everyone in the cast is fine, but the two standouts are River Phoenix and Christine Lahti. As Judd Hirsch's wife, she is not only perfectly cast, but fits her role like a hand in a kid glove. You can't see anyone else doing this as well. Maybe Sissy Spacek, but this unique combination of toughness and warmth is not quite a Spacek character--nor is it quite a Jodie Foster character either. It's Lahti's role all the way and she's really great.One of the best things about this DVD is that it's really inexpensive. My advice is to buy it; you can't do much better than this for solid American drama at a great DVD price.Highly recommended.
Hellraiser 2: Hellbound. It was better then the first. It shows clips from the first to remind you, or if you never saw the first tell you what was important. kirsty's stepmom comes back to life from blood where she died and it was cooler then Frank in the first movie tand she has a man bring in women so she can kill then and become human again, and there's bodies hanging from chains all over the room that she killed in which was cool. It diddn't take the wole movie for her the become whole again like the first movie did with Frank which was good, I don't even think it took five minutes. you got to see everyones personal hell this time which was really cool. Frank was in his hell being tomented which was kind of dumb, because he diddn't seem in pain or going mad. You learn that the cenobites were human once, even pinhead! Pinhead has pins in his head because that how he was tortured when he died but there's a new tourturer that kills the cenobites and in the end of the movie the cenobites come back to life and start living off blood, they'll be back to there old ways in no time
The Cutting Edge - Gold Medal Edition. The fil is good and interesting, you can enjoy and pass the tim
Good movie. This is a good movie that starts out as an adventure and slowly changes into a morality movie.  I like it and think its setting is contemporary and timely
Mr Chang and his Shangri-La. When I heard this film LOST HORIZON (1937), was being painstakingly restored and with much more footage found in the vaults, after seeing some of the footage, I thought I had to see it some day.  They say every film student and movie buff should see it.The fact that actress, Jane Wyatt [Father Knows Best tv series (1954-60) and reunion tv-movie (1977), also played Spock's mother in a STAR TREK episode and Star Trek: The Voyage Home (1986)] also appears in the film peaks my interest.This version is with the complete 2 hours, 12 minutes soundtrack with only 18 minutes of found footage put back into the film.  Since 7 more minutes of footage was never found, this is replaced by photography stills and freexe frame images.I won't say anything about the plot, but this DVD package does contain a nice pamphlet containing the restoration work they have done on this film.  Jane Wyatt's swimming nude scene is included.DVD includes subtitles in Spanish, Portuguese, Chinese, Korean, Thai.  Theatrical Trailer.Special Trailer include an Alternate Ending.  Restoration: Before and After Comparison with deleted scenes of Jane Wyatt.Photo Documentary.Restoration Audio Commentary.Jane Wyatt just passed away October 20, 2006 at the age of 96 of natural causes.Shangri-La was actually a hollow set at Columbia Ranch near Perduco and Hollywood Way in Burbank, california.  The site is now the Burbank Town Center Mini-Mall.Remade in 1973 in color with an all-star cast with Liv Ullmann, Sally kellerman, George Kennedy, Michael York, Olivia Hussey, Bobby Van.
Sit down evil dead & dead alive!. Based on a story by H.P. Lovecraft, this campy send-up follows an egotistical medical student (Jeffrey Combs) who develops a serum that revives the dead. Together with his girlfriend and his obdurate roommate, Combs reanimates a corpse but doesn't factor in certain complications that arise. Filled with equal parts laughter and gore, Re-Animator spawned a similarly outlandish sequel.Classic gorefest. Classic. It never lets up. Just when you think you've seen it all, it tops you. Tongue-in-cheek all the way, as funny as it is ghastly.Stuart Gordon has never made a film quite as outlandish and nerve-rattling as this one, although "From Beyond" was great, in a more cerebral vein. When I walked out of the theatre on first viewing "Re-Animator," I was literally vibrating, nerves frayed. Exhilirating, in a very twisted way. This is a how a real  horror/comedic gory movie is suppost to be done
Hilarious Entertainment. My sister and I were flipping the channels late one dateless night in high school when we stopped on HBO and this movie was on.  We laughed so hard that we were crying.  Chad Lowe is so cute and funny.  I thought it was going to turn out to be low budget and stupid but I thoroughly enjoyed it.  If you like to laugh, buy this movie
GREAT MOVIE!!!. Overall the DVD was excellent and very much appropriate for young children. However, after a couple of months it had fallen to the back of his preference list. We've not watched it in over a year now. I guess this isn't so different from any other DVD we have.I would recommend this for young children. It does have a few concepts that are not appropriate, but are presented in a way that is way over the heads of children adn does have a few scenes that very concervative parents may term violent but is violence in nature. very entertaining for the whole family
A funny dark comedy. This is funny.  Martin Lawrence is hilarious.  I loved when his car windows were broken in front of the police station.  How funny
Careful, no subs or close captioned!. Contrary to what the box and description here says this disc has NO subtitles or closed captions or whatever. The R2 neither.So again, don't feel sorry for the film companies about their complaining of copying of films and stuff.Non anamorphic or simply 4:3 format, no subs, not available at all (yes I mean you, Disney)... In short, no quality or consistency. Go and take a hike.Stop lobbying for legislation and start making real DVD's
Probably the Best Drama Series Ever Made. I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out
Great !!. This is a Great way to enjoy this very rare japanese TV Shows. This is my first download and the Quality is very Good ( and I talking about 1967 TV Show !!) Johnyy Sokko and his Flying Robot ( also Know in all latinamerica like "ROBOT GIGANTE" ) , One of the big japanese Sience Fiction shows of the 60,s.  ( Like Ultra Man , Space Giants and Ms. Comet ). In this version of Johnny Sokko you can see it in Full color ( Its no Black and White like the promo Picture Displayed in this first episode ).Dont expect good special efects, as you see, this is a very old show. ( I saw it when i was a Kid ). I give 4 Stars because they really rescue  the showand was one of my favorites a Looong time ago !!  Good Job Guys !!Sorry for my bad English but Im Trying my Bes
When, Oh When?. When can we look for this movie on DVD in widescreen format withgood stereo sound?  This is one of the few Elvis movies thathas not made it to the DVD format and is probably the most anticipated.  This is one of the big E's best movies and it isno accident that Shelley Fabares make a huge contribution to thatend.  Also, a lesser know movie--"Tickle Me"--needs to make it'sDVD debut: not as good as "Girl Happy" but has some good musicin it and is an entertaining bit of Elvis fluff.  We the DVD purchasing public would like to know
great dance movie. This is a nice movie.  Not an Oscar winner, but very pleasant and no sex (a virtue/shortcoming depending on your point of view).  I purchased the movie for the salsa dancing, but all of the dancing and music in the movie are great.  From the opening scenes staged in Cuba to the last dance scene the the movie is big time fun.  It also is beautifully filmed.  Chaynne and Vanessa are both easy on the eyes so each gender will enjoy it.  The movie is defintely worth a viewing
I love the movie. The Spice Girls are the best!and if you are a Spice Fan than this is the movie for you.I love i
Better than Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs. Cinderella is the film that saved the Walt Disney Company.I don't want to tell the story because everyone knows the story of Cinderella. I highly recommand this movie. It reminds everyone of childhood
What a Character!. Robert Evans has had a more interesting life than any character in his movies, and that is no small feat considering Evans is the man who produced Love Story, Chinatown, the Godfather and many other blockbusters and classics.This film is a fantastic portrait of an almost incredible man, one that anyone --even those who are not particularly interested in Hollywood-- will enjoy. A spectacular documentary! Highly recommended.
Mock On!. More than 20 years old now and a little dated, Spinal Tap is still loads of fun with the "mockumentary" gang including Christopher Guest and Michael McKean (who did the delightful "Best in Show" in 2000).  Every aspect of `60s and `70s rock music is lampooned.  Surprisingly, director/interviewer Rob Reiner comes off a little flat--but maybe that's just to help highlight the rest of the delightfully dim cast of characters.  "Big Bottom" (a sendup of "Fat Bottomed Girls"--one of my politically incorrect favorites), the "sophisticated" "Sex Farm", and the controversial "Smell the Glove" (ultimately released as Tap's "Black Album") are among "Tap's" big hits.
How Far We've Come. When I watched this classic documentary, I couldn't help but think that if we ever had to get back to the level of living portrayed here, we just wouldn't make it. What it took for Inuits to survive and the almost always smiling faces on them makes me think that despite our modern proclivity for shopping malls, body-piercing, Hummers and rap music, underneath it all is a heritage that is raw, rich and admirable; and thank god somebody was able to capture it to film before it was swallowed up. It would be interesting to produce Nanook II and show what goes on in this remote part of the world now.
An excellent, original movie. "The Bride Wore Black" is not your typical French film. It keeps your attention throughout the whole film. I have never come across something quite like it.The film is centered around a woman, who is seeking to kill five men. When the film commences, you have no idea exactly why she is doing this. Through her clever tactics, she manages to kill them all.As the film progresses you understand each piece of the puzzle, and by the end, the puzzle fits together, and you learn exactly why the film is called "The Bride Wore Black" and why she needed to get her revenge
If you love trashy, cheapie horror oldies...... ....and you know who you are...... this one's for you!This is, hands down, one of the best of the stupid, tacky, impossibly poorly written and acted teenie-bop fifties movies ever. It even has a production number, "Puppy Love", sung by a dreamboat greaser-guy (later a vampire victim, his body discovered along with another unfortunate teen in an unbelievably contrived shot with major bad lighting. Tacky effects, even for the time, the same girl-to-vampire progression sequence repeated endlessly. You can also see a string holding the vampire mask onto the protagonist's head in a graveyard sequence.I ADORE this movie. Yeah, where IS the DVD?????
A riveting cross-country ride with a serial killer. I don't know what it is I love most about Kalifornia. Perhaps that it's about a serial killer, or the man (Duchovney) who yearns to understand why serial killers behave in the way they do. If you enjoy movies about serial killers, then this one's for you. Someone's review said Brad Pitt can't act and I must strongly disagree. Oh sure...I'm a woman and I find him attractive, but in this movie, there's probably very few women who would find his appearance to be pleasing. It's a road movie and serial killer movie tied into one fantastic film and I highly recommend this, at the very least for anyone who wants to see Pitt looking unattractive, but also for any fans of Juliette Lewis - you'll love her in this. She's terrific as always. Enjoy
Good old child hood memories FINALLYY!!!! ON DVD!!!!!!!!!!. When I was six I loved this film  I used to watch it all the time when I was younger now I can't find the video cassette tape of Robot Jox I've decided to get the DVD. finally it came out on dvd it takes them forever to release a dvd sometimes. The only thing I'm bummed about is no special features no behind the scenes or not even a theatrical trailer oh well at least they released the movie on dvd, Can't wait to get it in the mail. I might be 19 years old now but I love my childhood favorites
"Eddie Cruises". Dear Amazon,I was happy to receive a copy of "Eddie and the Cruisers."  It's a film I first saw 20 years ago or so and have never seen again since.  So, the film was available on DVD thru Amazon, the price was undeniably good, and the convenience of Amazon made it easy to get a copy of the film!  Everyone's a winner!Thank you!Sincerely,Scott Gregor
net to you. an anime must have. an introduction to an incredible movie series. It started the ghost in the shell stand alone  complex.
Old fashioned search for love story... If you're looking for exciting chase scenes, gratutious nudity, explicit sex scenes, and formulaic mega-spectacle, then this one is not for you.  But, you will love this movie if you love dance, dancers, searchers for true love, cynics whom true love find, oddballs who find their one true soul mate, and good guys who win in the end.  All in one underrated and underreviewed masterpiece.  Ignore the naysayers.  Take a chance and see this one.  Share it with someone you love.  You will not regret it
Love Atlantis. I think this was a great spin off from stargate sg-1 which was starting to get stale even though I love watching it still.Love being able to download them all, just wish they'd get updated quicker!Honestly, when I left 2 weeks ago I saw the last episode available and I've missed the next 2
Love the new download!. I wanted it for my collection, however you can sift through all the youtube stuff and end up with the same video for free if you want to do the work
HG WELLS. This is an amazing service! For only 2 bucks i can watch what i like for the moment. In this case it was HG WELLS. Great biography
The best psycho-thriller since the Usual Suspects. A supurb roster of actors, headed by Tim Roth, bring to life this horrifying glimpse into the human mind and the psychoses of two individuals as the story behind a murder is uncovered.  In the grand tradition of the  Usual Suspects, the characters in Deceiver change dramatically from the  intriguing beginning to the exciting end.  Highly recommended for any  lovers of mystery and psychological thrillers
Master OF The rare LASERDISCs Movies. I have THREE FUGITIVES on LASERDISC And I bought The dvd too, A MUST SEE For Martin Short's Fans :
Interesting Movie, but.... This is another american remake of the original Danish movie, starring Stellan Skarsgard, which is more interesting than this remake. I always wonder why, when Hollywood does a remake, they change the things that make the movie interesting in the first place. Even though I give this remake 4 stars, mainly because Al Pacino and Robin Williams restrained themselves, and that Hollywood changed the ending. Check out the original. I give the Danish original 5 stars.
See it to believe it. Celebi, the legendary pokemon, is considered the gaurdian of the forests. One day 40 years before Ash and his friends were born, a hunter nearly captures the pokemon using scyther and houndoom. It manages to escape with a young boy Samual, or Sammy's, help. Acting fast the celebi travels through time to rescue itself and Sammy.Now 40 years later, Celebi brings Sammy into the future, where he is brought to shelter by Ash. Sammy soon tells them about Celebi, who is seriously confised and weakened. The friends bring it to the lake of life where it is healed.But a hunter, The Iron Masked Marauder, invents a new machine and tracks the Celebi down. He captures it, weakens it yet again, and then throws a dark ball at it, a special ball that brings pokemon to their highest levels and makes them evil.Creating a huge monster out of vines, twigs and other things Celebi readies to destroy the forest. But suicune comes to the rescue, although it is quickly captured by Celebi's amazing power.When celebi breaks free from the spell, it is extremely weakened. And with the forest destroyed the Healing Waters cannot work. Even when the water is cleaned again Celebi is dying. The friends must admit defeat......The wonders of this movie cannot be told into words
I enjoyed the season premeir emensely. I enjoyed this series premier tremendously and am looking forward to watching the rest of the series.  Enterprise started before I had my PVR and was either on at a time I was unable to watch it or I never made time.  I watched one episode of Star Trek the Next Generation yesterday and it peaked my interest in watching some Star Trek episodes again.  Rather than watch episodes I've already seen, Enterprise looks like a great way to enjoy Star Trek episodes.As far as privacy concerns mentioned in other reviews, if you're paranoid, the internet isn't for you.  Keep your private things private, and not on networked computers.  Hopefully Amazon will remove reviews that do not at all pertain to the show they are attached to
Un box Revisited. This Amazon unbox is not fully developed or has a lot of bugs in it. They should pull it until they get the bugs ironed out. Could not download all of the movie i ordered and now it is gone from my computer and I don't see how to download it again.Update: Most of the problems I experienced were with my Sattelite connection. After 175 MB they start to throttle the speed way down. I upgraded and this helped. I can now download large movies but only in 350mb bites each 4 hours. If you are having trouble read your sattelite "fair access" policy
Surprisingly very good. Sean Penn keeps popping up everywhere I turn. He's like an infectious disease that won't stop. He wasn't in his place in The Interpreter, but here, in a bit role in The Weight of Water, he's right at home. Catherine McCormack does another good job (did I mention that it helps that she's amazingly hot?), and Elizabeth Hurley is oh so hot. I can't believe they put both of those women in the same film.Right now, those of you who are women - or those men who are sissified - are probably bored to tears. Well, I'm not done, so give me one more minute of your hectic day, please.The plot flips back and forth between the past and the present. McCormack's character - a photojournalist - is unraveling a hundred-year old crime while watching her poet husband(Sean Penn) lust over another woman(Hurley) on a boating outing. Well, as our protagonist digs deeper and deeper into the old crime, she begins to lose control on reality, seeing herself in the same situation as one of the possible killers from the unsolved mystery.Good acting and a story that slowly engulfs. Plus, two incredible British hotties and a role that actually makes Sean Penn look great. What more do you need?
Great quality. There is a good reason you'd want to buy this from Amazon. The quality. Sure, you can watch it for free on CBS, but the quality isn't very good. It's streamed and the bitrate (quality) is low. Personally, I want to watch Survivor on my 50" plasma, not on my computer screen. So, I use Unbox + Windows Media Center to make that happen. Survivor from unbox is as good as getting the show directly from my cable provider.
Worth Every Minute. If you don't like to watch foreign films because of the subtitles, then you're depriving yourself of great tales such as this one. Every minute the viewer gives to this film is more than repaid.Under the rays of a Stalinist sun, a story of tragic heroism becomes illuminated against the "fertile" landscape of communist Russia. The threads of a few seemingly disconnected lives weave together to provide a portrait of characters in various stages of maturity: the pitiful self-destructive bitterness of a talented young man, the guarded confusion of a young wife preoccupied with doubt, the grace under fire of an anti-hero learning to accept and savor life, and the innocent precocity of a little girl caught in the middle of it all. The stark brevity of the language, which is utilized masterfully by an excellent cast, lends a heartbreaking poetry to the backdrop of a "common wealth" among comrades. The director then brings this script to life with scenery choices and visual tricks that would make any baby filmmaker drool. All in all, this was one of the films that helped to form me as an artistic person, and I am certain that it will move anyone who draws breath
Decidely Nasty Insects with Funny Shoes... A nasty disease is ravaging the children of Manhattan. The only way to combat it anyone can think of it is to eradicate the local cockroach population that is acting as carriers. Enter insect specialist Dr Susan Tyler (Mira Sorvino) who fiddles around with the cockroach gene to produce an aggressive new strain, the Judas Breed, that preys on normal cockroaches. The idea is that it will die out after one generation as all females Judases released are sterile.  But that doesn't seem to work and three years later something nasty seems to be lurking around the subway system. Some street kids bring Tyler an alarming specimen in an old Corn flakes Box. And Chuy an autistic little boy starts to notice people with "funny, funny shoes".It's a splendid little horror movie, one of the best of the 1990s, particularly liable to freak you out if you don't like creepy crawlies. The first hour is the best while there is still an air of mystery about these strange bugs and there are some beautifully clever scary scenes such as that where Chuy goes exploring or where Tyler is groping for a dropped torch. It has its faults. The last half hour or so, once the protagonists know what they are up against, where it just turns into a chase movie, is rather less effective. The opening title sequence is a quite shameless rip-off of `Se7en'. And the story surely doesn't surely make a whole not of biological sense. For it to be possible in evolutionary terms, a single Judas bug generation can't be much more than a few minutes long. In which case its hugely implausible that, as Tyler decides, there's only a single fertile male in circulation at a given time killing whom off will solve the problem. But not to worry. This remains a cracking good scary movie.
The sun has been rising from the east since the beginning of time. There are very nice allegories in this movie. Daniel, as the physicist that he is, lacking essential social abilities. needs to be enlightened. More like our average "I do my job, dont care about the rest" modern day type. Everbody has his/her own inner journey, Isa (Jesus), Daniel the (old tastement) scientist, Melek (Angel) and Juli (July) throughout the trip to Istanbul from Hamburg. And yes,follow the sun, as it has been proven to work already...A very good humane point of view that we have  forgotten for some decades due to unjustified arrogance.. As he himself, Fatih Akin, the director of the movie and writer of the scenario emphasizes in a somewhat joking way, and it is most probably true that, "if Sheakespeare were to live today, he probably would do such work". If you think you are up for some good romance and commedy, go for it. I would recommend this as a DVD for a romantic date too:-).
Scooby Doo is awesome!. It was fun to watch the first episode of Scooby Doo (High Rise Hair Raiser) on my computer as a download with my kids. We go back and watch it from time to time. I am glad that Amazon gave me this free download, so that I could try this feature
90 minute thrill ride. I am laughing at those 2 star reviews saying how AVP is destroying the Alien and Predator legacy because of its nonexistent plot.  All I am going to say is this: go back and watch Alien and P1 again before passing any judgment.  I did recently.  Both has even less of a story than AVP.  Both would be receiving mediocre reviews if released today.  Those 2 star reviewers are comparing AVP to how they remember Alien and Predator.  Memories are doing a real number on them.The only thing that AVP lacks is originality.  However, the story will continue.  AVP1 sets the stage for sequels. We should wait and see how it develops.  Meanwhile, enjoy the incredible CG and action sequences.In short, AVP is an awesome 90 minute thrill ride, that I am willing to take again and again.  And for the record, Paul Anderson is a great director.  Check out his "Resident Evil 1."As another side note, James Cameron ranked AVP as the 3rd best among the 5 Alien movies, after "Alien" and his "Aliens"
Steve is the Best. Steve Martin is simply the funniest guy in show business.  A great remake of a classic.  No one can play characters the way Steve can and this movie is sure to entertain one and all
The History a Cult is Trying to Hide. I can see how current members of the Prem Rawat/Maharaji cult wouldn't like this video, mostly because it shows a history of their master that his cult is trying very hard to hide from the public, because it doesn't fit into his current PR campaign to get new devotees.There is nothing biased, or one-sided, about this video, and it certainly isn't "amateur" and it wasn't put together by Maharaji's former followers (disgruntled or otherwise).  In fact, it's an extremely well done documentary made for PBS that documents, (without any narration or explanation/analysis whatsoever), a period in American history, specifically, what actually happened at the 1973 Millennium festival, when Mr.Rawat, the living "Perfect Master,"  said he was going to present his plan for world peace.  The video simply records the actual speeches of Mr. Rawat and the statements of his devotees.The end result is an historical record of a young Guru, who believes he is the incarnation of God, who seems to have a pathological need to be worshipped, and the idealistic young people who got caught up in his cult back in the mid-70s.  The fact that this story does not fit conveniently in Mr. Rawat's attempts, over the years, to pretend those embarassing events never happened, may upset his followers, but it does not in any way discredit the historians, nor the thousands of people who witnessed those events.
The last but not the least.  Un Flic  is the latest film of Jean-Pierre Melville, the famous French director of the 50s and 60s. It's the last but not the least. This film shows particularily well the style of the master which is very sensitive to the nights and gangsters'atmosphere. As it was the case for The Samura and for The Red Circle or The Army of Shadows, the story is brilliant and the thrill upon the characters is so high that the viewer feels in. Alain Delon is excellent as usual, Catherine Deneuve and Richard Crenna appears in mysterious roles. You won't regret to buy this VHS because Melville is now considered as a master for directors like John Woo, Quentin Tarantino, or even Martin Scorcese
Never Grow Up. What a good movie.  After having to call it quits due to a shoulder injury, Coach Jim Morris took another approach to baseball, coaching.  After taking over a high school team in Texas, he made a promise to them.  He told them that of they won districts, he would try out for a big league team.After the districts were won, that only left Coach Morris with one thing to do, try out for the majors!
CONVICTS. THERE WAS VERY GOOD ACTING BY ALL THE STARS IN IT. THE STORY WAS A LITTLE SLOW. I LOVE ROBERT DUVALL IN ANY MOVIE THOUGH.
If only there were more episodes. Firefly is a fantastic series.  My wife and I watched the DVD set from and found ourselves rationing the episodes towards the end, because we didn't want the series to be over.  Great cast, great plots, great music.  I really can't say enough about this series.  I have never enjoyed a season of any show more than I enjoyed Firefly, and everyone I've introduced to it has loved it as well
Wonderful!. When I saw the plot description, I wasn't sure I wanted to see this movie, but the reviews convinced me to give it a try. Am I glad I did! I laughed so much I did something I've never done before--watched it again the next day. And I laughed even harder the second time around.Okay, so this isn't your action-packed thriller. And the plot is, well, for the dogs. But you're laughing so hard you hardly notice. Granted, the characters are more caricatures than people. But the caricatures ring true -- we've seen those faces on our friends, our co-workers, and in our weaker moments, on ourselves.Get your friends to watch it, and soon you'll be comparing your favorite lines, and laughing all over again.Mine: "That handler looks familiar.
Stompin' good time. This group of folks can get music out of seemingly impossible objects including cutting vegetables as well as a deck of cards. A truly unique form of entertainment. Highly recommend
Women of the Covered Typewriter. Ginger won the Oscar for playing this part despite some stiff competition.  She's decidedly out of character as a white-collar girl with an old school attitude.  I love when she grumbles, "People always make a big deal about the Old West and the brave women of the covered wagons.  They don't seem to care as much about their modern-day equivalents, the secretaries--the women of the covered typewriters."  With her quivering lower lip and her turned-up chin, she makes us care for Kitty Foyle, a girl from the poor side of the tracks who makes good with the rich playboy Wynnewood Strafford the III, or for short, "Win," played skillfully by the wonderful Dennis Morgan, possibly Hollywood's most under-rated star player of the 1940s.  Morgan could sing too but he was best playing men whose love for their leading lady was always tested by some kind of addiction or other handicap, some sort of weakness.  Here his Achilles heel is his family and their swanky social position.Gladys Cooper would have a fit if she found out that Dennis was dating Ginger Rogers, and in the book of course, Kitty and Win don't get married but carry on a "back street" sex affair anyhow.  Moviegoers even in 1940s were agile enough to read between the lines and to guess that the baby Ginger loses in the movie was a real "love child."  You'd have to have a heart of stone not to feel strangle prickles behind your eyes, like tears, when Ginger realizes that she has lost the baby.  Luckily Dr. Mark is there to pick up the pieces--James Craig, another very good actor, playing a young intern who loves Kitty even despite the fact that her father's a boozehound and she will never enter the Social Register or Main Line Philly society.  I wonder if Grace Kelly ever saw KITTY FOYLE and based some of her choices in men on Kitty's Philadelphia binary.  Between this film and BACHELOR MOTHER you would think Ginger Rogers a very maternal figure, but anyone who met her in real life knew that there was no room for children in her heart; in some ways she was a very lonely lady despite her many accomplishments and all the famous men she attracted to her side (think "Lady in the Dark," probably the part she played that was the most like the real life Ginger Rogers.")The subtitle of this movie was "The Natural History of a Woman" and was supposed to provide a quasi-scientific, or sociological, study of class.  Far from it, but it's a treat anyhow
It's more than a movie about jazz. Round Midnight is the most delicate, sensitive and deep movie I've ever watched.It's a movie that goes much beyond jazz and musicians.It's a movie about love, about the possibilities, about us, human beigns.And amazingly played by two INCREDIBLE actors: Dexter Gordon and Franois Cluzet. Dexter Gordon was a special human being, he was an angel. I really belive this. It was up to Bertrand Tavernier to see it and he did. That's why the movie is a masterpiece, it's a combination of untouchble and unique souls
Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST!. The Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST drama I have seen ever. Korean, American, doesn't matter! This is better than anything I have ever seen on TV or in the movies. Hollywood cannot touch this one! Kim Myoung Min(Yi Soon Shin) is outstanding in this!(no wonder he won the 2005 KBS BEST ACTOR AWARD FOR IYSS)It starts from when he was a child to his adulthood and can be emotional, funny, sad, and can make you angry!! The numerous obstacles and prejudices this man had to overcome and then always bounced back with no complaint because of the love of his country is phenomenal!! He put his country above all else and Kim Myoung Min did a great job of portraying that!My whole family, kids and all, watched this with me and loved it!I can see why Yi Soon Shin is Korea's hero and why other countries teach his methods
Not quite purrfect, but close. This is one of those movies that you think to yourself - "This wacked out stuff could entirely happen." Because honestly, this wacked out stuff could entirely happen.Where this movie misses is that when they are going for the serious, they are really kinda funny. However, when they are going for the funny, they end up just kind of lame. And honestly, the whole Fern/Violette subtext...waaay to over the top. They could have simply bribed her by putting her in the spotlight, not redirecting the spotlight toward her and then marveling at the monster that they created.Great cameo from Marilyn Manson as the greaser in the bar. And the Donna's playing the prom...I went to see them in concert and they are almost worth picking up this movie all on their own
From the director of PRISON ON FIRE 1 & 2. I wrote off Jean-Claude years ago as a has been, but after seeing his impressive performance in IN HELL I might have to reevaluate The Muscles from Brussels.Director Ringo Lam who's visited the prison genre twice before with the two classic PRISON ON FIRE films this time has Jean-Claude Van Damme as a steelworker in Bulgaria who is sentenced to life in prison without parole for avenging his wife's murder.Mild mannered at first - you can tell by the way his shirt completely covers his muscles - Jean-Claude is eventually taken to the breaking point and forced to wear tank tops and release some Van Dammage on the crooked guards who pimp out the prettier prisoners and also run an illegal death match fighting league between some of the more bloodthirsty prisoners.The fighting, not to mention that there's also a good story, is what really sets this movie apart from most Van Damme movies.  There's no flying and spinning around like a helicopter or exploding a stack of bricks with your big toe here.  Its all gritty realistic bloody knuckle street fighting.  The best example of that is at one point where Van Damme looks lost and has to turn around twice before he notices his opponent laying on the ground behind him.  Anybody who's been in a real fight knows how easy it is to get disoriented.If Van Damme made more films like this he might get back in the movie theaters
The Search For Shangri-La. This is an excellent documentary of Shangri-La and its elusive transcendental nature
Good Stuff. Good movie, a mix of fun and lust. If you like classic naked girls this DVD is one of the ones you must have
Cute, fun, Hilariously crazy!. This movie, I have seen back when it came out, and I loved it! I watched in alomost everyday, and vnever got tired of it! I saw it again and loved it like the first time I watched it. Light, and cute! Keeps my mind happy, and entertained! I definetly suggest anyone to watch this movie. Especially if you feel misunderstood or out of place, this movie will pick you up, and show you that you are not alone.Greta sattire
Cutting Edge. Definately one of the best skating/love stories ever. It's humerous and both actors play their parts so well
Best Thing on Film Ever. This is one of the very few movies that both my wife and I love and have watched several times and never get sick of it.  It is hard to believe that David Mamet has something this good inside of him - it has to do with people not crime and violence.If you like this one, you will probably like "Breaking Away", "Strictly Ballroom", "Dirty Dancing", "What Planet Are You From?" (Mike Nichols), and the Burt Reynolds classic "The End" (the movie for people who don't even like Burt Reymolds)
Great movie!. We certainly enjoyed this movie in the wonderful series of the Pokemon adventures.  Must see
Ridiculous! Completely Ridiculous!. OK, this film bombed at the theaters and I am guessing it was panned by the critics. HOWEVER, it has some of the funniest lines and scenes in movie history. Artie and Norm work beautifully together. MOREOEVR, there is one scene in this movie that makes me literally cry because it is so funny, no change that, because it is so ridiculous
Still a Worthy Effort. Having always loved films from the 30's, I've recently re-discovered the delightful Norma Shearer. I find her to be quite a good actress, and found this film to be very entertaining. Allowing for the 70+ years since it was made, it's amazing to see how single women were treated in those days as opposed to now. Some of it is comical where it wasn't meant to be for just that reason, but Norma shines through. And Robert Montgomery, her perpetual co-star, is quite good, even though he's played this same personality in so many of her films. Norma Shearer was called the &quot;Queen of MGM&quot; because she was married to Irving Thalberg, but I think she'd have been the success she was without him
I capture the castle. I loved it!  Even though the book is much better than the movie, I still liked it.  The scenery is gorgeous, the people are beautiful and the story held my attention.  It is definitely a chick flick.  It`s all done in green England, and is produced by the BBC.   I did like all the 1930`s styles and mores.  A charming movie
an ironic delight of a movie. I first saw the movie when I was 17 years old and was smitten immediately by its dark, perverse humor, and especially the performance of Martha Raye. It is worth buying just for her performance alone, a classic of comedy. Some of it seems a bit awkward and not smoothly done, such as the speeding wheels of the train to indicate travel and time passing. And some of Chaplain's shticks such as the way he counts bills seem a bit gratuitous but these flaws don't do much damage to the whole. One of Chaplain's best if not the very best
film noir classic. this movie is a must see for anyone who loves film noir of the 40's. it's a story told in flashbacks, with twists and turns, and of course the murky lighting and shadowy imagery that gave the genre the name noir. robert mitchum is the quintessence of cool-he can do more with a sneer or the raise of an eyebrow than some guys today can do with pages of dialogue. jane greer is the doe-eyed tomato on the lam. kirk douglas is terrific as the heavy. you'll love this one
Un box Revisited. This Amazon unbox is not fully developed or has a lot of bugs in it. They should pull it until they get the bugs ironed out. Could not download all of the movie i ordered and now it is gone from my computer and I don't see how to download it again.Update: Most of the problems I experienced were with my Sattelite connection. After 175 MB they start to throttle the speed way down. I upgraded and this helped. I can now download large movies but only in 350mb bites each 4 hours. If you are having trouble read your sattelite "fair access" policy
Only one question. My only question is - When can I buy season 2?  This is the perfect medium to continue the most enjoyed show that TV execs killed this decade
top drama series. Savour the wonderful premiere series of UPSTAIRS DOWNSTAIRS in this great DVD box set.The saga of the Bellamy family and their lively, loyal servants at 165 Eaton Place went on to span 5 series and countless awards.  In the legendary first series we are introduced to politician Richard Bellamy (David Langton), his beautiful wife Lady Marjorie (Rachel Gurney) and their children James (Simon Williams) and Elizabeth (Nicola Pagett).  Downstairs, their staff, Hudson the butler (Gordon Jackson), Mrs Bridges the cook (Angela Baddeley), Rose the maid (Jean Marsh) and Emily the scullery maid (Evin Crowley) attempt to uphold their own values whilst coming to grips with an ever-changing world.Originally-devised by actresses Jean Marsh and Eileen Atkins, the series explored the day-to-day life of servant and master in the Edwardian period, a time of great political and social upheaval. The series later took the Bellamy family into the First World War (Series 4, regarded by most as the greatest), the 1920s flapper period and the impending Stock Market crash (Series 5).As the series opens, it is the year 1903, and great changes are afoot for the Bellamy family."On Trial" - Into the structured Bellamy household whirls the unconventional free-spirit Clemence Delise (Pauline Collins) who is applying for the new position of parlourmaid.  After Lady Marjorie re-names the girl Sarah, she is quickly inducted into the residence, but it soon becomes clear that Sarah's true calling isn't in domestic service."The Mistress and the Maids" - Lady Marjorie sits for an important society painter, but it's Sarah who enflames his creative talents."Board Wages" - When the Bellamy's leave London for the weekend, Sarah and the servants are left to their own devices.  But when James unexpectedly returns home early, Sarah is thrown into a dilemma which could see her walk away from Eaton Place."The Path of Duty" - Elizabeth returns home from a German finishing school, but her stubborn, willful streak is still very much intact.  When she must make her formal society debut, Elizabeth exposes her parents to a huge scandal by running away."A Suitable Marriage" - The visiting Baron von Rimmer seems the perfect prospective husband for Elizabeth...or is he?"A Cry for Help" - Richard becomes entangled in scandal when the new maid appeals for his assistance in a delicate private matter."Magic Casements" - Lady Marjorie enjoys a tender but brief affair with one of James' military friends."I Dies from Love" - Emily becomes infatuated with a footman, leading to dire consequences when her affections are not returned."Why Was Her Door Locked?" - An emotionally-distraught Mrs Bridges plunges the Bellamy family into disgrace when she kidnaps a baby."A Voice from the Past" - Whilst helping in a soup kitchen, James and Elizabeth stumble onto a homeless Sarah, and decide to take her back to Eaton Place.  The situation becomes complicated when Elizabeth learns of James' affair with Sarah during her previous employment at the house."The Swedish Tiger" - Sarah becomes a pawn in a plan to rob the Bellamy's of priceless antiques."The Key of the Door" - Elizabeth comes of age, but her headstrong attitude once again causes friction with her parents, when she befriends Evelin Larkin and her group of socialists."For Love of Love" - Elizabeth finally marries poet Lawrence Kirbridge at the request of her parents, and James rekindles his affair with Sarah, who is now a music-hall singer.Due to a technician's strike in 1971, the first six episodes were taped in black-and-white, and an alternate colour version of the first episode was filmed later on, for broadcasters who didn't wish to screen the black and white episodes.  In the colour broadcasts, Sarah leaves at the end of the first episode "On Trial", but the complete B&W/colour inclusive series has her leave at the end of "Board Wages".  UPSTAIRS DOWNSTAIRS is still often aired without the crucial black and white episodes, but the DVD edition includes the complete story arc with no omissions and both versions of the "On Trial" episode
Probably the Best Drama Series Ever Made. I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out
Lorax - Fond Memories, Pontoffel - Wow.. We rented The Lorax because I realized I hadn't seen it since 1978 on a reel-to-reel tape in my elementary school library but I loved it. Somehow 27 years later I knew a lot of words to the songs, but was struck by how much the message of the movie is relevant today. If anything, these days this movie would not be shown in a public school or on television because the FCC would investigate its subversive message of enviromentalism, critique of consumerism, and caring for others.As for Pontoffel Pock & His Magic Piano - I have no memory of this movie, and I have to say that it is one of the most bizarre things I've ever seen. Let's just say Theodore Giesel meets Timothy Leary and Ken Kesey and keep it at that
American freedom, democracy and equality. yes, you can see the principles of the merciful religion of christ, expounded by priests, politicians and generals, the innocence, courage and heroism of the brave American soldier....who go into a country which had just emerged from the shadow of french colonialism..for tungsten and tin. and burn thatched huts of peasants there, and napalm and agent orange. Amazing.the priest is happy that the work of christ is done, and the politician that communism is being defeated, and the general that "our boys are good killers".You can tell they will do it for oil too.oh wait. They are already..
How Could You Not Have seen this?. A Must for any Intelligent Person, Family or Library. Remember Innocence? The Fantasy Sequence is very "Period"(the 50s) , but worth every penny
No harm, no foul. At first glance this would appear to be a VERY serious movie.   The opening 1/2 hour or so reminded me of the movie BODY SHOTS, which is a rather disturbing film.   What is most intriguing about this story is that it is a complete farce and the movie seems to change colors like some sort of a chameleon.   What you end up with is something totally different than what you think you're getting in the beginning.Reese Witherspoon stars once again as a sort-of young girl lost type persona.   She seems to be somewhat typecast for this type of role as in many ways her character is not so different from the ones she portrayed in TWILIGHT and FREEWAY.   While the present film is not quite as off-the-wall as FREEWAY, it is still pretty far out in left-field.If you're a fan of Reese Witherspoon or films that are on the fringes of THE TWILIGHT ZONE, this one might be for you.  While there are many obvious clues during the film as to what's going on, I did not take them seriously enough to figure this plotline out before the final revelation.   Can you
Doctor Who and the first Download. Doctor who materialised without his Tardis on this, my first timelord download in the amazon unbox, which is much larger on the inside than it appears on the outside.For a very reasonable sum, $1.99, my family and I were able to enjoy the first Third doctor adventure after his regeneration, where he encounters the Nestene Conciousness.The down load took only a few minutes although I had some considerable difficulty installing the microsoft program. thanks to the good people at amazon tech support I was able to obtain an alternative download from the gates empire itself which allowed me to enjoy our rental.a great experience and will not be the last. easy to navigate and fun for all the family. someone should tell the timelords on gallifrey about unbox and perhaps they could get rid of all the old type 40 tardis'
Great action pack movie. The movie has a good story to it & it's action pack from begining to end. I like all the people that play in it. This is one of those movies you are sure to enjoy the whole way though. The Punisher is worth the buy
The Very Best!!!. There's so much to preview in this show, that to share it all would take a couple of pages.  However, the highlights are the music, the singers, and "The Dance."Flatley is INCREDIBLE, and the show flows like a river (pardon the pun).  It is superbly choreographed and executed, and it goes from the serene to the sensational in a split second.  The orchestrations are touching and the Irish/Celtic music is haunting, as are the costumes.This is theatre at its very best, and it is highly recommended.  I'd give it 20 stars if I could!!
One of the best documentaries ever made!. I saw this documentary in the 90's and it opened my eyes. Every human being on this earth should see this documentary and rethink it's role in human history. Noam Chomsky is a model. Humam, but a model
colour. Inferno is a kind of eye candy. The colour create a special tone for this imagination story
Pokemon will last forever. The movie is the next segment in the Pokemon movies which supplies everything on hopes and dreams of a pokemon warrior named Ash Ketchim and his friends. They go out and they look battle and run into new pokemon and take on new adventures with Pikachu and other pokemon favorities. This adventure takes on with a new pokemon called Celebi a time pokemon. Go join Brock and Misty to find all sorts of new things
Adorable!. Monkey Business is one of the cutest movies I have ever seen and it's just so funny to see Cary Grant and Ginger Rogers take the youth serum and act like children and they were great and also the monkey were absolutely adorable!This movie is recommended highly
HG WELLS. This is an amazing service! For only 2 bucks i can watch what i like for the moment. In this case it was HG WELLS. Great biography
Charlotte's Web. I've purchased this book for my daughter who is almost 9 years old, I end up reading it before her.  This book is great for growing up kids; how wonderful and variable it is to have a friend he/she can depend on and be with to share fun, sad and so so stories to one another.Wonderful, educational and life experience can be experience in this boo
No holds barred, irreverent, NOT for the easily offended. This has got to be the funniest, most warped show on cable today.  It's the ultimate show about nothing - a group of morally-deficient 20-somethings who own an Irish pub in Philadelphia.  They care about nothing but outdoing each other for attention and money.  They constantly argue over the dumbest things and come from families more dysfunctional than anyone can imagine.To give you an idea of the show's themes:  there are episodes that revolve around one of the characters trolling for dates at an abortion rally; another in which the gang tries to outdo each other by pretending to be crippled, just to see who can get the most attention and sympathy from strangers; and an episode in which the gang charges people to view a "vision" of the Virgin Mary (actually a water stain in the bar).  The dialogue is made up of all the things people are thinking but won't say.  No tender or sappy moments here, these are episodes you would NEVER see on the Hallmark Channel or Lifetime.One of the most unique comedies on tv, and by far one of the best.  I look forward to many more new seasons of "It's Always Sunny..." and am hopeful it does not lose its edge or pursue milktoast or nonoffensive story lines.
The Mighty mighty. I purchased this movie again because I lost my first copy. I used it as a follow up to the reading of the book by the same title. My at risk junior high school students enjoyed both the book and the movie!!! The theme is timeless and the film is well acted. It can be seen over and over again
Funny,Funny,Funny. Even though this is about 4 years old, it is extremely halarious.  I've been waiting to see a good stand up comedy. The first 15 min is just one hilarious hit after another. I love this guy
Nice date night movie!. Add one part love story and one part baseball sports flick and you have a great date night movie! This is a wonderful movie to watch. Kelly Preston and Kevin Costner do really great jobs of playing their roles in this movie, but more importantly the storyline is really well done. Costner plays an aging professional pitcher at the end of his career. On the last game he pitches, we see not only what is going on in his mind as a professional pitcher, but also flashbacks of his career over the years and his on again/off again romantic relationship with Preston's character. Definitely worth watchin
Epic Korean Drama. Koreans honor their greatest military hero in this epic drama which takes place in the late 1500s. The career and tactics of this Admiral are still studied at the U.S. Naval Academy, and doubtless those of other nations. The screenplay is based on a couple of novels, so there is some fiction, but the life of Yi Soon Shin was well documented, so there's plenty of fact supporting the story.If you are not familiar with Korean Drama, it's good to keep in mind that  this is not a Hollywood product, but they do very well with special effects and such considering the non-Hollywood budgets involved, and it's easy to see past all that and enjoy the tale being told.It's a long series, but presents an epic with power, depth and dimension and well worth watching it unfold through each and every episode.It would be great also to see KBS make other dramas available for viewing through Amazon, such as "Seoul 1945".
Excellent movie!!!. Great reminder of the time, very funny, great music,great actors, just worth it in every way
Perfect love makes perfection in all. I find it odd that when reviewing the reviews of this film that people seem to either give it perfect or abysmal scores.  The dichotomy of opinion is probably a direct result of the skill and immense power of Leconte's images, (especially those that his chosen actress affords us).Leconte is a master and quite possibly the greatest living auteur currently making films.  His movies often contain a refreshing difficulty that gives one hope that images still mean something, that film is still worthy of being explicated, that someone still cares enough to think that much without being overly clever such as the Coens and Anderson.  I shouldn't say still.  I should say is and will be, as Leconte is on a different level than any who has ever worked including Kieslowski (the master of images).  I enjoy how Leconte has said that although it was his second period piece he approached the film as if that had nothing to do with it, learning from "Ridicule".  I should point that out I have no problem with "Ridicule" and the fact that it is a period piece has a great deal to do with the presentation, but I can see what he meant.  Like I said, I enjoy the statement, but I should also point out I'm a jerk.Binoche and Auteuil are two of my favorite actors and this film shows them at their virtuosic best.  They deliver amazing performances of a truly passionate couple who both hold unconditional love for the other which in itself contains ultimate trust of decision and character.  Possibly more Auteuil's for Binoche's but the sympathy generated by his character fuels her as an equally sharing partner, making any difference negligible.  There is a third character, Neel, but he is there only to accentuate the relationship between the other two.The movie, quite simply is about unconditional love and what it means to love unconditionally.  There is a subplot of equal merits (mainly concerning Neel) about the belief in redemption, and what it truly means to believe in redemption.  In short it is about the consequences of action through belief, more so out of the love for another than those of moral ground or stance.  Some people are not willing to accept the belief that actions can or should occur solely out of sympathy for another.  Some people will never allow themselves to love unconditionally.  Some people will not understand or even like this film.Binoche deserves a prize that doesn't yet exist for her most exquisite performance.  Leconte deserves recognition for what he has done and what he has given us with this film, certainly one of the best I have ever seen.
Talk about Christmas spirit... I really love Bones.  It has everything: suspense, drama, humor, pretty people, fun storylines.  I have yet to miss an episode, and even into Season 2 this is probably my favorite.  It adds depth to all of the characters.  Also, the winter holidays are my favorite time of year.  I like holidays that are about what is good in the world.  Bones is about people standing for the good in humanity even though they explore the very worst every day.  I cry through half this episode, but in a completely good way.  Buy, watch it, love it.  But watch it with a friend if you don't want to cry alone.  So moving, great performances by the whole cast.  Emily Deschanel was powerful in this one, she brings real vulnerability to Brennan here.  David Boreanaz, as always the perfect sympathetic hero, loveably old-fashioned. Cute, funny moments.  Touching, poignant moments.  This really is the best of what is great about Bones
THE best martial arts movie EVER !!!. What else could you expect from the belgian's... buy hey, jean-claude, at the premiere of cyborg you let me and my cousin in the rain.  You were stuck in brussels... so, i'll still owe you a signed poster ;)This movie is what it's all about, off course, bruce lee was widely known.  But this one is trully magnificent... the story is based on a true-story, the movements are very very athletic and beautifull... to make it short...THIS MOVIE HAS IT ALL !!!More from this please instead of such stupid movies were chinese men make 7 flips in once while throwing some stars on top off a bus for example...This movie let's you see what it really is... ART !!
Carl Sagan inspired many with his series Cosmos... It was a great experience for me to see the &quot;man behind Cosmos&quot;, a series that years ago changed my life
Ain't spandex great?. This is an HBO remake of the original 50's 50 footer. Naturally there had to be some adjustments for the new era. However it still captures the thrills and chills. You may also marvel at the spandex clothing that stretches for ever (rats.)Nancy (the little woman) does not have quite the devoted husband. Here life is not quite ideal. Soon a chance encounter with aliens (the space type) leaves her feeling bigger about the situation. 50 foot bigger. Now it is Nancy's turn for a little revenge. The ending is a little unnerving.Be sure to see Daryl in just as serious of a role in "High spirits" (1998)
Great Sci Fi. if you like sci fi, and enjoy a large scale presentation (on a big home system), this movie is haunting, sad and powerful.  i do not understand the poor reviews by some unless they do not like sentimental and unhappy endings..
"Who Do You Say That I Am". 'The Greatest Story Ever Told' had the very real potential of being one of the biggest disasters in motion picture history. Think about it for a moment. Who would want to sit through a 3 hour and 19 minute film about Jesus with a virtually unknown blond haired, blue eyed Swedish actor named Max von Sydow in the lead role? Add to that the fact that the artistic integrity of the film was likely to be ruined by the studios decision to populate the feature with a multitude of cameo appearances by just about every living movie star in Hollywood. Sure signs of impending doom surrounded this project.Surely director George Stevens pulled off a major miracle. Aided by one of the finest soundtracks in motion picture history provided by the legendary Alfred Newman, some of the most gorgeous cinematography and set designs you'll ever see and an unforgetable performance by Max von Sydow 'The Greatest Story Ever Told' lived up to it's title to become the definitive film version on the life of Jesus of Nazareth.A classic from '64 that belongs in everyones' DVD library. One of the Essentials
Freaky Show. This movie is about a boy who gets badly insulted at a school dance in Junior High he ended up getting beaten up by a bunch of macho boys and all the popular girls who asked him to dance are all forgiven and there isnt any consequences.Many years later they all become succesfull people struggling with work and relationships. When one of the friends turns up murdered at the hospital where she works they start to think that the boy that they insulted as come back to get them. They dont remember what happened to him and have no idea to what he looks like. Denise Richards, Marley Shelton, Jessica Cauffell, Jessica Caupshaw, David Boreanaz, and Katherine Heigl star in this terrifying movie. The good thing is you get to see Denise Richards character Paige Prescott in a bikini. Soon the killer starts attacking all of the girls in a mask in bizarre places. For example in a jacuzzi at the spa, in a morgue while doing an autopsy, in an art gallery when taking a quick break. The deaths are pretty vile and brutal there is lots and lots of blood spilled everywhere you can tell this movie was filmed very quickly and rushed into release. The attack of the killer is very predictable and there is only one twist at the end when Marley Sheltons character finds out that her boyfriend Played by David Boreanaz was the one who was behind all the masked killings even though she was friends with them he let her live because she didnt hurt his feelings at the dance. Denise Richards character bites the dust hard i believe its after the art show when she goes to take a bath in the jacuzzi the killer attacks her with a nail gun and tries to suffocate her she shows a lot of ressistance to the killings but he still shows no mercy the nail goes right into her shoulder and then finally the kille throws the gun into the water which electrocutes her. It was very scary. But the movie itself isnt scary it wasnt as bad as Urban Legends: Final Cut or I still know what you did last summer. It was still a very good movie over all. This is not a movie to watch on Valentines day its a movie to watch around Halloween and isnt really meant for kids below 14. This is a teen slasher flick but it is indeed violent and it can easily scare people. Parents trust the R rating on the back and dont let them watch it. Its mainly for adults to laugh over. The weird thing is that Denise Richards was listed first on the credit line up and she was 3rd to last to get killed. It was bizarre. But still this movie was really good and not really scary it was like a freaky sho
Blue Collar Comedy Tour Rides Again. Very funny but some of the Jokes are the same. Bill is alsome and does not repeat his jokes
spectacular!. Though this movie is an edited version of the book, it captures the very essence of what Charlotte Bronte wrote in her classic epic drama. The moodiness and Movie Noire Gothic feeling of the sets are captured to perfection. Orson Welles is a very convincing  and plays Edward Rochester brilliantly.  Joan Fontaine while some may say is too fine and pretty to play Jane, Captures her innocence, inner strength and devotion to Mr Rochester wonderfully. An added bonus are the children actors who play young Jane, Peggy Ann Garner, who also played in the Movie A Tree grows in Brooklyn  and Helen, a very young and beautiful Elizabeth Taylor in her first featured role. In all, this is a must see film. I give it an A... I would have given it an A+ if they could have made it longer to fit the whole story in.I really love this movie, I highly recomend you buy it
very good. i was very pleased with this purchase .it came quickly and perfect shap
All About Eve. This classic is one of the best movies ever.  Bette Davis as the aging not so gracefully star with the wicked tongue.  Thelma Ritter doing what she does best and George Sanders in the perfect role for him as the "critic".  Ann Baxter playing the ingenue Eve--what else can I say.  Everyone who enjoys movies will love this one
Funny,Funny,Funny. Even though this is about 4 years old, it is extremely halarious.  I've been waiting to see a good stand up comedy. The first 15 min is just one hilarious hit after another. I love this guy
Great ocean shots in the Bahamas. I grabbed this flick from the shelf on a very wet and miserable day at my local Target....  craving the Summer sun and needing an island vacation....The cover appealled to me for these reasons and I admit I was not at all disappointed in the movie.  The scenery was indeed spectacular.  The underwater diving/snorkling scenes were clear, crisp, and just what the doctor ordered.  Even the sharks and rays made it all quite beautiful.OK, enough of the shallow stuff....  the movie was indeed much like the 70's flick "The Deep" which I enjoyed back then as well.  The characters of Jared and Sam were pretty believable - poor, honest, and happy folks (most of us would love to really be this happy - let's face it!) The introduction of Bryce (played by Scott Caan) really created an interesting balance of characters and how each reacted to the many dangers, twists, etc.Overall, the bikinis and the buff guys added to the adventure many of us would love to have in our generally boring lives.  Would I want to deal with Tiger Sharks?  No, but a little excitement would beat the heck out of my boring 9-5 job every day.
excellent movie. this is a great movie, acting may be a little light, but the action and story make up for it
Gripping and Intensive. Yes, it is a documentary and, yes, it is a monologue.  Yes, he discusses the sex trade in Cambodia which is extemely explicit.  But this is about Cambodia.  This is about the Killing Fields.  This is about our involvement  in that history. There is nothing gratuitous. Gray is captivating as he  sits on a darkened stage with his words and topics accented with strategic  lighting, maps, sounds and video clips.  You will leave this film with a  new understanding of what happened from Cambodia to Kent State.  He also  has a unique insight into mankind.  In this, his &quot;Talking Cure&quot;,  you will be compelled to try to answer the question that he wrestles with -  'Is morality a moving feast?'. This is an important film
To Gillian on her 37th Birthday. An easy to watch drama (with some comedy) that is sweet but thankfully not the "over the top sweet" these kinds of movies often become. It's a simple engaging story that is very easy to relate to since the movie tackled subjects like loneliness, moving on, and connections in an amusing and ultimately heartwarming way.Peter Gallagher stars as David who after 2 years of his wife's death Gillian (played by the gorgeous Michelle Pfeiffer) due to a boating accident still cannot seem to accept the fact that she's gone. In fact when no one is watching he still interacts with her dead wife like she was still alive. That causes a conflict with his daughter who was having a hard time dealing with her mom's death because her father doesn't seem to acknowledge that her wife is already dead. Kathy Baker played Gillian's sister who wants to take her daughter since she doesn't think that David was capable of raising his daughter.Peter Gallagher gave a great performance. He gets to butcher the song "You Make Me Feel Like Dancing", compete with a nine year old in building a sand castle contest, and he gets to play the heartbroken man who was so in love with his wife he doesn't want to let go. It was a great part for him. Claire Danes once again showed her sensitivity as an actress as she realistically portrayed the aches of her character. Michelle Pfeiffer in a semi cameo role was luminous, in the few scenes she was in she lights up the screen like a goddess.Towards the end of the movie, the supposedly rational Kathy Baker and Bruce Altman after giving lectures on practicality, responsibility etc. and how talking to your dead wife is silly, were both secretly jealous that they don't have that kind of passion for each other.It's those kinds of moment that elevate this film into just another romance movie.Grade: B
Informative. This was my first download and it was "free".  The download performed well.  "The Mystery of Edgar Allan Poe" was informative.  It ran up to 50 minutes. This was a Unbox Video Download. It started with the typical intro and ended with the credits. Some individuals did not get a complete download so i included my experience with the Unbox download.  i hope the review was helpful. ty
The Music Man. Robert Preston's version of The Music Man is the ONLY version - Matthew Broderick is NOT the Music Man!
a great film. This review is for the Criterion Collection DVD edition of the film.The Shop On Main Street, known as "Obchod na korze" in what used to be Czechoslovakia, is one of several films released internationally during the popuarity of Czechoslovakian movies in the US. It remains one of the most famous ones also.In the film, a young man takes over a shop run by a Jewish widow during the Nazi occupation. He helps take care of her and they become friends. He then faces a dilemma when the Nazis begin ddeporting the Jews.The film remain popular to this day and won an oscar for best foreign language film.The Criterion Collection edition only has the theatrical trailer as a special feature
Brilliant. I am eleven and me and my younger four year old sister both think that the lizzie mcguire movie is one of the best films we have seen.Towards the end of the film lizzie sings a song called "Hey now"and my sister since she was two has been singing along,it appeals to all ages even our mum likes it .It is a truly unforgetable film ,not to be missed .A true girly film about a teenage american girl called lizzie going on her first visit to rome with her school after being graduated from middle school.On a trip to the ice cream shop an italian popstar mistakes her for his singing partner,called Izabella.Won't tell you the rest but but her last few days in rome were every young girls dream
A great piece of eye candy. I really loved this film.  I'm a sucker for B-style sci-fi films and am a regular with SciFi Channel flicks like this.  Plus, James Spader rocks!  While the plot is thin at times, it's a great piece of sci-fi with some good special effects and a neat loner main character.  A definite watcher
Scary &amp; Funny In A Dark Way !. The acting performance by Jennifer Tilly was as bizarre and scary as it was funny (in a dark way). Her schizophrenic performance will stay in your mind long after the movie is over. It's not an &quot;A&quot; class movie but the acting is better than a &quot;B&quot; class movie. For the price of the DVD ($9.98 when I purchased it) I think it was worth it if only to see Jennifer Tilly in her most bizarre role yet
An inspirational view of a dark topic. This book was a refreshing antidote to modern day bias. During a time when ideology and mechanics take precedence over truth and objectivity, it is refreshing to read about slavery's impact on various levels of society; from clergy with political agendas to blacks who also profited. Few today would disagree that slavery is a terrible blot on American History, but Mrs. Stowe's book does a great job of portraying people as "people". Black or white, clergy or not, humanity has inherent weaknesses - and strengths - that are not confined to any one culture or society
don't look back - 1965. If you are a Dylan fan and don't own this, then run out and buy or order now. This is not to be missed.  Don't Look Back, shot by D.A. Pennebaker (who almost missed the chance to shoot the document, actually, when is partner, Leah was approached by Albert Grossman, Dylan's manager) to see if they would be intresed in touring with Dylan to shoot the documentary. Leah said, "Who's Bob Dylan"  When Pennebaker returned he was flabberasted, but thank god for all, the stubborn Grossman returned and the contract or deal was hashed out over a hotel napkin (true story).With a small budget, Don't Look Back is a lean, mean production of what the tour was really about, but it's not all sex, drugs, rock 'n roll. Hardly. In fact, it shows Dylan coming to terms with his own fame and how he negotiates this and how he negotiates his way through reporters, various interviewers (one famous scene with a 'science student' who Dylan toyed with in a game of cat and mouse, and who he asked, "Why should i want to know you? What could you ever do for me?" AT the time, maybe Dylan was right. As it would turn out, our young 'science student' went on to form Chrysalis Records, so that was a bit of a mistake - Dylan lacked some prescience here.Here we see Dylan as a thoughtful, philosophical young man - so many terrific scenes here, including a meeting wtih Donovan, who is a running theme and joke through the film (and a tidbit of imformation, it was Donavan, Baez and Dylan who wrote the cards you see in Subterranean Homesick Blues the night before in a hotel room - the better cards were done by Donovan because he was more 'artistically inclined' according to many reliable sources; regardless, the cards were done by all three...).Don't Look Back was the first "Rockumentary" in a real form that had ever been, and Pennebaker should be and has been applauded and rewarded for that. The opening scene is simply of Dylan holding his cards and the music of Subterranean Homesick Blues, what today we would call a music video - Pennebaker was the first to open a film in this style.DLB is broken down into sections essentially; we see Dylan in concert, Dylan in hotel rooms with frinds, notably Baez and Bob Neuwirth who was his constant side-kick (that would change by 66); scenes traveling, scenes in green rooms, and footage of fans and some of the towns. But that's it:TravelPerformanceHotel RoomsInterviewsGreen RoomsSome of the country (though not much).I don't want to give away too much. Perhaps one other compelling reason to buy this version is that it includes the book with all of the text and dialogue for every single shot of the film which is excellent for the true Dylanologist or writer or journalist.Buy it. Then buy Eat the Document, which is the folliwng year and note the diffrence a year makes.This book, if you like Dylan, is then positively for you.sadi ranson-polizzott
Friendship, Fishing, and Fatherly Bonds. Captains Courageous begins with Harvey (Freddie Bartholomew), a spoiled rich kid who uses bribes and cheats his way to getting what he wants. When his father (Melvyn Douglas) finds out what his son is up to, he plans a vacation together so that his son can learn how to be a decent human being and so the two can bond. However, Harvey falls off the boat on the way and is salvaged by a Portuguese fisherman named Manuel (Spencer Tracy) who brings him aboard his fishing boat and teaches his how to be a proper man.The film is filled with sentiment, wonderful acting, and good pacing. It never gets boring; there is always something happening even if the set (the fishing boat) is limited.The cast is wonderful. Outside of Bartholomew, Douglas, and Tracy, Lionel Barrymore and Mickey Rooney grace the cast list.The film is slightly dated. There are scenes between Bartholomew and Tracy that pull at one's heart-strings, but sometimes they come off as being too close and slightly creepy, especially in a modern world of child molesters. However, taking in the time period in which the film was made and the sincerity of the actors, these cultural differences can be overlooked
Apocalypse Revealed. Folks, The Apocalypse is a retelling of the book of Revelation as received by the Apostle John, produced by Italian Radio TV. It is a very Catholic movie, as most of the consultants were Catholic and at least one Orthodox and it shows. But it is not blatantly Catholic, so basically any Christian will enjoy watching the movie.You all know Richard Harris. His filmography is quite extensive and includes The Guns of Navarone (1961), The Bible (1966) titled The Bible... In the Beginning (in USA) & La Bibbia (in Italy), A Man Called Horse (1970), and two Harry Potter movies. The Apocalypse is his last movie and he delivers a powerful performance as John the Apostle. There's something about his raspy voice, which sounds old yet vital, imbued with authority and compassion that moves the viewer to listen carefully. All his actions seemed to very deliberate but not forced, very natural, without conceit. What an actor!Actors Vittoria Belvedere and Benjamin Sadler play "Irene" and "Valerius" respectively, in a supporting role. Theirs is the "mandatory love affair" that we often see in these kinds of movie, but I assure that this affair is not vulgar, nor does it eclipse the plot. Irene had met the Apostle John when she was younger and now she's sent by the Bishop of Ephesus to track the Apostle in order to ensure the authenticity of the Apocalypse. Valerius is a Roman officer whose parents were Christians, having been adopted by a Roman general. He infiltrates the Ephesian Church, his mission being to locate the Apostle John, but he has second thoughts and...well, watch the movie.The movie's strong points lie on its special effects. They carry the story well, without overwhelming it. John tells the story, and you see what he sees. Although the director-Rafaelle Mertes-threaded some current events into the movie to illustrate its prophetic aspects-including scenes from 9-11 to picture "war"-he does it without forcing the biblical text into modern fulfillments. What the director achieves is a correspondence of ideas. This is no "rapture" movie a la Left Behind..The Apocalypse is a part of the The Bible Collection produced by Italian Radio-Television. This is the kind of movie that we must support. I hope you watch i
BEST MOVIE OF THE 90'S. I SAW THIS MOVIE WHEN I WAS 16, AND I LOVED IT SINCE, BECAUSE IT REALLY DOES SCARE YOU AND THE FACT THAT IT DOESN'T INCLUDE NOTHING THAT CONSISTS SEXUAL SCENES LIKE OTHER MOVIES, IT IS REALLY CREEPY AND GIVES YOU THE CHILLS JUST TO THINK THAT MENTAL CLOWNS ARE IN YOUR HOUSE TRYING TO KILL YOU...I RECOMMEND THIS MOVIE, IT'S THE BEST....
Beware missing lobby cards. When Fox upgraded from Studio Classics to Cinema Classics brand, they upgraded the price too.  What you get are a larger booklet insert, four "lobby cards" and a slipcase.  This title, "Daddy Long Legs" and "Week-End in Havana are each missing 3 of the 4 lobby cards.  Twentieth Century Fox is aware of the problem, but offers no replacement for defective packages.Other than that, the film is great fun and it's wonderful these Grable classics are being released.
Better than it has every right to be. It's not a great movie, but it's a lot of fun.  This is one of those movies that just catches me.  It's quirky and has some decent (for it's day) effects.  There are a feww laugh out loud momments.  Truth be told they are few and far between.Some great bit characters make up a fun ensemble.  The cast is pretty damn cool, with Urich being upstaged by Ron Pearlman, Angellica Houston, John Mat.. Mattus... The big guy.  Anyway, it's cornball comedy with a basic plot.Hey what do you want?  It's 80's chessy goodness and more fun that it should have been.I still giggle at the time warp battle
The US government should be ashamed of lying to the world for more than 40 years. This movie describes the assassination of president J.F. Kennedy in Dallas, Nov 22 1963.The documentary includes several video footage, including the infamous Zapruder film, and pictures taken by several witnesses. The movement of one of the killers in the knoll (shown in one of the films) shocked me. It's also amazing how the CIA/FBI investigators tried to cover up the case for conspiracy. Also, the video that shows one of the policemen turning on the mic on his radio near the motor of his motorcycle for the purpose of jamming the communications was very revealing. One image can say more than 1000 words. Just by looking at the movie, you can tell beyond any reasonable doubt that the last shot, the one that took 1/3 of his brain, came from the front. The last commission concluded that there 7 shots and at least 3 gunmen planted at the site in different locations. A further analysis revealed at least 4 shooters involved in the assassination. It steel amazes me how this case was covered and the joke that was the Warren comission, I can only conclude that the conspiracy plot involved the highest spheres and institutions of this country
Fabulous show!. This was a great show.  I can't say anything better than the other reviewers, so I'll just say that this tape is a low-cost alternative to the DVDs that were released if you just want a little of the show for nostalgic purposes
Must be a Fellini Fan. You must be a true F. Fellini fan to enjoy this one. It is not as abstract as his other works, but a good documentary type movie through the eyes of one of Italy's greatest directors
Flawless!. Delightful!  Hilarious!How often do we get to see a perfect performance?  We're closing in on a century of movies and, as we can see, it's pretty rare.  So flawless was Judy Holliday's portrayal of Billie Dawn that, as a relative unknown, she came from behind to beat out two heavyweights for the Oscar in 1950.  I'm sure this was due in no small part to her refining the role for nearly three years on stage.Everything else fell into place as well.  Broderick Crawford was just excellent as Harry Brock.  Crawford is able to swing you back and forth between anger and sympathy for his character.  Not an easy task!  William Holden is perfectly calm and reserved as Paul Verrall.  His character forms a wonderful opposite to Billie.  And, with direction, George Cukor worked his usual magic.Most of the themes are timeless.  A person lives in ignorant bliss until their eyes are opened.  They realize that there is a better life for them and begin their struggle for improvement.  They discover that their greatest opponents to advancement are not those above them, but those at their current level.A few of the elements are dated.  Particularly Jim's speech about how hard it is to find a corrupt politician in Washington.  Wow.  Maybe that was the case in 1950.  Now it's impossible to find an honest one.It all comes back to Judy Holliday.  This movie is her vehicle.It is one of the most quoteable movies I've ever seen.  "Would ya do me a favor, Harry?  Drop.  Dead."  "You're just not couth!"  "I should take this pencil and draw a circle around YOU!"  "If there's a fire and I call the engines... who am I double-crossin?  THE FIRE??"She was a rare talent who we were only able to see for a very short time.  I love all of her movies and this one, Born Yesterday, is my favorite.Thank you Judy!!!!!!
"You Quacked At Your Teacher  ~  Ducks Fly Together!". 'The Mighty Ducks' released in '92 is probably the only film that can boast that its theatrical success launched a sports franchise. Fact or fiction, as a movie it found a large enough audience to convince Disney Studios to follow-up with two more installments of Mighty Duck Mania.Plot: Self-absorbed young lawyer, Gordon Bombay (Emilio Estevez) is sentenced to community service for a traffic violation. His assignment is to fill in as the interim hockey coach for a local group of underachieving kids. Coach Bombay, a former hocky star in the same league years earlier, has inherited the worst team in the league. Can he harness their rebellious attitudes and turn them into contenders? Maybe even make them good enough to challenge the perennial champions and his old coach?Formulamatic but lots of fun anyway. Estevez is surrounded by a strong cast with: Lane Smith as Coach Reilly, Heidi Kling as Casey Conway, Joshua Jackson as Charlie Conway and Marguette Moreau as Connie
Great. This is a very fun show and i enjoy watching it. i bought all the episodes available and they all worked great! its good to pay less to view
this is an excellent workout. it was my first firm workout, and has been my springboard and the one i come back to since i bought it in 1997. Tracie Long is such an excellent enthusiastic instructor, and she was so gracious to me as i was babbling that to her on the FitPrime website that i still cant help talking her up.  good luck to her and the Fitprime series as i read on this site sounds like another wonderful workout that i do intend to add to my collection at some point. the other Firm videos, The Tortoise and the Hare and All weights workouts are excellent
"When's the future?". Spike Lee has said, in hindsight, that he'd lost his abilities as a filmmaker between Do The Right Thing and Malcolm X.  If that's true, you won't be able to tell during Jungle Fever - at least not in a way you'd expect.  Jungle Fever is a lot of things - daring, empassioned, extreme, overarching, undeniably and intentionally "heavy" - but amateurish it is not.  Watching Jungle Fever now made me realize all the power Lee movies entail - which is, especially at this point in his career, a real voice.  Two scenes of extremes are rendered in equal precision - a group of African American women discussing the problems of keeping their men, contrasting with an equally long and empassioned scene of pugnacious racism between a group of Bensonhurst Italians.  In each scene the experience of its characters is given vividness by the authenticity of the dialogue, by the conviction of its cast.  And of the cast, let me add what a treasure of an ensemble it is: 15 years later, virtually every supporting role (some on screen for just minutes) has become a recognizable performer (it's a game in itself to count how many Oscar, Emmy, Tony, and Grammy wins/ nominations, not to mention plush Sopranos roles, these actors share).  In its leading roles, Wesley Snipes has a seething immediacy, John Turturro burns with conscience, and Samuel L. Jackson, in the most fearless performances of his career, unfolds so many gripping layers at once, the Cannes jury created a special acting prize to honor him.  All that helps make Jungle Fever provocative in the right ways - sparking conversations, as well as personal speculations, about the modern state of racism, of the way that we're never free of our own cultural expectations, and how they effect who and how we love.  The movie's first giant, nagging flaw is its attempt to handle too much - the plot that follows the path of crack addiction belongs to a (terrific) different movie.  Its second, and this is tougher, is that the notion of this "fever," of Flipper (Snipes) and Angie (Annabella Sciorra) being blinded by each others' race, is an unfulfilled idea in the movie - the characters, I'm afraid, work better as catalysts for thier environments than they do as lovers, as their affair is remote, and Sciorra, a gifted actress elsewhere, seems far too cold for fevers of any kind.  Yet even these flaws are the product of a force already at work on the film industry - the movie suffers only from an ambition to reach all aspects of the urban race experience, and succeeds as well as can be expected; you'll rarely recall a film who fails its goals this intriguingly
Two & a Half Rooms Worth Seeing. Only the last two skits are worth seeing.  The first one is nice because it has some nice *ahem* visuales but has a dumb plot.  This movie, or part of it, is worth seeing some time but not buying
Sophisticated Comedy. The combination of Grant and Kerr is wonderful on the screen. I loved the mix of British humor and civility. Adding the dash of American brashness in Robert Mitchum, one can enjoy watching the wheels fall off.  A very enjoyable movie
the postman. this was a very good movie. it had alot of action, a love story content and it had a bit of humor to it! i enjoyed it very much.
State and Main, , The Old Water Mill or Without Title. This gem of a movie was probably not a blockbuster when released. The storyline is thin and almost non-existent, it could be summed up as "Everyone gets the chance to screw up  a second time". Nevertheless, there are enough  twists and turns to make what story there is interesting.  This must be the sort of  movie that every good  actor and actress would love to have a role in  as the screenplay has been written by an accomplished playwright. It is a farcical melodrama rather than a comedy but nonetheless highly enjoyable.A film-making team, hard up on critical funds, has just been thrown out of a small town in New Hampshire. Their  movie's plot necessitates the choice of a small town New England locale and a water mill (one reason why they are short of funds is that they had to build an old water  mill replica in the New Hampshire town).  As the movie begins The Director and his crew find themselves in a small town in Vermont (actually most of the scenes are shot in Connecticut or Massachusetts). The  beauty of the location is well-captured by excellent photography.  The  makers of  "State and Main" did not fall into the trap of shooting the  film during the Fall. New England  fall colours would be a major distraction although  Alfred Hitchcock's black comedy "The Trouble With Harry" succeeded despite being shot in Vermont at the peak of the fall  leaf colour season, but then Hitchcock was an exceptional genius.The small town  has being going on in its leisurely way until the film crew arrive. The obvious star of  "State and Main"  is Philip Seymour Hoffman a previously little known Hollywood actor whose first appeared on the screen as  the spoilt rich Daddy supported George Willis Jr. In that memorable Al Pacino film, "Scent of a Woman". Hoffman's key role in "State and Main" is as the author and screen play writer for the movie within the movie.  The better known Hollywood star Alec Baldwin  plays the lesser role of the film-in making's male star. He is portrayed as a lustful male whose sexual preference is of under age nubile girls.The  Director is  played by William H. Macy, who is completely unflappable no matter what. The producer arrives after the crew has settled in. The role  is played by droopy-eyed  David Paymer, who is  completely obsessed with money and will bribe anyone to get things moving. The   male star lead is almost fatally distracted by a young teenager (Julia Stiles).  The female lead  and siren, Sarah Jessica Parker,  demands substantial extra money for  appearing naked  in  a scene claiming that she has found religion. Hoffman is smitten  in the heart  by an attractive  young woman  (Rebecca Pidgeon) in the town who is engaged or semi-engaged to the local bad man and town councillor.I will leave it to the reader's imagination to find out if the  film crew gets the  second chance to screw up again. The movie  is directed by David Mamet, a leading American playwright. Mamet wrote the screen plays for  "The Postman Always Rings Twice", "The Untouchables" , and had a minor role as a performer  in the  1986 thriller  "Black Widow". He has directed several movies aside from this one in the past 17 years.It is evident that Mamet , who also wrote the screen play for this  charming melodrama, was at a loss for a suitable  title for the film, just like the director in the play, who wanted to call his movie "The Old Mill", only to find out, upon arrival in the Vermont town, that the  much advertised "Old Mill" had burnt down in 1960. So Mamet settled on the uninspiring title "State and Main"" from the intersection  where the  town's brand new traffic lights  still stand at the start of the movie. Interestingly enough the title for the DVD version of "State and Main" circulating in Greece is translated as  "Without Title". I am fairly confident that this little known  102 minute movie will become a  movie buff's classic one day.
UNDERRATED LATE 80'S GEM ! Ya look'n fa goosebumps?Watch this flick!. John Hough's 'AMERICAN GOTHIC' is a brilliant little creep-fest & one of my childhood favorites. To me this is truly one of the most underrated horror films of all time. Between the excellent camera work/directing,a thick storyline & some above average to excellent acting(for the genre)to a couple of goulish kills & most importantly the incredibly creepy atmosphere! as a horror fan there isn't much not to like about this classic. Horror fans i found this dvd version for chump change & although it doesn't have anything more than a menu the actual picture quality & sound was pretty damn good. I highly recommend this to anyone who loves a good disturbing scare!
Wonderful,Dedicating Movie!!!!!. Although I'm labeled "horror buff", I just had to write a review of this film depicting the life of famed Dr. Dian Fossey. Heads up to Warner Brothers for giving us a glimpse into the world of a woman who ultimately gave her life to save and protect the few mountain gorillas remaining in Africa. Dian devoted 18 years of her life to researching and understanding these wonderful primates. This film shows Dian's vunerable side along with her determined side to do what ever it took to save the gorillas who are supposed to be protected by the parks. Sigourney Weaver shines in her role and was the perfect choice for this movie. She approached it with reckless abandon. Although Dian lost her life trying to save the remaining gorillas, we get to see how one person was responsible for doing so much for the gorillas. With heartwarming scenes with her and her beloved Digit, to heartbreaking scenes like when she had to turn over Pucker, the infant gorilla she nursed back to health, to a zoo and the horrible death of Digit, this movie captivates you from beginning to end. For anyone who is interested in the few remaining mountain gorillas, this movie will really open your eyes and make you route for Dian. Although with a tragic ending with Dian's death and burial next to Digit, it's a true love story not only between her and Bob Campbell, but between her and the gorillas she loved so much. I wish I could give this movie more than 5 stars!!  Definetly a movie to own and to cherish... for her memory will never be forgotten as her work carries on thru The Dian Fossey Gorilla Fund International to this day
A Surprisingly Very Good Remake: American Style!. I have seen, "La Femme Nikita," and it is a very good film. However, "Point Of No Return," is also a very good film. More importantly, it holds its own very well. One of the main characters is (Bridget Fonda) as the assassin working for a spy agency that you are never really sure about. Are they working in the best interests of the country? Or are they somewhere on the fringe working as a rogue agency within the CIA? Their loyalties are never really delved into. However, one thing is for sure; they are in the business of assassination. And it is the way the agency recruits their assassins that make this an interesting film. [no spoilers]Enter the main protagonist portrayed by (Bridget Fonda). Fonda has found herself in a very difficult situation [no spoilers]. Moreover, it concerns a matter of life or death. Therefore, she feels compelled to work for this agency: even though she continously wants out of it. (Gabriel Byrne) portrays the agent in charge of her assassinations. He is an unsympathetic character, and you get the feeling that he himself was pulled into the agency in much the same way as Fonda. However, my favorite character is played by (Harvey Keitel), known simply as 'the cleaner'. He is an agent who cleans up the mistakes that members of the agency create. There are some really shocking scenes with him. I highly recommend the film. Don't compare it with the other, they are different, and both deserving of praise. Recommended
Another good CSI:NY. Though CSI:NY is most least favorite of the three CSIs, they still manage to make a good one sometimes.  This is one of those good ones
"Can a still, mute image catch that forever?". Stephen Poliakoff's made-for-British television film "Shooting the Past" focuses on the fate of a remarkable photograph collection housed in a sprawling country mansion. The 10,000,000 photographs--known as the Fallon Photograph Collection--are stored in various rooms. To the collection's 5 caretakers--led by the elegant Marilyn Truman (Lindsay Duncan)--the care of the photographs is more than just a job--it's a labour of love. When the film begins, the staff members of the Fallon Museum are preparing to greet the photograph collection's new owner.Enter brash American millionaire Christopher Cunningham (Liam Anderson) and his whiz kid assistant. Cunningham dismisses the museum staff's attempts at a welcome, and abruptly announces that he plans to convert the museum into a business school. The photographs are to be sold, and all the museum employees will lose their jobs. The staff members profess shock and outrage, but Cunningham insists that he exchanged faxes with the museum explaining his plans.While Margaret Truman begs to save the collection and attempts to prove its worth to Cunningham, her assistant, the peculiar, eccentric and crafty Oswald Bates (Timothy Spall) wants to fight back using guerilla tactics. And just how the drama plays out in this splendidly acted and entertaining three-hour long film will please most fans of British television.Writer/director Poliakoff's message--the power and the importance of the past--isn't particularly subtle, but it is satisfying. In "Shooting the Past" the issue isn't just that an irreplaceable collection is about to be thoughtlessly tossed aside, the larger issue is the new vs. the old. The fact that the destroyer of civilisation is an American, and the saviours (or caretakers in this case) are British is a bit of a cliche. But there's more than this below the surface. The caretakers of the Fallon Collection reside in an outmoded world stuffed to the brim with an unwieldy number of photographs, and they'll do whatever it takes to preserve the collection and keep it intact--even at the cost of promised new employment. Would Cunningham's efficient assistant--who has his cell phone glued to his ear while he types away frantically on a laptop--exhibit such loyalty and self-sacrifice for his employer's business school? I doubt it.But it's the glory of photography that holds centre stage here--the photographs that capture a priceless moment and hold keys to the secrets of the past. While the film's ending seems a little far-fetched, it's still solidly entertaining. If you enjoy "Shooting the Past" then there's an excellent chance you'll enjoy another Poliakoff made-for-television film, "Almost Strangers"--displacedhuma
Orwell was a futurist. I loved the book in an oddly fascinating way, and the same with the film. Although the film is not a blow by blow account from the book, it serves to relay the darkness of the hour for humankind.It is one film that I watch at least annually. Orwells' vision of a future where public opinion and even personal thoughts are virtually controlled by "big brother" is at our doorstep. (Think in terms of the controlled media and political correctness, and the Patriot Act.)History is being rewritten as we speak. Orwell may have had insider information on the future that we are all rapidly seeing come into fuition. He was a member of several secret societies in London, notably the Fabian society, whose members advocate a socialist "big brother" control of the populace.The acting in the film is first rate, while the scenery conveys the hopelessness of the situation. It is a must see
Really good truckin movie. Maximum Overdrive is not the greatest horror film to the average movie critic. But if u r like me u will enjoy this. I love it because i am into truck driving for a reason i dont really know,but i am and so i liked the trucking side to this film. so if ur like me and like trucking then u will love this movie but if u are just looking for a good scare from a horror flick this may not be ur best chioce. In my opinion next to Smokey and the bandit it is the best trucking movie ever
MASTER & COMMANDER Of The Silent Era. Having recently seen and thoroughly enjoyed MASTER & COMMANDER: THE FAR SIDE OF THE WORLD with Russell Crowe and its incredible depiction of life aboard an early 19th century frigate, I felt compelled to trot out this silent classic from my VHS collection (it's not available on DVD) and revisit this 1926 view of shipboard life. I hadn't seen the film in quite some time and was surprised to note that several scenes in OLD IRONSIDES are quite similar to scenes in MASTER & COMMANDER. Surely director Peter Weir must have screened this film before making his. The battle sequences are very similar with sand being spread on deck to absorb blood, the crew hitting the deck to avoid a volley, young boys dying during the fighting, and fierce close up hand to hand combat. Both movies are set during the same time period but the storylines are very different with the USS Constitution (Old Ironsides) versus the Barbary Pirates being the setting here and in the classic Hollywood tradition there is a woman involved. Charles Farrell who was a big romantic lead in the 20's especially when paired with Janet Gaynor, shows here why he was so popular. He is vulnerable but heroic, reserved but not stoic and he possesses an effortless charm that makes him appealing. Although playing the standard damsel in distress role, Esther Ralston makes an engaging heroine who is not a total wimp when the going gets tough. Character actors Wallace Beery and George Bancroft have a field day as feuding sailors while George Godfrey is featured in a more significant role than black actors of the time were usually given. Add to that some brief nudity and a discreetly sexy performance from Ralston (she was once known as The American Venus) and you have a real winner on your hands. The film is well directed by James Cruze (THE COVERED WAGON, THE GREAT GABBO) who is all but forgotten today due to most of his films being lost. Hopefully Paramount will soon release this on DVD along with the others in their silent film series of a few years ago including WINGS. Until then this VHS version which features a beautiful print and a digitally recorded organ score by Gaylord Carter at an excellent price is certainly worth having
FINNALY, AFTER 15 YEARS, I HAVE FOUND IT, WEEEEEEEEEEEEE!!!!. I LOVE THIS MOVIE, I GREW UP WITH THE CHUCK JONES' KIPLING SERIES AND I LOVE IT BETTER THAN DISNY WHICH WAS JUST TOO LONG, HIS WERE SHORT AND LEFT ME WANTING MORE. WHEN I WAS LIKE 5 I SAW RIKI-TIKI-TAVI FOR THE FIRST TIME AT MY AUNT'S HOUE, AND EVEN THOUGH I AM DEATHLY TERRIFIED OF SNAKES, I LOVED THIS MOVIE. MY PARENTS SPENT LIKE $50 RENTING THIS MOVIE FROM BLOCKBUSTER THEN FINNALY IT CAME ON NICKALODEAN AND WE RECORDED IT. AFTER TIME, IT WORE OUT, AND WE COULDNT WATCH IT. WHEN I WAS IN 7TH GRADE MY TEACHER MENTIONED THAT WE WERE STUDYING KIPLING AND I GOT EXCITED WHEN SHE TOLD US THAT WE WERE TO WATCH RIKI-TIKI-TAVI. THAT WAS 7 YEARS AGO, AND NOW I'M 20. .... TO THIS DAY I CAN RECITE THAT MOVIE FROM MEMORY, (WHICH CMES IN HANDY WITH MY THEATER CLASS) THE CHARACTERS ARE MEMORABLE AND FANTASTIC AND NAG AND NAGAINA ARE STILL AS CREEPY AS EVER! I RECOMEND THAT CHILDREN NEED TO SEE THESE WORKS OF ART (THE WHITE SEAL, MOWGLII'S BROTHERS)
Offbeat '80s movie that still has charm. Vibes only lasted a few weeks at the box office before Critics tore it to shreds. No one at the time thought a movie starring singer Cindy Lauper could be any good. Despite what the critics thought, Cindy held her own.Jeff Goldblum and Cindy, as well as every other actor really make this film enjoyable to watch, despite its age.Jeff and Cindy are psychics hired by a charming as ever Peter Faulk to use their abilities to find a lost Inca City before another group of baddies do. The City however is not exactly what everyone thinks it is.I dont know why its not on dvd but it should be. Yes, its campy and very '80s but the actors make it believable and actually a joy to watch. A definite lazy Sunday afternoon movie
"Brandy!  Throw more brandy!". This movie is great if you want to spend your time being entertained, not dissecting the problems of the world, trying to follow multiple plot twists, or recoiling in fear whenever someone enters an empty house.  Made at a time when being funny required neither bad language nor scatological "humor," the only drawback to this film is the annoying character played by Natalie Wood (who was absolutely luminous in West Side Story).Jack Lemmon, Tony Curtis, and Peter Falk are great by themselves and a riot when together.  Jack Lemmon is a stand-out in his dual role, and the pie fight scene is spectacular.Alhough the timing of the film drags a bit here and there, this is the advantage of DVDS - one click and you can skip that scene. Otherwise highly recommended for simple fun
Amazing, Hilarious, Troubling, & Frightening. Some of the other reviews have said that the film is not editted properly and 'too slow'. I'm not a film-maker and cannot comment on that other than to say that they are wrong. The film is amazing. I'm not sure if there is ANY other movie or documentary that shows what a serialkiller-cum-dictator-cum-statesman is like. Nowadays people might not know who Idi Amin is, or what he did, so its important to read up a little so you can truely appreciate this movie. He plays accordian? You see him meeting with his 'advisors' (some of whom disappear so after.) You see him play acting like a grown-up boy with toy soldiers. You see his self-appointed royal pedigree and send his support for Nixon! Its fascinating and amazing. This is man that, self-proclaimed, actually ATE some of his rivals (not the whole body I hope). He killed many people directly and by his policies. His ego is outstanding and its an amazing movie. Apparently, there is a new movies coming out about Idi Amin starring Forrest Whitaker. He's a good actor and so I look forward to seeing it. But this is the REAL guy. Its amazing and a feat probably never to happen again
Excellent Family movie ~ Great gift idea !. I love this movie.  It is a must see and a must have for any family movie collection.  Love it so much ~ ordered extra's for Christmas gifts, and all my family now loves it, too.  Teaches great lessons in life for children, as well as adults.  Riveting performances by all actors, and it just really touches your heart.  When the movie ends.. you are left with a feeling of what love is all about, and a gentle smile will be on your face.  A++
Nostalgic :). When an individual buys a movie, it is in order to watch it several times (unless one is a reseller).  So, to buy a comedy to think that one will laugh at the same jokes a hundered times is foolish.The movie is enjoyable due to its excellent cast and quirky humor.  There is nothing overbearing about the movie, which is a nice departure from the majority of movies out there.  Two cast members are now gone.  The plot is simple.  The quirks are clever.  Enjoy every now and again when you miss the 1980s, its actors, and the style of thought you had when you were a kid.****
Propaganda, but very well done. Dziga Vertov's film is an amazing and quite daring foray into the realm of experimental cinema (I say this with some reservations -- see below).  The viewer is quite literally transported to the Soviet Union of the past.  We witness love and loss, happiness and sadness, life and death.  We witness the beginning of a day and the end of a day, a wedding and a divorce, a birth and a funeral.  All the scenes are real -- the birth is a real birth, the funeral a real funeral, the divorce a real divorce.  Nationalistic and cultural boundaries begin to fade since the events depicted say more about human nature than they do about a particular people.The music is quite inventive and amazing, especially when one considers that only three young men are performing it.  The editing is some of the most astonishing ever to come out of Soviet silent cinema.That said, there is a somewhat irritating political message that comes forth -- that industrialization will solve the problems of humanity, that those who follow the Party line are the ones depicted as being sober and responsible.  So many people are shocked by Nazi propaganda films such as "Triumph of the Will," -- I find it sad that more people are not troubled by Soviet era films which tout the beauty of Marxist-Leninism while ignoring the carnage and sometimes outright genocide (i.e. the Ukranians)carried out by the Soviets for over seventy years.  The fact of the matter is that Soviet Marxist-Leninism slaughtered millions of people and enslaved millions of others.  This is a troubling hunk of history that is difficult to ignore when watching this otherwise masterful work of filmmaking
Epic Korean Drama. Koreans honor their greatest military hero in this epic drama which takes place in the late 1500s. The career and tactics of this Admiral are still studied at the U.S. Naval Academy, and doubtless those of other nations. The screenplay is based on a couple of novels, so there is some fiction, but the life of Yi Soon Shin was well documented, so there's plenty of fact supporting the story.If you are not familiar with Korean Drama, it's good to keep in mind that  this is not a Hollywood product, but they do very well with special effects and such considering the non-Hollywood budgets involved, and it's easy to see past all that and enjoy the tale being told.It's a long series, but presents an epic with power, depth and dimension and well worth watching it unfold through each and every episode.It would be great also to see KBS make other dramas available for viewing through Amazon, such as "Seoul 1945".
Rob Reiner's Best. "The Princess Bride" is 1 hour and 38 minutes of excellent entertainment.  It is based on the book of the same name, which is worth checking out as well.  The witty dialog and charm of the movie is no accident ... it comes straight from the book.The movie is set in medieval times ... in a fictitious kingdom called Floren ... and it is a story of true love.  The heroine and hero (Buttercup and Westley) express and affirm their love for each other ... but are then separated ... and the movie is the story of their efforts to re-unite.  A subplot involves a Spanish sword fighter's 20 year quest to avenge his father's murder.  And these two story lines are rounded out by an affable giant's effort to be helpful ... in both situations."The Princess Bride" begins and ends (and is interspersed) with a modern-day scene: a wise and loving grandfather reading the original book to his smart aleck grandson, who is sick in bed.  This ... plot device works wonderfully, as it draws us in and makes the story, which is already pretty good, even more personal and lovable.There is not a dull scene in the entire picture, and there are many superb performances.  Whenever you can say that ... Peter Falk's performance ranks lowest among those of the principle actors and actresses ... you know that the quality of the acting is pretty high.  And such is the case here.The best job is turned in by Cary Elwes, who plays Westley.  He is very charming and likable, and he handles some pretty complicated scenes (and lines) with ease ... or so it seems.  Robin Wright, as Princess Buttercup, is also excellent.  Her natural beauty and innocence make her character a woman who, without a doubt, a man would risk his life to rescue.  Mandy Patinkin plays the Spanish sword fighter Indigo, and he makes him into an endearing and good-hearted character ... even though he's a character who kills people with his sword.  The giant is played by the good-hearted Andre the Giant ... a role straight out of the book ... and a role that Andre seemingly was born to play.  Andre is kind-of hard to understand at times in the film (English was his second language in real life) but his good nature comes through loud and clear.  Fred Savage plays the sick grandson, and he absolutely nails the part.  Chris Sarandon plays the bad guy Prince Humperdinck.  It must be a thankless job to play the heavy, but here he is none-the-less effective ... and it is easy for us to loathe his character.But "The Princess Bride" ... Rob Reiner's best movie, I think ... is the story of the triumph of love over adversity.  There is plenty of action, and plenty of suspense and drama, but it is this theme of love that gives the movie its life.
Should We Mess With Movies?. Ever since the "colorizing" debate of a generation ago, this question has been asked over and over again.And we've finally settled it, I hope.  This DVD gives the viewer options of seeing it in the way it was originally released OR with the ending created by its maker.Like everybody else, I'd only seen the "chopped" version, labelled by some here as "surreal."  Well, there were plenty of other "surreal" elements throughout the original, most epsecially the surreal premise that Ralph Meeker was an actor.However, I would urge even the purists among you to take a very, very close look at the "intended" ending.  It adds so much to what came before, and helps us understand the childlike attitudes we had towards this weaponry we'd just been the first to use in the name of world peace.  This new era was far from innicent, but we were like children with the power we had.A great film, now made even better for history
Undefeated. A Good movie;A John Wayne movie with a very nice cast, the usual Harry Carye Jr.Ben Johnson,John Agar,Paul Fix and many other great people. Especially from the time it is great to see Merlin Olsen and Roman Gabriel from the Football movie actor Era. The added plus is we have Rock Hudson in the movie.Not to forget the movies leading ladies Lee Meriweather,Marian McCargo.The women are very nice looking  and they would be if they were in Rock Hudson's family. The time era of the film is after the American Civil War. John Wayne is your Northerner and Rock is from the South. The deep South. John Wayne is with his loyal men who are finanical ruined after the war and need to take home money to their families when they return.They band together to run a herd legally.The Rock is a family man who has lost everything even his country. The Southerns are lured to Mexico with false promises and high hopes. The Northerners are going to do business with Mexico also.John Wayne and the men end up helping the Southerns. Enemies but John Wayne and his men have honor and help the Southerners.Most importantly fellow Americans. The Civil War tore us apart and threw us together. There are great elements in the movie action,love,honor in people,human weaknesses,saddness,and some historical correctness. The movie is not anyone's best movie but it is not the worse either. Good entertainment with a good mix of plot and history. John Wayne and the Rock's only movie together. The movie shows everyone in such great shape and takes you back to great movie times.Watch and Enjoy
Comment on movie: "Empire of the Sun". (I think we already did this...)This is a classic historically-based movie.  Educational in that I (and probably many others)did'nt know about the English colony in a special status in China prior to Pearl Harbor.The cars were beautiful, I mistakenly thought the Packard was a Rolls!  Beautiful antigueaircraft, scale-model fighters, good flying scenes.  Theme music (Welch hymn I think)helped so much too.The horrors of war are clearly shown, but without a deliberate "anti-war" theme thatcan detract from good drama.   All told,  a  must-have DVD. / Richard and Arlene Norman(born in 1932; both of us observed WWII in real time via newsreels,  Life Magazineradio (Lowell Thomas) and the narratives of the combatants we knew.)
Treasurehouse. A haunting film, superbly directed, edited and acted, a source for cinema techniques we take for granted today, in short everything that the remake was not.  For the film enthusiast an absolutely 'must have.'  For those to whom movies are simply entertainments, probably something of a disappointment, open ended as it is and subject to questions to which there is no definite answer
one of the best asian family film i have seen. Flawless and Beautifully Rieveting"The Joy Luck Club" has to be the best movie I have ever seen, and probably will be the only one of it's kind. The story is beautiful and timeless and I encourage everyone to see it. It makes you think of the relationships of your family and how, even though this is a movie, it can impact you beyond belief. It will rock you to the core of your being and I am living proof
harold squared. The insatiable Bud Cort steals the show, but is only rivaled by the complex and theoretical plot.  One can spend a few hours contemplating the exact allegorical comparisons between birds and humans, and still feel perplexed, yet satisfied.  Do watch the film, which forces the audience to &quot;...think outside the box&quot
Beethoven First As A Man, Later As A Legend. Daunting task it must have been to portray Ludwig van Beethoven, probably humanity's most talented individual from any field of endeavor, but Gary Oldman rose nicely to the challenge, and in Immortal Beloved we have a tale that humanizes the supposedly marble-featured Maestro, although whether that's for better or for worse is up to the viewer to decide. Concentrating on those incidents and years in Beethoven's life that seldom receive much discussion, this motion picture pursues the answer to the mystery of the identity of the woman dubbed by Beethoven in a single surviving letter as his "Immortal Beloved." Was it a countess, with whom Beethoven seemed to enjoy the most relative contentment in his stormy life? Was it one of the many admirers of his passionate music? Or was it some other woman, perhaps one pre-dating his fame, long since lost to renown and history? It's all only conjecture, of course, we'll never truly know, but in making this film about a quest for enlightenment carried out by a longtime friend after Beethoven's death, we see not only an unusual biography of a great man, but we are reminded that even one of the most legendary figures in all of history was once a young man who lived out many of the same experiences, fears, sadnesses, and hopes, that would be familiar to any of us. We see Beethoven transcend the brutality of his youth and the crushing blow of his increasing deafness to become the man who inspired the image of Beethoven the stern-visaged icon most think of him as being. And yet even his brilliance was no defense against the pain of lost love. Throughout Immortal Beloved Beethoven's wondrous music, perhaps greatest ever written, flies with free range. If Immortal Beloved falls short of a masterpiece, then it deserves at the very least recognition for its daring
Ellen Degeneres makes this movie!. I'm so happy to see Ellen in a movie. All in all, the movie is full of romance and laughter. The all around cast is great to watch
Outstanding!. Blending music with ski/snowboard video and travel this is a must see. If you dont want to go to a mountain afterwards then you have no soul. My only complaint is that it is already geared towards people that already love to ski/snowboard. I would have liked more descriptions of the terrain and better shots showing just how steep some of those cliffs are. For people that have never skied this movie will be slow going at first but patient - it gets better. Again my only complaint is that it assumes people watching already know what powder and big mountains feel like. A little extra effort could have been made to portray that to the new skier.
[billionaire] Oprah Winfrey's favorite money guru - 'nuff said!. i've given MANY of these away because...i have lived the life of an artist [translated: not made much money, worked REALLY hard!]... and if i had only known these principles of how to allocate my money for the last 30 of my 54 years, i'd be Just Fine...Number 1, of course, it'd have been smarter never to smoke [saving at LEAST $30,000 over time in real dollars, not to mention interest compounding] or other unnecessary stupid purchases...Perhaps the most important and fascinating thing about the book is that you understand why you spend money or don't... and it just naturally follows that it is easy to stop buying things [to cheer you up, keep you company, whatever - better to fix your LIFE and not try to buy things instead because it'll never really be a satisfactory experience]...And this helps clarify what your values really are...Suze busts the notion/excuse that "I don't have the money" and shows us all the truth that how we are spending the money we DO have tells it all about what our values are...are we saving, do we buy clothes or CDS or trips or too much food?very interesting and - surprisingly - it is COMFORTING to read this book...no one should be able to graduate from high school or get their GED without passing a proficiency test on the principles taught in this book...given the angst we all put ourselves through on (1) love and (2) money, doesn't it make sense to educate ourselves and do these things better...i also love The Courage To Be Rich - and the Laws of Money...if you are [currently] poor, buy these used through the z shops ---and soon, you'll be able to afford amazon's [discounted] full price with super saver shipping on all future purchases!!!thanks suze orman -
Life Changing Experience!. The 1991 series of Dark Shadows that aired on NBC was a saving grace for me!  As a 7 year old girl I stayed up late every Friday night and got lost in the world of Barnabas and Angelique and Josette.  My mother grew up on  the original show and I've seen many episodes of that as well, but in my  opinion it doesn't hold a candle to the revival series.  The actors in the  1991 series show such passion and soul in everything they do!  Definitely  see this series!  Believe me, it's worth it!  I own every episode on video
Passport to laughter. This blissful flim is set im Miramont Place, Pimlico (a district of South London).  When an unexploded bomb left over from WW2 goes off, local shopkeeper Stanley Holloway discovers an ancient trasure hoard, including a mysterious document.  An eccentric university professor (Margaret Rutherford) translates the document, and it proves that Miramont Place was the site of a palace given to the exiled Duke of Burgundy by King Edward IV, making the inhabitants of Miramont Place natives of Burgundy rather than Britain.  The locals go wild, tearing up their ration books and keeping the local pub open all night, they have a great time until the government turns nasty and starts cracking down on them. Enter a dishy Frenchman who turns out to be the present Duke, come to claim his inheritance and save his subjects from the iron hand of beurocracy.  Under seige, the defiant Burgundians take to stopping subway trains and making the passengers go through customs, the government retaliates by turning off their water supply, who will win in the battle of wits?  If you are a fan of eccentric British comedy, this film is a classic in the genre
"Unforgetable". Actually this film really deserves 10+ stars! I first saw this movie on pay per view somewhere in the later part of the 90's and you know how there are really only a few titles to great flicks that you can actually remember? Put it this way, 9 years later I still never forgot "My Family" The cast is wonderful & the acting couldn't be better. It reaches into the soul of the heart and is one heck of a film that you'll never forget..
Fort Apache -- It exceeds "The Searchers". This is the gem of the Wayne/Ford Calvary trilogy, and I am delighted it's finally coming to DVD.But a question: Can anyone heal me of the following misjudgment?Try as I may, I cannot shake off my estimation of Fort Apache as a more complete and substantially higher overall cinematic accomplishment in comparison with The Searchers.Partly it may consist in the fact that The Searchers is a great movie to watch -- and watch again -- but Fort Apache somehow succeeds as a more nearly perfect, complete and wholly rounded experience. The Searchers shines due to its externals, but Apache proceeds and then later culminates in a richer, deeper and more satisfying way, and the whole movie experience resonates with you in a way that The Searchers does not quite achieve
BLUE GENE. Gene Hackman's electrifying performance dominates this adaptation of John Grisham's best selling novel.  Hackman portrays Sam Cayhall, a man who's been on death row for sixteen years for the bombing of a lawyer's office that resulted in the death of the lawyer's two children.  Cayhall is a vile man, who has lived a life of hatred and prejudice, the result of generations of such bigoted ancestors.  Enter Chris O'Donnell as his young grandson, who is a lawyer and wants to reopen the case and spare his grandfather the gas chamber.  What ensues is a painful exploration of hatred, prejudice and a dysfunctional family.I liked the movie, in spite of its several flaws.  Hackman is phenomenal, and Chris O'Donnell does a good job as the naively innocent, but determined, young barrister.  Faye Dunaway offers wonderful support as Hackman's estranged daughter who has lived a life of secrecy and guilt.  Lela Rochon, Raymond Barry, David Marshall Grant and Robert Prosky offer fine support too.I found myself involved in the movie, and feel it didn't offer any easy answers.  Hackman is a guilty man, but his performance is so well doone that one can't help but feel sorry for the life he has chosen, and the life he has sacrificed.I think it's well worth viewing
Excellent! Simply Excellent. This episode embodies why I love this series. The bad guy is bad - and makes appearances throughout the series.And now, this episode offers some more understanding of the Wraith species and actually BEGS you to learn more of what initially seemed to be a barbaric bunch to kill at all costs.Now you really don't know what to think...except that today is a day of honor.I won't blow it for you. Watch this one FIRST if you're not sure about which episode to sample...and savor what makes this series a landmark in sci-fi adventures.
Truffaut's "mad" composition. This film is based on the life of Adele Hugo, from her diary, part of which was discovered in a historical Library(Pierpont Morgan Library in New York City). Inspired and based on the book, "Le Jounal d'Adele Hugo," and a biography Truffaut read  by Frances Vernor Guille.I anticipated seeing a kind and gentle French film when first sitting down to view this--instead this beautiful creature appears on the screen (Adjani), and begins to bare her soul with the intensity of a fire breathing Dragon(as Truffaut said, her story is the autopsy of a passion). As the only surviving daughter of Victor Hugo(the famous author), Adele was sharing his exile in the Channel Islands during the reign of Louis Napoleon when she met the English Lieutenant Pinson, with whom she had a brief affair. When Pinson was transferred to Nova Scotia, she followed him. The film begins with her arrival in Halifax in 1863.With that said, I think this film becomes a deep psychological drama. As this apparently rational, well educated, perceptive character, indulges herself with irrational behavior, in an attempt to obtain love from someone who does not want it; clearly it is her feelings towards him that matter to her, not him. This is a story of a women who is destroyed by a man who is indifferent to her. Yet throughout the film you don't condemn or pity her, she remains a heroine. As a representation of a kind of archetype, Adele's fixation transcends amorous feeling. The male version of this, which has been dealt with in a number of films (womanizer types), focuses on physical conquest, what could be had or taken. The female emphasis or version of this is on romanticised attainnment or loss. Truffaut has found a perfect metaphor in Adele for this neurosis, and unlike other films which carry this theme made later, such as "Fatal Attraction," he is not inclined to put this character in a strait-jacket or have her blown away. No moral judgement is made.The stylized direction from Truffaut and cinematography shot by Nestor Almendros give this film a poetic quality. Dark on dark, with the sky rarely visible, and the characters clearly focused, the emphazises is on emotion.Isabelle Adjani performance in this film, as noted by many, is first rate. A veteren actress by this time, having first appeared on the screen at age 14, she seems to intuitively know and understand the part of Adele. Truffaut should get the credit here for staying true to the story, and bringing her performance to light, while at the same time keeping the theme intact throughout. Truffaut stated, "The story of Adele H, which might be compared to a musical composition for a solo instrument, requires no preliminary explanations. Suffice it to say since I am obviously incapable of making films "against," I keep on filming "for."Trivia:-Isabelle Adjani was only 19 when this film was made, much younger than the women she played.-There are photographs seen in this film of Victor Hugo's actual funeral procession. When he died at age 83 he was buried like a divinity, with a procession of over 2 million mourners.-Daughter Adele(Victor Hugo's wife Adele died in 1868) was not among them, she spent the last 40 odd years of her life in a asylum, writing in her journal in code. Pauline Kael wrote, "Victor Hugo is said to have had no equal as a poseur and a mythmaker, but, on Truffaut's evidence, his daughter, who lived to eighty-five(1830-1915), burning with faith to the end, may have surpassed him."
Wonderful Movie!!!. This movie is one of my personal favorites. It shows how European immigrants in the early 20th century voluntarily became a part of our country/culture, and how they appreciated being here. As I had European grandparents and witnessed all the family interacting (with 11 aunts/uncles who were born in this country), the story is very true to real life.  I warmly recommend this movie to anyone who wants to see how the immigrants had a strong desire to become a part of the U.S. society.
WONDERFUL!!!. This is probably Jackie Chan's best movie.  It has it all; action, comic relief, and a great story line.  Highly recommended to all fans of Jackie
Wonderful love story. I thoroughly enjoyed Fire.  I found it to be a lovely story of love and desire.  Both actresses did a fine job in their roles.  You will like this story and the ending is better than I thought it was going to be.
TO THINE OWN SELF BE TRUE... This is the film adaptation of a best selling novel of the same name by Lauren Weisberg. My daughter, who loved the book, was home visiting and suggested that we rent the film. We did so and really enjoyed it. The film is a tightly scripted, well-directed one with excellent performances.The story turns around an aspiring journalist, Andrea Sachs (Anne Hathaway) who lives with her hunky boyfriend, Nate (Adrien Grenier), an aspiring chef. Having just graduated from college, Andrea is looking for a job and improbably gets one working for a top notch fashion magazine. Her job is to be second assistant to the Editor-in Chief herself, Miranda Priestly (Meryl Streep), a veritable dragon lady before whom everyone kowtows. It is a job for which many would give their eyeteeth to have. Andrea, however, sees it just as a way station stop to becoming a legitimate journalist, as she is not at all interested in fashion, as evidence by the way she dresses.  Meanwhile, for Emily (Emily Blunt), the catty and acerbic newly promoted first assistant that lives in fear of Miranda Priestly, her job is her life.Thrust into the fashion maelstrom and thought of  as a size six fatty by all the size zeros with which she works, Andrea begins to change as the perks that go along with working for such a powerhouse fashion rag become apparent. The magazine's stylist (Stanley Tucci) ultimately helps Andrea pull together a look that serves to quell all criticism about her fashion sense.   This affects the way she dresses and, ultimately, the way she acts, as she starts emulating, to some degree, the dragon lady herself.  Moreover, the suave, sexy, and sophisticated Christian (Simon Baker), who is a serious and successful writer, sweeps Andrea off her feet.  As her relationships with her boyfriend and friends start to head south due to Andrea's absorption with her career, Andrea gets a wake-up call. The only question is whether she will answer it.Ms. Hathaway give a coltish and engaging performance as our erstwhile journalist, and Adrien Grenier is appealing as her heart stoppingly hunky, personal chef. Christian Baker is dead sexy as the serious writer who has designs on Andrea. Stanley Tucci gives a strong performance as the stylist who helps Andrea overcome her fashion faux pas. Emily Blunt is terrific as the harried first assistant.  The standout, however, is Meryl Streep. Her coolly understated, low key performance as the ruthless and powerful Miranda Priestly gives conviction to the adage that less is more.  Her very whisper commands attention, as her performance is that powerful and should not be missed by anyone who enjoys top notch acting.   The film leaves little doubt as to why Meryl Streep merited an Oscar nomination for Best Actress
Absolutely wonderful. especially for the hopeless romantics.  James Caviezel shines as a man obsessed for revenege.  The character arch of Danets youthful and unspoiled trust in people and friends to an elighted and educated man with a thirst revenge alone is a joy to watch.  No, it's not exactly like Dumas' classic novel, but it succeeds in being both a guy movie and a chick flick with its political politics and sword play along with a man scorned by love.  Guy Peace also puts in a great performance second to his wonderful Momento.  Highly, highly recommended
Thank God for Richard Egan. Richard Egan makes this film watchable AND enjoyable. It is an interesting portrayal of this biblical story, and as he always did, Egan shines above all others. A good movie for both historical and entertainment value.  Actors of Egan's caliber - talented, charming, and handsome - are a rare  breed in this day and age. Its too bad
Scotty Doesn't Know!. I LOVE this movie!  I first saw it on HBO in a hotel room in Florida during a high school trip, and at that time I only saw part of it.  Still, I was laughing so much!  We had about 10 people in the hotel room watching it and we had a great time!I've seen this movie so many times since then, but it never gets old.  It is so much fun.  Who wouldn't, if given the chance, chill in Europe with your friends, having the time of your life?  Sure, they all have their problems, but in the end, they're better people.  I never thought I would enjoy an obscene comedy so much...but Eurotrip completely exceeded all of my expectations.  I don't even care that the ending was completely unbelieveable, out-there, ridiculous.  It doesn't matter.  It just made the movie more hilarious!And except for the title of my review, I haven't even MENTIONED the catchy, awesome song associated with the movie - "Scotty Doesn't Know!"  Definitely check out the soundtrack, because after watching this movie, you will feel the need to rock out to this song...it is great
For dance lovers. Good movie to show people the difference between ballroom dance and fun dance. Best dance movie I ever seen
Great show, Bad DVD. I loved the Davy Crockett Televised Series as a kid but these left a bit to be desired. The picture sometimes goes to a sepia tone and other times it loses its color contrast. It also get super fast in some places. It looks like it was hodgepodge together from different lesser quality sources. Also on parts do not play well.  The story is great and so is the packaging but the quality of the DVD leaves something to be desired. However if a full original copy has been lost to time this is better then nothing.
Jon rules. Jon Bon Jovi proves he is multi talented. We know (or you should know) he's a fantastic singer and he demonstrates a pretty good acting ability in this vampire flick. In this movie,he is a white mans version of "Blade" as he seeks vampires to kill. Good cast of characters was assembled and a decent storyline
Simon and Garfunkel Old Friends. This concert is their best one on dvd in my opinion.  The quality of sound and picture is good along with the fact that they stick to the original style of the song without changing it too much for the stage.  It's a mellow and enjoyable concert to kick back and watch with some old friends
Magnificent film!. This is fantastic!  Great music, Great story,  Awesome photography!   I promise you will love  this film
Supercop (1992). This film really should be called "POlice Story 3: Supercop" but anyway in this film Jackie's sidekick is Michelle Yoeh (James Bond's sidekick in "Tomorrow Never Dies"). Together they pose as bad guys to infiltrate the drug gang and go undercover to destroy the operation from the jungles of Thailand to the city streets of Malaysia. Jackie battles the bad guys in some of the most spectacular stunts yet! Jackie won a Best Actor Award. Highlight: when Jackie jumps from a building to a rope ladder hanging from a helicopter. Great film
Who Knew A Honeymoon On 4 Wheels Could Be So Funny!!. The "Long Long Trailer" is the second Lucy movie I saw and it's probably my favorite one. With a dynamic cast who dosn't love Lucy with Ricky? And a surprisely funny plot you can't help but love this hidden Lucy treasure. I watch this movie again and again- I'm only disappointed it hasn't come to DVD.Tacy(Lucy) and Nicky(Desi) have it all love-- but, there love is soon tested when they decide to buy a trailer instead of a proper home. Soon casosis erupts as Lucy and Nicky have to deal with cramped spaces, car problems, dozens of nick-nacks, high mountains,pesky relatives, trailer brakes, and annoying neighbors-- which eventually lead to martial fueds and a break-up. Will Nicky and Tacy be able to overcome the trailer? Who could of guessed a life on four wheels could be so funny? This is one of my favorite old movies of all time and more importantly it's funny I still laugh everytime I watch it.This is a must for any old comedy movie buff or any Lucy or Desi fan!!!!
Even if you're not a fan of Westerns... ... you may want to give this one a go.  I'm amazed to realize that it's 37 years old; I think this film is going to end up among the classics when it gets a little older.  I'm not a big Western-watcher at all.  But I end up watching this one when it's televised because the cinematography is marvelous.  It's what I loved when it first came out (I'm revealing my age) - that and William Goldman's screenplay.  For those reasons, even if you don't care for shoot-em-ups, it's worthwhile
Not the best national lampoon's movie, funny moments, extreem exageration of dorm life. Taken at face value, Dorm Daze is an Exagerated view of dorm life for college kids, with its relationships, love triagles, and the problems/gossip that occur while sharing living quarters with so many people.  Initially starting out as a movie following one brother's attempt to get his younger brother "some Action" by purchasing a prostitute, it soon becomes one involving mixed up identities and a good bunch of money. Along the way many characters are introduced, the nerdy girl, the nerdy guy who secretly love the nerdy girl...who is hot, the young couple that has goes through a relationship crisis, the gossipy girls that spred rumors and jump to conclusions...you get the point. But the writers did do a fairly good job at pulling all of these characters together into one plot that did have some cohesion to it, and actually was quite funny at how things got blown out of proportions.   A good comedy rental, or buy it for cheap here on amazon since rentals cost so much any more.CAUTION, they have now released Dorm Daze 2, which makes this movie look like a masterpiece compared to it.
The Scariest Movie about Giant Bugs Ever. This is an excellent monster movie, pure and simple.  It is not really campy or funny, but it manages to do something that few monster movies do nowadays; it scares you.  Yup.  The atmosphere for this movie is great and the movie is very unpredictable.  It seems if Del Toro took quite a bit of care to avoid cliches, and he definitely succeeds.  If you want a monster movie that is actually scary, pick up Mimic.  If seeing a giant roach killing a child does not shake you up a little bit, watch this on a rainy night.I give "Mimic" a 4.5 out of 5(rounds up).
the best movie ever. if you have not seen this movie you dont know what your missing. this is the best movie i have seen in years
thinking man's (or woman's) erotica, and a solid noir. a sharp starring-role debut by susie porter and an unusual cinematic return by "witness"' kelly mcgillis in this, certainly the first-ever lesbian film noir to be based on a detective story originally told in long-form poetry. porter's sleuth is as hard-bitten as bogart ever was, and director lang gives us plenty of luxuriously moody scenes of her aussie PI scrouging the enigmatic streets, seeking clues to the murder of a troubled co-ed. how does femme fatale mcgillis, playing an alluring bi-sexual professor, fit in? who cares? like porter's beloved car, this offbeat whodunit offers a fine ride
Still much to learn from this film..... It's been some time since this film first appeared at Sundance at the end of the 90's but it does not lose it's power...Many will shy away from it's difficult subject matter. It is not a family film. Neither is "Twin Peaks" and that is an indisputable masterpiece.Watch the acting. These actors have much to offer. It's apparent that like most indie films, they need some script-tweaking but that not withstanding, it is worth your time..
A good movie. I enjoyed Running on Empty really because of River Phoenix. He is such an incredible actor and he really shows his acting skills in this movie. I also liked Martha Plimpton in this movie, she was very good
Penelope Ann Miller and hormones. A ship that was supposed to transport some crates from South America to a museum seems to have a crew that lost their heads. The crates finally get flown in. One full of goodies the other just leaves. The museum's Dr. Margo Green (Penelope Ann Miller) is suspicious. Everyone else is happy until a guard seems to have misplaced his hypothalamus. Looks like Dr. Margo Green is about to be consumed by her work.This is a pretty spiffy well done formula movie. As with many contemporary movies they completely ignore the book and add all the standard clichs. We have the ruthless rivalry, missing scientists, and mysterious crates.  Naturally no one does what they are supposed to do and you start rooting for the, lets just call it a, relic.
"Here's yum...here's the other yum...and here's yum-yum!". "Ball Of Fire" is one my favorite screwball romantic comedies. It was made towards the end of a golden era of this genre of films, which also includes such better-known classics as "The Philadelphia Story" (1940), "His Girl Friday" (1940) and "Bringing Up Baby" (1938). Directed by Howard Hawks, the master of rapid-fire comedic dialogue, it tells the story of nerdy language scholar Bertram Potts (Gary Cooper, in one of his best "aw-shucks" performances, along with "Mr. Deeds Goes To Town") who lives in a house with seven other stodgy, albeit older bachelor scholars, all of whom are working on an encyclopedia.Upon discovering that his knowledge of slang is outdated, Potts bravely ventures forth into the real world, where he discovers flashy (literally, as the dress she is first seen in is sequined and purposely lit so as to momentarily "blind" Potts when she shows up at his house in it) nightclub singer Katherine "Sugar Puss" O'Shea (Barbara Stanwyck). He is taken in by O'Shea's gusty performance of "Drum Boogie", (accompanied by a famous drummer of the times, Gene Krupa, who reminds me onstage a bit of "The Who" drummer Keith Moon), and her lively banter, and asks her to help him with his slang research. She takes him up on his invitation very abruptly by showing up at his home that same night, claiming to be arriving to help, when in fact she's trying to hide. The resulting storyline is predictable, fast-paced, extremely well-written, thoroughly dated, and filled with 1940's slang...in other words, to anyone who is a fan of this genre...completely captivating and charming.With this in mind, and taken as a movie of the times, it's a comedic gem. Gary Cooper (my all-time personal favorite actor) is absolutely sexy here, believe it or not, and Barbara Stanwyck is perfect as the title's sassy little "Ball Of Fire", with her brash, streetwise exterior but ultimately soft heart, climbing onto a stack of books to reach the 6'4" Potts so she can show him the meaning of "yum-yum". Also, the above-mentioned dress she first wears, which is featured in most of the ads for the film is amazing; it's something Bob Mackie might have designed for Cher, and she looks gorgeous in it.  The outstanding supporting parts are interesting, clever, and except for the gangster parts, individually well-fleshed. Veteran character actors such as Oskar Homolka (the servant in "Mr. Sardonicus") and Henry Travers (the angel in "It's Wonderful Life") help lend charm to the story. Dana Andrews ("Laura") and Dan Duryea ("The Little Foxes"), are effective, if somewhat wasted, in small parts as typical sterotypical 1940's mobsters.You'd have to enjoy these kind of old screwball, dated comedies of the '40's to love this one...and I do.Side note: the roles of the seven professors (excluding Cooper's) were inspired by Disney's dwarfs from "Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs"
New Holiday Kids Classic!. What a great movie -- moving, funny, and thoroughly entertaining.  The kids come across and real, the acting is great (particularly John Corbett and Stacy Edwards), and the plot moves along really well.  The sequel is better than the original -- I think this'll be shown every holiday season for quite a while
80's Classic. The Breakfast Club, one of the best movies out there. Timless no matter what's your age or what year you were born in your sure to love this movie! :-
Romance and intrigue amid squalor and poverty. Guy Hamilton is an opportunistic Australian journalist looking to make his name in Indonesia so that he can go on to bigger and better things. Hamilton (played by Mel Gibson) is lost amid a foreign culture and political machine so competely alien to him and  gets help from Billy Kwan (played in a cross-gender role by Linda Hunt), an educated native who is desperate to do something about the rampant poverty he sees every day. The two develop a partnership: Guy supplies the words, and Billy, the images. However, their partnership undergoes strain due to their contrary aims: Guy wants to break the story of Communist aggression and insurrection, while Billy wants to blow the lid off of the poverty in his country. Guy's response is that people don't want to hear about starving kids. Things are complicated when Guy falls for a British diplomat (Sigourney Weaver, whose beauty and brilliant performance make up for a marginal British accent) who gives him the story he wants, but broadcasting it may just be bad for everyone. At end of the movie, everyone has committed themselves to what they feel is important, and for some, it isn't what one would initially imagine them choosing.This is another 80s gem from Peter Weir, who is simply brilliant in setting up an utterly realistic impoverished Indonesia circa 1965. The acting, as I mentioned, is excellent: Gibson has rarely been better, and Weaver is one of the greatest living actresses today. Linda Hunt got much recognition for the role of Billy, but this is no gimmick or Oscar-bait performance--Hunt shows a compelling portrait of betrayed patriotism. Weir, as in Gallipoli, shows a weakness for the music of the times, and there is some 80s synth in the movie again (this time, from Vangelis). Other than this, though, this is a movie which is compelling all the way through and comes highly recommended from this viewer
The best historical war drama from the Far East. I have seen many historical war dramas from Far East (mainly China's) and most of them are not only historically inaccurate but have a strong bias toward the enemy.Yi Soon Shin, however, is a rare exception.  Not only is the drama very historically accurate but it is also very comprehensive in detailing the meticulous battle planning of the admiral that leads to each victory but also the political in-fighting between the Chosun political factions (and the second-guessing nature of the king) which causes his eventual death.Also, the special effects are great.  The battle scenes (whether on sea or land) are realisitic and of outstanding quality.The only problem that I can find is that the DVD has not placed sufficient focus on the contribution of the Ming China.  Then again, this is not unexpected since this is a Korean drama focusing on the great admiral.Also, the entire selection should have 104 episodes.  I don't know why it stops at 101.If you want to have a more comprehensive knowledge on the subject, try Samuel Hawley's Imjin War (which portrays Yi Soon Shin more accurately by quoting original sources).Any who is only intered in the fighting may also want to check out Stephen Turnbull's Samurai Invasion (which has more colorful maps and detailed description of battles from the Japanese perspective).Lastly, anyone who is a fan of samurai warfare may want to check out Shogun:Total War by Creative Assembly (now in Gold version).
Epic Korean Drama. Koreans honor their greatest military hero in this epic drama which takes place in the late 1500s. The career and tactics of this Admiral are still studied at the U.S. Naval Academy, and doubtless those of other nations. The screenplay is based on a couple of novels, so there is some fiction, but the life of Yi Soon Shin was well documented, so there's plenty of fact supporting the story.If you are not familiar with Korean Drama, it's good to keep in mind that  this is not a Hollywood product, but they do very well with special effects and such considering the non-Hollywood budgets involved, and it's easy to see past all that and enjoy the tale being told.It's a long series, but presents an epic with power, depth and dimension and well worth watching it unfold through each and every episode.It would be great also to see KBS make other dramas available for viewing through Amazon, such as "Seoul 1945".
What I learned after viewing Monte Walsh. *Spoilers*                                                                                                                       What I learned after viewing Monte WalshI believe that the movie, Monte Walsh tells me to strive for my desires and dreams because in the movie, Monte continues doing his job as a cowboy even though he lost his close friends and he continues even with technology taking his job away. However, at one point he has second thought on whether he is doing the right thing to leave his passion for being a cowboy.I saw this movie at my father's house on DVD on September 25th 2005. I never saw or knew that this was a TV special, so the first time I saw it was on DVD. At one point I never had an intention of seeing this movie until my father recommended it, so I decided to watch it.In the movie, it shows Monte and his friends enjoying their jobs as cowboys. However, at a point he loses his closest friends Shorty and Chip. He lost Shorty because out of all the cowboys he had the least experience in the group, so he was fired. Chip, however, left because he wanted to have a better living, so he became a hardware shop owner. This reminds me of my passion for the Japanese language. I have lost many friends who have gone on to do much better things because they thought there wasn't much work that involve the language. They might be right, but I plan on staying on track and hope to use it in my career.Technology had put a big burden on Monte's job. With automobiles making horse obsolete and trains doing the job of moving animals much faster; the need for cowboys was decreasing. Monte didn't even like fences being built because they prevented him from going places and he wanted to travel all over the country. Even with these advancements he still continued doing his job. This was Monte's biggest difficulty to overcome, but he made it over in the end. I have also had a difficulty in my life and it was my ability to socialize. This had been a problem for me since I was really young and I wasn't able to make many friends because of it. Recently, I have been getting more social and this difficulty is starting to disappear.When Monte lost all his friends; he had second thoughts on whether to continue his job or not. He was considering marriage and even considered an alternative job. He was worried about this decision to change, so he talked with his fiance, Martine and she told him that she would love him regardless of what job he had. After this conversation he decided that he would continue his job as a cowboy. I, too, have had second thoughts like when I was moving from my mother's house to my father's. I was constantly wondering "is this the right choice" and "will I be happier over there". In the end I made a good choice and I am glad I made the choice to live with my father.I believe that many people have desires that they want to go after and once they watch this film they will want to go after those dreams.
Trapped in the cube. "Cube" is a cult hit. That basically means that it's good or innovative, but not many people know about it.Vincenzo Natali (also creator of "Cypher" and "Nothing") made his full-length directorial debut with this film -- a low-budet, innovative sci-thriller that feels like an episode of the "Twilight Zone," as written by Mark Danielewski and Franz Kafka. Yes, it's that surreal -- and that intelligent and well-written.Seven people have been placed in a cubical room, which is connected to a bizarre maze of thousands more. Among are a cop, a disabled man, an architect, a student, a doctor and a criminal, and all of them have wildly disparate personalities. But they soon learn that behind the countless doors, there are deadly booby-traps.So of course, their chances of survival don't seem so good. But they soon learn that their placement in the Cube is no accident -- each one has skills that the group needs. To escape, they will have to band together and use their brains. But why are they in the Cube in the first place -- and is the maze even the same as when they started?Vincenzo Natali's "Cube" is a perfect example of what Hollywood can't seem to grasp -- it doesn't matter how much money is poured into a movie, because it's the concept, brains and skill that make it good or bad. Not the special effects or the big names.And Natali did a magnificent job with his first full-length movie, infusing what seems to be a straightforward thriller with a taut, claustrophobic atmosphere, and some ominous hints about morality (or the lack of it) and sociology. It also has an unusually intelligent script, with prime numbers and their powers playing a big part, right next to the gruesome deaths. And of course, the solid dialogue. ("You've got a gift." "It's not a gift. It's just a brain.")At the heart of the creepiness: Natali only reveals the secrets of the Cube as they are revealed to the characters, which adds to the suspense. What is this thing? Why are they in it? We know as much as they do. And we're only going to find out more about it when they do.It's also a movie that bothers to have real characters. No screaming teens here -- the movie's plot depends on them being very different. Natali and Andr Bijelic reveal the characters through their action and dialogue -- some are whiny, some are cruel, and some are just annoying. Some of the acting is rather flat, and a few of the arguments ring hollow, but overall it's very like watching real people.Vincenzo Natali's "Cube" gives a good name to shoestring budgets and eerie plots. Definitely deserving of its cult status -- bizarre, twisted and creepy
A story of a father and his daughter. This review is for the Criterion Collection DVD edition of the film.Late Spring, released in Japan as Banshun is about a widowed man who is hoping for his only daughter to get married.  His duaghter desires to continue living with him to take care of his in his old age.The film is very good and has some excellent scenes.The DVD has fewer special features than normal though.Disc 1 contains the film with optional audio commentary by Richard Pea of a New York film society.Disc 2 contains Wim Wenders' film Tokyo-Ga, a tribute to Ozu and Japan.This is a good release and a fine example of Japanese cinem
A Perfect Foil to "The Devil wears Prada". I have loved this movie since I was a kid.  It is a cute 60's romantic comedy with fashion and reluctant romance thrown in.  Very dated in the mores and attitudes of the time, but a great time capsule of fasion in the 60's...and in Paris.  It's a great supplement to "...Prada", which is sort of a "Miss Congeniality goes to Paris".  Not great drama, but wonderful fun....with Paul Newman..and Marice Chevalier!  It is a delight
Grim WW1 based anti-war flick. Errol Flynn, Basil Rathbone and David Niven star in the sobering 1938 film "The Dawn Patrol" which undoubtedly served as the model for the WW2 classic "Twelve O'Clock High".  They are all members of the 59th fighter squadron of the Royal Flying Corps based in France in 1915.  A somber Basil Rathbone playing Major Brand is the squadron leader.  Day after day he depressingly orders his pilots on dangerous missions which create a high mortality rate.  Ace pilot Capt. Courtney played by Flynn and his able wingman Lt. Scott played by Niven continously marshal replacement pilots with little combat experience into the skies to face almost certain death.  Flynn despises Rathbone for the missions of death he orders them on.The tables are turned when Rathbone gets promoted due to a daring and succeesful mission flown by Flynn and Niven.  Flynn becomes squadron commander and must order his pilots on those deadly missions lead now by Niven.  He now realizes the plight that was driving Rathbone mad.Niven and Flynn have a falling out when Nivens baby brother turns up as one of the green replacement pilots.  He is immediately shot down on his first mission.Flynn is ordered to ask for a volunteer to fly a suicidal mission behind enemy lines.  When Niven opts to fly the mission, Flynn gets him intoxicated and heroically flies in his stead.While the aviation dogfights in this well acted flick are nothing spectacular, the plot and performances rendered by the solid cast get the director's message across loud and clear
Talk about Christmas spirit... I really love Bones.  It has everything: suspense, drama, humor, pretty people, fun storylines.  I have yet to miss an episode, and even into Season 2 this is probably my favorite.  It adds depth to all of the characters.  Also, the winter holidays are my favorite time of year.  I like holidays that are about what is good in the world.  Bones is about people standing for the good in humanity even though they explore the very worst every day.  I cry through half this episode, but in a completely good way.  Buy, watch it, love it.  But watch it with a friend if you don't want to cry alone.  So moving, great performances by the whole cast.  Emily Deschanel was powerful in this one, she brings real vulnerability to Brennan here.  David Boreanaz, as always the perfect sympathetic hero, loveably old-fashioned. Cute, funny moments.  Touching, poignant moments.  This really is the best of what is great about Bones
An emotional powerhouse. This film is a truly epic experience, the type of film that one doesn't see too much of anymore these days. Based on an autobiographical novel by Stefanie Zweig, it concerns the Redlich family, one of the lucky few families to leave Nazi Germany before it was too late. Walter, the father, saw the writing on the wall and left for Kenya in 1937, sending for his wife Jettel and daughter Regina six months later, in 1938. Normally one doesn't think of refugees from the Nazis as escaping to anyplace in Africa, particularly not Kenya, although there was actually a fairly substantial Jewish community in Nairobi by the time WWII broke out, along with other refugees, such as the Redlichs, living in more isolated and less-developed areas of the nation. Jettel is a bit of a Jewish German Princess at the beginning of the film, and has a very hard time adjusting to life in Kenya. She believes living on the farm in Rongai will be temporary, and was so unaware of the reality waiting for her that she brought her fine china and bought an evening gown instead of something more practical like a refrigerator before she left home. Her character proves to be the most interesting, the one who goes through the most development, becoming a very different person by the end of the film. Walter, in contrast, has a sea change in attitude in the opposite direction, and wants to return to Germany after the war instead of staying in Kenya, which has become like a home to his family and saved their lives. They also have to deal with their troubled marriage; they'd apparently begun having some problems before they left Germany, but their marriage is really put to the test in Kenya, particularly while Walter is away in the British Army for four years and Jettel is left to tend the farm. Young Regina is also a fascinating character; being so young, she adjusts quickly to life in Kenya, although, like her parents, doesn't ever really fully come to think of it as home. She has a number of different cultures to deal with--the German culture she left behind and the one she has a connection to via her parents, the native Kenyan culture and the Swahili language, and the British culture at the colonial school she attends. (Though most of this film shows us Kenya through the eyes of people living far away from so-called civilisation, this was still a time when most of Africa was under colonial rule, a much different Africa than it is today.) Her relationship with Owuor, the native who acts as a servant to her family, is incredibly moving and touching, one of the finest aspects of this film. Unlike her mother, she never has any hesitation about or resistance to befriending the natives. She doesn't care that their skin is dark and hers is light; they're just other children she has fun with and who like being with her, the same way that she instantly takes to Owuor, seeing him as a kind man who warmly welcomes her to Kenya. On the surface this is a historical film, but the true themes are about the nature of home, alienation, self-discovery, finding oneself, loss, and how sometimes the least likely place can become a refuge and come to feel almost like home over time. What is the meaning of the word home, does a refugee or immigrant ever really completely feel at home in a foreign land, and will these people ever really feel at home anywhere again, whether they remain in Kenya, return to Germany, or start a new life in an entirely new place? It's also a nice change of pace to see a WWII-era film set in Africa, to see how the war affected the native peoples, the dominating British colonialists, and the refugees like the Redlichs. The soundtrack is also incredibly gorgeous, as is the natural scenery.There are also a wealth of bonus features. The audio commentary is top-notch, revealing such interesting facts as how Walter's voice was actually done by the popular actor Herbert Knaup but for two undubbed scenes (one of which is conducted entirely in English), because it was felt that Merab Ninidze, the true actor, had too strong of a Georgian accent, and that Silas Kereti, who plays Regina's friend Jogona as a young adult, was initially very hesitant about performing in one of the tribal ceremonies in the film because it was being done by another tribe, and he thought that taking part would mean that he were becoming a member of this other tribe. Other extras are deleted scenes (with optional commentary); a making-of featurette; interviews with Merab Ninidze, Juliane Khler (Jettel), Matthias Habich (Walter Ssskind, a character who immigrated to Kenya before the Redlichs), Sidide Onyulu (Owuor), and Caroline Link (the director), Peter Herrmann (the producer), and Stefanie Zweig; score selections; a storyboard comparison for the locust scene; trailers; and a photo montage with commentary.At almost two and a half hours long (and three hours long originally), this is a truly epic picture, a real emotional powerhouse. All of the characters are developed so well and acted so masterfully that one grows to feel as though one actually knows them, has gone on this powerful life-changing journey along with them. It's also not "just another WWII movie," since the setting and themes are so very different from the usual ones. Far from just another movie, this one makes the viewer think and feel instead of just being entertaining or delivering a lot of high-tech special effects. It's a shame more films in Hollywood aren't as masterfully crafted as this wonderful highly-recommended German film
PLEASE BRING THIS SERIES OUT ON DVD!. Fabulous show. Amazes me the number of stupid TV series that are being pumped out in droves yet an intelligent, witty, entertaining, upstanding show like this has yet to be considered for DVD release. What are these studios thinking??
Fully entertaining..!. This is a great movie, there is nothing you can not like in this movie.Bruce willis as well as the rest of the cast did a good job in this movie with very good acting, the plot is also entertaining with some twists in it, the whole thing about how all the family members of Bruce are cops is just cool, reminded me a little of cop land (town of cops), but this movie is even better than cop land.Tom sizemore performance was also noticable, even Sarah jessica parker was good here.currently, i only own a VHS copy of the movie, but if any one have not seen it yet, my advice is to buy the DVD because this movie is worth it and is FULLY ENTERTAINING
Loved this movie!. I can honestly say, right off the bat, this is the only movie I've ever seen that's so creepy, I have trouble watching it again...very psychological with some great visuals and startling sound make for a great movie experience. The extras are great too
Fabulous Bizet movie in english!. Wonderful way to hear Bizet's music and see the USA in the 40's. And the actors are surperb
Quite possibly the most emotionally profound film ever made. I won't go into plot sypnosis, as it's been detailed in previous reviews of the film; instead, I'd like to address the message and meaning of the film.In order to fully appreciate Au Hasard Balthazar one must understand the thematic construction of the film. By being literally a passive, dumb beast who is being passed from owner to owner and being mistreated and shown (little) love throughout his life, Bresson uses Balthazar as a witness and reflection -- or both a window and mirror, if you will -- of human nature in all its facets. There are also the clear parallels Bresson establishes between Balthazar and his owners, especially his first owner, Marie. The purpose of such a thematical tool is for the audience to regard Balthazar as another facet of the human condition, but only in the spiritual sense (Bresson takes extreme care in not anthromorphologize the donkey). So, with Balthazar and these group of characters, the film shows the entire spectrum of humanity: purity (Balthazar), good (Jacques), evil (Grard), weakness (Arnold), selfishness (Merchant), arrogance (Marie's father) and self-pity (Marie). In one or several of these characters, we can see ourselves since they encapsulate the different ways human beings deal with their existence.Now this is the most important thing to comprehend about the film: Balthazar is an ignorant, unknowing beast who has no choice but to accept everything that happens to him in his life due to his condition, that of being a donkey, a creature who has no intelligence and who has no free will. He simply lives life the way he knows: he is used as an animal of burden, and he does so. He is mistreated by his owners, he accepts the mistreatment. He is shown love and compassion by Marie, he accepts it. He even shares his state of being with other animals (in times of captivity during his stay in the circus and times of freedom during in his deathbed). If you think about it, within the oportunities (or lack thereof) he has been given, and the circumstances (good and bad) he's gone through, Balthazar has achieved to live life to the fullest (and die with utmost grace). Us human beings have a different condition to Balthazar. Human beings have intelligence, reasoning and have the free will to make choices. Yet with all those gifts and advantages, humans have no peace of mind and keep having an attitude towards life and making choices that more often than not, lead to a life of misery and suffering, destroying ourselves and the lives of others in the process.The simple yet profound question the film basically begs us to ask to ourselves is: "if Balthazar could live life to the fullest, why can't we?". When we realize this reflection on Balthazar's life and reflect it on our own, a sudden feeling of enlightenment, trascendence and spirituality undeniably invades us. Throughout this meaningful revelation, we emerge with a moral clarity (especially concerning the characters in the film) and with a newfound sense of spirituality, hope and a strong will to transform ourselves.I personally can't think of something more inspiring and life-affirming than that. Au Hasard Balthazar very well might change your life. This is one of the most noble, humane and beautiful works of art, of any medium.
It's Shania! - She Rocks From Start To Finish - Incredible. This video features her TV specials Winter Break & Come On Over. She is the only female artist in US history to achieve back to back Diamond Awards (sales of 10 million) selling albums. In addition to Shania these specials include performances by Elton John, Backstreet Boys, and The Dallas Cowboy Cheerleaders. Shania does a very nice duet with Elton John in Miami, Fl.The video includes photographs of Shania in her native Canada and of the home in which she grew up and learned to love music. The sound quality on this VHS is outstanding. No need to rush out and buy the DVD.This video gives the viewer some of Shania's life story in very well conceived flashbacks to her native Canada. Sadly, we learn in one of the flashbacks that her Dad and Mom were killed in an auto accident.Shania and a team of performers on stage perform "Don't Be Stupid" with amazing high-energy. It is just breath-taking. Most of her songs are wonderfully spirited. She seems to have an endless supply of incredible energy. It is just awesome. Thank you Shania.(Amazon Marketplace)
Theme Song Information. The original theme song for this movie is "Time and Tide" it was written and performed by Paul Williams and is available on one of his CD collections.I believe that the theme song was changed in 1992 when the movie was re-released as a TV movie.I don't know why they changed the song, I still remember some of the words and I haven't seen the movie since 1976!!!What's that old saying????? If it ain't broke, don't fix it.Hope that helps,ajmcgil
Funny,Funny,Funny. Even though this is about 4 years old, it is extremely halarious.  I've been waiting to see a good stand up comedy. The first 15 min is just one hilarious hit after another. I love this guy
Slap-stick fun comedy. Absolute fun classic with classy slap-stick fun. Never a dull moment in this film. Really funny fun. They don't make them like this anymore. Fun for entire family and all ages
Much Ado About The Loves Of Our Past. Some people do make much ado about nothing, but maybe that's something.  Maybe that's one thing more than nothing.Beatrice is the smartest girl in the room - any room.  Her trouble is that she loves a defiant, bull-headed, and notorious man from her past.  And she is betwixt with herself, not liking that she has feelings and concern for her gender rival - Benedick.  Beatrice is good humored, disarmingly wickedly tongued, and always torn between her loves and her independence.  Benedick is self-involved, conceited, & constantly fighting.  "They never meet, but there is a skirmish of wit between them."Beatrice:  I wonder that you will still be talking, Senor Benedick.  Nobody marks you.Benedick:   What?  My dear Lady Disdain.  Are you yet living?Beatrice:  Is it possible Disdain should die while she hath such meat food to feed as her Senor Benedick.  Courtesy herself should convert to Disdain if YOU come in her presence.Benedick:  . . . But it is certain that I am loved of all ladies, only you excepted.  And I would that I could find in my heart that I had a hard heart, for truly I love none.Beatrice:  A dear happiness to women.  They would else have been troubled with a pernicious suitor.I have my favorite movie lines from this DVD recorded on a 16 minute compilation on my iPod.  I do this because I'm not smart enough to "get" Shakespeare the first time I hear it.  I listen to them repeatedly, not only to try to understand the words, but also to understand the intelligence behind how they were so well acted by Branagh and Thompson.  This Shakespearean play succeeds or fails in the casting of Beatrice, and in this version, Emma Thompson plays Beatrice divinely.At a turning point in the movie, Don Pedro, played capably by Denzel Washingion, visits with a pensive Beatrice.  Beatrice is discussing with Don Pedro her past trials with Benedick:Don Pedro:  You have put him down lady.  You have put him down.Beatrice:  So I would not he should do me, my lord.  Lest I should prove the mother of fools.Don Pedro:  Will you have me lady?Beatrice:  (Carefully) No my lord.  Unless I might have another for working days.  Your grace is too costly to wear everyday.  But I beseech your grace, pardon me.  I was born to speak all mirth and no matter.Don Pedro:  Your silence most offends me.  And to merry best becomes you, for out of question you were born in a merry hour.Beatrice:  No!  Sure my lord.  My mother cried.  But then there was a star danced.  And under that was I born.Benedick later sililoquys that he will not marry, until he finds all positive attributes he seeks in only one woman.Smart women tend to be able to recognize gifted men and women who cross their path.  Fortunately, most Beatrices encounter a few Benedicks & Beatrices in their travels, and vice versa.In a final scene, Benedick asks Beatrice, "Then you do not love me?"  Beatrice replies, "No!  Truly!  But in friendly recompense."There are more good reasons than I can understand why Shakespeare's ideas withstand the tests of time.  This film version is so very, very good.  As with most Shakespearean comedies and tragedies, the plots hinge on several key misunderstandings.  In his romantic tragedies, the misunderstandings (such as Romeo & Juliet) are not discovered until too late.  In the comedies, the misunderstandings are discovered in time.
Don Coscarelli, please make more films!!. Being a fan of the Phantasm films I was interested when I saw this reviewed in EMPIRE way back on its US Theatrical release and thinking whats not to like?Bruce Campbell......Good!Don Coscarelli......Good!Ossie Davis.........Good!Elvis and a black JFK fighting a Mummy........ In a retirement home....... Super Good!I wish these types of films where made more often!
Rambo Revisited. I don't mind that the idea of this movie was pretty much taken from Rambo, however, it would have been nice if the idea was improved upon. In some ways it was but not enough to give this movie any real depth or realism.What I REALLY liked about this movie is its use of Johnny Cash's music. At the very beginning and at the very end we are presented with songs by Cash that I was previously unaware of. The idea to use these particular songs for this movie was a great choice and gives us an excellent prelude and conclusion to the theme of the movie
Tragedy and Compassion with a Wonderfully Comic Edge. There are a great many gay themed films available today, but when Longtime Companion was released, it was but one of a small handful of films brave enough to paint gay characters with empathetic and intelligent brushstrokes - something that continues to beset filmmakers even today.Set during the late 70's and on into the 80's the film is a bare bones and ruthlessly truthful before-and-after portrait of the devastating effects of the AIDS virus on a small group of close friends/lovers and on the wider gay community. Very funny, extremely moving, occasionally upsetting, whether you are a gay viewer or not, this film is a courageous celebration of the strength and frailty of the human spirit.
Ping Pong Match!. Phil Hartman is one of SNL's best, and this DVD does a fair job of capturing his talent, but, like most of these recent SNL DVD releases, it is definitely lacking. If you're a big Hartman fan, you should buy this, but if you're looking for a DVD packed with non-stop laughs, you may be disappointed. This one starts out strong, but dwindles in comedic value by the end. The extras are OK at best, although I did really enjoy the audition extra, which again, if you're a huge Hartman fan, you'll definitely want to see. Overall, there's nothing wrong with this DVD, I had just hoped for more going into it. It would be a definite buy for less than $10
EXCELLENT MOVIE. Not a big box office success this is really a very good movie.  Great performances from Michelle Pfeiffer, Colin Firth, Jessica Lange and Jason Robards.
Something fresh and new for today's kids!. My children are pretty jaded when it comes to movies.  They've been raised on big-budget, high-tech, computer generated films like "Shrek" and "The Incredibles."  When I purchased this movie it was for me, as I love old films and this one intrigued me.  I put the movie in last night, and my kids and I  were immediately drawn into the plot, the characters, the language (It is Dr. Suess.), and the great, imaginative sets.  We all loved it.  My girls couldn't get enough of the the synchronized skating, Siamese twins connected by a shared beard.  I enjoyed studying the sets...as so many reminded me of this great children's illustrater and his legendary work "Cat in the Hat.
My man Dr Smith is a riot in this episode. Dr Smith and the Robot go hog wild, switching personalities and swapping insults.  This is a great episode
The Epitome of a Great Film. "Walkabout" is a film directed by Nicolas Roeg (The Man Who Fell to Earth), and is frequently considered one of the greatest films ever made. Having just finished my first (and definitely not last) viewing of it, I must agree. The film is an incredibly unique, visual poem, that is truly a beautiful sight to behold. The film begins with this:"In Australia, when an Aboriginie man-child reaches sixteen, he is sent out into the land. For months he must live from it. Sleep on it. Eat of its fruit and flesh. Stay alive. Even if it means killing his fellow creatures. The Aboriginies call it the WALKABOUT.This is the story of a Walkabout"The story goes like this. A man drives his two children into the harsh Australian outback. He has a teenage daughter and a much younger son.None of the characters are given names, the credits reveal them asGirl and White Boy. The girl is played by Jenny Agutter, the son by Lucien John. The children are under the impression that they are driving all the way out here for a picnic, but soon their father begins inexplicably shooting at them. After he misses them he pours gasoline on the car, lights it on fire, and shoots himself in the head. The Girl and the Boy don't waste time crying or screaming at the sky "WHY!" like people in a lesser film would do. Instead they try to find their way back home, armed only with some cans of fruit and an AM/FM radio. After a few days of walking through the outback, completely out of any source of water, they meet a young Aboriginie boy (David Gumpilil) who's doing his walkabout. Since the Aboriginie and the two sibilings don't speak the same language, there's definitely a language barrier they have to get past...Obviously they don't, but they find their ways of communicating things like "water" and such. For a movie that spends about 85 minutes of it's 100 minute running time in the desert with little to-no dialogue (none of it really furthers the plot any), this is truly a one-of-a-kind work of art. I know some reviewers (including Roger Ebert, who's responsible for me even hearing of this film) reveal the fate of the Aboriginie boy, I'm not going too. It's much more effective if I don't. In most of my reviews of movies that are deemed "important films" I usually grade the film on it's importance and it's entertainment value. This is definitely an important film, one that people definitely need to watch. As for entertainment, I can't answer that. This film transcends that word. You can't call it entertaining, it really doesn't have the qualities of an entertaining film; But it's not dull or boring either. On another note, many people talk about how the film is suitable for both adults and kids. Despite the fact that it contains both full-frontal nudity (of both genders) and violence, I think some of the most Conservative parents in the world wouldn't mind letting their kids watch this.Both the nudity and violenced is handled in such a humane and realistic way, it's really handled just as a thing of life. I don't want this review to be too long, so I'm going to try and wrap it up real quick. This is a beautiful, haunting, extremely well written and well acted film. It's not just a film that "movie buffs" will enjoy, but people who rush out to see "Resident Evil" could potentially like this film. Seriously, do not miss this movie.GRADE:
S/F CLASSIC. ANDROMEDA STRAIN WAS A GRATE MOVIE IF YOU LIKE THE OLDER SCIFI MOVIES. IF YOU HAVE NOT SEEN IT YET I WOULD RECOMEND YOU SEE IT. IT DOES GET LONG IN THE MIDDLE OF THE MOVIE BUT BY THE END OF IT THERE IS PLENTY OF ACTION. GREAT FOR ALMOST ALL AGES THAT LIKE AND ENJOY OLDER SCIFI MOVIES
The Definitive Kieslowski. For most viewers, 'Three Colours' was the entry point into Kieslowski's approach to cinema. A flair for ambiguity, challenges to morals, and intimate camera work were quirkily matched to sensual and sexual dilemnas. But if this was arthouse cinema from the chic end of town, all Parisian glamour and buzz, it was the gritty, if not grimey northern sensibility of the 10 Commandments, that is Kieslowski's mid 80s masterwork. The lighting throughout seems contaminated by acid rain.There's a dense macabre atmosphere, by turns flicking from pathos to brutality with the ease of a tale from the Grimms. It's these beguiling episodes, so economically shot, that earned him the acclaim and rights to be mentioned in the top tier: Bergman, Pasolini, Tarkovsky, Dreyer, Bresson, the coiterie that pose the Big Questions with authoritive magnificence and allow their cameras to suck away at the world's textures. This DVD has a useful interview with Kieslowski who acknowledges the pivotal role of his long and fecund association with legal eagle, Piesiewicz. He is astonishigly candid with the assembled Polish intelligensia while scathing of their lack of useful critique: adored outside his coutry, reviled or too challenging within. The cast throughout are uniformly excellent. The children are astonishingly good in very demanding roles. Reviewers have their favourites and I concur with those who rate episodes 1, 5,(where the camera eye hauntingly tunnels its way to the inexorable gallows scene)  9 and 10. But this is only to place them as scintillating(if such sombre themes can be so deemed) rather than merely excellent. In the introduction American critic, Ebert whips through the stock praise for the director, with minimal insight for acquainted viewers. He's right though about the emphasis Kieslowski gives to the face. The episodes rebound on you, and doubtless, like me, you'll enjoy replaying these brilliantly filmed urban tales for years to come
Excellent Romantic Comedy. This laid back romantic comedy from 1978 is a real treat, particularly because of the performances. Walter Matthau and Glenda Jackson were so wonderfully combustible in the movie, they were again paired in 'Hopscotch', though oddly in the second film, they spent little time on screen together. Art Carney is a riot as a bumbling Chief of Staff, and all the supporting performances, from Richard Benjamin to the always delightful Candace Azzara, are equally enjoyable. Howard Zieff has a lackadaisical directing style that perfectly suits the material and actors. He basically gets out of the way and lets everyone shine. If you have not seen this movie, give it a try. (It was so successful it was made into a sitcom the following year, but without Matthau and Jackson, it didn't really go anywhere.)One odd and rather irritating thing, though: The movie has the obligatory 70's love montage in the middle. In the original film, and in the TV versions and VHS versions, The Beatles `Something in the Way She Moves' was the background music, and it was just wonderful. The film was cut to the music, and it really had an impact on the two leads' relationship. Michael Jackson and Co (unless he has since sold the rights) must not have allowed the music to be used on the DVD, or made a ridiculous demand, for the song is missing. There is just some mediocre filler music behind the montage and it really hurts that section of the film. It's annoying they were not able to put the movie on DVD in its original form.
gang tapes. i think this is the best movie i have seen in a while. if you arelooking for something new to watch this is the movie for you. i watched it twice in the same day. i believe i may watch it againtonight. i fell in love with darris love after his portrayal of the character alonzo.
Strong story with memorable performances... Complex study of the dynamic effects of various family pressures that affect the characters...Sean Connery is excellent as the charismatic type who is irreverent, with a criminal side...Dustin Hoffman gives a very good performance as the Dad who seems to feel somewhat inadequate competing with the charisma of the Connery character...Broderick does well as the understated son, who is drawn to Connery's 'fun' rebellious personality...Terrific performances, film creates a unique atmosphere, the action sequences drive the story to a powerful ending...
Good Actors, Good Pilot. The Show's Pilot originally aired back in 1996 showing promise. For anyone that had a remote interest in Horror/Scifi shows this show had them from the beginning. The cast itself worked well with each other and gave some great performances considering most of the action seens required them to visualize most of the things they were fighting. The only down side to this pilot is the demise of one of the characters which leads to the introduction of another with her young daughter. If this was a stand alone movie it wouldn't be so bad...watch the season as it unfolds and the ones that come after it and you'll know she should have been the one to go
Arthur 10th anniversary show. This two parter commemorates the  10th anniversary of the Arthur show on PBS. It's nice, they could have gone cheesy and just recycled old footage but they decied to be subtle about it. Really the only thing that specifically makes this a 10th anniversary show is the fact that there are '10's hidden throughout each episodes kind of like how Marc Brown hides the names of friends and family in his picture books. It's nice to see them both together too (episodes 1 & 2), I think they aired them seperately on TV
Very Hilarious. Truely speaking, this is a very hilarious episode. Must see for every one
The Magnificent Seven. This is the 7 from the TV series. Great movie - great western! The guys that play the 7 could not have been better protrayed by someone else. They do an excellent job. Loved Dale Midkiff as Buck; Can't understand why this tv series didn't run longer than it did. Liked the movie so well am trying to catch the series on cable and taping them
Preferred the Rummer Godden documentary in this DVD!. I watched everything on this DVD, and I am giving it a 5-star rating not for the film but rather for the British TV documentary that was included at the end.  Usually I don't watch the special segments on the making of a film, the cast, the location, etc., but in this case I found all this information much more interesting than the film itself.  I think I watched it all because after I watched the film, I was somewhat disappointed and wanted to know what exactly all the fuss was about.  The movie is very visually artistic and enjoyable to watch with that expectation only.  India was gorgeous and unsurprisingly director Renoir kind of made the story and setting into a non-stop stream of watercolors.  I don't think I have ever seen anyone else do it better than he did in this film.  However, as for the storyline I found its presentation too "French" for me.  What I mean by this is that I have often found the female characters in French films made by male French directors to be too adoring, too emotional or too wicked, if not all three at nearly the same time.  There often is this element of melodrama and sudden emotional swings as if all the females were PMS'ing at the same time.  FYI, I'm female by the way.  Even some of the male characters acted too melodramatically for me.  I have not read the novel by Rummer Godden or any of her books for that matter so I do not know if this was how the book was written or was due to free license taken by the director.  However, there was an hour-long British TV program about Godden's life and her return to India decades later included on this DVD.  It was excellent!  This DVD is worth watching just for that alone.  I was mesmerized listening to her tell her life story and watching her reactions as she revisited scenes of her childhood and young womanhood.  She has had an extraordinary life and she is so honest about herself, good and bad.  To me, she was the "great work" on this DVD and watching the film was the background special bonus material.  I wondered how she liked the film and listened for her to give some indication.  Maybe I missed it but I don't think so.
"A Five-Star Double-Rated Astro-Navigatrix". The 1960's were an era of terrifically beautiful actresses, ranging from Ursula Andress to the starlets of Hammer Film Productions.  Among the highest order of cinematic goddesses was young Jane Fonda, whose performance in the title role of "Barbarella" remains extremely erotic--today's more explicit sexuality notwithstanding.  The film's slight storyline concerns a futuristic "astro-navigatrix" trying to track down a mad scientist and prevent him from using a horrific weapon that he invented.  Hot on his trail Our Heroine encounters all manner of intergalactic beings who do their best to separate her from her unusually frail space-girl costumes; a blind angel, sadistic "leather men," children w/carnivorous dolls, and a tyrannical lesbian queen are all eager to entice Barbarella into their various fun & games.  Finally, when the space-girl does catch up to her quarry (the crazed scientist wonderfully named Duran Duran) he too wants to work out his fantasies on her; he subjects her to his "excessive machine"--a pleasant torture device that supposedly kills by inducing a lethal number of orgasms!  Fortunately, Barbarella's [...] capabilities outlast the machine, causing it to collapse in broken fuses.  And so it goes until the less-than-inevitable, but happy, finale.All in all this film's fantastic episodes are brilliant, inspired.  Barbarella's narrow escape from flesh-eating dolls as well as her many encounters with the lesbian tyrant (played to the hilt by Anita Pallenberg) are truly imaginative sequences.  Other highlights include the film's initial scene--with Barbarella doing a strip-tease in a zero-gravity chamber; and her down-and-dirty defeat of Duran Duran's nasty machine.  In essence there are very few dull moments in the entire film.  Director Roger Vadim--Jane Fonda's husband at the time--was at the height of his considerable powers.  And Mistress Fonda herself was glorious; in such an unlikely role, her extreme beauty blended harmoniously with an essential innocence in a way that made her the cinematic descendant of Marilyn Monroe!  For any actress at any time there can be no higher praise than comparison with Marilyn; and in Jane Fonda's case, such comparison is actually deserved.  My highest ratings.
Irresistable blend of attitude and style and content. The premise of the story is funny-- a village full of women factory workers who live crammed together in dorms needs men so the factory owner charmingly pleads with the military to send an attachment of men to the town to give his girls something to do with their evenings but when the men show up they are all middle aged, the young girls are disappointed. What is even funnier is Formans attitude and style which borrows some tricks in cutting and impromptu time shifts from the French New Wave directors but adds to this famous style a lucid charm that is irresistable. The cutting techniques innovated by the French New Wave directors emphasized the looseness and spontaneity of life but Formans sense of humor is such that he cannot help parodying the techniques he is emulating. For instance in the dance hall sequence the camera slowly pans the feet of the band members which makes for an absurdly enjoyable incidental.  French New Wave in technique but the humor is charmingly Czech in tone. The storyline makes some poignant observations about the new social mores of the 1960's--a married soldier trying to meet girls drops his wedding ring and proceeds to watch it roll across the dance floor where it falls to rest beneath a table of single girls. The title character dreams of a young man to take her away from her grim life as factory worker living in a dorm full of girls but since the men she meets do not take her away she decides to take matters into her own hands and follows one to his hometown. But arriving there she is greeted only with more grim reality. She returns home to her factory job and dorm and finds solace in make-believe as she tells her girlfriends a version of the events which conforms to her dreams. Very touching, wise, and satisfying film from a filmmaker who exhibits a fondness for all his characters. No one escapes Formans lighthearted satire nor his  empathy which embraces all forms of life, young and old. Remarkably light and poignant at the same time.  Czech and Polish films of this period strike an irresistable chord and are some of the most irresistable films ever made. Also recommended: Closely Watched Trains
Definetely eirie!. The film keeps you at the edge of your seat.  If you've never seen it, you'll like it.  Just the thought of an intelligent Alien life form manipulating, tapping into circuitry and recking havoc, is disturbing enough.  Pretty cool sci-fi 80's movie. Definetely an eirie one
A Dysfunctional Woody Allen Prior to Therapy. I think Woody Allen is the best director currently in the business and I believe his serious-themed movies are the reason.  He excells at making us look at ourselves.  If I'm not mistaken, "Interiors" was his first venture into dramatic movies.  For having led the way, this movie is noteworthy.  However, it is also exemplary in helping define the genre of the Woody Allen movie.  It defines the Woody Allen film by showing us what it is not.Woody Allen's greatness is in being able to let us take a critical look at ourselves.  His characters have faults that we share.  Whatever passions that we have fallen prey to, we see them in a new light through Allen's masterful script and direction.  The problem with "Interiors" is that most of us could not relate to the problems that the characters in "Interiors" have.  Many of them belong under the category of mental illness while others are taken too far to the extreme to be relevant to us.  Woody was on the right track but he was overly influenced by Ingar Bergman.  Allen's own style quickly emerged after this movie and we have been the better for it.Taken in its' own right, "Interiors" is an above-average movie.  The acting is excellent and the mood of the movie is very tense in a somber manner.  The movie is simply overwhelming and we are left wondering who would ever have been so deranged as to have married into this mess.  These people deserve themselves and that is an observation that applies to no other Woody Allen cast (with the bumbling exception of the cast of "What's New Pussycat?").Woody Allen took a turn towards drama and hit a speed bump on the way.  Fortunately, he learned from his experience.
Solid entertainment. I am glad Best of the Best released on DVD. Even though it is only the 3rd and 4th of the series. The third one is about Tommy Lee (Phillip Rhee) fights a group of neo-nazi. Best of the Best 4, Tommy is up against Russian mafia who involved in counterfeit. Both movies are quite good for this martial arts action genre. YOu got 2 movies for slightly higher price of a single DVD so it is quite a deal. The picture quality is OK (full screen only) and no 5.1 Dolby Digital, just Dolby 2.0 which is not too bad either. I wish Best of the BEst 1 &amp; 2 will be released soon on DVD. Best of the Best 2 is available on DVD in Canada. For those who can't wait you can find these put up on auctions by Canadians in ebay. I have not received my copy yet so I can't comment on the quality of the DVD
Dolores Claiborne. My Dvd came brand new and wrapped in plastic, it takes alittle longer but was worth the wai
A Magical Film About Friendship In A Terrible Time. Louis Malle, one of the best directors to ever create film, gained his reputation through a series of semi-autobiographical films, films so heart-felt, so deeply emotional, so full of detail, they can't be anything but outstanding. "Au Revoir Les Enfants", recently released on DVD by the Criterion Collection, is my favorite of these films.Julien (Gaspard Manesse) has a deep-felt affection for his mother (see Malle's "Murmur of the Heart" for more on this) but he understands he will be much safer at the French boarding school in the countryside. The school, run by priests, provides a safe haven for the children of well-off families during World War II. Returning from Christmas break, the new year is uneventful for a while. Julien is a bright student and the ring leader for a bunch of boys. Julien trades items with Joseph, a poor boy who works in the kitchen, more out of amusement than anything else, but also to supplement the meager diet served by the priests. One day, a new student arrives; Jean Bonnet (Raphael Fejto), a quiet boy the other kids make fun of: "Look at Easter Bonnet." Julien also begins to notice things about the new kid; he doesn't participate in the Catholic prayers the father's lead, he doesn't eat certain things, and one night, Julien wakes up to find Jean praying over some candles. Then, Julien's attitude changes and he forms an uneasy friendship with Jean.Made in 1987, more than forty years after the events depicted, Julien is a thinly disguised autobiographical version of the director, as he lives a real life event from Malle's childhood. You might expect such a film to be filled with saccharin and sugar, full of fond reminiscences from his childhood. But the film is very astute at depicting the childhood as an observer might see it. We watch Julien observe things, react to things, but he is very adult for his age, giving us an adult view of the events. Because we are watching his reactions, we see his feelings, which are emotional but reserved. It is similar to a television show with a laugh track, the fake laughter cueing us to laugh. When the television show doesn't have a laugh track, they have to work harder to make us laugh. When we are watching the events unfold through Julien's eyes, Malle has to work harder to make adults feel for the characters. Because this works, every emotion is more resonant and the film is much more powerful.Life in the school is depicted in such a vivid fashion, it instantly becomes clear someone really lived through this period, this tale is autobiographical. The boys live in an old monastery, with very little heat. Yet, they don't seem to notice the problem much. They have endured it for so long and have become used to it, playing outside in the frigid weather, wearing shorts and coats. The classes are also very different from what we are used to today; the teachers are strict and the children tend to learn despite the circumstances of their life. Even though these children are from rich families, living in this boarding school, and they are well-cared for, they still have worries. The war is ever present. Some of the students have lost brothers, father, uncles and more. They are better off than many of their countrymen, but that doesn't mean they are comfortable.As the relationship between Julien and Jean grows and changes, their friendship becomes deeper. Julien is like most boys his age, anytime someone new enters the picture, they have to prove they can fit in. Jean doesn't really fit in, or for that matter, really try to. Yet, every time Julien is surrounded by a group of friends, Jean seems to long for the same camaraderie. He is better in most subjects than Jean and he seems to get the preferential treatment Julien once received. But as Julien realizes Jean is different, and begins to piece together why, he realizes Jean will never completely fit in and has to help him through this ordeal. They become friends. Thankfully, Malle also shows a lot of restraint in this area. The friendship is a gradual thing. It doesn't happen immediately, or completely, taking time to develop.Because the film is set in the winter of 1944, the threat of German soldiers is constant. These soldiers have occupied the small town, changing everything about the people's lives. Yet, Malle doesn't paint them as the completely evil men we have come to associate with Hitler's persona. Yes, there is always a threat, but some of their human qualities are displayed. When Julien and Jean get lost in the forest, German soldiers find them and return them to the school. One of the teachers makes a remark about the "filthy" German soldiers. The soldier responds he would like the blanket the "filthy" Germans used to keep the children warm during the ride back. During a parent visit, Julien's mother visits and takes them to a restaurant. At the restaurant a French Collaborator gives a Jewish customer a hard time. A table of German soldiers notices this and chastises the French Collaborator, humiliating him, leaving the Jewish customer to reflect in silence. The German Soldiers acted out of irritation at having their dinner interrupted, but it is interesting to watch them take the frustration out on the right person. It would have been extremely easy to paint the German soldiers as the villains we know they were. This story is told through Julien's eyes. And at the time, he wouldn't have known the full extent of the atrocities inflicted by the German army. Therefore, Malle makes some of these men seem human, giving the entire film another layer of depth. Also, during the final moments, when the Gestapo arrives at the school to investigate claims of Jewish students, their leader seems to be fairly kind and nurturing, even towards the Jewish students he uncovers. Of course, this makes him all the more monstrous. We don't expect him to take one of the children and start reading him a bedtime story. We know the fate of these children. And it is chilling. We don't really need to know what happened to them, but when Malle provides voice over narrating what happened to Jean and the other Jewish students hiding in the boarding school, we learn their fate and it causes great sadness.All of these different layers help to make the story seem more realistic. The boarding school is run by Pere Jean (Philippe Morier-Genoud), a strict missionary who puts up with little foolishness. But after Jean's arrival, Julien witnesses a different side of the headmaster. The fact that this Catholic priest would help Jewish children hide in his boarding school, putting him and the school at risk, is a truly courageous thing. This is yet another layer, another detail, giving the film great depth. Because no one is completely innocent, or completely bad, everyone is involved in the tale of wartime survival."Au Revoir, Les Enfants" is a heartfelt, masterful film everyone should witness for themselves. Description doesn't do it justice.Malle also worked in American film, creating some interesting stories, the best of which is "Atlantic City" starring Burt Lancaster and Susan Sarandon in an early role.If you haven't experienced the work of Louis Malle, now is the time. "Elevator to the Gallows", an early Malle film, was also just released by Criterion. Check it out.
I know I shouldn't like this ... but I do. Yes, the movie is juvenile.  Yes, the movie has some gross out moments.  Yes, the plot is basic.But it is still fun!  I know that now that I am in my twenties, I am supposed to be more into classical films and literature, and modern smart and well written films and literature, and I am, but I also really like movies like this.Films like Out Cold, Hackers, Grind , etc. all have that same magical combination of good times, outrageous skills or situations, comedy, adventure, and some deeper meaning.  Ultimately, these types of movies speak to the inner child in all of us, especially those of us that missed out on some of the light hearted teen years, due to some reason, or another.Don't watch this movie to learn anything, or to expand your mind.  Watch it to have a good time, and get some great laughs
Awesome. This film captures the art of courage and self esteem and that we all have a  purpose in life despite the we way we were born. Herw we have a little guy 3 feet tall with the ehart of a lion and i also concur with the statement that when God made him it was for a reason. Please watch the film to find out the reason
Love my DVD. I am very happy with my DVD, it was in great condition, thank yo
Old Movies. I have wanted this movie for a long time.  It is one of my favorates.  Also found the price not to bad
Ghost Busters With A Kick. If You Love Any Kind Of Ghost Movies This Should Be A Definite Buy! This Movie Is Funny And Creepy At All The Right Moments And Michael Fox Gives An Outstanding Performance Throughout. And Not To Mention The Acting Done By Jake Busey Was Also Incredible. This Is An All Out Fun Film That Should Definitely Get Picked Up, Especially If You Like Any Of Peter Jacksons Works
Informative. Nice little video for my Zen during my long wait at the doctor's office.  Confucius overcame many difficulties
JFK: The Case for Conspiracy. This is the most definative presentation of all the Kennedy Assasination materials availble for review. By far the most factual. When all eyewitnesses are interviewed and all the Doctors at Parkland and all the eyewitnesses at the autopsy are heard, there leaves little doubt to the conclusion. There's no fluff just fact. I own all other presentations and the Peter Jennings presentation is on the other end of this spectrum. The 3D animation is so ridicolous and unaccurate relative to the Zappruder Film I can't believe it and neither should you. A cartoon which never accounts for the 3rd bullet hitting the President in the back as shown on Zappruder Film and no interviews with the Parkland Doctors or Bethesda Staff of x-ray teams who say " That's not the x-rays we took." What kind of reporting is that. John Kennedy has been dead a long,long time now and the events that occured the day he died are more than just a compelling story. It's hard, or mabey not so hard, to believe that a grand conspiricy took place because Kennedy had an agenda that did not set well with many people from many powerful places inside and outside government. The mission was accomplished. It dosn't matter who did it but it does matter that more than 1 person did. Although the Congressional Panel concluded that as fact, that's as far and as much as we will ever get. If you want to know what happened and get on with your life, JFK: The Case for Conspiracy, is the only choice if you just want the facts and hear the real eyewitnessees tell the story.
fabulous childhood memories brought back to me. Even though this cinderella does not have the modern day "movie magic", (in fact, the sets are pretty corny)...That does not hurt, or take away any of the  wonderful memories of when I was a little girl, and looked forward every year for the airing of "cinderella" and "The wizard of oz"  I was thrilled to have found this, and would highly, highly recomend it to any 40+ woman out there that has the memory of this wonderful version of cinderella. Leslie Ann Warren is simply timeless in this
Better Then I though It Was Going To Be. I really didn't think that Raquel Welch could hold her own in a western picture. However, as in the past I was wrong again. Bandolero has a star-studded cast that featured James Stewart who played the role of Mace Bishop, Dean Martin plays the role of Dee Bishop, Raquel Welch plays the role of Maria Stoner and George Kennedy plays the role of Sheriff Johnson. Dee Bishop and his gang of outlaws try to rob a small bank close to the border of Mexico. While in the process their caught and are supposed to be hung for ******. Enters Mace Bishop who portrays himself as the hangman here to a job. Bishop arrives in town with the intention of freeing a gang of outlaws, including his brother, from the gallows. Mace urges his younger brother to give up crime. The sheriff chases the brothers to Mexico. While on their way towards the border they take Maria Stoner as a ******* with them. They join forces, however, against a group of Mexican bandits who mortally wound both brothers. Watching Raquel body bake in the Mexico heat and sun made this picture worth it
Love and Dominance. Takuya loves Satsuki and Satsuki loves Takuya-at least until she finds out that that what Takuya really loves is being dominated and abused by her. Moonlight whispers lies somewhere between THE PIANO TEACHER and SECRETARY as a thoughtful look at how a relationship based on domination can develop between two people, but it is presented in a manner unlike the two films I just mentioned. All three share a wide eyed fascination with the subject, but where SECRETARY approaches it with humor and THE PIANO TEACHER with horror, MOONLIGHT WHISPERS is out to tell a genuine love story. It helps that the two characters are high school students who appear almost entirely innocent about the subject of love at the beginning of the film. The blurb on the box says that watching MOONLIGHT WHISPERS is like watching a very kinky episode of "Dawson's Creek". And it's right, only I'd hasten to add that the film is better written and acted than the sitcom. Not that I ever watched that show. Ever. I first saw this film at the New York S&M Film Festival (I was there for the films, not the S&M, thank you) and despite containing very little of what we generally think of as S&M, it was an audience favorite. It's worth your attention
Nausiating. I have never seen anything like what is contained in this documentary.  I am forever changed.  I bought the DVD to be enlightened about "whatever it was" the film was about; I never thought it would have affected me the way it did.  It can not be stated enough how imperative it is that people see this film
One more time -- the greatest of all movies. It is impossible to overpraise this film on any dimension of quality. Visually, it is so rich that I have found in my many watchings of it that it is worth taking your eyes off the centre of the screen and just absorbing what is going on at its peripheries. Depth of image, chiarascuro, mise-en-scen, mood and texture -- all are so nuanced. The cast is almost the definitive Classical Academy of French film and drama of the last century. Only Jean Marais is missing (catch him along with the underrated Maria Casares, who plays the only muted -- and smewhat boring -- part in Les Enfants -- in Cocteau's Orphee -- same period roughyl, same visual brilliance and the same five star rating), Pierre Barasseur, whose 19th century grand passion performance from Othello is in itself superb, the haunting Jean-Louis Barrault who with his wife Madeleine Renaud was the leader in classical French theater post World War II, and of course Arletty, the enigma around whom the entire film centers.... I cannot think of any film with such a peerless cast. Them there is Jaques Prevert's script.... And Carne's direction is peerless, reflecting perhaps his own very enigmatic personality; his other films share the visual and dramatic power of Les Enfants but seem more dated; here, somehow he found the exact style to create a film deeply rooted in history but not locked into it. No one has ever directed such a cast of varied and great actors and given them so much space of expression and style while maintaining a unity.The film is Balzacian in its breadth of story -- reminiscent of Pere Goriot perhaps? -- and covers so many moods and themes and scenes. It can be very funny -- Brasseur as the vain, worldly Frederick LeMaitre -- and so deeply sad -- Barrault as Baptiste, both of which are portrayals based on real actors of the 19th century and both of which are genuinely great in their capturing of the grand acting style of the period without this being pastiche or artificial.It is impossible to overrate this film. If you haven't seen it, don't be put off by the idea that it's a period piece, black-and-white, French and sure to be boring. It's over sixty years old now and still profoundly beautiful, deeply moving and most of all unforgettable.
Forgotten 80's ... Hiding Out has been hiding out from the funny 80's teen flicks. It has been lost in between the Brat Pack and John Hughes finest, but it is just as corny/funny as the rest of them. Jon Cryer plays Andrew a stockbroker running for his life from the mob and the feds who are attempting to protect him. After narrowly escaping from the Mob, Andrew assumes a new identity in a new town. What is not planned ahead is the fact that he will be a high-schooler again.The interactions with teachers, fellow students, love interests, and his dorky cousin Patrick make this movie quality for the genre it belongs in.Good soundtrack and memorable quotes round out this lost flick.
Harry Block Lives in a Fellini Movie. An homage to Fellini with dream sequences in which Harry Block's fictional characters from his short stories interwine with his real-life characters, Deconstructing Harry is about a writer who cannibalizes his life experience, using his loved ones and family as fodder for his fiction and who in the process alienates, humiliates, and enrages those people who prefer their secrets not be featured in published fiction. Amongst this turmoil the writer Harry is obsessed with freeing himself from himself--a sixty-year-old man who never grows up but who remains fixated on his childish ego, his raging lusts, and his incurable narcissism.  Divorced several times, barely able to see his young son, and resenting that a lover whom he scorned is now marrying, he must negotiate between the people he has alienated and the fictional characters who merge with reality as he goes on a soul quest to answer the question: Can I ever grow up? I can't reveal the ending but will say that the film maintains a Fellinisque, comic tone that has a hint of magic. The film does an excellent job of showing Harry's real-life adventures and weaving them with dramatizations of his stories that parallel his condition.
A great film about Van Gogh. Lust for Life based on Irving Stone's novel about Vincent Van Gogh (1853-1890) was filmed in 1956 and directed by Vincente Minnelli. Kirk Douglas as Vincent crackles with intensity. He won a Golden Globe award for his portrayal; depicting Van Gogh's artistic growth, deep loneliness and inevitable descent into madness with sensitivity and pathos. It is a moving performance that, along with Spartacus and Paths of Glory, is one of his best. Anthony Quinn as Paul Gauguin won a Best Supporting Actor Academy Award. James Donald is especially touching as Vincent's loving Brother Theo. The film features a powerful and poignant musical score by the great film and Classical Music composer Miklos Rozsa, composer of music for Ben-Hur, Double Indemnity, Ivanhoe and The Lost Weekend amongst many others. This film is, along with John Huston's Moulin Rouge made in 1952 about the life of Toulouse-Latrec, one of my favorite Hollywood films about an artist.As soon as the titles appear on this recently released DVD you are aware of the superb transfer to disc. Written with Van Gogh's trademark thick impasto technique, they leap off the screen with 3-dimensional brilliance, breathtakingly alive. This is important because the film contains dozens of Van Gogh's most famous art works, all filmed from the originals in the possession of private collectors and museums. With their thick swirls of color and movement, the images are stunningly beautiful; making the DVD of the film a living art gallery. This was worth the price of the DVD for me. I wish there was some way each one of the paintings could have been bookmarked on the DVD to make them easier to find. Alas no. However, the other more disappointing aspect of this DVD release is that it does not contain the 30 minute long "Making of" documentary that often followed the showing of this film on Turner Classic Movies. This fine documentary showed how modern locations in Holland, Belgium and France were painstakingly converted into the late 19th Century locations actually painted by Van Gogh. It also showed how Kirk Douglas developed his characterization. It featured the process by which extras were chosen amongst local townspeople, including one old French woman who had actually known Van Gogh, had seen him paint and remarked upon Douglas' uncanny resemblance to the painter. It is a wonderful little film and its absence from this DVD is inexplicable. There is certainly room for it. The only extras are a 3 minute trailer and a fine commentary by Dr. Drew Casper, a film historian who gives a deeper, more academic analysis of the film than is usual for a commercial release not on Criterion or Kino. This was a missed opportunity by Turner Entertainment that makes no sense and is deeply disappointing.The film is in color shot in widescreen with an aspect ratio of 2.35:1 enhanced for widescreen TVs. It looks beautiful, almost 3-dimensionally vivid. It is 122 minutes in length. Sound is offered in Dolby Digital 5.1 Surround and sounds glorious. Miklos Rozsa's music sounds especially alive. Languages for menus are English and French. Subtitles are in English, French and Spanish. The region code is NTSC 1.This is a film definitely worth getting for its beauty and its excellence. Its lack of appropriate extras is disappointing but that is tempered by gratitude for finally having this wonderful, deeply moving film available on DVD. I strongly recommend this DVD release for that fact alone.Mike Birma
An underrated gem. This underrated, highly entertaining satire boasts memorable performances, clever camera angles and a spirited production design. Look for a red-headed, scene-stealing Douglas Spain (Walkout, Band of Brothers, Resurrection Blvd) as one of gone-with-the-gays True Directions' "misfits." His climactic tearful speech is both touching and hilarious. Pop the corn, kick back and treat yourself to this delightful romp
Probably the Best Drama Series Ever Made. I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out
It is all a lie. Although it might seem like an odd starting point, the first time I heard of Kurosawa's Rashomon was when I read Iris Chang's Rape of Nanking for the first time a few years ago. Within this book she alluded to the film because of the various stories detailing the atrocities committed in Nanking differed greatly depending on the source of information. Anyway, a couple of years after that I read Akutagawa Ryuunosuke's short story "Rashomon" and noticed that it really did not fit Chang's brief description of the movie and it was not until I read a later short story in the collection, "In the Grove", did I find the actual short story the film was based on.The film Rashomon was Western film audiences' first real exposure to the films of Kurosawa Akira and it ignited the flame of interest in Kurosawa's films for decades to come. And with good reason, because Rashomon is truly an excellent film and it still tops best films ever made lists constantly.During a terrible rainfall three men, a priest, a woodcutter, and a bandit, duck into the ruins of the Rashomon gate to escape the massive downpour. The priest and the woodcutter have just returned from a court case detailing the murder of a samurai by the bandit Tajomaru. Listening to Tajomaru's testimony it seems like a pretty cut and dry case. He wanted the samurai's wife for his own and after raping her he killed her husband as she asked him to do. However, after listening to the wife's story and even the dead husband's story through a medium, it is hard to say what the truth...isThe old saying goes "History is written by the victors" and Rashomon definitely displays not only how different people view the same events, but how lies thread their way into the truth and corrupt it. Kurosawa depicts the scene with the samurai, his wife, and the bandit Tajomaru four times within the film's 88 minutes, and the resulting juxtaposition is quite enjoyable.
Nice and awesome. I absolutely love Atlantis. From Ronon Dex, to Sheppard, and to all the faces. I'd cry if Atlantis was cancelled. Seriously though, Steve should have never have died, he should also have been put in command of SG1. Can you imagine that..."Why Steve, welcome to Earth...you're welcome to live out your life, if you only feed in self defense on enemies...'kay? Oh, you're also in charge of Sg1. :P" But seriously, the Wraith make this show so awesome. From Steve to Bob to Edward, to Gordon and Alexander, to Michael and Eric (by far James's best performance yet).The Wraith make this show what it is. But one thing??? Why don't we have Before I Sleep? Seriously, you have no idea how irked I am at that, since I began watching in S.2.12.Anyways, I think Atlantis totally pwns SG1
A Christmas Classic. For every season, there is a classic movie.  In our house, "A Christmas Story" tops the list when Christmas rolls around.  Without a doubt this movie is a classic!  Ralphie and his quest for the Red Ryder BB gun -- I do love this movie.
Gary Cooper's God & Country. This is one of the best American films ever. It stands out as a monument to America's greatest era. It has the most representative American actor of all times, Gary Cooper, and possibly the second best American director ever, Howard Hawks. It's a piece of Americana. It's a religious, patriotic, social, and political film, but above all, it's a masterpiece. Its key moment (truly beautiful) is when York is rummaging about his dilemma between God or Country. Then he finds those illuminating verses: "to Caesar what is Caesar's, and to God what is God's". Ask yourself if in 2007 Americans are giving each its due (or rather stealing from them).The film is respectuful to the religious beliefs of people. It portrays the commonsense and hardships of hardworking country folk with no abuse or ridicule; it is emotional and funny; it is realistic and sensitive. It has great trench war scenes, wonderful family gathering scenes, and beautiful settings in the country. Nobody but Hawks (or John Ford) could have risked making this complicated film, and come up with something so perfect. It's embarrassing to think of what could be done today with a story like this one, especially when political, social and religious elements are involved. Hawks handles every thread of the story amazingly.Curiously enough the real Alvin York requested that Cooper play the leading role, and would not accept anyone else (to allow the rights for the story), and he also requested that the girlfriend didn't "drink, smoke or swear"; and she does a splendid performance too (she was only 16).The extra disc comes with 2 documentaries, one 1/2 hour long, about the story of the real York, and another, some 50 minutes about Cooper's career, and hosted by Clint Eastwood. Pretty good both.The value of the film itself is enough for any classic film collector to rush to get it. But, as I said already, it is also a piece of Americana, worth using as an educational tool in towns that have forgot how truly great America once was.With God & Country you have Gary Cooper.No God & Welfare, you have Michael Moore
Reply to writer from San Marco, CA. Arsenal's home jersey's are red, but their away jersey's are yellow.  Travelling fans will often wear their home jersey's when following their team on the road, but the team will naturally be wearing their away jerseys.  This is consistent for all teams across Europe - different colour home and away kits
Mis-matched friendship. Enough people have generally explained the plot, so I will not. Suffice it to say this is Mischa's best movie, and perhaps the best of any actors early performance. Unfortunately, her subsequent major roles are hit-and-miss - "Skipped Parts" being a hit, and "Lost and Delirious" is to be avoided at all costs.Sam Rockwell was also excellent as "Trent", the friend of Mischa's character ("Devon").Elsewhere I read the one negative review of this movie by someone who seemed upset over nudity and child pornography. The fact that Mischa is topless for a few seconds (and shot from across the street, at night, and about 2 inches tall on my TV) does not quite fit the category of child pornography, I do not think, unless you are predisposed that way and really, really hard up.This is a story about a mis-matched friendship, and all the prejudices that attracts, plain and simple. Great dialog, too.Also, ignore the DVD cover - it has nothing to do with the movie. Why the mother takes up half the cover is a mystery - she is a minor character. The picture of the shirtless man is, I think, from the photo of his high-diving award, and the image of Devon and Trent on the truck actually takes place on a river bank, not on a lawn. I suppose it is Hollywood's influence creeping in - fortunately it does not affect the movie.
A Decent Film In Storytelling: Worth A Look!. "To Live," does not hold the same appeal for me as it once did in the past. However, I do recommend viewers to at least take a look at this film. The films narrative deals with the lives of Fugui and Jiazhen, a husband and wife with two children, as well as Fugui's mother. The time period is from the 1940s up to the 1980s. Because Fugui has a gambling problem the family loses everything: house and possessions, which splits the family apart. It is a time when the Chinese Nationalist's and Communist's are battling for control of China. Further, the film deals with the social upheaval that is afffecting the lives of many Chinese. Although the film never criticizes the changes incurred by Mao Tse Tung, just the view of the how people's lives were affected accomplishes this task very well.And although this film does not look deeply enough at the changes taking place in China in the chaotic 40s, 50s, and 60s with Mao's reforms and its affects on the people; I don't think that this is what the director had in mind. Especially regarding the films main protagonists. On later viewings I realized that there was much missing in the film which could have made this a truly great film. As the viewer, one witnesses the changes occuring in China, but the real horror of Mao's reforms are put on the backburner. There is social upheaval occuring, but it appears tame in comparison to actual events. However, Fugui and his pregnant wife are the films main protagonists, and the film is about their life in this new China. With poverty now a way of life, Fugui decides to work at a puppet troupe. After the birth of their first child [a son] Jiazhen returns to Fugui, however, civil war has broken out causing Fugui to leave for the fight. The rise of Mao changes everything for these two individuals in the films narrative.And even though they have suffered [as many other did too] they never complain. The film never throws Mao at the viewer, but he is left in the background of the film. However, this was a very clever use of directing in order to tell the story of these two individuals. This is a decent film of human tragedy, which I only feel could have been so much more. I recommend the film to those viewers [rent it first] who are not familiar with this period in Chinese history. This is not a propaganda film, but a film about those caught in the unheaval of turbulent times. Recommended. [Stars: 4.5
Kiefer Sutherland Keeps Control of &quot;Ground Control&quot;. I'm not a ground controller, so I won't even try to analyze the technical aspects of this movie. I fully admit that I purchased &quot;Ground Control&quot; mainly because Kiefer Sutherland is the star and I love his acting. Even in movies that aren't the &quot;best&quot;, Kiefer always delivers a fine performance, and &quot;Ground Control&quot; is no exception. I could list some negatives about the movie, such as the inclusion of Kristy Swanson in the cast. This woman adds nothing to the plot and isn't the least bit convincing, except when it becomes obvious that she has her eye on Jack (Kiefer)and follows him around, even during what should be private moments for him. Nothing personal against Kristy, but most of her contribution could have ended up on the cutting room floor and it would have been no loss. Kiefer Sutherland, however, proves again what a versatile actor he is as the tormented Jack Harris, a top notch ground controller, who years later, still feels responsible for a crash that was not his fault. Now, as a favor to his friend, Jack comes to lend a hand at Phoenix ground control, and soon finds himself in an all too familiar situation. This movie would fall apart if Kiefer Sutherland had not been in the role of Jack Harris. This is Kiefer's movie all the way, and every facial expression and word and action is totally Kiefer. He had me thoroughly convinced of what Jack Harris had gone through, and was still going through. I actually learned a lot from this movie. I learned that being a ground controller is NOT a cushy job, and the controllers who keep thousands of planes safe every day are more often than not overworked and in danger of burnout.....but they keep going. I know I couldn't be that dedicated......this is not a job I could handle. I give &quot;Ground Control&quot; high marks. Sure, it may not fit the definition of &quot;award winning&quot;, but Kiefer Sutherland plows through the weaknesses of the film and he simply makes it work
Curleycue_82 has it down!. I agree with you Curleycue_82. I couldn't wait to write a review to these people
A must if you enjoyed Hartman's comedy. After all, this is very simple: you should have this if Phil Hartman made you laugh.Yes, some reviewers are correct, this DVD could be better. Maybe there are missing, funnier, sketches; maybe the finale is too romantic; maybe ...  (that's why it gets a 4 star rating from me).But still, this will make you laugh and remember good old Phil.Among others, you will find him impersonating Bill Clinton, Frank Sinatra, Phil Donahue, Alm. Stockdale, Donald Trump, Jesus, Barbara Bush, Frankenstein, Ronald Reagan and Ed McMahon. He also appears as the Unfrozen Caveman Lawyer, a russian weightlifter, the Anal Retentive Chef, and other funny characters.Again, if you were a Hartman fan and miss him, get this. It might not be perfect but it's good enough. Hopefully they will make a second DVD with more sketches
Enjoyable and fun!. I was skeptical when I first heard they were making a "Freddy vs Jason" movie. The chances of getting it totally wrong seemed quite high. After viewing the film, however, I was pleasantly surprised. The plot makes a twisted kind of sense, the performances by Robert Englund and Ken Kirzinger are inspired and enthusiastic, and the special effects are top-notch.As a Nightmare on Elm Street fan, I was pleased that the movie seemed to fit the tone of previous Nightmare movies. I was, however, intrigued by the Jason backstory and scenes. Since then I have become a fan of the Friday the 13th pictures also.If you like either franchise, you will most likely enjoy Freddy vs Jason. Even though the final battle might not end the way you would prefer
The Day the Earth Stood Still. This is the original classic movie that everyone should see.  The props and the technology of film making has advanced but the differences in our world are the same.  Man only does one thing well.  He finds improved ways of killing each other.  In this movie, though many years old, man is faced with a dilemma.  Live in harmony or be eliminated by higher intelligence.  Let's face it folks, no intelligent life form would want to have anything to do with a race of people that only excell at murdering each other and their own environment!   It is a great movie
An important story. This film opens and closes with footage from a Czech news program in 1998, talking about Righteous Gentile Nicholas Winton, who saved 669 children from the Nazis in the late Thirties, and reuniting him with some of those very children he saved, who are now old.  He would have saved even more than that had WWII not broken out in September of 1939, as he had had plenty of more names of children to be saved and transported to safety on his lists.  However, to save these children, Mr. Winton had to convince their parents to do the unthinkable, to say goodbye to them and send them away on a train alone, to a strange new country (England), where they didn't speak the language, didn't know anybody, and would be taken into the homes of strange families they had never met.  One of those 669 children was David Silberstein, whom we meet in this film.  His parents, Jakub and Irma, have a comfortable, rather privileged life (his father is a doctor, after all), and a big happy family.  David's other loved ones include his older sister Hedvica, who is always going to the movies to make out with her boyfriend (later husband) Robert, who works as a projectionist, his uncle Leo, who is a cantor, his uncle Sam, who is a successful violinist, his uncle Max, who is somewhat of an itinerant wanderer, rather like a Gypsy, and his best friend Sosha Klein, his childhood sweetheart (a rather cute little girl).  Like most families in Europe at the time, the Silbersteins too think that what's happening in Nazi Germany won't happen in a civilised place like Czechoslovakia, even after the Germans invade their homeland and gradually start making life harder for them.  However, since this film takes place entirely in the late Thirties, and is told through the eyes of a child, we never see anything very bad happening.  Things did not really start to get really bad in Czechoslovakia for a few years more; most Czech Jews were still living in their own houses, even with increasing persecution and restrictions, until 1942.  The bad things that happen are things like the Silbersteins' car getting taken by Nazis, a little German boy throwing a knife into one of their trees over and over again, and Uncle Sam's beautiful young Gentile fiance Alenka (who is about half his age) breaking the engagement because of pressure from her father and because, as Sam puts it, her fear was stronger than her love.The main focus of the film is the happy normal life this family enjoys just prior to the end of innocence, making it a more subtle portrayal of these years than one normally expects from such films.  Many films about these years seem to start with normal life but then move into more and more horror and sadness, but not so here.  It also moves back and forth between the respective characters instead of putting all of the focus on the storyline of Nicholas Winton convincing Irma and Jakub to make the arrangements so David can be put on one of the trains going to safety in England before it's too late.  That storyline only really comes into focus towards the end of the film, when Uncle Sam introduces his friend Mr. Winton to his brother and sister-in-law, urging them to save David, even if they may be convinced nothing bad is going to happen to them and find it foolish to try to leave their homeland just because their people are being persecuted yet again.Though this film does move a bit slowly, and may annoy some viewers by how it jumps back and forth between the different characters and their storylines instead of staying focused on one main plot, this kind of cinematic approach can work very effectively at really drawing the viewer into the story unfolding, making him or her truly care about these different characters and what happens to them.  I only wish that there have been some kind of epilogue, even with just text on the screen, telling us about the respective fates of David's loved ones, even knowing that David was the sole survivor of his family.  It kind of leaves the viewer hanging, wondering what exactly happened to them after the war began, if they tried to leave or go into hiding, how long they survived, if Robert and Hedvica went through with it and tried to cross into Slovakia, just about the only safe border that was left, to fulfill their dream of going to Palestine, and if their baby were a boy or a girl.  The film really ends just as the viewer is really getting involved in these people's lives.  My only other problem was how, on the back of the DVD, the blurb actually twice says "The Silberstein's" when clearly it meant "The Silbersteins."  It's so embarrassing when errors like this make their way into print, since it only encourages people who genuinely think that an apostrophe makes a word plural, and other just-as-basic grammatical errors that no one out of elementary school should still be making.  Extras include a number of trailers, photo galleries, and filmographies for Rupert Graves (Nicholas Winton) and Josef Abrhm (Dr. Jakub Silberstein)
Magnificent. Truly an enjoyable sports movie!  Redford is genuine in his portrayal of Roy Hobbs.  This movie makes you wish it was based on a true story.  It also causes you to dream of the things little boys have been dreaming of for ages.  I highly recommend The Natural to anyone who ever had a dream of doing something great or keeping a promise made to your father
the eiger sanction. I like this Eastwood movie; I always found myself watching it when it came on TV so I bought it
I ENJOYED IT FOR WHAT IT WAS!  ENTERTAINMENT --. Yup! just bought it for a chance to see some other Kiefer Sutherland movie.  He does hold the movie together.And I am always interested in Michael Gross [from Tremors]  He did play an excellent by the book nerd.And who could pass up the scene where Winkler pull the goose [or was it a duck [:-) ] out.I generally have no use for the ultimate head-boss who makes decisions without being aware of the chaos they generate.Then there was Leonard, mister know it all.Yet they all worked together to make a movie of entertainment - even if the actual facts were blurred as to true life.You had to feel the same sorrow that the emotionally wounded Jack Harris felt at the lose of the hundred and some souls.Humanity is what it is all about.  Not numbers.Can a plane actually be landed that way?  This DVD was well worth the price.  Don't let others color what your opinion is of what you enjoy.  Just see for yourself.Definitely Recommend.  For Sutherland alone
The First Suitcase Bomb In Film. Wow, what a movie! This 1955 Robert Aldrich film is way ahead of its time. Not only in terms of subject matter, but stylistically. Shot in shadowy black and white, scenes are displayed at angles with an almost dizzying effect. The film was supposedly very influential on the French New Wave directors of the early Sixties and I can see why. It is a detective story based upon a Mickey Spillane novel with Ralph Meeker playing Mike Hammer the detective. I had never seen Ralph Meeker in any sort of role other than a supporting one (Paths Of Glory, The Naked Spur), but the dapper-dressed, muscular Meeker, given the part of his life, comes through brilliantly as the arrogant, self-absorbed snoop who pimps out his secretary to obtain information. It makes one wonder why he had so few leading roles.I believe, other than that secretary, he doesn't meet a woman with anything on other than a trench coat until the movie's end. The only extra on the DVD is an alternative ending in which our "hero" is blown to bits by some sort of nuclear device contained in a suitcase. The true ending, the one Aldrich chose for the complete film, has Meeker escaping the exploding house. But for how long? Other than references by his police detective friend to the Manhattan Project and Los Alamos, nothing is ever explained about the device in the suitcase. When its top is lifted, a bright, burning glow is emitted, and when completely removed, hell is unleashed, but how much? Is Los Angeles ultimately incinerated by a nuclear holocaust? We never know from the film.
Love Story Secondary. This is one of the best movies I have ever seen.  It is certainly a love story, but for me this is only important in that love is one of the things most of us look for in life.  The deeper search, and this is where Asia'a character starts out, is for a life that is not "frayed at the edges," perhaps another way of saying "whole."  What plays out is two people, driven in part, for certain, by their passion for each other, but even more for their passion for authenticity, who deepen themselve, each other and an amazing relationship through that search.  It is the insistence of each of these people to fully honor themselves, individually, that causes them to succeed both in their personal quest and in love.  It is they way they ultimately honor each other.  This is a deep life lesson that is not learned by many, which, perhaps, is why so many reviewers miss it.What they learn is that when they find themselves, "They Can't take that away from me," as the music that accompanies the credits at the end says.A fantastic flic.  Good music, color, cinematography, acting, editing and other things, too
Nice and awesome. I absolutely love Atlantis. From Ronon Dex, to Sheppard, and to all the faces. I'd cry if Atlantis was cancelled. Seriously though, Steve should have never have died, he should also have been put in command of SG1. Can you imagine that..."Why Steve, welcome to Earth...you're welcome to live out your life, if you only feed in self defense on enemies...'kay? Oh, you're also in charge of Sg1. :P" But seriously, the Wraith make this show so awesome. From Steve to Bob to Edward, to Gordon and Alexander, to Michael and Eric (by far James's best performance yet).The Wraith make this show what it is. But one thing??? Why don't we have Before I Sleep? Seriously, you have no idea how irked I am at that, since I began watching in S.2.12.Anyways, I think Atlantis totally pwns SG1
The lesbian classic that raised the bar!. This is the definitive lesbian love story that launched the genre in a new direction.  Out of the dirty bars and masculine flannel shirts, away from the creepy angst of punks.  This wonderful love story brings lesbian love into the light of day with beautiful women, looking and acting sexy, and leading productive, respectable lives.  WHY NOT portray lesbians as beautiful, educated, clean, classy, talented, sober, drug-free, non-violent, non-"self-destructive", straight forward, honest...oh, and truly SEXY??  The Reno landscape in the 50's is a great backdrop for the conflicts that lesbians encountered.  The filming is top notch, the sets and period clothing are spot on.  The musical scores are superb!The cast was wonderful!  Charbonneau and Shavers are sensational as total opposites who eventually become drawn and attrated to each other.  Just a masterful duette of performances!  Cay, free and fully out, forward and knowing just what she wants; Vivian, tentative and reluctant to step outside of her cultured and closed box.  Every minute they spend with each other oozes electricity and sexual tension. Two georgeous women making love??  HELLO!  The love scene is landmark.  Audra Lindley is wonderful and perfectly cast as Cay's stepmom.  Cay's best friend, Silver, is absolutely a key role in the dynamics of these chracters; she is the definative support and validation that these women are wonderful people, and deserve love and happiness.  We all need a little "Silver" in our lives!!This story is completely intriguing, and HEY, what a wonderful ending!  SEQUEL, SEQUEL!!! This is an absolute must have in any collection.  Timeless tale of the beauty of lesbian love.
sweet story. my neighbor totoro is another film from the same guy who made howl's moving castle. it has the same kind of story and if you like how's moving castle then this is one that you would like to see too
This animated series led to so much, the novels, movies and three other series. As a fan of the original Star Trek series, I was overjoyed when the animated series aired and sad when it ended. I remember being impressed with the quality of the animation at the time and was impressed once again when I watched this tape. Produced in 1973, the animation was state of the art and allowed the producers to create space scenes that would have been impossible with human actors.In the first episode, "The Survivor", the Enterprise encounters a damaged ship and beams aboard what appears to be a human. He is a famous man who has used his fortune to come to the aid of people in distress. Lost five years earlier, he passes all biometric identification tests, although there are some anomalies in his medical tests. Furthermore, his fianc from before his being lost in space is on board the Enterprise. The man is in fact a creature that is capable of assuming any form and of rendering humans unconscious for short periods of time. It renders Captain Kirk unconscious, assumes his form and orders the Enterprise into the neutral zone with the Romulans. The creature also sabotages the ship, rendering it vulnerable to attack.The problem is discovered, but before the Enterprise can return to Federation space, it is surrounded by the Romulans. Kirk realizes that the creature is a Romulan spy and refuses to surrender the ship. A battle ensues and he is able to extricate the Enterprise.In the second episode, "The Lorelei Signal", the Enterprise is sent to a region of space where a star ship has disappeared on a precise schedule for many years. When the appropriate time arrives, the ship receives a strangely compelling signal. While it renders the men listless and easily manipulated, although it has no affect on the women. Kirk, Spock, and McCoy beam to the surface and are captured by the female inhabitants. They are rapidly drained of their life energy, aging very rapidly. Lieutenant Uhura takes command of the Enterprise and rescues the people on the surface and resolves the situation. This makes this episode one of the best, it is probably the first time that a black woman was  ever placed in command in a television show.The quality of the dialog of these episodes is outstanding, a tribute to the writers and producers. Using the voices of the actors of the original series also enhances the realism; they are some of the best cartoons ever made for television. Every fan of Star Trek will appreciate them
A powerful and moving story. I initially wanted to see this movie because I am a huge Oliver Martinez fan and I wanted to see more of his work.  The fact that Oliver does not appear until the end of this movie did not really cause a problem for me.  I was so engrossed from beginning to end with this movie that I hardly noticed Oliver was missing.  Javier Bardem has to be one of the most passionate actors I have ever seen.  I was mesmerized by his protrayal of Reinaldo Arenas.  And while this movie may not be for everyone, I would say it is the best biographical movie I have seen in my lifetime.  As added bonuses, there was Oliver Martinez, for me, of course.  Also, Sean Penn was very good in his few minutes on the screen.  Johnny Depp had me lauging out loud at his potrayal of the transvite and the officer.  His facial expressions alone are pure comical genius.  And, while I am a huge Johnny Depp fan,as well, I am glad his parts were minimal as Javier Bardem is the true acting genius in this film.  I am now going to further investigate Reinaldo Arenas and Javier Bardem and see what else they have done that may interest me.  Isn't that the true motivation of a movie or writer....making you want more from them?
Movie releasing in March 2007. Private school despite its weak story line is still one of my favorite 80's movies. FYI - It is due to release on DVD in March 2007. Enjoy
Great Great Great !. This is mostly a showcase of Bruce Lee, Jackie Chan,Samo Hung and other greats.The fight are some the greatest ever made for the silver screen.If one movie could show in 90 minutes the real meaning of &quot;Martial  Arts&quot;,this movie is it
re: best Batman animated crossover. I always loved cross-overs, especially in animation.  The first teamup between Batman and Superman was as expected: filled with tension both over Lois Lane, and especially the way things are done.  Both Heroes take some time to find some footing with each other, and learning to work together before their super-villains try to take them out.  This character development was accomplished to an amazing degree; watching the movie you could really feel the emotions coming from them!Why do voice-actors get little respect in this country?  There should be an award for them specifically.  Kevin Conroy will always BE Batman in my mind, and Mark Hamil as the JOKER.  Even Tim Daly does a fine job as Superman. Dana Delany as Lois Lane is always terrific and makes this Lois sexy and personable.The animation was superb, it was almost as good as some Japanese animation.  the Batman "cartoons" are by far the best American animation I've ever seen.Batman brought the best out of Superman, and the Joker, well, is always as scene-stealing as ever.  I never felt Lex Luthor was that much of a super villain, no offense to those who like Lex and Superman's world.  I mean, he's ruthless and a genius and all, but he is NO Joker!the one character I felt sorry for was Mercy (Lex's assistant) geez, she got beat up a lot in this episode (by Harley, Batman)!  unfortunately, the music was not as good as it could have been, considering this was the first meeting between the Man of Steel and the Caped Crusader.  It should have been more intense and fiery.Oh well, otherwise, I have no complaints.  Whenever Superman crosses over to Batman's world, he becomes a better hero.
Good disaster movie. What I thought would be a another B movie turned out to be a good action flick.  Good actors Annabella Sciorra, Michael Biehn and quite a few other good tv actors.  Worth the money and time to see it. Characters were developed and you knew who they were and what purpose they served.  Good plot, even kept the interest of my grandchildren.  Can't find too many directors or producers that can make an interesting plot and keep it moving.  Dr. Lily McKee played by Annabelle Sciorra discovers a massive asteriod hurtling towards the earth and tries to get Feds to help and believe her. She notifies FEMA in comes Jack Wallach (Michael Biehn) he plays his role well -- better than Annablle Sciorra, sometimes she looks like she is confused...but carries her role well.  Good flick I think you'll enjoy. Good special effects.
LOVE THE WORKOUT. THIS IS THE BEST WORKOUT I'VE BEEN ABLE TO GET ON VIDEO! I'VE HAD THIS VIDEO FOR A OVER A YEAR NOW AND I ALWAYS FALL BACK ON IT.  YOU GET A GREAT CARDIO WORKOUT PLUS MUSCLE TONING-A GREAT COMBO TO BURN THE FAT. I REALLY ENJOY DENISE'S VIDEO BECAUSE YOU SEE RESULTS AND SHE KEEPS THE EXERCISES INTERESTING BUT NOT TOO COMPLICATED TO FOLLOW AND BOY DOES IT GET THE HEART RATE UP!  I ALSO REALLY ENJOY THE YOGA INFLUENCED COOL DOWN STRETCH, IT'S A NICE WAY TO COOL DOWN AFTER WORKING SO HARD
The STRONG should PROTECT the WEAK--or  slaying the "judicial/bureaucratic" Goliaths!. Paul Newman is great as a despairing, alcoholic "David", once second in his law class, once part of a prestigious law firm, once married...till he dared to stand up to his dishonest law firm owner/and father-in-law who wanted to fix a jury.The above is past history...just mentioned in the film.It is some years after, and alcoholic Newman, with only 4 cases in the last few years,...has an epiphany...where his youthful religious and ethical training reawakens  as he gets the picture, so to speak, of a woman treated unjustly, whom he can help.He forgets himself and his troubles, and the people who have pushed him around,...and starts fighting for the brain damaged young woman...against the hospital and doctors who damaged her. He will later awaken the conscience (as the movie hints) of one of the "Goliaths" he goes up against.However, there are pitfalls... as opposing lawyer Concannon is not above using any trick---or person...to destroy the case.Paul Newman's epiphany scene (which I won't describe further to spoil it for you, but which is clearly recognizable) is quite moving.His Goliaths include:  The biased, hostile Judge, the "Prince of Darkness" superlawyer Concannon (played well by James Mason, always good at suave villians), the doctors and **most** of the attending support staff who attended the unfortunate Deborah Ann Kaye,...and the somewhat hesitant Bishop Brophy, head of St. Catherine's, the hospital where Mrs. Kaye lost her baby and suffered massive brain damage.Set in Boston, a largely Catholic city (I am told) we here have nominal Catholics pitted against those of their denomination who take the Christian "Good Samaritan" story seriously.My family caution:  There are some cuss words and a brief suggestion of a bedroom scene.The Verdict implies the barely seen 12 who also are key players...the jury, who must deliver the verdict.Will they go with the letter of the law?  Or---its spirit? (If you are familiar with this phrase from the Christian faith, you have the answer...)(Hint of spoiler below)My wish is that brain injured Terri Schiavo had had a jurywho could see the spirit of the law!Instead we had lots of judges fighting turf wars against a Congress that dared(how DARE they question the unquestionable judges seemed to be the attitude)    to merely ask for a second look at the whole case.  Meanwhile, Terri slowly starved to death...Shame on us! Shades of Nazi Eugenics!!!
Odd Story, Both Visually & Audibly Entertaining. Here's an extremely stylish, different film panned by almost all the professional critics which means here's another example of why they should be ignored. You are better off reading the reviews of people here at Amazon.Being one who appreciates stylish film-making, I thoroughly enjoyed the images and the sound on this movie. I found it absolutely fascinating. Being a male, it doesn't hurt that Ashley Judd stars in it, either.To be fair, I can see where the story would turn off a number of people.The co- lead, Ewan McGregory's character, is odd and not very credible. k.d. lang's character is unlikable, there is some stupid numerology as part of the story and the ending is unsatisfying .Yet, despite the above, the story is very involving and the visuals and sound (5.1 surround) are just so good that they way outweigh the negatives.The movie flat-out entertains, which is the name of the game.
Nail on the Head. I first saw this in the theatre because I like Dennis Quaid and Scarlett Johansson.  I had never really seen Topher Grace outside of 'That 70's Show' which I never kept up with on a regular basis.  I fell in love the movie first time I saw it and bought it soon after it came out on DVD.Mr. Grace plays a 26 year-old executive moving up faster in the world than his experience allows him to comprehend.  He's become such a machine in a competivie world that he's loses his way in life.  I was able to relate to his character very well and assume many my age did too.One of mentor's has told me repeatedly that the mid-twenties can be one of the roughest times in life.  So many things are going at once on so many levels.  To me, this movie captured that.  Paul Weitz did a great job writing this.  The cast was exquisite
"Cube" has a classicly well put together screenplay held back by poor acting. After reading the very positive reveiws of this late 90's thriller I decided that it deserved at least a rental. I must confess that I am glad that I happened to stumble upon this movie on Amazon because it was everything that a horror movie should be. The Screenplay was very put together, the plot & setting were intriguing yet mysterious & the killings (Or cinematography if you want to make it sound all fancy) & visuals are quite impressive for it's 500,000$ dollar budget. Now, the only real complaint that I can say about the film is that the acting is horrid. Now dont get me wrong not ALL of the acting was that bad but I would be lying if I said that most of the actors were okay, the truth is that most of them had very little experience and THAT made the film look all-around quite a bit less professional and hard to look at as an ELITE horror film. I think that if the producers would have known when they made the film that it would do so well and have such great reveiws and number of veiwers than they would have been more than willing to dish out the few extra bucks in order to have some more experienced actors.I thought that David Hewlett played David Worth (The Architect) acceptably and I also thought that Nicky Guadagni's performance as Helen Halloway (the Doctor) was pretty good. Other than those two I thought that the acting was very lightweight. The guy that played Quentin (the cop) was really bad which was quite a shame just because that characte had a big role in the film and was really important ... also I thought that they could have gotten a better and more experienced guy to play the role of the Autistic boy (or man it was some what hard to tell...).I know that I keep going on and on about the acting but I cant wonder away from the truth to much. The concept and idea of the film was really quite brilliant, the screnplay was brilliantly written and the story line meshed with extrodinary ease. Despite the acting I was heavily impressed and the film was Overall very good.Grade: B+
A Most Beautiful Film. This is a visually lovely, well acted, heartwarming, whimsical movie.  We all loved it- my husband and I, my teenage daughter and our six year old daughters.  There's a tinge of sadness, as the little girl's mother is dead and her father doesn't take good care of her, so she goes to live with her grandparents.  There isn't a lot of action.  It's a quiet movie, not huge special effects or big action scenes.  It has a dreamy quality.  Also, the Irish accents are such a pleasure to hear!
Very Hilarious. Truely speaking, this is a very hilarious episode. Must see for every one
Mongolians?. Ever wonder where the idea of the magic carpet ride comes from? Well look no further than Raoul Walsh and Douglas Fairbanks's The Thief of Bagdad. An amalgamation of Arabian Nights magic, romance, fantasy, mythical travelogue, and sense of fun The Thief of Bagdad transcends the irony of its caricatures and stereotypes - not just from what it reifies but by what it invents.With its theme nestled squarely on the precept that "Happiness must be earned," The Thief of Bagdad starts with Fairbanks as a happy-go-lucky "Middle Eastern street thief" [the first of many negative stereotypes]. Though at first this cheerful "thief" - who feels he can take what he wants - and no rules apply, the road to salvation begins when he falls in love with the caliph's daughter (Julanne Johnston) - things take on a different significance.True to character, Fairbanks starts by pretending to be a prince to win her over. Found out, the thief ends up punished and then humbled, in the end seeking the counsel of the "holy man" he earlier abused. He is advised hat if he truly loves the princess, he himself must make the transformation and "become a prince."The epic begins when all suitors must come up with a unique gift. As with all good epics, the thief on a fantastic storybook return "there and back again" to the bottom of the sea, haunted by sirens as well as giant spiders, to the space above the clouds, where Fairbanks discovers the home of the winged horse and the sanctuary of the moon.When taking into consideration filmic representations - I was drawn to this movie via my interest in Anna May Wong - as the "Mongol Slave." However, after further consideration, I was drawn to the character of Sojin - who plays the "Mongol Prince."  With purposeful intent or by accident, the Mongol Prince comes across with the same type acquisitiveness of a Dr. Fu Manchu. Coincidence, perhaps but it is an interesting phenomenon to observe. While both the "Mongols" Slave and Prince "sneak" about the "Orientals" in our imagination are reified. Well, it is a magical carpet ride, right?Miguel Llor
Another good CSI:NY. Though CSI:NY is most least favorite of the three CSIs, they still manage to make a good one sometimes.  This is one of those good ones
I enjoyed the season premeir emensely. I enjoyed this series premier tremendously and am looking forward to watching the rest of the series.  Enterprise started before I had my PVR and was either on at a time I was unable to watch it or I never made time.  I watched one episode of Star Trek the Next Generation yesterday and it peaked my interest in watching some Star Trek episodes again.  Rather than watch episodes I've already seen, Enterprise looks like a great way to enjoy Star Trek episodes.As far as privacy concerns mentioned in other reviews, if you're paranoid, the internet isn't for you.  Keep your private things private, and not on networked computers.  Hopefully Amazon will remove reviews that do not at all pertain to the show they are attached to
Very Depressing Tale. The title of this movie holds no secrets. The Virgin suicides may have its up and downs throughout the movie but the whole time the viewer is left with an impending sense of doom. Almost every aspect of this movie is fantastic, between the acting and a great story line, but this movie is truly dramatic in that it will no doubt influence your emotions
My boys picked this out and we all loved it. Ok , so this isn't the best movie ever made , it's still one slam bang adventure movie that even though it has some places that might not be kid friendly, is still a great family action movie. Billy Zane and Kristy Swanson make a nice couple and Treat Williams is one bad guy that you can't wait to see get what he should. All in all a very good , but not great action movie for the whole famil
The Cutting Edge is a Cut Above. A working class Olympic hockey star is looking to turn pro when he gets a body slam that costs him peripheral vision and the chance to play in the big leagues. Enter a frosty, WASPy figure skater from Connecticut who has every thing she wants except a partner. She doesn't like them, or they cannot stand her.Her desperate Russian coach finds the hockey player who has the strength, stamina and spirit to skate with her, but he takes an instant dislike to her spoiled disposition and condescending temperament. The coach is convinced that both are partners who can bring home the elusive Olympic gold in figure-skating. The sparks fly.The chemistry between D. B. Sweeney and Moira Kelly is instaneous. Their evolution to a skating pair is filled with competition between them at every turn. The on-screen tension between the two build as the Nationals and Olympics draw nearer. (It doesn't hurt that Moira Kelly is actually an accomplished skater.)Sorry! You'll have to see the DVD because my narrative ends here. You will enjoy this drama-comedy of budding romance unless you don't have a romantic lace in your ice skates.There is no language or skin, but it is a story for mid-teen to adult. This is light fare that is well-acted with a good script. It is thoroughly enjoyable, and worth the purchase.My recommendations? Don't miss. Buy, don't sell.
Better than another dumb reality show any day. I loved this show, everyones already mentioned the storyline, characters, etc.  PLEASE, PLEASE put this on DVD. We NEED more shows like this nowadays, instead of another Survivor, The Simple Life, Real World, or another dumb reality show AGAIN.Hey, Executives at the Studios, come up with something original instead of following what everyone else is doing and driving the reality shows into their early graves.  Give us the Season DVD's Please.  Thank you so very much.  Hamilton and Perlman had such great chemistry together.If you've never seen this, and you like fantasy/Sci-Fi mixed with drama/action/romance then you'll love this.  It's one of those 80's TV shows that had heart.  I wish there was more like those today, thanks
DeVito & Miller? - Yup, and now on DVD. This DVD is of pretty good quality, not "remastered", but normal DVD quality, and it is in "widescreen" format, the audio is fine. There are no extra features.I wondered if this was ever coming out on DVD, and why not? Look at the cast - Danny DeVito, Penelope Ann Miller, Gregory Peck, Piper Laurie, Dean Stockwell. It did well at the box office, but then....nothing. Well it's finally here.I agree that the match-up of Danny DeVito and Penelope Ann Miller seems a bit odd at the beginning, but as the movie unfolds, you begin to understand the attraction. Danny's attraction to Penelope's character is for obvious reasons, but her's are NOT so obvious.  However, as she gets to know him she finds that, in spite of his appearance, he is not only rich and powerful, but also a smart, funny, romantic, caring person who also provides her with the most powerful aphrodisiac of all - he admits he's madly in love with her. We all find THAT very attractive in another person, don't we? Still, this movie doesn't provide that usual "guy gets the girl" ending, but leaves it hanging as a possibility, since Penelope's character, in spite of her attraction, is still somewhat put off - both by his appearance, and his profession.This is a great movie about the "merger and acquisition" frenzy of the 80's, and has absolutely stellar acting and writing. I also like that Penelope's character doesn't mind using her obvious physical assets to her advantage. After all, if you've got the smarts to back it up, then why not? All's fair, and so on. All-in-all a very enjoyable movie, maybe not for everyone, but certainly just right for some.And it really points out that you CAN'T judge a book by it's cover
"I forgot to tell you...if you catch any squirrels, give them to me.". Written by Joseph Minion (After Hours, Vampire's Kiss) and directed by Barry Shils (Wigstock: The Movie), Motorama (1991) stars Jordan Christopher Michael ("Full House", The Favor) as Gus, a ten year old boy from a dysfunctional family who decides one day to take it on the road.  Also appearing is a great many semi-recognizable names and/or faces including Dick Miller (Piranha), Jack Nance ("Twin Peaks"), Robert Picardo ("Star Trek: Voyager"), Flea (The Blue Iguana), Mary Woronov (Night of the Comet), Garrett Morris ("Saturday Night Live"), Michael J. Pollard (Roxanne), John Diehl (Stargate), Martha Quinn (Chopper Chicks in Zombietown), Sandy `Jack Klompus' Baron ("Seinfeld"), Vince Edwards ("Ben Casey"), Meat Loaf (Fight Club), Charles Tyner (The Longest Yard), Irwin Keyes (House of 1000 Corpses), Susan Tyrrell (Cry-Baby), Shelley Berman (Meet the Fockers), and Drew Barrymore (Scream), who is featured prominently on the DVD cover but appears for all of about ten seconds in the film.As I mentioned earlier, Jordan Christopher Michael plays Gus, a ten year old boy who, fed up with this messed up family, decides to hit the road by stealing a cherry late model Mustang.  Now I should probably mention the film, which appears to be set in the American southwest, actually takes place in a sort of alternate type reality where the states have different names than those we might expect...for example, the landscape featured may lead one to believe we're in Arizona, but within the film a sign might say we're in the state of Essex.  Anyway, along the way Gus starts participating in a game called `Motorama', sponsored by a gas station chain.  The game involves cards that are given to customers after purchasing at least five dollars of gas.  As participants collect cards, they remove the affixed sticker, hopefully to reveal a letter, the idea being to collect all the letters to spell out the word `Motorama' and win the grand prize which is 500 million dollars.  As Gus travels from filling station to filling station (always buying only five dollars worth of gas), he comes across all kinds of bizarre individuals including a pious gas station attendant (Diehl), a motel operator (Nance) who has an unusual prejudice towards squirrels, a psychotic, simple-minded busboy (Flea), a vindictive security systems designer (Baron), and so on...as Gus collects more and more cards, the game becomes somewhat of an obsession, one that begins to take its toll both physically and mentally (Gus seems to be aging fairly rapidly).  Eventually his travels lead Gus to a virtual no man's land, a nightmarish state marked by an over industrialized landscape (oil refineries and what not) and a plethora of individuals even more bizarre that previously experienced, all in search of the final card he needs to win the game, or so he thinks (as always, be sure to read the fine print).If what I've written doesn't make a whole lot of sense, then you should try watching this film.  I suppose there's a message or two that emerges by the end, but after about ten minutes in I stopped trying to comprehend of much of what happened as the story doesn't seem to be written to accommodate viewers expecting a straightforward tale.  By the way, on the surface this may appear to be a film geared towards children but that's certainly not the case as there is some violence, profanity, and even a bit of nekkidness, all of which contributed to the movie's `R' rating.  There are some comedic bits throughout, but many of these seem to include a dark element.  One scene in particular features Gus, in need of funds, stopping at a roadside rest stop and challenging a family man, played by Dick Miller, to a game of horseshoes for money.  Miller's character loses and has to pay up, forcing him to pull a Hansel and Gretel routine on his two, small children (seems he can afford to support his entire clan the rest of their journey).  This is the tone of much of the humor, so if it doesn't sound appealing, then you'd best skip this film altogether.  I'm unsure if I was supposed to like the character of Gus as throughout the film he's portrayed as not only a criminal (stealing a car, Motorama cards, and siphoning gas), but he also appeared a somewhat smarmy, smart-mouthed, patronizing punk in need of a beating (which he does receive, more than once).  But then again it's not like I related to any of the grownups in the movie, so whatever...I mentioned earlier a number of performers appearing in the film but one should known most of these performances are brief as Jordan Christopher Michael is the only person we spend any meaningful amount of time with...he seems like a decent actor but with this type of material it seemed to me one could act any number of ways and still have the film come off relatively the same, that being an eccentric road trip into the land of the mondo.  There was one aspect I found annoying, even after I stopped trying to make sense of things, and that was the near the end when things come full circle, in a manner of speaking.  At times it seemed the film was being weird just for the sake of being weird (which I dislike), but other times there seemed some genuineness, so I'm willing to give the movie the benefit of the doubt.  All in all this is a real curiosity piece, one that probably won't appeal to most audiences.The picture format on this Columbia/Tristar DVD release seems something of an oddity to me as it is presented in fullscreen anamorphic.  That's right, I said fullscreen anamorphic...what the hell is the point?  Seems to me those interested in only the fullscreen format would care less if the picture was anamorphic, and those interested in the anamorphic aspect would be looking for the original aspect ratio as presented theatrically.  Either way it is kind of a shame as there are tons of scenic desert vista shots that would have come across much better in the original widescreen format.  The picture itself comes across clean, and the Dolby Surround 2.0 audio comes through well enough, with subtitles available in English, French, Spanish, Portuguese, Chinese, Korean, and Thai.  As far as extras there's squat, unless you count a trailer for the 2001 David Spade film The Adventures of Joe Dirt, which I don't...Cookieman108By the way, Andy Summers, former member of the band The Police, supplied the original music for this film.  Some of it's good, but there was a repetitive quality that got on my nerves a little.
My favorite "B" movie. Do not buy this movie if you are into crazy well done effects, good acting, or being affraid.  This movie is absolutely hilarious!  I have seen it many times and I love it.  It is one of those movies that is so bad that it is good.  The Stuff commercials and songs in the movie are awesome!  A CLASSIC
Angie toting a machine-gun.  This can't get any better... Glorious trash-fest with Angie Dickinson reprising her role of hard-boiled gun-toting Wilma McClatchie, featuring Danielle Brisebois and Julie McCullough as her buck-wild daughters Billie-Jean and Polly.This isn't so much a sequel as it is a remake of the original BIG BAD MAMA.Angie Dickinson sprouts out plenty of one-line zingers while Brisebois and McCullough really just stand there looking pretty, do some requisite nude scenes, flirt with cowpokes and of course carry around machine guns in violin cases.  Produced by Roger Corman (`nuff said?)
Am I my Brothers Keeper?. I am a resident of Central New York and this story was very well known to everybody in these parts.If your reading this you probally have read some of the other reviews so I`ll be brief.This is an incredible film,you are taken to a place that exists and people that are exactly what you see...its almost like travelling back to the turn of the century when you visit the Ward farm.The Ward brothers were indeed considered outsiders by some locals but they,ultimately,were a genuine thread that made up the fabric of this community and after Delbert is charged with his brothers murder and when the people sensed a railroading by a politically minded D.A.,they rally to Delbert`s defense.It is a unique look at small town America...from its citizens,its lifestyle and its politics.The film is sometimes funny,disturbing and even uncomfortable at times but it is as powerful an experience as you could ever have.Like another documentary I have seen - Sunshine Hotel....about flophouses on the Bowery in New York City - it pulls no punches and hits hard....gritty and bold it will resonate long after its final credits have rolled
Hepburn's Best. Others have reviewed this film extensively in this forum.    Simply put, this was Audrey Hepburn's best performance, and should have brought her a second Oscar win
Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST!. The Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST drama I have seen ever. Korean, American, doesn't matter! This is better than anything I have ever seen on TV or in the movies. Hollywood cannot touch this one! Kim Myoung Min(Yi Soon Shin) is outstanding in this!(no wonder he won the 2005 KBS BEST ACTOR AWARD FOR IYSS)It starts from when he was a child to his adulthood and can be emotional, funny, sad, and can make you angry!! The numerous obstacles and prejudices this man had to overcome and then always bounced back with no complaint because of the love of his country is phenomenal!! He put his country above all else and Kim Myoung Min did a great job of portraying that!My whole family, kids and all, watched this with me and loved it!I can see why Yi Soon Shin is Korea's hero and why other countries teach his methods
Fun for Everyone. This movie is pure fun.  My whole family loved it.  It's corny and the acting leaves you feeling like it's amatuer hour, but its fun to watch.  We made popcorn and laughed our way through the whole thing.  Watch it and enjoy
It's funny, campy & interesting on several levels!. People are missing the comedy (intended and not) in their reviews.  The script reportedly went through 3 writers and they shot two endings. My friend and I think that Bruce Vilanch (who has a cameo as a bartender in a West Hollywood leather bar) may have written one of the drafts.  Jane's virtuoso comic scene in the airport ("What about Vegas? You fly to Vegas?") is priceless as she goes through a whole dramatic act about her dying sister.  The drag queen she goes to visit has several funny lines.  Diane Salinger has some classic, overdone reaction shots at the climax which are funny!  Love it and don't agree with the other reviewer who said it's not involving.  You're grabbed from the beginning by the situation, the acting, the glamorous L.A. locations, the cinematography.  I'm first in line for the DVD.  I wish they'd included the alternate ending, but supposedly there's a featurette and audio commentary by Jane and Lumet.
A MUST SEE!!. This movie touches on many emotions. Great cast. I have watched it at least 50 times and never get tired of it
Long waited DVD. Well, this is one of the long-waited DVDs from Pink Floyd.The video and sound are great. The extras are not so special but for the PF fan this is a must.Still waiting for the "Delicate sound of thunder" DVD
JAG: Lets have it all. I have been a fan since the pilot episode.  I enjoy the well thought out plots and find Harm and co-stars to be delightful to watch.  I was very disappointed when Meg was replaced with Mac, but it hasn't stopped me from watching every episode.Can someone please tell me when the series will be released on DVD????wondering in Indiana
Zola's tale of passionate doom done brilliantly by Renoir. A passionate story of illicit love that can only end tragically - and it does. Jean Gabin is a train engineer who witnesses a murder on the train: a jealous and brutal husband (Fernand Ledoux) has killed his boss in a fit of jealousy after he learns that his wife (Simone Simon) has slept with him to get her husband his job. Suspecting Gabin has seen the murder take place, he sends Simone to him to "convince" him to keep his mouth shut about it, and before long he and Simon are lovers. Typically, the lovers conclude that the only way they can be together as they wish is to do away with Ledoux, but Gabin can't bring himself to do it.Early in the film it's hinted that Gabin had once suffered from depression with destructive impulses, and now this comes into play; however, he kills Simone instead of Ledoux. Gabin then commits suicide by leaping from his speeding train. Gabin is fascinating in his role, as is the beautiful Simone - their love scenes are passionate without being overdone. In fact, the entire cast rivets out attention throughout the movie. The train sequences - all filmed on location with no back projections - are powerful and exciting. Renoir's direction is also superb. An excellent movie; definitely worth a watch
A Classic. I never grew tired of this movie when it was released..... And i'm still loving it. A great feel good movi
Video in time for Valentine's. Since I ordered the video on February 13th - I was so impressed by how fast it arrived at my house!!  Less than 24 hours later!
WOOOOOOOOOOOOW. I LOVE IT SOOOOO MUCH IT'S THE BIG NEW THING ... CAN'T WAIT 4 THE NEXT EPISODE..
Jane as she should be portrayed. This is, in my opinion, the best Jane Eyre of them all.  The characters look the part, and the film is beautifully shot and convincingly acted. A great romantic movie
I Don't Agree With The New Yorker Review At All. This is a modern Greek trajedy. I'm not a big film fan but this film reminds me why the medium is regarded. The most important elements required to make this work are definatly present. The chemistry between Irons and Binoche. As well the chemistry between all the charactors. A story of obsession and sex, scandal and sex, power and sex, dizzing falls from grace and sex, love and sex, hate and sex, sex and sex. This was more exciting than most pornos I've seen. A stone, cold, drizzlely, red-hot and almost sickening tale of adultry and betrayal. And the director is FULLY aware of this. I saw this when it was new and wanted to se it again now (in 2006, 14 years after it was made)and it took me a few video stores to find it. I remember my girlfriend at the time jumping my bones like a madwoman for days after she saw it. Whew! I wonder how Juliet and Jeremy are doing these days. I could go on and on, but this is an underrated classic. This an existential story in the way Irons' charactor has gone along his life with too much success and power that has left him empty. His son has had too much luck and success which has made him vulnerable. The Anna Barton charactor has had too much trajedy which has made her reckless and opaque. The wife is thoroughly human and doesn't deserve what she is left with. I find this story surpringly plausable. I love how Irons' charactor becomes basically an addict to sex with Anna Barton. Love is the drug and I need to score. He looks at her with total mad lust. This films shows the vulnerablity of success and power. Of being human. Subsitute Iron's Cabinet Ministry wrangelings with EU policies in CO2 as oppossed to Ozone and this could come out today. The charactor Anna Barton is the first one to really show a lack of restraint. She just comes too close and lingers too long..and doesn't do much at all to hide her attraction to Irons' charactor. She's "damaged" goods and even tries to convey this. But the men..can't quite believe it enough. She's too sexy, to maddening..and too good in the sack.
I love this movie!. Yeah it's low budget and yeah it doesn't have quite the novelty factor of the original since this is a sequel BUT taken on it's own terms this flick delivers fun shoot em up entertainment, sex appeal, humor, and even social commentary. I can't watch the first without wanting to check this one out. I noticed this got a bad review for not being porn. Go elsewhere if that's all you care for. There's nudity here though and it's very pleasant to behold. This IS what I was looking for: an enjoyable cult movie. Julie is so sweet! I adored her in this role. Danielle is sultry and perfect in her role too. Once again Angie is FANTASTIC in the role she made a cult classic in the first film. Culp is great. Hell the whole cast of this is great. Far better than it should have been if you bring your sense of humor and fun along for the ride
Great movie to satisfy all tastes. In "Forbidden Games" a capricious little girl named Paulette gets her parents killed, then meets Michel Dolle, a boy not much older than herself who's willing to satisfy her every wish.  Dolles welcome Paulette into their family, while she and Michel forge a strange bond.  Paulette is fascinated by death and the act of burying, so Michel - who treats Paulette as a kind of pampered pet -- devotes all his time to creating a private cemetery just for her.  When the children's grotesque game goes too far, the adult world threatens to separate them.  "Forbidden Games" is a great movie that somehow manages to be cynical and unrelenting in its realism, even as it stays sweet and sentimental on the surface.  The way this movie weaves drama, social commentary and comedy into a perfectly subtle and disturbing little fable reminded me of another great French title released by Criterion: "Le Corbeau".  Watching "Forbidden Games" will almost certainly make you want to see other films by Rene Clement.
good parady. the best part of the film is when the charachter from "Scream" is in his costume getting high.for more stuff from the Wayans Brothers, check out "In Living Color
2274 my  phat white uggly old 36 year sandled man foot!. I was an innocent babe of "6" when this movie came out and only just discovered it, ironically when I was 30 back in 2000.  Ha!  Asside from the appearence of people(plasti-face surgury done right,) most LESS intelligent people, in particular a real life plasti-face on some Fox show that had so much "stuff" on her face and body she could barely speak(though had nothing to say) is the reality of it.  You cannot be someone you aren't and if you do you run the risk of being Frankenstien's monster.  She was(in real life).  My brother's college classmate wanted a big chin over his mousey face and so now has a  plastic pile-o-crapola under his neck Ha!  for being so stupid, I say.  this movie is actually a walk in the park compared to what is happening today and shows the "future" is sooner than one realises.  The nasty nineties(which I adored) became the neat-n-spiffy 21st century.  Sharply ascending zippers and high-strung people who struggle to hide thier uggly character(el demon).  That is New York City(git u rope!)  Of course this movie-show(a coloaklial 70's term) is in a "Ultra" modern environment(nowadays that is an obsolete term replaced with "Post" Modern). with a method of escape in the rural countryside of hell.  The domes(remenscent of Dr. Who's Genisis of the Daleks, Kalide Citedel) is a beautifully done symbol of the future that is not the Earth we know today(or America we knew in 1970+)  Typical 60's/70's mentality of actually HAVING a place to escape from the hum-drum pretty boiez school but what evah!  Farienhieght 451 playes out exactly the same. In reality, their will be no escape from a totalitarian scociety, those in charge are too cleaver and the rest of us too stupid.Duh End
Great money.... woops I mean it's Very funny. There are so many movies like Hot Shots, but this DVD is well worth the price.  I would suggest everyone getting it.  It's just a funny spoof of a whole bunch of movies.  This Hot Shots movie is better then Hot Shots! Part Deux by the way
spike lee is the only person who could have made this movie. he's so earnest and unthreatening and funny. there will never be another movie like this. it is heart warming and scary and deals with racism in a way that a movie studio wouldn't have the guts to. this is one of the most important films in cinematic history. so many people i know say they hate it and hate spike lee, but then i find out that they never saw it or any spike lee movie. i don't know why people dislike him so much. if you've never seen a spike lee movie, start here
No s Amours. A Very good first class film,& very fast delivery service highly recommende
Shining, Brilliant, Hysterical. I had heard of this movie years ago and thought the premise sounded funny, but never made any effort to see it. I happened to notice it in the video store the other day and when I saw that Sean Hayes was in it, my memory of it came back and I thought, "Okay, sure, with Sean, it has to be at least entertaining."I really wasn't prepared for how deeply funny, sad, and brilliant this little film was.Let's get past the problems first: Bad lighting, amateurish camera angles, okay, yes. But the story about wayward reject April (Katie Holmes, who was so brilliant and perfect that I can't understand what has happened to her career -- oh right; Tom; oops!) and her desperate attempt to prepare Thanksgiving dinner for her estranged family, in the most hellish apartment building in NYC, is superb.Some of the lines come out of nowhere and just force you to laugh, they are so funny and true. And Patricia Clarkson as the mother with cancer and Oliver Platt as her loving, keep-positive-at-all-times husband, were just simply outstanding.The movie keeps moving at all times and along with its funny-tragic plot, and its sad little subplot of boyfriend Bobby (Derek Luke) trying to find a nice suit to impress April's family, just takes a hold of you and drags you in to this dysfunctional family's world and insists you go along for the ride, whether you like it or not.Sean Hayes did not have the big part I thought he did, but indicated without a shadow of doubt his off-kilter comic timing that cinched him the part of Jack on "Will & Grace." The only thing that was questionable is why in the world would he have been living in this delapidated hell-hole with his purebreed dog and his spanking new oven? The other residents, including a nutcase vegan, a staggeringly funny Lillias White as the woman who first lets April into her apartment to use her oven (for a few hours), and an entire Chinese family who patiently listen to April's valiant attempt to explain the history of the United States -- all of it was just outstanding. I loved it, loved it, loved it. (Did I say I loved it?)Yes, you will have to get over the atrocious lighting (hello people -- ever hear of LIGHTS?), and if you have claustrophobia you might freak out at the feeling of being in tight, crammed little apartments, but if you can get past those things and you enjoy out-there humor with a tinge of tragedy, you're in for a treat. Thumbs up all the way
Ozu, Most Japanese of the Japanese directors. Ozu has been called the most Japanese of all Japanese directors, and for good reason, he is. Ohayo (Good Morning) is Ozu at his Japanese best. There is a misunderstanding among the neighborhood ladies. Some club money has turned up missing. The misunderstanding is compounded by two boys, who after an argument with their parents, are told to shut up. The boys want a television set, the parents do not. The boys take their parents admonition to shut up to the extreme, they stop speaking to everybody, even the neighborhood ladies. These ladies find that their customary greetings  of ohayo (good morning) to the boys goes unanswered. The ladies feel that the boys mother is angry at them and a neighborhood quarrel ensues. Finally the parents relent, the boys get their television set so life resumes to normality once again, everyone is happy. No action, just everyday life
One of the Best Movies I've Seen In a Long Time. Many reviewers on this site have said that they would want to see a film that focuses on the hardships and extremes that immigrants face when coming to the United States.  To this, I respond: We've seen that hundreds of times in films.  The same goes for sports films.  We've seen the movie Glory Road in other films like Coach Carter, Remember the Titans, and Hoosiers.  They are exactly the same movie with a different team.  That's not to say that these films aren't decent sports flicks, but the film industry needs to take a step back when making a film that has the potential to be just like every other film in its genre.That being said, that is exactly what Jim Sheridan does with In America.  The story is so original and the acting makes this film a glorious triumph.  The basic story follows a family of Irish immigrants who come to America with the same notion that all immigrants have: to attain the American Dream.  But, as they all sooner or later find out, the American Dream is an ideology that 99.9% of people never attain.  They have trouble finding a place to stay, and end up with an apartment at the top of a run down building with many of its residents being junkies.  The father Johnny (Paddy Considine) is a struggling actor, who hasn't been able to get a part since the death of his son Frankie, who fell down the stairs.  The mother Sarah (Samantha Morton) takes a job at an ice cream parlor to earn the rent money.  The oldest daughter Christy (Sarah Bolger) is probably one of the smarter people in the film, and Sarah Bolger gives a flawless performance for such a young girl.  She is the stereotype of the oldest child who is forced to grow up too soon.  Her younger sister Ariel (played by Sarah Bolger's younger sister Emma) is the typical naive little girl who asks fifty questions about everything.There are some really touching scenes throughout the course of the film, one especially comes to mind, where the father almost squanders away all of the family's money trying to win an E.T. doll for the youngest daughter.  There are essentially three miracles in the film, and Christy, who is also the narrator, relates these three events to a set of three wishes that her brother Frankie told her about before he died.  The other great scenes in the film involve the family and their relationship to the man on one of the floors below.  When they first arrive in the house, Christy calls him "the man who screams."  This man's name is Mateo (played brilliantly by Djimon Hounsou) and he is a brilliant artist with quite a bit of emotional problems.  He is sort of the figure of "morality" in the film, often giving out endless amounts of advice.  Mateo has some sort of disease (we can only expect that it is probably a venerial disease) and he gets sick throughout the movie.In America features one of the best ensembles I have ever seen.  Every actor is perfect in every scene.  Djimon Hounsou and Paddy Considine give the best performances in the entire film, and Jim Sheridan wrote and directed every gorgeous shot of the film.  While I do agree with one other reviewer about how Christy has a modern camera in a story set in the eighties, stupid facts like these should not detract from the overall message of the film.  The overall message, then, is not just about how immigrants face hardships when they come to America; we already know that from previous films and/or experiences.  The film has such a deeper message, relating not just to immigrants, but to every person who watches this film.  I really do not want to give the message away, but rather I will leave it up to you to go rent or buy this treasure of a film.  This is truly one of the most unforgettable movies I have ever seen
Glamour's Underbelly Revealed. 'Boogie Nights' does for the disco seventies and the porn industry what 'Nashville' did to country music.  It shows the underside of the glamour presented.  The film shows us all the trappings that draw people to the "high life," then pulls the rug out from under it.  We see the usual suspects and the usual draws:  There's money, fame, lust, passion, and drugs.  But these benefits provide an understated banality that comes to the fore.  The seemingly long, drawn out conversations are only postcards of emotion that show the depth of personhood that seems to escape all of the protagonists.  It is superficial, and all of life's best elements seem to go out the window.There is the calculated cheesiness of the producer (Burt Reynolds) and his odd detatchment from his craft.  He both revels and drowns in the lust and money that are presented to him.  He meets a young aspiring hopeful (Mark Wallberg) who must overcome his poverty and alienation from home.  His naivete' is striking, and he doesn't entirely change in his innocence, only becoming a casualty of it.  (The way he practices to become the next Bruce Lee in the midst of his success as a novelty presentation is certainly a sad commentary about his life.)  His new success doesn't make him all that happy, including his rationalization that his movies are making marriages more passionate.  The aftermath of all the calculated lust makes everyone, except the calloused producer, a casualty in a different way.  One fellow porn star (Don Cheadle) demonstrates that his true passion is for a loving marriage and a hi-fi business, but the decent, conventional world won't let him.  Similarly, a fellow porn creator (William Macy) shows tragically that love transcends lust, even when it won't ever become realized.  A female porn star is devastated by her cocaine addiction and an inevitable result of a custody battle.  If we aren't convinced near the end of the movie, then a "candid camera" scene between "Rollergirl" and the man off the street certainly shows how the emotional baggage catches up to all of the porn industry's false promises for true happiness.The initial draw to 'Boogie Nights' may be deceptive.  It presents the glamour of all that the modern world believes to be desirable, but cleverly shows how the lowest common denominator can restrict our lives from even greater happiness.
one of the best hockey movies ever. I love hockey and I loved hockey before I saw this movie. this movie did help bring a lot of people my age into hockey to abd a lot of them didn't stay on the Mighty Ducks are a bunch of great kids who will keep kids and adults laughing and even though a lot of the on ice action is corny it is still cool to watc
One of Ben Stiller's funniest films!. 12 year old Gerry Garner joins a group of "heavy" kids that are sent to their favorite fat camp for the summer, "Camp Hope" (a place where they're supposed to lose weight, but instead have a fun time). The kids find out that the camp has been sold to a crazy fitness instructor named Tony Perkins (Ben Stiller), so now, the camp has turned into a living hell for the kids. No more candy, or fun things like Go Karts and "The Blob". Tony wants the kids to lose weight, so he'll be able to make a profit from his fitness TV commercials (he has a camera man follow him around the camp). However, the kids rebel against Tony, because they want to have fun, not exercise, therefore, Tony starts to go crazy (in a hilarious way), so he decides to counter their actions, for example: one day, he takes their lunch away, and on another day, takes them on a 20 mile hike, among other things. Gerry and his new friends, along with the original camp staff members Pat, who has visited the camp every summer for the past 18 years, and a goofy counselor named Tim who became fit before the summer, as well as a new nurse named Julie, decide to take the camp back.Ben Stiller is HILARIOUS in this movie. Seeing him as an insane health nut, patting kids down, searching for a pez dispenser or watching his character getting mad at the kids is great. While the film is not a cinema masterpiece, Stiller's performance in this film is great, and he delivers some of the funniest lines I've heard in a movie. His character in this film is like a younger version of White Goodman in "Dodgeball". Is this a guilty pleasure? Definitely.As for the DVD, in 2002, Disney established a new policy whereby any movies that they feel have limited adult appeal will be released on DVD in Pan & Scan only. No widescreen DVD. They've reneged a bit since then, but many titles from their live action catalogue have made their DVD debuts exclusively in reformatted fullscreen. This affects every unreleased live action Disney film, particularly those that the studio suspects have limited appeal outside of children. THEREFORE, this film, like many Disney classics, is only available on DVD in fullscreen (pan and scan). BLEH
Love the new download!. I wanted it for my collection, however you can sift through all the youtube stuff and end up with the same video for free if you want to do the work
Forget the Bible,. Seven Samurai is really the greatest story ever told!  I won't go into why here because there are plenty of reviewers both here and elsewhere on the internet who do a much better job than I ever could. This brand new Criterion reissue that improves on the older one in every way so you have no excuse not to buy it right now
Informative. Nice little video for my Zen during my long wait at the doctor's office.  Confucius overcame many difficulties
Boys Town. I have seen this movie in the past on TV and am familiar with the story line. I have also been to Visit Boys Town Since I have family in Omaha Nebraska. I would say if anyone is considering buying this movie, Do. Spencer Tracy makes a good Father flanigan (the Priest who starts up Boys Town) in this movie and Micky Rooney who plays a hoddlem
Better than I had expected!. Okay, I decided on this movie after a bit of apprehension. I mean, the only reasons I even considered watching it was because: 1. Jason Scott Lee is from Hawaii (like me) 2. We both went to the same high school (really!) 3. I always try to support Asian American actors, even if they don't usually get good roles.So, with that in mind, I really wasn't expecting much. In fact, I thought it would be worse than the Van Damme original, which, although one of his better movies, was still a waste of a couple of hours of my life. I mean, straight to DVD sequel could never match a big-budget Hollywood movie, right? Well, I'm glad to say I was wrong. This is actually a pretty darned decent movie--better than the original, that's for sure.Thomas Ian Griffith and Jason Scott Lee are both great. Their roles are complex, as there is a lot of grey area in terms of their being good and evil, but I thought they handled it well. Unfortunately, I still had some trouble seeing JSL as anything other than Bruce Lee in &quot;Dragon,&quot; which wasn't helped by his fight scenes, where he still looks like the Dragon.Special effects were your typical Sci-Fi Channel stuff, nothing to write home about. Costumes and sets seemed a bit forced in period scenes, so it didn't come across as very natural, but, hey, like I said, Sci-Fi Channel stuff. In general, the acting was very good, all things considered, with only a few actors coming up lame (see Tava Smiley who is hot, but couldn't act her way out of a paper bag).The action sequences were kind of forced into the script (some of it didn't seem terribly necessary), but when it happens, JSL and TIG are great. And while JSL is great in his fight scenes, it was kind of sad to think that he'll be relegated to these kinds of roles because of his ethnicity. And while he does need some range to pull off this role, not much acting is required, and he is a better actor than this movie allows him to be. TIG, of course, is a wonderful villain...now if you could only get his role from &quot;The Karate Kid&quot; out of your head...I actually enjoyed the story, as I like time travel movies, and while it can be bewildering figuring out what's going on as the characters jump back and forth in time, the main idea of the movie--If we could go back in time, should we be/are we morally obligated to right the wrongs of the past?--comes through.If you're going to watch this expecting a Hollywood summer blockbuster movie, you will be sorely disappointed. If you love the Sci-Fi Channel, like I do, and want to watch a grade &quot;A&quot; b-movie, this is it! The cast is great, the story interesting and the action entertaining. Adjusted for the kind of movie it is (straight to DVD), I give it a solid four stars. A pleasant surprise and one of the best direct to video movies I've ever seen
Recommend this seller. DVD was in good condition. Shipping was prompt. I recommend this seller.
Awesome abs!!. This video offers a great ab workout.  I've already worn out two videos and I am now on my third tape.  I've used this video for over eight years and never get bored.  The exercises are always effective - even after all these years.  I really appreciate Tamilee's knowledge and experience.
Better than 34th Street. I love this movie. Every year there is a 24-hour marathon on the television of this film and my family and I watch it at least ten times. It truly never gets old with us as the characters are authentic and full of good humor. It is hysterically funny at times, especially when the father receives the leg lamp in the mail and pronounces the word stamped on the box "fragile" as "fra-gee-lay; huh, must be Italian". Ralphie and his family make my family's holiday a lot brighter and we all look forward to watching this movie every year.
Excellent drama with suprise ending. James Woods was great as a burned out "I'll give this job one more try" kind of character who risks his life to discover a deeply buried truth, "his client really is innocent" and his career as an attorney is reborn. Too bad James Woods doesn't get enough parts in Hollywood but I suspect the bottom line is he is not part of the "inner circle" (he's a Reublican)
Very Good. As expected, this Yuen Woo Ping film is very good. Nice fight choreography and even includes a cameo by Simon Yuen. The hero is the same hero from Dance of the Drunk Mantis which I felt was more entertaining. However, both Buddhist Fist and Dance of the Drunk Mantis make excellent additions to your collection
Great movie. I actually just saw this movie recently, and I have to say it's definitely my favorite Christian Slater flick.  The dialogue in this movie is incredible and it even lets you use your brain, something 2005 movies don't tend to have.  If you're not thinking of BUYING this movie definitely at least check it out
&quot;In dreams I walk with you&quot;... Somehow I feel that if this film had been even stranger, it may have been more critically popular.  Had it not bothered with as linear a storyline and just followed the dream-logic plotlines it may have been hailed as a David Lynch-like fairy tale nightmare; add more violence and it could be a Dario Argento film.  But instead we have something by Neil Jordan, who gives this film more wonder and magic (albeit dark) than anyone else could.  I think it's a great film.  See, it's called In Dreams, not In Logic.  Its surreality is its strength, staying visually spectacular at all times and boosted by an absolutely great performance by Annette Bening.  I think the plot contrivances are almost subversive; OF COURSE there are moments of coincidence because that's what happens in dreams.  Moments of opportunity or clarity (claire-ity?) arrive for our heroine and she takes them in stride.  The film's general feel is continuously reinforced by the eerie flooded dream village in the reservoir, and the fairy tale orchard.  This is a Grim tale alright, but its beautiful, trippy and saturated in atmosphere.  Killer ending too, closing a disturbingly satisfying thriller by a masterful director.  Highly recommended for those who like to dream
wanda's opinion. This is one of the greatest movies I have watched. I know I have probably watched the movie twenty times in the past. It  has heart and compassion. It is absolutely one of the best I have see
Oh My Looorrrrdddd!!  Bring out the tissues @}->---. What a beautiful and heartbreaking movie.  When I first saw this at the theaters, I swear I wasn't only crying - but sobbing.  I still sob watching this moving movie.  This was an original idea for a movie at that time; Bob Jones is dying (played by the gorgeous Michael Keaton) and his wife Gail is expecting their first child.  So thinking he may not be around long or at all after the birth, he tapes his life for his child to look back on as they get older.  I don't think anyone in the universe could watch this dry eyed.  He goes and revisits the house he grew up in; he teaches his son how to shave; he gives all the fatherly advice to his future son that kids learn from their living parents.  It's a beautiful, heartwarming story that is acted well and will flood your house.  You must see this if you are a fan of a love story between husband and wife and father and baby.Look out for Queen Latifah as Theresa, the nurse and listen out for the beautiful score in this movie.
Challenging Workout and Fun!. I've had this "tape" for 10 years.  I came online to get it in a DVD format before I destroy the tape that I've used off and on for the past 10 years. If you don't like to dance, don't bother with this DVD. However, if you like to dance, then that's what will make this one fun.  When I first started this VHS, 10 years ago--and 10 years younger--I thought it was hard.  It took me a bit of practicing before I could get the steps; but I DIDN'T QUIT.  Eventually, I got all the moves. I didn't even have all the range of motion either, but that improves as your body gets use to doing the routines.  I haven't worked this VHS for a few years, and I needed to get in better shape so I pulled it out again.  I am 47 years old, and about 30 pounds overweight, and if I can do this routine at my age (it took me about two weeks to be able to get through it again), anyone can do it.  The key is, you must love dancing and this kind of aerobic workout.  You can tone the movements down until you get better at them, and rev it up as you get better.  But once you get it, you will always want to do it. This is a great workout, and I will be doing it for along time. For all the nay sayers: either they don't really like to dance, or they just gave up too soon.  And by the way, this was not called "Hip-hop" 10 years ago.  "Hip-hop" is just a new name which includes a lot of old styles.  I don't particularly care for "Hip-hop." And I would not consider this a "Hip-hop" DVD
Anti-John Wayne. This is one of those groundbreaking films that that put the whammy on a genre; in this case, the Western can never come back.  Oaters traditionally are the realm of strong male characters righting wrong, loving their horses, and ignoring the school marm. Robert Altman, a political and cultural man of the 1960's Left simply says "horse feathers."  The hero is a corrupt bawdyhouse owner.  The school marm makes her living in a crude manner and normal everyday middle-class types don't really exist in the hardscrabble world of capitalism.The town, near Vancouver, Canada sits in a mountains and wilderness.  The film company built the town.  That's real snow there folks and blizzards as our anti-hero Beatty shoots it out with the company men while his best "girl" Julie Christy hides out in an opium den, her brown eyes realistically glassy.  John Wayne's, The Searchers was one of the best films ever made.  McCabe & Mrs. Miller tries to undo all that.Fascinating look at the underbelly of frontier life and a forerunner of the HBO series Deadwood, the West may not be a better place for it.
A MASTERPIECE. This movie is truely one of the crowning achievements of the 90's. Pauly Shore should have won the oscar. I wish there were more movies like this one
Wild. This is the best movie to watch with a teenager to bring your family together.  Laugh, cry & laugh some more!  Get it
Witty, fun, real and relevant. We have a small group of women meeting once a week and reading this book. I love the way Liz starts each chapter by retelling the story of the woman the way it may look if it was happening today and gives us a new insight into that life. She then goes step by step through the Bible verses and does a study on them - showing insights and ways that it relates to us today. The questions at the end of the chapter are good as well and the whole diverse group of us is learning... There are different types of women in the Bible and each of us relates to at least one of them! I like the catagories: Bad to the bone, Bad for a season and Bad for a moment. Witty, fun, real and relevant to me today
It is all a lie. Although it might seem like an odd starting point, the first time I heard of Kurosawa's Rashomon was when I read Iris Chang's Rape of Nanking for the first time a few years ago. Within this book she alluded to the film because of the various stories detailing the atrocities committed in Nanking differed greatly depending on the source of information. Anyway, a couple of years after that I read Akutagawa Ryuunosuke's short story "Rashomon" and noticed that it really did not fit Chang's brief description of the movie and it was not until I read a later short story in the collection, "In the Grove", did I find the actual short story the film was based on.The film Rashomon was Western film audiences' first real exposure to the films of Kurosawa Akira and it ignited the flame of interest in Kurosawa's films for decades to come. And with good reason, because Rashomon is truly an excellent film and it still tops best films ever made lists constantly.During a terrible rainfall three men, a priest, a woodcutter, and a bandit, duck into the ruins of the Rashomon gate to escape the massive downpour. The priest and the woodcutter have just returned from a court case detailing the murder of a samurai by the bandit Tajomaru. Listening to Tajomaru's testimony it seems like a pretty cut and dry case. He wanted the samurai's wife for his own and after raping her he killed her husband as she asked him to do. However, after listening to the wife's story and even the dead husband's story through a medium, it is hard to say what the truth...isThe old saying goes "History is written by the victors" and Rashomon definitely displays not only how different people view the same events, but how lies thread their way into the truth and corrupt it. Kurosawa depicts the scene with the samurai, his wife, and the bandit Tajomaru four times within the film's 88 minutes, and the resulting juxtaposition is quite enjoyable.
Great opener to a great series. I especially like the Maverick episodes that emphasize humor, and this one has many clever scenes. The highlight for me was seeing Bret sway the election to the ex-judge.   However, I have to side with Phineas in the  poker game at the beginning--No way I let Maverick bet with a sealed  envelope
Draws deeply from the well of man's most instinctual fears. Truth be told, I should probably give this film only four stars because it does take a while to really get going and I think some of the story elements could have been presented more effectively.  When this thing gets going, though, The Descent easily attains not-to-be-missed status, and on top of all the incredible special effects, oppressive atmosphere, and grievous bloodletting (made with a pretty limited budget, by the way), one of the most important plot points of the story is actually brought home in an impressively subtle manner.  Are you kidding me?  Blood, gore, a claustrophobic atmosphere like you wouldn't believe - and subtlety?  How could I not give The Descent five stars?So you've got these young British women who like to get together once a year and engage in some sort of risky, extreme activity.  White water rafting, for example.  Everyone has fun, but then a horrible automobile accident changes the life of one of the women, Sarah (Shauna MacDonald), forever.  Still recovering from her terrible loss, Sarah joins her friend Beth (Alex Reid) in America, where mutual friend Juno (Natalie Mendoza), an Alpha Female if there ever was one, has staked out a cave system just begging to be explored.  Joining in the fun are Holly (Nora-Jane Noone), Juno's new gung-ho sidekick, and a couple of sisters who round out the spelunking sextet.The movie drags a good bit as we sit and watch the girls arrive at their destination in the Appalachians (apparently somewhere in the North Carolina mountains - although the movie was filmed entirely in the UK), then do their bonding thing the night before the big adventure.  Once they descend into the cave system, though, things start getting more intense fairly quickly.  Their first real move down into the complex of cave structures turns into quite a tight and claustrophobic ordeal, especially for Sarah who gets stuck and is barely pulled to safety before the tunnel collapses.  That's when Juno, a woman with more than her fair share of secrets, admits that she has led the girls into a cave system that has never been explored before, supposedly to help reunite the group.  Well, it does just the opposite, but they just have to keep going.  If there is a way out, they're going to have to find it the hard way.Things are already creepy enough at this point.  The filmmakers did an incredible job with the sets, making the viewer feel as if he/she is trapped in a real cave system with the characters.  Just watching these girls pull their bodies through extremely tight, dark spaces was enough to get me feeling pretty darn claustrophobic.  But the real fun was just about to begin.  In the wake of one of the most realistic compound leg fracture scenes you'll ever want to squirm through, Sarah spots the presence of someone or something else down there with them.  No one believes her - at first.  When the "crawlers" attack, though, all hell breaks loose two miles under ground.  These Gollum-like creatures are some kind of blind, albino humanoids who hunt by sound, can scamper and climb like monkeys, move unbelievably quickly, and really tear into whatever flesh they can find.  Not only are they frighteningly impressive in and of themselves, the filmmakers present them in the most effective of cinematic light.  And when the girls fight back, it's cinematic magic as the filmmakers hold nothing back in the creepy, bloody, gruesome department.  And even as characters are fighting for their lives, a personal bombshell or two also drops to ratchet up the frenetic drama level even higher.The ending is a little controversial because American theatrical audiences didn't get to see the true final scene of the film, for some pretty questionable reasons.  A few seconds can and do make a pretty big difference.  Don't worry, though, as the DVD has both endings available.The Descent draws deeply from the well of man's most instinctual fears, making it one of the most atmospheric, heart-pounding movies to come along in quite a while.  The subtlety of the story in terms of the relationship between Sarah and Juno is almost as impressive as the cinematography and sound work - and it even leaves room for an alternate explanation of everything that happens here.  The Descent has everything you could ever ask for in a horror film - and plenty more on top of that.  If you care the first thing about horror, you must see this atmospheric tour de force
The thief of Monte Carlo. A wonderful film by Hitchcock,King Of Mysteries.It'll forever be a classic.It draws through a virgin land of a French maritime in the 50's.Apart from the blue beauty of the overlooking Mediterranean sea,we can contemplate the beauty of Princess Grace Kelly too.This package is fine,colour is great,clean and neat,enjoyable performance,no blurr.How many times have i visited Monaco,this time this twist-ending story of Hitchcock has caught me delightfully with this never-ending beauty of this place.I caught a thief too,this morning....when i discovered that my 'Tweety' disappeared!!
The Hunger  ~ Catherine Deneuve. I have been looking for this vampire movie for awhile. I love this movie and am glad I found it
A Great Old Film. This is a funny movie. I saw the play recently and it was fun to see the original version. Highly recommended for anyone who remembers vaudeville fondly, or likes Charlie Chaplin movies. Phil Silvers was great
Genius. Putting it simply, this film is the work of a genius. As a Tom Stoppard fanatic, I adored it from the moment I read the play, which was even the version he was considerably unhappy with. He was significantly more satisfied with the movie, and there is very little doubt as to why. He clearly had a handle on what he was doing and writing and with whom he was working.Any being who has ever had a single existentialist thought should see this film--they may or may not like it, but that's not what matters. This film is amazing
Brings Old West Back to Life. Mario Van Peebles Posse' brought a new perspective about the west. This was the first western in many years to feature a predominately African-American cast. Stephen Baldwin was great in his potrayal of Lil' Jay. Very educational movie
A memory of 30 years comes to life. I first saw this film when I was thirteen - perhaps even younger, as I recall seeing it in black and white. Thirty years on, propelled by memories which still stuck in my mind, I bought this disk from America (it is not released in the UK where I live).Seeing again through adult eyes, one notices the joins - the songs which do not really work, the occasional twee touch. But what a film! Presented in marvellous technicolour, with a cast which takes the script seriously and does not go over the top unnecessarily, thus bringing Dr Seuss's amazing (Freudian?)dream/fantasy to life.This is not an epic. It is an intimate film, which talks to you rather than throwing endless special effects at you to stave off your boredom. (It's also nothing like the recent live action 'The Cat in the Hat'which some consider the worst film ever.) It reminds us of the gulf between adults and children, and Dr Seuss reminds us that sometimes adults have to see through children's eyes to see the truth. But it also lets the adults have their say as well.This is ultimately a film of its time (the early 50s) but it's a  film which takes its chances and doesn't play safe. It's a film which is strange, dreamlike - and worth taking to your heart.Thirty years on, I'm glad I did. Why not try it? - you might too
Fabulous as always. This is a great show along with the sound of her italian tour, and all of drowned world minus the sexual perversion.  Her sound is rich on all of her live DVDs.  I pump them all out on my dvd stereo system.  BUT WHERE IS THE BLOND AMBITION DVD???? Somebody get it out there so my madonna dvd live collection will be complete.  Do get girlie show if you like madonna.  A bit too much sex for me but the sound is good
Toya's Review. This is my all time favorite movie. J Reed..damn I could not play his part. An undercover cop playing a drug dealer to bring down a huge drug lord. He befriended "God" and took him down. It was really hard for him to do because they had built such a strong bond. This movie was really good though,. LL Cool J and Omar Epps played their roles really well
Enough (Ws). J Lo was real and intense in this movie.  I've been there, done part of that, and felt it was great to see the ending.  Really great
Rest in Peace. This film is a stunning tribute to the memory of all the victims of this tragedy,and to all the heros who contributed to our triumph of the American Spirit
Passion of Mind  entertwined with Passionate Bodies. The film is well titled and is full of intrigue and mis-direction, yet it always returns to its central theme of over arching sexuality and attractiveness.
Soylent Green - Pure Fantasy or Potential Reality. My watching this film resulted from a conversation with a friend beginning with politics and spiraling down to the future of our world. The premise of the film was disturbing to say the least. I have never been a true fan of Charleton Heston who in my opinion always has overacted. However, Edward G. Robinson seemed as comfortable playing this character as he has been in the many different roles he has played. His performance was truly heartfelt, bringing to mind the current debate on "ending one's own life with dignity". I shutter to think that this is life as it should be though. But Robinson's character acted on the decision with the counterfeit courage and ultimate hopelessness that accompanied it in such a way that you could very well empathize with him. I found the other actors to be somewhat bland. Perhaps this was acting at that point in time, but some actors can make the most of roles and others cannot. The story line was unique, but the script was lacking. A re-make today by Steven Spielberg might be worthwhile seeing. Perhaps the most striking element I took from this film was an unshakeable chilling and unsettling feeling that this could very well be our world if we do not wake up
Great Movie. I have read Well's book and seen the older movie. That said, I love this movie. Guy Pearce is very convincing in his role.We see a man in love. When he looses that love, he uses his genius to try and save her. Failing to do that, he embarks on a quest to find out why. When he gets his answer, he realizes he has found a new life, and to leave the past in the past.I thought the ending, with the past next to the future, was well done.And Orlando Jones role is entertaining.
Best Movie for Children and Adults to enjoy together. My granddaughter absolutely loves this movie and she's only one year old.  Not to mention that my husband and I saw the movie first and decided we had to buy it for her. We have watched and enjoyed it many times.
Jane Eyre. I have this original version of Jane Eyre with Orson Welles. I fell in love with it as a young girl watching it on TV. It is truly wonderful.  I also have the version with William Hurt and Charlotte Gainsburg.  Hauntingly beautiful.  I recently purchased the newest Jane Eyre from Masterpiece Theater.  This is an updated version with just the most subtle hint of spice, also wonderful.  Anyone who loves the Jane Eyre story should treat themselves to all three versions.  You won't be dissapointed
The best movie of the 90's. Word's can hardly desribe the genius film. It is without a doubt the peak of mystery, romance, action and pure cinematic brilliance!The fantastic screenplay perfectly shows how equally amazing Elmore Leanord's book is to the movie. It is also, by far, John Travolta's best role ever, and without him the movie would be nothing. This film is perfect for everyone, the alluring plot, amazing acting, entertaining screenplay.It is truly, a gem.
This model is not soft!!!!. I took a lot of time researching work out videos.  I had read an article about Cindy Crawford having her baby completely natuarl with a midwife.  I was intrigued.  Then I saw a special on models on VH1.  Again I was intrigued.  A friend recommended this video saying her roommate did it faithfully and got a great body.Basically the video has three segments.  One 10 minute, one 20 minute and then one 40 minute.  It incorporates simple lunges and squats with some aerobic cardio and weights.  Cindy and Kathy and very upbeat, but not in a cheesy way.  Cindy is way impressive since she just had a baby.  You might think you would pass on this video since it is for post natal exercise, but I am telling you to keep it.  It works!I worked out with the video a couple of times this week and I love it.  It was beautifully shot and had pleasant music.  The workout wasn't hard, but it wasn't easy.  I woke up the next morning completely sore and unable to barely sit down.  This work out definitely sneaks up on you.  I am going to incorporate this video with running a few times a week and I can't wait to see the changes!!!Buy this video
A Different Travolta movie. This is a little different that what some may expect from Travolta.  Enough action and twists to keep it interesting.
GREAT HORROR FLICK!!!!!!!. April Fool's Day is a great horror flick from the decade that bought us wild hair thats right the 80's!!!!!!! The movie is about a bunch of kids go to this island to visit their friend Muffy!!!!! Needless to say one by one someone is killing the kids off!!!!!! The movie is fun and has a fun cast to go with including Amy Steele!!!!!!!!
It was really funny. It was really funny when Snoopy was putting up the vine and the vine was fighting a little bit with Snoopy.  The story was about Sally and the whole Peanuts gang making Charlie Brown's baseball field into a garden.  But  Charlie Brown didn't understand what they were doing because he wasn't  there
It just doesn't get any better than this-. This has been one of my favorite movies for a long time.  Recently I was happy to see it on DVD which is a relief from watching the old, grainy VHS versions.I hadn't seen it in years and watched it today to find myself amazed at how well the movie stands up to time.  It's one of those rare, perfect storms of comedy where great writing (truly funny line after truly funny line) is paired with great direction and outstanding performances all at the same time.Dudley Moore got an Oscar nomination for "Arthur" but lost (although John Gielgud won for best supporting actor).  If Moore's performance in "Arthur" doesn't win a Best Actor Oscar -it's proof that no comedic actor could ever win the title (another example is Gene Wilder in "Young Frankenstein").Steve Gordon crafts the film beautifully keeping true to each of the characters and the warm-hearted tone of the story.  Quite simply, IMHO the movie is a rare gem.  It's only sad that Steve Gordon passed away just a year after "Arthur" was released.Regarding the DVD, it's so/so.  Although the video quality is a leap over the old VHS copies, there is still no widescreen version available.The DVD has a few extras that are nice but it's just not enough.  One example is commentary from the Director stating how he greatly wished how certain deleted takes and scenes could have been included (because they were hysterical), but that he had to make tough choices for a final edit.  The DVD, being the perfect format to include such material, certainly should have offered it as well.This, the original "Arthur", is a classic comedy that is one for the books
kipling gets a classic treatment. i had never seen this movie, and i dont know why! freddie bartholomew (top-billed as a teen!) is an obnoxious rich kid who falls overboard and is rescued by portuguese fisherman spencer tracy. over the next few months a bond forms between the two that is both honest and touching. a terrific olio of pathos, comedy, melodrama, and good common sense make victor flemings adaptation of the rudyard kipling novel (which im embarrassed to admit i never read) one of the best movies ive seen. great supporting work by lionel barrymore, john carradine, mickey rooney, melvyn douglas, more. and freddie is quite the beauty here. a winner!
Great flick for Bollywood enthusiasts. I've seen many bollywood films and  for that reason I was intrigued by the controversy sparked by the entire Deepa Mehta trilogy (Fire, Earth, and Water). After having seen all three movies I can honestly say that Earth was by far the best of the three. The acting was superb and the story was so much more tragic and heart wrenching than the other two films.
Who Looks Good in a Film about POW Camps?. After looking at some of the reviews, I'll admit I'm a bit confused.  I think this was made AFTER Gettysburg so any motivation of remorse couldn't have had much to do with "Andersonville"....As a younger Civil War/War of Northern Aggression student, I read MacKinlay Kantor's book "Andersonville" and while there is much vile to see in this film, it does show why the written word is still the most powerful weapon in war.  Kantor's descriptions in writing defy depiction by even the most skilled set-dresser.  And nobody, I mean nobody, Federal or Confederate, officer or enlisted man, young or old can come out a situation such as Andersonville looking particularly well--and the post-liberation photographs show it, just as do the post-liberation photographs of Auschwitz, Dachau, and Bergen-Belsen.  The German film of the 1950s "The Doctor of Stalingrad" which purported to show conditions in a German POW camp in the Soviet Union after World War II, and the great film "Hart's War" depict relative Shangri-La conditions...For someone who knows little about the POW situation during this great American conflict, I would recommend the DVD "Andersonville" but NOT in isolation.  It must be tempered with a rounded knowledge of conditions in Northern Camps--which DO appear on the History Channel regularly...and recognition that after prisoner exchange was discontinued, nothing short of genocide on a fairly grand scale could result.I recall a television documentary about the trial of the Andersonville Commander, whic starred of all people William Shatner--back in the 1970s or so...which I was quite impressed with and should be resurrected.  But for the present, films such as "Andersonville" are replete with underlying messages about the horrors of war, that humans make war and then complain about the conditions which are inevitable, and that despite our intelligence we have not found an alternative to it--yet.  If this film inspires one intellect to put his or her head to the solution of this problem, then there will be no more Andersonvilles....This film shows how easily humans who are civilized (we think) can descend into the psychosocial dynamics of the crowd, the group, the herd, plundering and devaluing of human life to that of mere livestock
Great Holiday Story. Sequals are rarely successful, but this film proves the exception. It is at least as good and in some ways better than the original &quot;Prancer&quot;. It is a really nice holiday story that should please both children and adults. Yes, it is a fantasy, but one grounded in reality which makes it the best kind of make-believe. From the opening, the viewer knows what the results will be. It is obvious who the divorced mother will end up with, the reindeer will actually be one of Santa's and the unpleasant person will get his just dues, but the way the events unfold make it a really enjoyable story. The characters are true to life with excellent preformances from the children. This could become a Christmas classic
A plea from the great unwashed. I endorse the comments of the previous reviewer and support his plea for a re-release of Big Black's Pig Pile. When Pig Pile (the CD) was released in Australia you could buy the video for an extra amount. Since my grandmother had died some years earlier, I had nothing to sell to raise the boodle, so  I had to make do with just the CD. Since I've never been able to find the  video again, I've regretted it ever since. If the company responsible won't  re-release the Pig Pile video, is there anyone out there who can find me a  copy? For the purposes of a review, the CD at least is frighteningly  awesome. I have no doubt the video was anything less
Spy Kids 3. The kids really loved this. We liked it too. Exciting. Nice to choose 3-D version or standard version
Baby, I Don't Care. Great, iconic Noir with laconic Mitchum as the smitten schmuck who falls for the wrong femme fatale dame and follows her to the end.  The femme fatale is gorgeous Jane Greer in probably her best role. Kirk Douglas turns in a great performance as a mob boss who's also suckered by the bad girl. Out of the Past is one of the best Noirs ever; perfectly capturing the grimness and inevitability of anguish inherent to the style.  One great one-liner after another.
A great leadership movie. As an Active Duty Air Force Officer, this has to be by far the best leadership movie ever for newly commissioned Officers and NCO's.
The Dark Knight, As Campy As Ever!. The film adaptation of the hit ABC series of the 1960's has it all. Action, danger, romance, and comedy! Adam West and Burt Ward were at their best as Batman and Robin, Lee Meriwether was just as sexy as the Catwoman than Julie Newmar(who was unable to appear in the film to to a prior commitment), and Cesar Romero, Burgess Meridith and Frank Gorshin was hilariously excellent as the villains. The special features in the DVD has a mini-documentary featuring Adam and Burt talking about their days on the set of the Batman movie, and there's also a tour of the 1966 Batmobile as told by the man who made it possible, George Barris. I love this film, I have not seen it in years. It may not be the TV series that we wished for, but it is close enough
"Domestic Disturbance" is entertaining with its high-tension suspense and great action. "Domestic Disturbance" is a thriller about a divorced couple and their child.  Frank (John Travolta) has to deal with a man marrying his ex-wife Susan.  The guy (Vince Vaughn) is well liked by the community, but there are hints of something being amiss with him.  Frank's son claims he witnesses his mother's new husband Rick commit murder.  The more Frank investigates Rick, the more suspicious he looks.  The investigation spurs a game of cat and mouse.There is great interaction between Travolta as a concerned parent and Vaughn the cold heartless type.  The tension between them breeds suspense.  The would-be new father uses his craftiness to manipulate those around him.  There are few things he wouldn't do to get his way."Domestic Disturbance" is entertaining with its high-tension suspense and great action.  I highly recommend it for those who enjoy a thriller that will keep you guessing to the last minutes.
the best of those english working class films of the era. this one was a shocker to me, especially after my usual ranting  against the english movies of this period, and anything with laurence harvey in particular. that said -- i loved this movie, and damn if julie christie didnt DESERVE that oscar over julie andrews! she is great as a vapid self-involved ditz who uses her looks in climbing up the social ladder, finding herself in progressively more vile situations. dirk bogarde is one of her lovers, laurence harvey another, but the movie really is the property of miss christie, who gives a performance as breathtaking as her looks.
The best historical war drama from the Far East. I have seen many historical war dramas from Far East (mainly China's) and most of them are not only historically inaccurate but have a strong bias toward the enemy.Yi Soon Shin, however, is a rare exception.  Not only is the drama very historically accurate but it is also very comprehensive in detailing the meticulous battle planning of the admiral that leads to each victory but also the political in-fighting between the Chosun political factions (and the second-guessing nature of the king) which causes his eventual death.Also, the special effects are great.  The battle scenes (whether on sea or land) are realisitic and of outstanding quality.The only problem that I can find is that the DVD has not placed sufficient focus on the contribution of the Ming China.  Then again, this is not unexpected since this is a Korean drama focusing on the great admiral.Also, the entire selection should have 104 episodes.  I don't know why it stops at 101.If you want to have a more comprehensive knowledge on the subject, try Samuel Hawley's Imjin War (which portrays Yi Soon Shin more accurately by quoting original sources).Any who is only intered in the fighting may also want to check out Stephen Turnbull's Samurai Invasion (which has more colorful maps and detailed description of battles from the Japanese perspective).Lastly, anyone who is a fan of samurai warfare may want to check out Shogun:Total War by Creative Assembly (now in Gold version).
Those Magnificant Men and Their Flying Machines. This was sent in great shape. It also is a great older movie about the first flying machines to be in that era. It involves a race of these older machines that was a lot of fun to watch
Everytime I watch i cry!. Being first generation in an Asian American family, my sisters and i can really relate to this movie.  We watch it about once a year with our mom (who is Chinese) and we always laugh and cry.  My favorite part is the scene with Waverly bringing home her boyfriend to meet the family and how the cultures clash.  We made our boyfriends (who are all white) watch that scene especially so they know how to act.  The part that always brings the most tears is the scene with June and her mom after the crab leg supper.  Very typical of Asian American families espcially if you are the first born of immigrants.  Recommended for all mothers and daughters to watch
One of the best comedies ever. Great cast help make this one of the funniest movies ever
Un box Revisited. This Amazon unbox is not fully developed or has a lot of bugs in it. They should pull it until they get the bugs ironed out. Could not download all of the movie i ordered and now it is gone from my computer and I don't see how to download it again.Update: Most of the problems I experienced were with my Sattelite connection. After 175 MB they start to throttle the speed way down. I upgraded and this helped. I can now download large movies but only in 350mb bites each 4 hours. If you are having trouble read your sattelite "fair access" policy
memories. Still a great movie.  The special features with Paula Prentis commentary was great
Absolutely Brilliant. Though the movie staring Peter Sellers was a spoof of all James Bond  movies, This was Hollywoods first ever attempt at bringing James Bond to  persona... My British roommate even enjoyed this movie!     EN
Still holds up great. I saw this back when it was released in the 70's. I liked it thn and I like it now. It is a poignant story that still has merits today. New York looks awfully gritty too. Just like ti did in the 70's. Edward G Robinson's death scene is particularly moving. Being that this was his last movie it makes it even more so. Good cast too. The late Edward G Robinson. The late Chuck Connors. The late Brock Peters. The last Joseph Cotten (in a small part), and of course the 70's sci fi man himself. Charlton Heston.Robert T
Blood Curling. WELL, I saw this movie the first time when I was but a boy, maybe ten or twelve years old, and it frightened me to death, though there was no gruesome monster to be seen, only a shadow, once, I believe. And the final words were:(in Italian): Scrutate il cielo...(Observe the sky in the meaning to detect anything "unnormal".Many years later (I still revered the movie) I realised that I was just becaus youjust never SAW the monster, that it was so terrifying. (Only the first "Alien" movie by Ridley Scott exude such claustrophobic helplessness, something quite unfamiliar for the species Homo Sapiens sapiens, to be well, game, I guess!!! AH YES, and Carpenters "Prince of Darkness", next to some George Romero Zombie movies, but "The Thing" is the BEST Black and White Horror Movie!It was just left to your own imagination, and that, speaking with Freud, will come up with something REALLY mean.I tip my hat to Howard Hanks!!
A Powerful and Romantic Love Story. This is a charming flick about two teenage boys who discover their love for one another after harrowing circumstances land them in the same apartment and eventually in the same bed
Great Book. The Sum of All Fears is about soldiers in war. The book talks about the fear men have when they are in war. We never think about the fear men have when they're in a war. In The Sum of All fears soldiers were surrounded by friends and men dying around them. They worry about staying alive each second. They crawl from one ditch to another. Soldiers are always thinking about their families at home. The Sum of All Fears describes fears of men in all different countries in the Middle East like Israeli, Sea of Galilee. The first part is telling the time and places. Also what the men were doing. The soldiers were involved in Israeli held-Golan Height on Saturday the 6th of October 1973. These are soldiers recounting events.My opinion of The Sum of All Fears is a very good book, for it lets us knowledge about the fears men had have while they in a war. To me a war is a long journey that soldiers go though and have no idea why. I had a first cousion that went into the army and came home after basic trainning then he went on assignment three day later was killed leaving a wife and new baby boy. Only the government knows what the real fight is about. While the media is give misleading information to the public. But The Sum of All Fears was able to let me know some of the things soldiers deal with day-to-day.
Poignant film about an intricate brother-sister relationship. This has become one of my favorite movies because of its realistic and honest portrayal of family life. In fact, it masterfully describes all kinds of relationships, their intricacies, and the ambiguosities that are often involved. Mark Ruffalo is especially memorable, delivering an entertaining, sweet performance, and he'll probably remind you of someone you know. All around, a great cast.
Those were the Years... To say this is a great film is probably an overstatement, but it certainly is a great idea for a film. Gibson looks good, Weaver looks good, Hunt acts good, Weir directs good, and the script is better than good. Much. It's a movie about ideas, which earns high marks these days, as so few flics can make that claim. Sure, it stumbles a bit, and the ending is purposely frustrating, to carry forward the theme of White Guilt and "What then shall we do?" Beyond all that, it's sensual, and unpredictable, and pretty damned intelligent. Seen anything lately in the multiplex that fits that bill? I ain't. See it for yourself.
Great movie!. This is a wonderful and accurate account of the "mad" Queen of Castille, Juana, sister of Henry VIII's first wife Catherine of Aragon. This is a great lavish movie that keeps you hooked from start to finish. I recommend this if you love great entertaining historical pieces.
Brudal and a bit shocking. DMX stars as the drug dealer King David, who pops up in the streets again after a long absence. Rolling into the frame in a player's classic - a late 70's Stutz Blackhawk - King David shrugs his way back into the hard-knock life. He quickly reaps what he sows and, mortally wounded, passes all his worldly goods to Paul (David Arquette), a scrambling white would-be writer. King David's estate includes an audio journal of his life, which provides flashbacks and a narrative-within-a-narrative that answers the shaken Paul's curiosity. It's the highlights of King David's high life that propel "Alone."Like all of Goines's heroes, King David is a scourge on the periphery, and the movie dramatizes his corrosive effect on the margins with savvy muscularity. Every life he touches he leaves in ruins - a need to deface beauty as a result of self-loathing is implicit, and DMX signals that motivation with sly hostility.To say that King David is the best part he's ever had is an understatement; he has never felt the need to inhabit a movie in this way before.I would recomed this to anyone who likes the hip hop lifestyle or music and for anyone who like films with a twist
Great Episode. This is the first episode where we really see the heart of Tony in his dealings with a teenager struggling with the horrible death of his father. A must see
Paddy, by George. We need to bring Paddy Chayefsky back to life, but it'll never happen if he ends up in this place. The novelist, playwright, and screenwriter penned some of the best and most acidic scripts in Hollywood history, including "Marty," "The Bachelor Party," "Network," and even the underrated "Altered States." Few if any, however, were better than "The Hospital," a dark comedy about a Manhattan hospital being terrorized by a mad killer. George C. Scott absolutely devours the screen as Dr. Herb Bock, the suicidal chief surgeon who has lost his wife, his kids, and his desire to serve mankind, until that desire gets rekindled-along with other desires-by Diana Rigg, whose visions tell her to get her father out of Scott's hospital before the machinery of medicine does away with him. It's refreshing to revisit highbrow satires such as this, from an age when scriptwriters were allowed to assume intelligence in the viewer and the ideas don't seem watered down for consumption by the lowest common denominator. The mysterious murderer is a bit of a throwaway, but the inhumanity of modern healing was never so bleakly funny. Or, considering that it's only gotten worse in the last 35 years, so scary
Great if you teach US History. Best overall look at the 1920's for students and the people interested in the 20's. Music is right with the times and the film is vintage. Fred Allen is the the host and his old radio voice is right out of the Jazz Age!
About bloody time!!!. Praise the lord. Beckett on DVD. This was and is a supreme movie. Two dynamos of the English stage/screen at the peak of their abilities. I loved this movie since it was first released. I have owned it on VHS for over 10 years. The only sad thing seems to be that it is not letterboxed like the VHS is. I guess I can live with that.As a matter of fact it is one of the two reasons I have kept my VCR. The other reason is the 'non'-director's cut of Blade Runner the one with commentary. Now if only Ridley would cough up a 'non'-director's version of Blade Runner I can get rid of the old thing.
Truly a gift for your DVD collection. The Gift is a riveting, very well-acted movie about a woman named Annie (Blanchett) who still has not yet gotten over the death of her husband and struggles to raise her 3 young sons. She gets money from social security as well as supplements her income by doing psychic readings for many people in the town. One of her clients (Swank, who you can always count on for a remarkable performance) has an abusive husband (Reeves, fantastic as a wifebeater redneck here) who thinks what Annie does is witchcraft and he threatens her life as well as the lives of her children if she is to read for his wife ever again. Then, the daughter (Holmes) of an important man goes missing. She's engaged to a man named Wayne who works at the school where Annie's boys go (I believe he is the principal, but I could be mistaken...sorry, but in any event, played by Greg Kinnear). But there is much more than meets this eye in this gripping tale, and soon the police, with no clues as to where the daughter is, turn to Annie and her powerful gift to see if it can lead them in the right direction.I won't spoil the rest of it for those that have not seen The Gift. Look for an amazing Giovanni Ribisi in the substory as well...he's terrific here. If you enjoy thrillers and are intrigued by the plot, The Gift is something you will surely treasure as I have. Even if you question the validity of psychic readings, this is a very interesting movie that's best viewed with an open mind. Very recommended
Totally psychotic. Totally psychotic Wedding Dress designer kills his models to 'find himself', but his horrible wife has her own willpower to wield. Bava's direction parallels the edge of John's insatiable drive to Kill, an assaultive film experience. Low budget. Horrible sound, so play it loud! (6/7
John Grisham's novel brought to live by a stellar cast and preformances. THis is one of my favorite movies. Besides containing a stellar cast (Matthew McConaughey, Sandra Bullock, Sammuel L. Jackson, Oliver Platt, DOnald AND Keifer Sutherland, Kevin Spacey) You get the idea. Is there a cast member that ISN't a biggie? The casting is Genious, and the acting incredible. It's suspenseful, deep, VERY emotional.. slightly dark.. it's the perfect movie. Even the rape scene is well done by being comfortably vague while still haunting you.A Time to kill's plot is pretty simply explained.  In the deep south, a 10 year old black girl is raped by two wite rednecks, who almost kill her. A young white lawyer and father (Matthew McConaughey as Jake Brigance) is sickened at the news, and doesn't quite know what to think when the little girl's father (Sammuel L. Jackson as Carl Lee Hailey) pays him a visit and asks if he'd "help him if he were in a tight spot".  The next day as the two redneck/monsters are being led up the stairs of the courthouse to their arraignment, Carl Lee Hailey pops out of a storage clauset with a machine gun and blows away the two young men that raped his daugher.Jake Brigance agrees to defend Hailey as his murder trial begins. The insanity plea is used to "give the jury an excuse to aquit" But in my opinion, I think it was quite legitimate. What father WOULDN't be driven insane under the circumstances?  the rest of the movie is Carl Lee Hailey's trial and the surrounding Drama as KKK violence emerges led by Kiefer Sutherland, and Jake's life and home are in danger, his relationship with his wife strained, and his career are seriously on the line in what seems to be a loosing battle.My favorite scene? It might come as a surprise, but my favorite scene is when the Prosecution calls to the stand the policeman who was leading the two rednecks up the stairs to their trial. He was caught in the knee by a stray bullet, and now has half a leg.  After the prosecution use the witness to incite rage against Carl Lee, and establish unerring identity of the shooter, The Defence asks him two questions."Do you think Carl Lee intentionally shot you?""No""Do you think he should be sent to prision for what he did?""He did what I would have done."but it doesn't end there as the Policeman (remember he's missing a leg because of what Carl Lee Hailey Did) becomes very emotional and boldly confesses that if someone raped his little girl he would blow him away just like Carl Lee did. He starts screaming to the jury to "turn him loose, He's a hero!"  I think this is one of the most emotion packed and well acted scenes (albeit there are many others too) (Great acting by Chris Cooper as the policeman)Anyway.. forgive if I rambled. I love this movie and if you like courtroom dramas... star studded casts.. John Grisham...suspense thrillers..just all around good movies.. You need to see this.
Her Naked Ankles. In one of his essays The German philosopher/critic Walter Benjamin compared film with theater stating that the lens of the camera replaces the audience as the spectator, but because the camera is emotionless the actor is unable to feed off the audience's reaction. However, in some films theatrical aspects are not only used, but become part of the film itself. For anyone who has watched Ichikawa Kon's An Actor's Revenge or Shinoda Masahiro's Double suicide this is quite evident. While not taking theater into play, Im Kwon-taek's extraordinarily popular film Chunhyang incorporates the traditional storytelling elements of the pansori, a singer and a drummer, into play. Instead of just opening the film, the viewer is treated to listening to the pansori's storytelling throughout the entire film even having his voice overdubbed over the actors and actresses. While this aspect of the film might be a bit distracting at first, especially when the film's action is cut between the stage and the visualized world of Chunhyang, it eventually sinks in and one can enjoy being told a story while seeing it acted out by actors and actresses instead of just the realm inside one's head.Chunhyang tells the story of the lovers Lee Mongryong and Sung Chunhyang, the former the sun of the governor of Namson and the latter the daughter of a courtesan. A budding scholar who is preparing for the exams that would open to him the world of officialdom, Mongryong one day becomes bored with his hours of constant study and asks his servant Pangja to show him some areas of local interest. At one spot he notices a beautiful young girl swinging high in a swing and he falls in love at first sight. He orders Pangja to fetch the girl for him, but the servant is reluctant because Chunhyang has a reputation of turning down every man who has shown interest in her. However, Pangja does go speak to her, but instead of returning with the girl he returns with a message that Mongryong interprets as that Chunhyang wants him to come visit her at her home. On the night he visits Chunhyang, the girl eventually agrees to marry him on the promise that he would not abandon her because of their differences in social status. He agrees to do so and so they marry and they seem quite blissful at first until Mongryong's father receives a promotion which requires him to return to Seoul. Because Mongryong has to return to Seoul with his father and because he cannot take Chunhyang with him, because being married to such a lowly girl would destroy his chances of taking the exams, the young couple must part, but Mongryong promises to return for Chunhyang after he finishes the exams. However, during the time that Mongryong is away, a new, corrupt governor takes over the old governor's position and he seems to have an interest in our heroine.Directed by the man who is considered by many to be the father of Modern South Korean Cinema and the director of nearly one hundred films, Chunhyang might not at first seem no more than a simple love story, but with its elements of traditional storytelling, its intermingling of history, romance, and melodrama, it does stand out as a great film within the ever growing number of spectacular South Korean films.
Funny Sellers Farce. "After the Fox" succeeds on so many levels.  It is equal bits caper film, slapstick, and filmmaking satire.  It also allows Peter Sellers' fertile comic mind to run free as a master criminal masquerading as an Italian neo-realist filmmaker.  Good supporting turns are given here by Victor Mature as a vain American movie star and Martin Balsam as Mature's exasperated agent.  Britt Ekland, Sellers' wife at the time, is good as Sellers' incorrigible sister.  Director Vittorio De Sica makes good use of the Italian locales and peoples the film with authentic locals.  I was surprised that this film was scripted by Neil Simon because alot of his work is topheavy with verbal gags but this film is equally weighted with the visual and verbal jokes.  A wonderful entry in the Peter Sellers canon
Best Legal Drama Out There. My wife had been fed up with all of the legal dramas I was maknig her watch.  Being a third year law student she always netpicks the details.  But the story in this fil overrides the legal fallacies, making True Believer a great drama that centers around a lawsuit
"I'm in love with you...". `In America' is a truly touching and beautiful film, elevated by strong performances by everyone involved.  The film centers on a poor Irish family that, after the tragic death of their 5-year-old son, illegally move to New York's Hells Kitchen and try and start a new.  The family consists of parents Johnny and Sarah (Paddy Considine & Samantha Morton) as well as their two daughters Christy and Ariel (Sarah & Emma Bolger).  Johnny is trying to make it in the world of acting, and they struggle as he fails audition after audition.  Their apartment is just about condemned, all their neighbors are crack addicts, and worse yet Sarah has become pregnant again and her condition is far from perfect.  In the midst of all this tragedy there is a glimmer of light.That light is found in Mateo (Djimon Hounsou) who, while appearing to be reclusive and mean actually lets his guard down with this family and becomes a friend.  It all starts with his kind gesture towards the two girls while the experience their first Halloween in the states.  No one is paying them any mind as they trick or treat throughout the building, but Mateo is softened and opens the door for a friendship all parties needed.  As the film progresses and we learn of Mateo's condition, their relationships become more and more pertinent and meaning some.  They need each other.The final frames of the film are tragic yet beautiful and as the oldest daughter Christy turns off her camera a tear is brought to your eyes...one of happiness mixed with sorrow.  This is a brilliant film that touches on so many levels of human emotion, from grief to acceptance to fear and happiness.  As you watch these people grow and learn you are swallowed up in their trials as if you've known them your whole life.  This is due mostly to the impressive cast.  Samantha Morton hands down delivers the finest performance here.  I only feel that if the academy had placed her in the right category (she was above all things `Supporting') she may have beat out Renee for the golden statuette.  Regardless, her performance was harrowing.  She captured every emotion a grieving mother goes through, and her nervous breakdown in the hospital is so emotionally gripping it had me weeping.Djimon Hounsou blew me away with very little words, but it was Paddy that shocked me, mostly because he was all but ignored come awards season.  He was brilliant and deserved some recognition.  His grieving father trying to hold his family together in the midst of even more tragedy was heart stopping.  And don't forget these two young girls who played their roles so perfectly you'd swear they weren't acting.  They became these adorable innocent children without slipping into stereotypical `cute kids', remaining three dimensional and `real', not Hollywoodized and hollow!This film is, as many have stated, classic and should be watched and enjoyed by everyone.  It's very rare you get to enjoy something that exuberates perfection on every level, and this film, this rarity, does just that.
Creative, surreal n' crazy. I enjoyed the film, it was uncanny, bizarre, and colorful. wow. It' was a nice family movie
Moving and Beautiful. Excellent cinematography, superb acting, and a story that is engrossing, believable, and touching. Incredibly moving- I laughed and cried... bittersweet and honest. A must-see. One of my all-time favorites
The best one!!!. My kids are really crazy about these 3 films,but they think that this one is really the best one
Don't analyze, just watch. Do not try to apply western thinking to Asian movies!  They are not done with the same intent or even at times for the same purpose.  These movies go deep into culture and you have to go with it to enjoy what goes on.  This movie has good action and fantastic plot lines!  I searched until I found it.  I like wire fu and prefer it to "real" kung fu movies because I like to escape.  Butterfly and Sword will take you places you haven't likely been before.
Another good CSI:NY. Though CSI:NY is most least favorite of the three CSIs, they still manage to make a good one sometimes.  This is one of those good ones
One of the greatest episodes. This was one of Stargate SG-1's funniest episode ever. You get to finally see The FURLINGS for the first time, too bad it took 200 episodes. (And too bad they may not be real).If you're a Science Fiction fan you'll love the Burns that go around in this episode. Especially the Star Trek and Farscape burns which were Hilarious. This is the perfect 200th episode for those loyal fans that stood by and watched every episode for the last decade.
LADYHAWKE and TIMELINE both produced and directed by Richard Donner. Novel by Crichton...All equal WINNER!. Director Richard Donner (LADYHAWKE, SUPERMAN, LETHAL WEAPON I, II, III, IV, etc.) leads an ensemble cast of stars Gerard Butler, Billy Connolly, Frances O'Connor, Ethan Embry, Morton Csokas and David Thewlis "back into time only to find out that if history had not been changed by these characters the present might not exist!" (Yeah! I wrote those words! Not another critic yet it's a true analysis of this fantastic film!)If you loved Richard Donner's LADYHAWKE then TIMELINE (2003) based on the novel by Michael Crichton should capture your need to escape for a good two hours entirely! Modern day archeological students go into the past by way of new age technology in order to rescue their professor. ON the way and IN the way are knights of not so good caliber, ladies in distress and one man in particular who finds himself lured to a past he never realized existed for him until he is there!My rating of TIMELINE is FIVE STARS! I can sit here and give away the plot but in order for you, the viewer to truly enjoy it, I'm not! When I saw TIMELINE for the first time it was in order to see another wonderful DONNER PRODUCTION and Billy Connolly, a Scot to whom my heart had been lost. The character of "Marek" (Gerard Butler) enslaved me upon my first sight of him! As "Creedy" in REIGN OF FIRE I'd fallen slightly under his spell and was willing to battle with dragons that I'd gone to cheer on in the film. "Creedy's" torched demise gave me cause to end their existence. "Marek" is yet another character such as LADYHAWKES "Navarre." (Rutger Hauer) For ladies who love a beleaguered knight without armor and men who like a man's man, "Marek" is your fellow!TIMELINE is wonderful fun but enough of a twist to make you think about what actually would happen should we have the technology to "back to the future!" This is one film not only well worth the money but well worth the time to view over again and again! For ladies who despair of a real man keep this one within hand's grasp at a moment's notice! :-)
one of the best. This episode is a classic, and is one of the best in the series. It explores time travel and alternate time lines, and it's storytelling had paved the way for many screen plays that followed.
Unforgettable and wonderful. I have loved this movie ever since I saw it on television and watch it whenever it is on (it's been some time now) and I plan to buy it.  Waterston has never been better as the understanding and loving father.  I didn't realize when I first saw it that Reese Witherspoon was the daughter (that was before Reese Witherspoon became Reese Witherspoon).  A heartbreaking, beautifully acted and must-see film.  Rings true to life.  They certainly don't make movies like this anymore, and it's a shame
Corny, corny, corny, great film. We dust this off every year during Super Bowl Week.  An excellent choice for the "Chick Flick" section of your collection.  And as any husband can tell you, it doesn't hurt to have a lot of Chick Flicks on hand.
Wall Street wackiness. The 1980s were a time of unparalleled corporate greed, or so the media told us then and now. You had a bunch of workaholic young executives known as "Yuppies" pounding the pavement in New York making complete fools out of themselves. Why? Because many of these dolts were the same ijits involved in the flower power movement a few years before. You simply must hand it to the Baby Boomers--never has a generation taken so much from so many and given back so little to so few. By the time the 1980s rolled around, many of these cads turned up their sleeves and went about changing the corporate world. Thanks a lot. Largely due to the efforts of this generation, we all have to jump through a lot more hoops to get and hold a job. "Barbarians at the Gate" is a satirical look at just one aspect of the corruption the Boomers helped bring to the work world, namely the managed/leveraged buy out (...). Although several of the principals in the film look much older than the Boomers, don't be fooled. It was the total lack of morality of the post-war generation that helped fuel the greed of the 1980s.This made for HBO film--one of the best the channel ever created by the way--stars James Garner as Nabisco/RJR chief executive officer F. Ross Johnson. This is a guy who is a born salesman, as the beginning of the film shows us when we see a youthful Johnson selling photography sessions door to door. By the time he has grown up, he's running one of the biggest corporations in America, selling cookies and smokes to people around the world. In fact, Johnson's latest brainchild is the creation of a smokeless cigarette that promises to revolutionize the industry. The possibility of huge profits from the new venture leads Johnson to make an offhand comment about buying the company so he can hold on to most of the profits. Little does he know how easy it is to accomplish this goal. His friends put him on to a fellow named Henry Kravitz (Jonathan Pryce), a corporate raider known for his skills in buying up companies and turning huge profits in the process. Johnson meets with Henry, but doesn't care for the guy that much. For one thing, Kravitz is a bit on the cold side whereas Ross is everyone's witty friend. Worse, the Nabisco executive gets the feeling that Henry won't let him run the company the way he sees fit, i.e. maintaining a huge fleet of corporate jets and posh expense accounts.Ross Johnson decides to go ahead with his leveraged buy out without Kravitz at the helm. He contacts his old friend Jim Robinson (Jim Thompson) over at American Express, who in turn brings in hotshot financial whiz Peter Cohen (Peter Riegert) from the firm of Shearson Lehman to help finance the deal. Robinson's ingratiating wife and public relations guru Linda (Joanna Cassidy) also lends a hand. All the principals must keep quiet about what they plan to do, though, because Kravitz and other sharks on Wall Street will jump into the fray if they get a whiff of Johnson's ambitious intentions. Of course, that's exactly what happens. Kravitz does discover the plan and makes it a personal crusade to force Johnson out of the picture. Henry considers himself the "Father of the LBO," and he's not about to let a bunch of upstarts steal his limelight. He's got his own hotshots willing to work night and day in order to present a better offer for RJR/Nabisco stock to the company's board. The majority of the film deals with the minutiae of back and forth backstabbing, blatant greed, under the table dealing, and assorted other highly unethical business practices. You'll be surprised to discover how suspenseful this film makes a leveraged buy out seem.Rarely have I seen a film that so successfully balances a message with fantastic humor, great characters, and high suspense. The message, of course, is the unbridled greed of corporate America. Repeatedly, these characters plot and plan to make a boatload of the green stuff while everyone else suffers the consequences. Layoffs don't mean a thing to these people as long as they can fill their pockets. You should despise these people, and you will at times, but most of them possess endearing traits as well. Garner's depiction of Johnson steals the show in this respect. His witticisms, outbursts, and general grouchiness are hilarious to behold, with none other than the scene where he discovers the utter failure of his smokeless cigarette serving as proof of this assertion. "I need an extra set of lungs to take a drag of this thing" is the cleanest line I can mention from the exchange. Garner's just great, and the primary reason I have watched this film at least a dozen times since it came out in the early 1990s. His overpowering presence tends to overshadow the great performances put in by Jonathan Pryce, Jim Thompson, and Jeffrey DeMunn as one of Ross's underlings at Nabisco. David Rasche does a great job in the small but very funny role of Ted Forstmann, an investment banker seeking to carve out his own niche in Ross's deal.I don't know what the problem is over at HBO, but they consistently release their films to DVD with few to no extras. At least "Barbarians at the Gate" comes with a widescreen picture transfer, something I can't say for several other HBO releases I have rented lately. If you love James Garner, or just adore films with a high entertainment value, you must check out this obscure little gem soon. Do it for no other reason than to blow raspberries at that darned Boomer immorality!
Blackmail, death, and sex invade a family. This fine film has many stories - one might be the story of individualism versus society where the former is represented by two blackmailing men out to make a dollar and the latter represented by a woman and her three children and absent Navy husband maintaining a family. But the strongest and most interesting one to me centres on the journey the handsome character played by Goran Visjnic makes from criminal to something of a rdeeming figure when he cannot effectively carry through the task assigned to him by his partner in the blackmailing strategy they have devised.  With an excellent music score, strong design characteristics, fine acting by all concerned, this is a very fine film indeed worthy reviewing from time to time
Pretty darn good for a sequal !!!!. Hey, for the third installment of the Pink Panther franchise. It's not that bad. The acting was excellent as ususal. The plot is a simple one. The famous Pink Panther diamond is stolen once again and all clues are pointing to that rouge jewel thief "The Phantom". Clouseau is brought in to solve the case. But there is one problem, this time "The Phantom" aka ,Sir Charles Lytton really didn't do it this time. So, now both Closeau and Lytton must race to figure out this mystery before they are both killed.
Funny, slightly surreal comedy on the merger of East and West Germany. If you don't mind reading subtitles (or, of course, you understand German) this movie is great. Some of the humor is visual, some verbal, so you have to be good with subtitle reading.The humor is subtle, that is to say it is tongue in cheek, not slapstick. It is not a political film, though it presents itself in a political context.The R rating is not really deserved - there is a little nudity but there is nothing shocking in the movie.It is a nice view into the lives of East Germans during the early chaotic days of integration. I dare say life now in East Germany is more brutal and more cynical.-k
Branded. If you enjoy good OL westerns this is one of the most entertaining.  Good story, one of Alan Lad's best westerns
Ronny Yu's masterpiesce. Now as long as you know hong kong films, you know that they are like all low budget and therefore are really hit and miss.  This is a definite hit.  The beautiful brigitte lin is I guess a girl who was raised by wolves and she works for this evil cult.  She helps a young boy and she ends up later being his lover.  Now when I review my absolute favorites I usually just go off on the keyboard, but nobody I know has ever seen this movie.  In omaha, nebraska, we don't get all these movies at a chinatown store and my best buy store has like nothing that it shows on it's website.  Therefore I need to go to places like amazon and ebay to get the movies I want.  It really sucks.  So I will make sure I don't give anything away cause I would feel absolutely horrible.  But I will tell you a few things to look for that made this a classic for me.BRIGITTE LIN-she is hotter than ever in this movie.  But not nearly just that, after seeing this the first time the bide became my favorite woman character EVER.  And that goes for all genres of all countries movies.  And all TV shows for that matter.  She gives such a powerful performance, and I will just say that when the white hair comes in to place you will feel her pain.  The director just did a brilliant job with EVERYTHING.WUDANG KID SHOWING OFF SWORD TECHNIQUE- this is a scene you will always remember, it is so beautiful, this shot alone makes this movie very unique.  And the kids sword skills aren't too bad either.THE TWINS-you will never foget these 2.THE CAMERAWORK-the cinematography is just astonashing, I saw a reviewer complain about thi, but it is another thing that makes this unique.  Stunning.THE ACTING-you are not gonna get much better acting than this.  Other than a goofy character who was very good, everyone's acting is brilliant.Now the version I recieved was not the special edition.  But I don't buy dvd's for the special features.  But then again it would have been really nice to hear the ronny yu commentary not just cause he speaks perfect english and i wouldn't have to read somebody's translation of ronny's speech, but because we just don't get many of these commentaries.  I mean wouldn't it be cool to hear like jet li on fist of legend, donnie yen on drunken tai chi, or woo oing on iron monkey.  But anyway the picture quality is very good, not good for a 93 film, but still good.  It's widesreened and has 5.1 sound that rocks, so you can't beat that, the music is sweet.  I bought this used over amazon so if you buy it directly from them you may get the special edition but I have now learned ot ask before you buy.
The McCourts. If you are a fan of the McCourt literary legacy, then you will definately want to add this to your collection.  It is an informative, thoughtful, and touching film that is sure to add to the whole McCourt experience
I Adore This Movie!. I watch this about once a year and never get tired of it. Hepburn and Tracy are great together as usual. The company setting is appealing, and makes me yearn for the pre-PC days when big companies had bars, Christmas parties with drinking and revelry, etc. It's a Christmas movie out of the ordinary.My favorite scene is when it's raining and Tracy goes home with Hepburn. They are all cozy with a fire and fried chicken and floating island, only to be walked in upon by the wonderfully arrogant Gig Young. Sometimes I just watch this scene alone!I also love the line near the end of the movie where Young says he's been thinking and Hepburn asks him what that was like.A delight
Mysterious magic or just a trick. I have to say I was really skeptical about liking this movie because I thought the movie was about magic. This movie is more of a love story with magic tricks being conducted by Edward Norton's character. I really like this movie because it is mysterious and yet it has a love story going on as well. Edward Norton did a very good job of playing the mysterious Eisenheim the illusionist and the tircks he conducts are quite intresting. This movie was also quite enjoyable because the lovely Jessica Biel plays Eisenheim's love interest. This was a very great movie because it has a love story, mystery and magic. This movie really makes you ask yourself is it magic or just an illusion.
wonderful. received better off dead right on time. quick and will consider buying from in the future. thank
What a Great Screenwriting Coach!. This wonderful little book is for you, the student of screenwriting.  How do I know?  I had the good fortune of being in Dr. Claudia Hunter Johnson's screenwriting class at Florida State University.  We used the methods described in her book and they work!  If you are disciplined enough to follow her process, you will amaze yourself.  You will begin with Le Menu (your very own personal autobiography) and finish with a well-crafted script.  Although you will not have her direct feedback, you will have the benefit of a script coach who has helped launch a thousand careers.  Tom
great movie for the family. I love this movie! it is incredibly good. It is definitely sad to see this young girl struggle so much. It really makes you thankful for you have got in life.
The era is securded. This was the first movie to be shot of the six films. Since this movie has barely any violence in it and only occasional very mild thematic elements in it. This movie should be fine for kids ages 10 to 21 years of age and older. The reasons why I recommend this for ten and up is because the gags used in this comedy movie are the old school slapstick gags that have been used since 1950s and earlier. These old school gags may be to confiscated for kids under the age of ten to understand. The other reasons why I recommend this movie for ages ten and up is there are a few brief scenes thrown into the movie occasionally with the use of Champaign and other alcoholic drinks.. In this movie Inspector Closeau is hot on the trail of a notorious criminal. known as the Phantom. Can the young detective catch this thief who has been dogging the police for twenty years? Find out in the hilarious funny conclusion.
DVD - U2 Elevation tour - 2001. This is a great DVD.  We really enjoy U2 and have found this to be one of their better DVDs.  I think you'll enjoy it
A Very Powerful Treatment of Popularity viz a viz Discipline in the Military. In an interview Sir Alec Guinness was asked how difficult it was for him to portray an individual whom he in actual life was the opposite to, Sir Alec responded as all great actors would, by saying that he  felt it to be challenging, but enjoyed it once he got into it... and this is the Alec Guinness that one sees in Tunes of Glory. The tale of friction between two powerful figures, both with huge egos and both unwilling to bend to the circumstances of reality and their times. The ending of the movie has always broken me up and brought me to tears.  for just as in the movie... "all my sons".. theMajor (Guiness) felt an afffinity and a kinship to all the men under him, growing to love them as (..."all my babies"...) he would his own sons.. there lies the irony in the ending... and his ultimate feelings for Col. Barrow (John Mills).....enuff sai
Baseball: Metaphor for life. This movie wasn't really at all about baseball, but about the metaphor for life baseball is. Overall if you are looking for a film that is going to capture what baseball represents, then this is it
Cult Classic Movie. This movie is wrong on so many levels, which is why I love it.  It's not so much "dark comedy" as much as it's just funny.  About a rich guy who wants his wife dead and the incompetent kidnappers who can't understand why the husband is pushing them.  Add to that the rich guys lover and her other boyfriend who, as the cop describes in the movie "this may very well be the stupidest man on the face of the planet; perhaps we should just shot him."  Great cast, great writing
Great fun and kind of scarey. I really enjoyed this movie.  Great music, good effects for the time the movie was made and unexpectedly funny.Enjoy
Fans of Woody Allen will like it. This was a pretty good Woody Allen film packed with well known celebrities. Woody Allen is playing a novelist named Harry who written books based on people he knowns. He doesn't tries much to disguise them and upsets his friends with his tales. There are funny moments when the movie segues to his fictional characters. My favorite is the one with Demi Moore. The one with Billy Crystal is pretty funny too. In Harry's real life I got a kick out of Cookie the goodhearted prostitute.
Fandango. I have loved watching this movie through out the years on TV when offered. The original "Road Trip". Kevin Costner's best movie in my opinion
It 's a cool "HighSchool comedy" movie. I really enjoyed this movie, All the action passes always checking the clock, shows as the desperation is taking a young person who always were correct and nice in an apparent ruffian and bad student.  Very good music and photografy, a detail:  the starring actor like his against figure (a young R Tyson)  have 26 years old each one and they simulate to be 18.Comment in spanish for people who speak Spanish:Toda la accin transcurre checkeando siempre el reloj, muestra como la desesperacin va llevando a un joven que siempre fue correcto y pulcro en un aparente rufin. Muy buena la msica y la fotografia, un detalle : el actor protagonista al igual que su contra figura (un joven R Tyson) tienen 26 aos cada uno y simulan ser de 18
Walt Disney's Best Movie. Disney made its mark as a major studio in 1937 with its first full-length feature film, Snow White and the Seven Dwarves. Ironically, given this early success, Snow White was their only hit movie for the next 13 years. World War II kicked the hell out of Disney's overseas markets. Even movies today regarded as classic Disney - Pinnochio, Bambi, Fantasia - lost money on initial release. Disney eked through by diversifying into training films for the US government, and the South American films that were part of FDR's Good Neighbor policy, etc. - stuff that made back its costs but not much more. By 1948, Disney was in dire financial straits. They had just enough money for one more movie. Walt Disney realized he needed a hit or his studio probably wouldn't survive, and it would have to be what they did best: a full-length animated feature film. Walt said to himself, "What we need is a movie about a girl in trouble. Audiences love that. They loved Snow White." That's what he wanted: a movie like Snow White, but even more so - more comedy, more drama, more magic, more music, more lovable characters. He chose as the basis of his company's Hail Mary pass arguably the most famous fairy tale in the world: Cinderella.Disney didn't have the money, as they had on earlier films, to lavishly storyboard every scene. Thus they hit upon the wonderfully clever idea of shooting the entire movie in live action, then the animators used stills from that as storyboards. The photos used survive to this day, and many are provided as a Special Edition "extra." In some cases these photos have the animator's drawings over them, turning for instance an almost bare stage into a hall in Cinderella's family chateau.In 1950, Cinderella was released and was everything Disney so desperately needed. Even today, Cinderella is arguably the best movie Disney's ever made. It's just awfully hard to argue with any aspect of this film. The animation artwork was a product of Disney's famous "Nine Old Men" - at that time not yet old. Cinderella pulls off, superbly, something not particularly easy to do: it integrates believable human characters with funny cartoon animals and makes it work. From Eric Larson and Marc Davis' beautiful and graceful Cinderella to Ward Kimball's wonderful Jaq and Gus-Gus the mice and over-the-top Lucifer the cat, everything flows together so well it all seems perfectly natural.Part of Walt Disney's plan to out-Snow White Snow White with Cinderella involved its music. He very consciously wanted Cinderella to be a source of hit songs. There had been hit songs from Disney films before ("Heigh Ho" and "Whistle While You Work" from Snow White, "When You Wish Upon a Star" from Pinnochio, etc.) but they'd been almost accidental. "Oh, we have a hit song, well that's nice." For Cinderella, Disney for the first time went to Tin Pan Alley (28th Street in New York City where the professional songwriters could be found). Disney wanted his girl's music done by the very best craftsmen, the guys who wrote hit songs for a living. The Cinderella soundtrack hit big (a #1 album with 3/4 million units sold) with songs even today considered quintessential Disney, most notably "A Dream is a Wish Your Heart Makes" from the movie's opening scene, "The Work Song" while the animals help Cinderella clean the house and simultaneously build her ball gown, and "Bibbidi-Bobbidi-Boo" (nominated for an Academy Award as best movie song of the year) from the Fairy Godmother transformation scene.For their best movie, Disney apparently spared no expense producing the DVD. Not only has the picture quality been digitally restored, but the audio has also been cleaned up with a new 5.1 surround sound mix. Totally gone is the background hiss associated with so many old movies. (Cinderella has the distinction of being "the noisiest movie ever restored" according to its audio crew.) The original mono soundtrack has also been spruced and is provided as an option for purists.A word about the movie's aspect ratio (i.e. how wide the picture is compared to its height). The DVD cover says Cinderella is presented in its "Original Full-Screen Aspect Ratio (1.33:1)". This is untrue. Virtually all sound films until 1953, including Cinderella, were 1.37:1. Since a TV screen is 1.33:1, you don't lose a lot when the original is "formatted to fit your television." I just wish they hadn't lied about it.Cinderella ends at breakneck pace: we go straight from her foot sliding into the glass slipper to the wedding to Happily Ever After, bing, bang, boom. Walt Disney believed "Audiences like a happy ending, but they don't like a happy ending that goes on too long." Hey, who am I to argue? Well, maybe I'll argue. A DVD extra addresses scenes originally planned for the movie but not actually used. One of these would have occurred after the fitting of the glass slipper and before the wedding: Cinderella is taken by the Grand Duke to the castle in her normal everyday clothes; the first time Prince Charming sees her since the ball she's not wearing a lovely gown, she's wearing her scullery maid outfit. Cinderella is frightened, how will he react when he realizes she's not a fine lady but a poor servant girl? And of course he doesn't care how she's dressed, he loves her anyway. I can **see** that scene in my mind, it would have worked beautifully. This is the one way in which an almost perfect movie could have been even a tiny bit better
Innovative, easy to follow, and gets excellent results. Richard A. Wolters was a longtime friend who died in 1993.  Dick was founder of the North American Hunting Retriever Association (NAHRA). I campaigned Labs with him and used his training technique to develop  wonderful hunting companions. Anyone interested in owning and hunting with  a first class retriever will benefit from Wolters' training tips, videos  and books.  A good retriever is an important wildlife conservation tool.   You will add further to your enjoyment by joining NAHRA to work with other  retrievers and retriever owners. Good hunting and great success
Magnificent transfer by Criterion. I am not going to write about the merits of Ran, i.e., it is a given that it is perhaps Kurosawa's finest work. If you bought the previous Masterworks edition and are sitting on the fence whether to purchase the Criterion, don't hesitate. The "Masterworks" transfer is a travesty compared to the Criterion. The colors just bleed in the Masterworks, whereas here the colors are perfect and vibrant. On the Masterworks DVD there is a restoration demo, which I thought was a joke since they did a lousy job compared to the Criterion. Get this DVD if you are a Kurosawa fan; you won't regret it. This is perhaps the finest Criterion DVD that I have purcased, and I own over 40 Criterions
Firefly is worthy of your download!. The cancellation of this short lived but highly acclaimed series is perhaps the biggest mistake made by a network. Ever.Fox executives broadcast the series out of order, it was preempted several times for baseball...it didn't have a chance.*The DVD box set of Firefly has been in the top 20 boxed sets in Amazon sales since its release in 2003. Not too shabby for a series that was limited to 14 episodes. Must be something to it, huh?Give this series the chance it deserves. Download #1 Serenity and try it on for size. It's space westerny goodness all around.If you find you are drawn to this series, come visit us at fireflyfans.net. We'll be waiting for you with Mudder's Milk and Strawberries.
As great as the Babe was. It is the best film about baseball I have ever seen, based on the real story of one of the most important icons of the twentieth century.
Wonderful. The Bicycle Thief (Vittorio de Sica, 1948)One of the things I adore about Italian filmmakers is that they know how to end their movies. Whether it's completely understated (Michele Soavi's Dellamorte Dell'amore) or so over-the-top that "cheesy" doesn't even begin to describe it (Argento's Suspiria), you know that you're going to get some sort of reward for the build-up. The Bicycle Thief is no exception to the rule; you see the ending coming from a mile away, but that doesn't make it any less of a payoff.Antonio Ricci (Lamberto Maggiorani) is trying to get along in post-World War II Italy, where poverty is rampant. He lands a job hanging posters, for which he needs a bicycle. The family has to sell the bedsheets to get his out of the repair shop, but that's all right, innit? After all, he's making money now. Until, that is, on the morning of his first day on the job, his bicycle is stolen by one of the city's ubiquitous bicycle thieves. For the rest of the movie, Antonio, aided by his son Bruno (The Barefoot Contessa's Enzo Staiola) and some friends, goes looking for his bicycle and/or the guy who stole it. Antonio, consumed more and more by the random injustice of the thing and his frustration at the indifference of the rest of the world to his plight, finally hits bottom, with the expected results.Antonio is, at no point in this movie, the good guy. Even when he's on top of the world, having just gotten his bicycle out of hock, he berates his wife for stopping to visit a seer (in a scene that's actually one of the film's most suspenseful, since you know his bicycle's going to get stolen, you just don't know when). He berates the seer, yes, which later becomes an integral part of his character, but his wife as well, which is an integral part of his character right then. He's never all that good to his kid. He orders his friends around like Mussolini. When he gets frustrated, he takes the kid out for grilled cheese sandwiches and the two of them proceed to get plastered (allowing Antonio-- and De Sica-- a rumination on class structure, as the daughter of a wealthy patron of the restaurant catches Bruno's eye). All of this is, in a way, morbidly funny, and yet you know you're watching a tragedy, Antonio as low-rent Lear or Titus Andronicus. And Maggiorani-- who, despite having turned in (in his big-screen debut) one of the great performances in Italian film to that point, never landed anything more than a supporting role the rest of his life-- plays Antonio as if he knows Antonio is Andronicus, but not as if Antonio knows Antonio is Andronicus. That's great stuff, right there.I've been putting off watching this for years because, honestly, I had no idea why a movie about a bicycle thief would have captured the imagination of critics and the public alike. Well, now I know, and I have to tell you, they're right. This is a fascinating study of a man's slow descent into obsession, and it's well worth your time. ****
cant believe its on dvd. this is so weird i never thought they would put this on dvd i had the old v.h.s. copy i loaned it to some one never got it back how long has it been out on dvd i dont know how good it did at the movies but its a b movie are there any special features the whole cast are great shannon presby what ever happen to him john philbin also i just cant believe its on dv
Lovely Movie. This sweet romantic movie is a favorite of many and perhaps Woody Allen's best film.  Mia Farrow is perfect as  sweet Cecilia who really deserves a handsome hero in her life, Jeff Daniels is great in his duel road and Danny Aiello plays a villain with enough charm that you can see why Cecilia got involved with him in the first place.  The 1930's setting is well realized and nostalgic. And the movie within a movie is fantastic since as others have said Allen somehow makes the black and white fantasy world brighter and more appealing then the drab reality.
What makes a classic a classic.... What makes this movie a kung-fu classic?  Quite simply, the influence that it had on the genre and all the movies that followed it.  Watch any modern Kung-fu movie (from "Crouching Tiger" to the myriad of Jet Li films) and you will see a little bit of "5 Deadly Venoms" in it.  This movie was as much a trend setter as "Enter the Dragon".  Of course, today's movies are a lot more sophisticated in the acting, sound and choreography.  But considert that this movie was made in the late 70's and still stands the test of time
Teusdays with Mauri. Terriffic Movie  just shows how some people make the most of thier lives and tackle the cruelest of diseases with dignity and an inspirational inner stregnt
This tape is the best!. I have found this tape to be outstanding for starting to stretch after not working out for a very long time! It's the perfect pace and nothing in is so advanced that it's discouraging. I feel so good during and afterwards. I'm addicted to this tape. I'm telling you, you feel so calm, relaxed and limber after doing this. You'll want to do it everyday. Perfect for beginners. Highly recommended
I Loved It. I love this movie. It is not in English, but the story is easy to understand, and has an ending you will always remember.A great popcorn evening at home movie
Indiana Jones and the Temple of ICK!. The &quot;Indiana Jones&quot; trilogy will endure for a long time--everyone adores cliffhangers and romance, and these three films have plenty of both. Of the three, the middle film, INDIANA JONES AND THE TEMPLE OF DOOM, is by far the ickiest: the assortment of bugs, monkey brains, millipedes, burning bodies, and unique open-heart surgeries are visually more stunning than tangles of snakes and melting Nazis. But, like the other two, TEMPLE OF DOOM is loaded with action, great pacing, and on-the-money performances.
Gets better everytime I watch. I just love this movie, but it may not be for all, since it is a very specific type of humor. Don't expect "Best in Show" or "Waiting for Gufman," because this is not a mockumentary, but rather a really funny movie about the ups and downs in Hollywood. And may I add, very on point.  I just love it more and more...and wish Guest would direct another one this funny.In love with both Emily Longstreth and Teri hatcher. I can't pcik which one, so I'll choose both
Probably the Best Drama Series Ever Made. I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out
DO NOT MISS THIS!. This is one of the sexiest movies of all time! Pre-dating the Italian Neo-Realist wave of film-making by just a couple of years, its influence can be felt in the the movies of film-makers such as DiSica and Rossellini
I enjoyed the season premeir emensely. I enjoyed this series premier tremendously and am looking forward to watching the rest of the series.  Enterprise started before I had my PVR and was either on at a time I was unable to watch it or I never made time.  I watched one episode of Star Trek the Next Generation yesterday and it peaked my interest in watching some Star Trek episodes again.  Rather than watch episodes I've already seen, Enterprise looks like a great way to enjoy Star Trek episodes.As far as privacy concerns mentioned in other reviews, if you're paranoid, the internet isn't for you.  Keep your private things private, and not on networked computers.  Hopefully Amazon will remove reviews that do not at all pertain to the show they are attached to
And the Band Played On. I received this product on time and in perfect shape. I enjoy the high quality of Amazon's site
Epic Korean Drama. Koreans honor their greatest military hero in this epic drama which takes place in the late 1500s. The career and tactics of this Admiral are still studied at the U.S. Naval Academy, and doubtless those of other nations. The screenplay is based on a couple of novels, so there is some fiction, but the life of Yi Soon Shin was well documented, so there's plenty of fact supporting the story.If you are not familiar with Korean Drama, it's good to keep in mind that  this is not a Hollywood product, but they do very well with special effects and such considering the non-Hollywood budgets involved, and it's easy to see past all that and enjoy the tale being told.It's a long series, but presents an epic with power, depth and dimension and well worth watching it unfold through each and every episode.It would be great also to see KBS make other dramas available for viewing through Amazon, such as "Seoul 1945".
Fascinating. My husband and I watched this, and we both give it 5 stars. It's fascinating, sad, and really thought provoking.
Aw-Shucks Sweet and Funny Stuff. Official Meg Ryan Movie Disclaimer:  If you love Meg Ryan when she's playing the "quintessentially Meg Ryan" character -- slightly ditzy, girl next door, all eyes and smiles for miles -- you'll adore this film and must own it post haste!That said -- this is a larky, improbable, at times almost too cute vehicle for her charms, and those of the (who knew?) equally daffily appealing Tim Robbins, who can play crazy, tender, and smart like nobody's business.  Here he's a grease monkey full of heart, a little light in the cranium but fascinated by the gee-whiz, pre-lunar landing stuff of 1950's American pop pulp science.  She's Einstein's brainy niece in the of Sandra Dee, all white gloves and sparkly eyes, Doris Day suits and brisk, collegiate sexiness.  Walter Matthau's turn as Albert the Immortal is a bit heavy handed, but he's the zip and zing which makes this improbable romance "go" ... he and his band of fellow doddering professorial brainiacs, who relish rock and roll and fast cars, badminton and cardigans.Brilliant Brit Stephen Fry brings heavy comic gravitas to his role as Catherine's fiancee, a plummy sounding gent who calls her munchkin and is so pre-occupied with his lab rats and the color of the paint for the new home he's planning to provide for his amore that he misses the point entirely:  it's about love, stupid!Not an Academy Award calibre movie, I.Q., but not a bad way to pass the better part of a morning or an afternoon either.  Incurable romantics, this movie was made for people like us.  Cynics, take a pass ... and pass the sweet peas
The Prelude to the 2005 Butterfly Affect. This is not for the underaged due to the same sex scenes in the beginning scenes, otherwise it is an excellent drama. It is about a ruthless thief who finds redemtion after she and her partner betray their gang. Excllent twists and turns with a curious and amazing ending
I Believed All OF It. Movies, plays, and books are all subjective endeavors. The idea is to suspend your disbelief while reading or watching the piece.  In the case of BEAUTIFUL THING, that is not hard  to do.From the opening frame you want Jamey to thrive. He hates PE because the macho guys pick on him as they start a game of soccer (the English call it football). He jumps the fence and heads home skipping PE for the umpteenth time. Who can blame him and when a school chum's, Ste's, homelife with his brother and father takes an abusive turn, Jamey's mother rescues him on those nights and the two teens form a bond that goes well beyond friendship.As the two guys struggle to deal with their love and erotic feelings for each other, the music of Mama Cass Elliott plays in the background. The story and the music is an enchanting combination that intensifies your urge to see them make it as a couple.  You know they are young but not too young.  You wish that had happened to you when you were their age.Earlier reviews have already mentioned the terrific supporting cast as well as the two leads in this story, so I won't go into that here.  Instead, I want you to see the DVD so you can experience the feeling I felt at the end of the movie when Jamey and Ste begin a slow dance in the street in full view of their neighbors.  Unlike a few of my friends who dismissed this scene as unrealistic in a poor working class neighborhood, I chose to suspend my disbelief and each time I watch it, I mouth the word "yes".
You will either love it or Hate it. People who watch this movie either love it or hate it.
HG WELLS. This is an amazing service! For only 2 bucks i can watch what i like for the moment. In this case it was HG WELLS. Great biography
A lot of fun!!!. I'm a big fan at the serie and I enjoyed it agai
Vanishing Point great action Movie. This is one my favorite movies. I had it on VHS now on DVD. Non stop action start to finish,with a message
A Valuable Message. I liked this movie very much.  It was entertaining, funny, charming, but I especially liked the "twist" toward the end.  I felt it put out a message that really needs to be understood by everyone these days.  That is, as this movie attempts to show, the feelings shared between partners in same-sex relationships are no different than those shared in hetero relationships.  They are just as genuine, moving, loving, and caring.  Everyone can relate to them if they just let themselves.  I applaud the writer and those who starred in the movie
Hot Chick. A Great Funny Movie is a great movie.One of the best part is when the little brother walking to the car in his sister's high shoes.
Jungle Holocaust AKA Cannibal Holocaust: The Beginning. A film by Ruggero Deodato (Cannibal Holocaust). A plane crashes in the jungle. One of the survivors named Robert Harper (Massimo Foschi) gets lost and while trying to find a way out of the jungle he gets captured by cannibals. He is humiliated, stripped naked, and thrown in a hole with a bird for a while. Eventually, he escapes with the help of a beautiful cannibal girl named Pulan (Me me Lai) and tries to find his plane so he can go home. This is one of my favorite cannibal movies along with Cannibal Holocaust that in my mind is the KING of all cannibal movies that lives up to its name in being the most Controversial movie ever made. Jungle Holocaust is presented for the first time in America Uncut and Unrated released by Shriek Show on DVD. The movie comes with 10 lobby cards that are Extremely detailed. I recommend this movie to any one who likes Cannibal movies, Exploitation movies, and Horror movies. This is a most have for any fan of Euro-Exploitation movie fan. DVD features for this movie are Available Audio Tracks: English (Dolby Digital 2.0), Commentary by From Director Ruggero Deodato, Rare Production Stills, Posters and Promotional Materials From Around the World, and Director Commentary. Also the DVD comes with trailers for Umberto Lenzi's Eaten Alive (1980) the original uncut version released by EC Entertainment (1985), a trailer for Zombie Holocaust (AKA Dr. Butcher M.D.) (1982), Burial Ground - Night of Terror (1986), and a trailer for Beyond the Darkness: Buio Omega (1984) as well as a trailer for Jungle Holocaust (1978) trailer. This movie is also called and is known as Cannibal Holocaust: The Beginning. I think one of the best things about this movie except for the blood and gore is the amazing Music and graphics of the jungle and the wild life.
Mom's Not Too Old nor Dead, and Not About to Pack It In. With the death of her infirmed husband, May, an older woman faces a future in an urban world that views her as invisible, dead from the neck down, and unwelcome in the pseudo- sophisticated yuppie homes of her son, Bobby and his shallow wife, Helen, and Paula, a self- absorbed, clinging, and minimally talented daughter. The central family is anything but warm, supportive, and understanding of her new and tragic stage in life with the death of her husband. The Mother is a quiet character study that points up how in some societies, the elder parent is both unwelcome and a burden to grown children whose careers and status seeking overshadow all else.As May comes to realize the world is still important to her, the lonely widow finds her libido reawakened and alive with her daughter's boyfriend, a carpenter and rough sort. May embarks on an uninhibited sexual affair with Darren whose character is sympathetic to her at first, but his flawed nature is quickly revealed through the pressures of the women who surround him.This is the kind of role Hollywood actresses of a certain age whine is never written for them, but they would never appear because of the frank and overt sexuality, unglamorous wardrobe, little makeup, and social commentary on the vapidness of the society most film industry women are involved. The performance by the lead actress, Anne Reid ranges from quiet to giddy and her interpretation blossoms on screen from the drab widow to a sexually alive and freed middle age woman without face-lift, hair extensions, and liposuction. She bares more than her soul for the screen.Daniel Craig is the enabling handyman, Derrek who beds both mother and daughter. He turns in another stellar performance that is at first sympathetic to the widow's situation, but in the end is without redemption as his true nature unfold and he is literally the rooster in a hen-house. His aimless character's inability to say no to the ex-wife, boring girlfriend, and her mother is blamed as the root of his ineffectual existence. While good with his hands at building a conservatory, he is unable to construct meaning in his life.One of the best films from Britain in years, it is simply adult in its storyline. The Mother is the rare kind of film that is perhaps too honest for American audiences to tolerate having no car chase, no bling, no rap soundtrack to drown out the cretin performances by TV starlets and buff studmuffins. The Mother reflects how the aging baby boomers are now disposable people that offspring are willing to overlook, send to the retirement home, and get out of the way. May doesn't know what to do as she is made alive by Darren, isn't willing to go to the old folks home, and finds her kids are more conservative than she ever was at their age
My Favorite Episode. I don't have television, haven't for 11 years. When I learned CBS was allowing free viewing over the internet I checked it out and started watching episodes of CSI, CSI NY, CSI Miami, and NCIS. I found NCIS to be my favorite and this particular show Dead And Unburied is my favorite so far. I enjoy the light-heartedness of NCIS. So I decided to download this episode from Amazon Unbox.I really wish Amazon Unbox would allow me to burn shows I've purchased. As it is they are restricted to viewing on my computer. When Unbox expands this service to allow me to burn DVDs I will likely purchase many more shows this way. I like selecting individual shows
Western. My second favourite John Wayne Movie, the first being "She Wore A Yellow Ribbon".  A great cast and very entertaining as the westerns from this era are far superior to those of today.  The movie shows just because you are superior in rank doesn't mean you know everything.  The battle of wills between two of the greats John Wayne and Henry Fonda was handled beautifully by these two veteran actors.  Throw in a great supporting cast of Ward Bond, Victor McLaglen, Shirley Temple, John Agar and you can't miss.  I highly recommend this movie to add to your collection.  Glad to see it finally came out on DVD.
Darkest Comedy. The cast, the pacing, the violence, the one liners, this movie kills. If you don't like it, you're a prude or have no sense of humor. This movie kills, understand
Shangri-la. Everyone dreams of a world with no wars and peace with everyone.  This film, a great story about finding, losing and finally finding again such a place, is such a feel good film that never looses it's appea
The Bishop's Wife. Cary Grant is charming, as always.  A good "message filled" story and tradition to watch during the holidays
"Triumph of the Will" for the 1970's. My review's title is not to imply Barbet Schroeder is a manipulative filmmaker like Leni Riefinstahl, nor to say the film looks at Idi Amin purely in a positive light. (both are far from the truth) It refers to the fact this film, like "Triumph of the Will," looks at a cruel dictator during the height of his power, and while he was alive and well enough to actually partake in the film. Because of this, the documentary holds some historic importance not just for African history, but world history in general.The documentary is a fairly straightforward one. Some have found it boring, and admittedly there seems to be not much form to it. (although in Schroeder's defense, few documentaries are) Much of it is following Amin around and watching his daily life, as he would probably most like to see it. He gives the film crew a tour of Uganda wildlife, (including a focus on crocadiles) allows them to film a cabinet meeting, and displays a wargame simulating an attack on the Golan Heights. At times it almost seems like Idi Amin is greatly enjoying the limelight - during the wargame he is pointing up to the sky saying, "Film that jet!" or "Film that helicopter!" and the cameraman complies. If you're interested in Idi Amin or African history, then it will interest you and provide insight on a regime that eliminated hundreds of thousands of Ugandan citizens. If you aren't, then it probably will bore you, and be thought of as a cookie-cutter documentary.The special features include an interview with director Barbet Schroeder on how the film came about and what it was like to work with Idi Amin. Two interesting stories in particular arose from it. One was when Amin and Schroeder were watching Ugandan television footage, and Amin was infuriated that it showed him shaking hands with a foreign diplomat using his left hand. Schroeder replied, "No, that's normal, it happens everywhere - it just means the editor switched the footage around." Amin replied, "Oh! So it was the editor!" What Schroeder hadn't realized was that the cameraman had already been killed, and Amin afterward killed the editor. Schroeder kept his mouth shut after that. The second story involves the film's initial release. Amin was not happy with the original cut, and demanded Schroeder edit the film. When Schroeder refused, Amin rounded up 150 French citizens in Uganda and threatened to kill them unless Schroeder complied. Schroeder did, and the film wasn't restored to its original cut until after Amin had been overthrown in 1978.A rare personal look into one of the cruelest dictators of the 20th century. I would recommend it to any one interested in the subject matter, most definitely
The most Sensuous Tarzan. As a longtime Tarzan aficionado (I've read all the books),I just had to write a review for this Tarzan film, because I love it!   Yes, Richard Harris is embarrassingly over-the-top.  Yes, Bo's acting is sophomoric.  Yes, the plot plods, and, yes the slo-mo snake scene is overlong.  BUT!  First, the music is exquisite.  I have searched for years for the soundtrack to this movie!  Second, the on-location filming was first rate.  The lagoon and tree house were exactly as you would expect Tarzan's world to look. Third, the nudity was for the most part, appropriate to turn-of-the century Africa.  Fourth, and most importantly, Miles O'Keeffe was an incredibly sexy Tarzan!  Tarzan is a savage, sensuous literary character, and this Tarzan personifies that image.  As a gay man, I enjoyed watching Tarzan as much as I suppose the Derek's were hoping straight men were enjoying Bo!  Now if they had only shown HIM naked!  Now, about that soundtrack..
Looker. This is an excellent thriller for the time period in which it was created
Classic in its own right. I dont know what its like to have gone to school in the 1980's or have gone to school in the United States but I can still relate to this movie. This movie could have been set anywhere and in any decade and it would still tell the same story, only fashion and accessories would be different. Everyone has seen this movie by now and everyone has an opinion on it and most will say it is a really good movie. I would say that it deserves to be called a classic by now. It may not be a laugh out loud comedy or very dramatic and does move a little slow at times, but it delivers its message loud and clear and keeps you engaged throughout the whole movie. It gains momentum as it moves along and by the end, after experiencing all the emotiions you will feel satisfied.Being a small cast, all your attention is focused on the individual characters. The 5 students are all completely different from one another and all are brilliant. Each actor plays their part perfectly. While there is a large age gap between them they are all convincing as teenagers fighting there own demons. They will all probably be most remembered for this movie, with the exception of Emilio Estevez, but special mention must go to Judd Nelson who I believe is the biggest star of the film. His part was originally intended for either Nicholas Cage or John Cusack who would have also been great, but I'm glad Judd got his chance to prove his acting capabilities.It is a shame the DVD lacks many special features. All you get is a trailer and cast bios, I was desperately seeking an audio commentary, or at the very least production notes, however there are some interesting facts noted on IMDB.A teen movie for the 80's generation, anyone born after the film was made will probably not like it, but for others who grew up around or just after it will probably agree this movie is indeed a classic.7.5/1
Romance. Good movie.  Rather racy in light of the rating.  I thought it probably would have been an X.  Interesting plot and I especially liked the ending
"I don't know!!!". I love this stand-up. I saw this for the very first time about 3 or 4 yrs ago and I still laugh as hard as I did the first time I watched it. I'm a big fan of chris rock and all those guys, but cosby figures out a way to be hilarious while still being clean for everyone to watch. If you wanna see great comedy, you should really check this one out
Great Legal Thriller!. This movie is by far among the greatest legal thrillers I've seen, not only because the writing and directing are superb, but James Woods' acting performance is nothing short of spectacular. The variations he projects in his character expressions--with so many subtle nuances--make him 100% believable and fetching as that character. And when his sense of right is piqued, he explodes in the most compelling, absorbing, credible way--one which just pulls you another foot deeper into the story, kind of the way quicksand pulls you in: you just can't get out, nor do you want to.In this story, the Woods character is fighting not only for an innocent man's life, a prisoner doing time, but even more important, he's fighting for his own life--his sense of self-respect, honor, and decency, none of which he feels in his earlier law practice while defending and acquitting sleazeballs whom he knows should be in prison instead wrecking society with their crimes.I watched this movie a second time the night after I watched it the first time and got even more out of it. Buy it and keep it. It's far batter than most of the John Grisham legal thriller movies.No question about it: James Woods is one of the most underrated actors today. He performed almost equally as well in "Indightment" the McMartin child abuse case.I've omitted talking about the plot because you can obtain that from many of the below reviewers
Very good movie about medical students. Very well taken movie that depicts the sacrifices and passion required for medical profession. Background score goes very well with the movie
GREAT. I found the information awesome.  I found myself wanting to watch it over and over again.  It is packed full of information, watching situations as they naturally present themselves and ideas.  I hope Ian Dunbar does many more of these classroom environment tapes in DVD too ... I love watching trainers & dogs in action
ONEGIN. I highly recommend this DVD for its superior acting - all hands, as well as for the spectacular photography, scenery and overall quality of presentation.  A real keeper
Who is Sutter Cane?. A prophet?  A devil?  An oracle?  A preacher?  Whoever he is, he outsells every other author with his Lovecraftian style horror books, and now he's turned up missing.  John Trent (Sam Neill) begins the film in an insane asylum, telling Dr. Wrenn (David Warner) a fantastical tale.John, an insurance investigator, was hired to find the missing Sutter Cane (talented Jurgen Prochnow).  Tagging along with him is the publisher's assistant Linda Styles (Julie Carmen).  Together, after John pieces together a map made from Cane's book covers, they set out to find the fictional New Hampshire town called Hobb's End, featured in Cane's book and supposedly his current hideout.Those allegedly firm lines between reality and insanity begin to slip-slide away when John finds Hobb's End.  Styles had warned him that Cane's work had been known to have effects on his less stable readers, resulting in disorientation, memory loss, and severe paranoid delisions.  John believes this, having been attacked by a man with an axe, asking him if he read Sutter Cane.But, now that he's found Hobb's End, will John be able to leave?  After meeting Sutter Cane, can John handle the tales told to him?  Is John factual or fiction?  And what lies in wait for him in the black church?Believers, fanatics, followers, all flock toward Sutter Cane's work, which boils down to one question - is it fiction or reality?Look for a great performance by John Glover as Saperstein, plus cameos from Charlton Heston as Jackson Harglow and Bernie Casey as Robby.  The acting is good and the atmosphere creepy, but the editing is a bit choppy in places.  However, those who love great 'B' horror won't be disappointed in this little lovecraftian-type terror fest.  One of John Carpenter's best films outside of 'The Thing'.  Enjoy!
A Crusade of Good Taste. The Holy Grail of Science Fiction. Brilliantly scripted and marvelously acted Sci-Fi movie based on the all-time favorite PC-game. The intense combination of an intergalactic war-story and a classic Shakespearian love-tale makes this movie an adrenaline-pumping tears-jerker of historical proportion. Mankind can traverse the darkest depths of space, it will always bring along its emotions!The Kilrathi character-depth is the secret of its success, diminishing the personality of Hamlet to a superficial cartoon-character. While the lines spoken by the Kilrathi have the rhythm of a Swiss watch, it is the depth of their meanings that truly fascinates. Only repeated viewing can reveal the many layers of its message. Once discovered, your will agree that this is what takes Wing Commander beyond the level of the greatest classics of Hollywood or even global cinema.The people of the future will divide human history in the pre-Wing Commander era (or the Dark Age) and the post-Wing Commander era, when humanity finally became enlightened by this masterpiece and its powerful message. At a lower level, you are bound to forget the part of your life that was spent - wasted really - before you could become a wittness yourself to the brillance that is Wing Commander.Oscars may be awarded for artistry in film-making, only a Nobel Prize (or several) could do justice to the levels of excellence reached by Wing Commander. This production will no-doubt be remembered by the many generations to come as a turning point in movie-making. How many ages hence, shall thsi our lofty scene be acted over? Its message, when correctly interpreted, will influence society as only the Holy Bible may have done before.Be ready to experience never-felt-before emotions as you watch this hallmark movie over and over again. It will leave its tracks on your soul - tractor-pull deep tracks
Great CLASSIC film. This film tugged at ALL of my emotions....I was angry, dissapointed, and sad.  This is a must see for everyone of any age. Its one of my favorites
Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST!. The Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST drama I have seen ever. Korean, American, doesn't matter! This is better than anything I have ever seen on TV or in the movies. Hollywood cannot touch this one! Kim Myoung Min(Yi Soon Shin) is outstanding in this!(no wonder he won the 2005 KBS BEST ACTOR AWARD FOR IYSS)It starts from when he was a child to his adulthood and can be emotional, funny, sad, and can make you angry!! The numerous obstacles and prejudices this man had to overcome and then always bounced back with no complaint because of the love of his country is phenomenal!! He put his country above all else and Kim Myoung Min did a great job of portraying that!My whole family, kids and all, watched this with me and loved it!I can see why Yi Soon Shin is Korea's hero and why other countries teach his methods
bad movie, but............................................ Well this is a very difficult movie to judge.  I would highly recommend it to any man who wants about 5-8 amazingly sexy scenes.   Seriously, if you see those scenes....they are burned in forever.   The movie itself?   Well if you drink about 20 beers, after depriving yourself of sleep for 48 hours......it may seem un-predictable.   Betsey Russell was a Goddess for sure!!!!
Prom Night. I enjoyed the movie very much. I'm a collector of old B rated movies as well of the 1950's. Hope to see more of the same
Pate bros 2nd joint rolled with creeper. The cool thing about watching movies constantly is that you see so many bad ones that occasionally a movie as slick as this plays out.  The cast is top notch, as is the directing by the Pate brothers, whose other credits include &quot;The Grave&quot; and the short lived but cool TV show &quot;GvsE&quot;.  Plenty of twists and turns abound in this movie that centers around Roth(in one of his best performances) taking a lie ditector test from two shady cops(Rooker and Penn) to find out if he is a murderer.  A film that relies on character development and suprises that pays off in the end with something to think about, this is a good one.  It would be nice to see on DVD but is not yet released on that format
IVAN THE WONDERFUL I. Despite having been produced over 60 years ago, IVAN THE TERRIBLE remains one of the most bizarre and compelling movies ever made. It is filmed in an ultra-expressionist style, despite the fact that expressionism had long passed its heyday in the 1920's and early 30's. Nonetheless, the style fits this almost gothic film perfectly. Religious and other symbols of power and authority are exaggerated, transformed into grotesques. The powerless peasantry, mired in the darkest ignorance, is presented as a frightening presence of menace, ever lurking in the background, waiting to be harnessed by the next tyrant.  Ivan himself is depicted as an elongated, Nosferatu-type character with a moral compass so convoluted as to be nonexistent. The mixing of "song & dance numbers" under the most monstrous circumstances toward the end of Part II only enhances the mesmerizing quality of the film. It is said that Stalin attempted to pressure the director to make this masterpiece more "Stalinist friendly," but that the filmmaker courageously refused. Unfortunately almost all other films made during the Stalinist Era reflect the justifiably maligned, dreary style called "socialist realism."[...
I just met a wonderful new man. He's fictional; but you can't have everything. Woody Allen's The Purple Rose Of Cairo ranks among his better films. The film centers on the experiences of a poor woman named Cecilia who is played wonderfully by Mia Farrow. Cecilia is trapped in a loveless marriage to a brute named Monk who is played by Danny Aiello.Cecilia has a job as a waitress in a small diner during the depression and although she tries to work hard she can't help but fantasize and chat about the movies with her sister who also works at the same diner. Cecilia's only comfort is in the movie theater watching glamorous but highly contrived movies about rich people who aren't suffering from poverty and the scorn of her husband. Cecilia eventually loses her job and after catching Monk being unfaithful to her she winds up watching The Purple Rose Of Cairo endlessly at the small movie theater in their town.Imagine Cecilia's surprise when one of the characters, the dashing all-American type guy Tom Baxter, decides to leave the film, jump from the screen into the audience, and run away with Cecilia! Tom represents the purity of heart and the true compassion that Cecilia longs for in her real marriage. She knows Tom is fictional because he came off the movie screen; but Tom maintains he's never going back because he wants to experience the real world with Cecilia as his new bride.Of course, all of this horrifies the movie theater manager and the Hollywood studio that produced the film entitled The Purple Rose Of Cairo. How inconvenient this is for Gil Shepherd, too, the actor who portrayed Tom Baxter in the film! The movie studio executives and Gil Shepherd hatch a plan to get Tom to return to the movie--but will it work? What would happen if Tom returned to the movie but took Cecilia with him into the land of make believe?The Purple Rose Of Cairo is a film you cannot afford to miss. Mia Farrow as Cecilia, Danny Aiello as Monk, Cecilia's husband and Jeff Daniels as both Gil and Tom all give some of the most convincing performances I've ever seen. Their performances moved me and engaged my attention much longer than I initially thought they would.This movie deals with the universal human desire to escape the pain and boredom of everyday life so many of us experience and to replace that misery with a world in which there are no real problems and everyone has money or at the very least a secure job. Cecilia represents us all as she delights to Tom's world of relative innocence and harmony. Therein lies the true strength of this film.The cinematography shines: I like the scenes in the movie house where you see the film being screened within Woody Allen's picture. The scenes filmed in the amusement park reflect careful forethought concerning lighting and camera angles. The choreography amazes me: I love the scenes in which both the movie theater patrons and the actors in the film are stunned by Tom's decision to leave the movie and they all move about simultaneously in ways that prove good judgment on the part of Woody Allen and his colleagues who worked on this film.Overall, The Purple Rose Of Cairo will remain an excellent film as long as the human condition and the quality of our lives are imperfect. Everybody dreams of a world where their true desires are reality and their troubles disappear. The Purple Rose Of Cairo elegantly explores this theme with sophistication, wit and poignancy.
You could hear a pin drop. The divergence of opinion among the reviewers regarding this film interests me - and reflects the changes the media itself has undergone, inspiring me to add my bit to the dialog here for what its worth.  First, I confess to not having seen the DVD.  I saw Under Capricorn about 20 years ago at the Nuart, a  revival theatre in Los Angeles, where it played as the late night feature on a double-bill with Strangers on a Train to a packed house.  The showing was memorable.  By the middle of the film, the tension had absorbed the audience to the point where you could literally have heard a pin drop in there - as the cliche goes.  The feeling was truly amazing - the energy was that of watching one of the great cinematic masterpieces - and Under Capricorn, great as it is - is hardly one of the greatest film masterpieces.  Yet, many of the reviewers here would be surprised to know that a surprising number of the most respected critics consider this rather musty treasure from the golden age of Technicolor - 1945-55 - one of Hitchcock's greatest achievements!Part of the problem is that the "action" in this "costume drama" hails from an age when the ne plus ultra in special effects was stuff like Charlton Heston parting the Red Sea in The Ten Commandments (and that was several years after the 1949 release of this film). There really is no viable action to speak of in the film - which, if films had academic subtitles, could be called:  Under Capricorn: Hitch meets Henry James.  Really, it is the Jamesian novel of film, before movies of James' novels came into vogue, although The Heiress, one of the most lauded and popular films of 1949, was Hollywood's first major adaptation of a James novel.  One can see flashes of Under Capricorn in the more droll moments of the French New Wave cinema of the 1960's - many of whose makers were nursed on Hitchcock.  But, calling this rather serious film merely slow-paced would be euphemistic.  The film bombed at the box office back in 1949, and would probably not fare much better, if as well, today.Then what exactly has earned this glorified and rather messy soap plaudits from the some of the most selective critics, an enduring cult following, and standing ovations at revival showings?  Not the storyline, trite even for the melodramatic 1940s.  Not the visuals.  There's not a whole lot to commend Under Capricorn in any technical category. What is great, making the film appear larger than perhaps it is, is a surfeit of that elusive combination of awesome acting and on-screen chemistry (could it be that Hitch really was as great a director of actors as some have claimed?).These actors don't need script or props - and, in truth, they don't get much of either, and yet - they cast a big-time spell.The other reviewers have concentrated on the performances of the central characters - the beautiful, strained couple - played by Joseph Cotten, and the gorgeous Ingrid Bergman in one of her most fetching screen appearances - if her character, played the hilt, is seemingly somewhat vapid at heart.  These seasoned pros are brilliant,and the subtlety of their portrayals, in which their characters show a truly lifelike, complete unconsciousness of what is going on around them, and their bittersweet devotion to each other, catalyzes the dramatic tension.But center stage in this film belongs without doubt, to the moral battle as it evolves between protagonist and antagonist of the drama, played respectively by the magnificent Michael Wilding, in what must simply be called a larger than life performance, as "Aunt Clary's boy" who comes to Australia "to make his fortune", and the great British heavy, Margaret Leighton.   And the action here, which does unfold - is moral.  Under Capricorn is, in essence, an old fashioned morality play, as Wilding's character, urbane, polished in the deeper sense, puts on the `shining armor' of altruism and engages in a furious, yet utterly muted combat, with Leighton's.  The latter flawlessly projects in probably less twenty minutes of screen time one of the great evils of the age, a character fueled entirely by envy, a desperate, nasty have-not, of little or no formal education, utterly lost in the fury of her blindly narrow, furtive, conditioned scheming.  The escalation of the this conflict gives the film its noted ballast. As the moral extremes in us are played out against the usual banal, superficial, and prosaic social contexts, the ponderously crafted sets, the costumes are finally retired, and our real faces are revealed for what they are.  As Wilding's character says to Bergman's in his incredible farewell scene: "I suppose I'll be the first man who ever went to Australia, not to return with a fortune", and she never will know how much he loved her, and how much he'd sacrificed.  Sublime.
A great film but a slightly disappointing DVD from Criterion. Le Samourai, Jean-Pierre Melville's riff on This Gun For Hire, is another of Criterion's slightly disappointing recent discs. The film is superb and the extras are okay but not outstanding (Melville trying a little too hard not to blame rival studios for the fire that destroyed his own studio during filming is the highlight) but the transfer, while acceptable, is nowhere near the standard of the deleted French DVD, or even the Russian one for that matter, both of which are much sharper. It's still a great exercise in pure filmmaking, but I'm glad I didn't trade in the French PAL disc, which boasts superior picture quality, before seeing this transfer
Modest But Ingratiating Allen Effort Features an Effectively Blowsy Farrow. Mia Farrow is the big surprise in this minor-league Woody Allen comedy from 1984. Before he started deifying ("Hannah and Her Sisters") and then skewering ("Husbands and Wives") her image as the consummate caretaker, he cast her against type as Tina Vitale, a brassy Mafioso widow in this frequently funny paean to Allen's days on the Borscht Belt in the 1950's. She is the mistress of a loutish Vegas-type performer named Lou Canova, who is represented by his woefully unsuccessful agent, Danny Rose. Danny gets Lou a big break, a high profile gig at the Waldorf-Astoria Hotel at which Milton Berle is to attend, and Lou insists that Danny take Tina to the show. Complications ensue as when Tina's mob connections think she and Danny are a couple, and much of the brief 84-minute movie is about the chase - which is frequently hilarious.My favorite scene is when Tina and Danny are trapped by a thug in a huge warehouse where Macy's stores their Thanksgiving Day floats and their voices break into a helium pitch when the bullets hit the air tanks. As Tina, Farrow submerges herself so completely in the role that in hindsight, it seems a shame she didn't push for a greater variety in her film roles. For once, Allen plays a completely sympathetic character, a nice guy caught up in ludicrous circumstances that are truly not of his own doing. I am not sure who Nick Apollo Forte is, but he is completely convincing as Lou especially when he's onstage singing like Tony Bennett and acting like Vegas mainstay Danny Gans.As a framing device for the story, Allen assembled several famous comics at the Carnegie Deli to talk about Danny's story. Led by Sandy Baron, who later played Jerry's father's adversary on "Seinfeld", they are the ones who usually played the Catskills hotel showrooms and showed up on the Ed Sullivan Show in the 1960's. Speaking of which, I assume the story takes place sometime in the 1970's, but I'm not sure since Allen really does nothing to the set designs to make it feel like a period piece. Allen also jettisons his standard jazz score for the Italianate lounge music that Lou sings. The ending is surprisingly poignant given the shenanigans that precede it. Within his filmography, this is definitely one of his more modest efforts, but along with "Sleeper", "The Purple Rose of Cairo" and "Manhattan Murder Mystery", it's also one of his most ingratiating comedies. Other than the film's trailer, there are no extras with the DVD package
AN EXOTIC VEHICLE FOR GARBO. Mata Hari (Garbo) is a German spy posing as a dancer in Paris.   She is sent by Andriani (Lewis Stone) to get Russian messages about military movements needed by the Allies during the First World War.......Changed though it may be from the actual career of Mata Hari, the Dutch dancer and spy, the picture is an entertainment of no mean value in which that mysterious actress Garbo gives another flawless performance.  The star may not be any more like the ill-fated spy (whose real name was Margaret Zella MacLeod (!), than the film narrative is like an authentic account of the spy's career.  There is, however, in the skillfully arranged series of incidents, enough truth to make a most compelling melodrama.  Garbo is stunning and full of her special mystique as the Javanese-Dutch spy who, in real life was shot at Saint-Lazare, France in 1917. Both Garbo and Navarro had accents which caused the critics to snicker (especially a line of Navarro's which sounded thusly:"What's the mata, Mata?" British censors had a problem with Navarro becoming so hypnotically seduced by Garbo and Greta's famous exotic dance before the Malaysian idol is stunning. Mata Hari was a Dutch pseudonym meaning "Eye of Dawn"
wayne and ford in fine form and william holden along for the ride. i love john wayne and i love this movie. william holden costars but make no mistake this is john waynes movie all the way. as an officer sent behind rebel lines to attack a rail line wayne does his always great job and the action is crisp and the story is just right. join wayne and holden and "the horse soldiers"
Loves Long Journey. This DVD is excellent for all ages to watch. It is a heart warming story that everyone should watch. The books that these DVD are based on are great also
I enjoyed the season premeir emensely. I enjoyed this series premier tremendously and am looking forward to watching the rest of the series.  Enterprise started before I had my PVR and was either on at a time I was unable to watch it or I never made time.  I watched one episode of Star Trek the Next Generation yesterday and it peaked my interest in watching some Star Trek episodes again.  Rather than watch episodes I've already seen, Enterprise looks like a great way to enjoy Star Trek episodes.As far as privacy concerns mentioned in other reviews, if you're paranoid, the internet isn't for you.  Keep your private things private, and not on networked computers.  Hopefully Amazon will remove reviews that do not at all pertain to the show they are attached to
Heartwarming Romantic-Moving On Comedy. A lovely and wonderful film. It's a comedy that's light and will make you smile, but it does speak of very true to life situations and tugs at the heart making one run the gamut of emotions, especially for anyone who has ever had someone you love leave you for someone else and being left to deal with it. It also touches on other true problems such as about caring too much about the opinions of others, importance of family, unconditional love and life in general. A light but touching movie that will give a touching experience and have you walking away with a smile. Very satisfying :
11/10. How to be a part of real Rock History without being a musician, singer, producer or someone in the music business? Answer: Make a movie as this one. Almost every serious Rock fan and rock star must have seen this movie or if they haven't, they had better see it before they go out and give another interview. Believe me, there are bands and performers who still talk and give interviews like Spinal Tap did in this movie. This movie is made for these guys. Like me, if you have watched countless interviews of rockstars, popstars and movie stars you cannot do without this classic. The Lead guitarist was my favourite. I could give him an Oscar for his brilliant performance. If Jimmy Page used a bow on his guitar you must wait and see what the lead guitarist of  Spinal Tap does.These guys literally become Gods by the way they poke fun at Rockstars and their mannerisms particularly when it comes to giving interviews and playing live. In fact this movie is so well made that it puts to shame serious rockumentaries made for real rockstars and bands.One of the most famous lines from the movie apart from "This one goes to 11" is when the band is asked about one of their deceased members for which the band mates tell the interviewer (played by the director Rob Reiner himself) that the bandmate died of choking on vomit but they didn't know whose vomit!  Hilarious and highly entertaining you'll love this DVD with tons of goodies which are worth the price of the DVD alone. There is so much extra footage on the DVD that is seems like Spinal Tap 2.The extras are as good as the original movie. I couldn't stop laughing when the band goes to the zoo and near the chimps cage when they are talking their usual ridiculous lines they say things like "'..chimps can't talk but can use computers.." and stuff. You wonder how brilliantly the actors have come together to pull off something like this.Neatly packaged even the liner notes are funny. Almost every move made and every line spoken is worth being labelled funny. One of the songs even caught my attention though the lyrics were insane.A classic you cannot afford to miss
Tchaikovsky and Riding Crops. I'm not usually a ballet person.  I haven't seen anything since "The Nutcracker" when I was six.  But this was absolutely brilliant.  The concept for it is completely bold and original and Adam Cooper as The Swan blew me away.  How can you beat a dancer in black leather pants with a riding crop?  Tchaikovsky never would have envisioned this, but he would be utterly thrilled to see what they have done with his epic ballet.
Rooster Cogburn. This is a funny and touching movie with spectacular scenery.  Katherine Hepburn is at her best as an independent single woman living in the old west who encounters John Wayne's character, Rooster.  Together they make their way with a dangerous cargo through many obstacles.  John Wayne is even better in this movie than he was in his academy award winning roll in True Grit.  Sit back and enjoy this movie because it's well worth 2 hours of your time
Nice and awesome. I absolutely love Atlantis. From Ronon Dex, to Sheppard, and to all the faces. I'd cry if Atlantis was cancelled. Seriously though, Steve should have never have died, he should also have been put in command of SG1. Can you imagine that..."Why Steve, welcome to Earth...you're welcome to live out your life, if you only feed in self defense on enemies...'kay? Oh, you're also in charge of Sg1. :P" But seriously, the Wraith make this show so awesome. From Steve to Bob to Edward, to Gordon and Alexander, to Michael and Eric (by far James's best performance yet).The Wraith make this show what it is. But one thing??? Why don't we have Before I Sleep? Seriously, you have no idea how irked I am at that, since I began watching in S.2.12.Anyways, I think Atlantis totally pwns SG1
The most original screenplay since Brazil...which was. ...the most original screenplay since Citizen Kane.At least that's my take.How do I describe this movie?  I can't.  It's bizarre in the extreme, but I mean that in a good way.  It's like nothing you've ever seen before.  It takes screenwriting to a new level.  Maybe that sounds a tad pretentious, but sorry, it's true.I can't imagine how they sold it.  To the suits, I mean.  I can't even imagine how the script reads, how one can make sense of it on paper.  But I'm glad someone did, because the result was a stunningly-original film.But how do I describe it?  I can't.I'm not the only one with this problem.  I read the back of the box in the video store: it made no sense.  I read some capsule summaries on the Internet Movie Database: they made no sense either.  It's very stream-of-conscious, proceeds more by gut instinct than by logic.  Basically, but not entirely, I [Heart] Huckabees is a philosophical discourse where the various existential elements are personified and characterized.  And these existential elements get into arguments with each other.  If you're the type of person who thinks matters of importance through only to have your own brain argue with itself, to hear little voices competing for your psyche's attention, then you'll understand this movie.  If you aren't that type of person, you may find yourself, like many (Roger Ebert, James Berardinelli) feeling on the outside, frustrated that you can't crack the code and get "into" this movie.  From the first frame I had no trouble identifyinjg with these extremely strange situations.  But many will, and it's understandable.  I'll skip all the obvious jokes about how maybe the right drugs will help.  This movie is like a drug.  And you may have a bad reaction to it.  Or not.But how do I describe it?  I can't.  Just rent it.  The performances are a joy, except maybe oddly for Dustin Hoffman, who never really seems to find a unique voice to match his unique haircut.  Paired with Lily Tomlin, she blows him off the screen seemingly without trying.  Jason Schwartzman and Mark Wahlberg are wonderful as the screwball main protagonists--Schwartzman in particular shines in this sort of offbeat role.  Isabelle Huppert made me laugh just by her what-is-she-doing-here presence, but I couldn't tell you why.  Ditto Naomi Watts.You can read all the reviews you want of this film, but they won't do it justice.  You'll either hate it or it will blow your mind.  Ebert didn't like it, but he didn't like Brazil either, and for many the same reasons.  For him, neither film "made sense."  For me, they come from deep within our psyches, and owe more to the irrational than to anything in the neocortex.  How well you respond to either might be determined by your imagination, how far it can go, how many different ways you can see something.But how do I describe it?  I can't.Go see it.
Probably the Best Drama Series Ever Made. I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out
sleeper. This is an Australian "western" written by Nick Cave and as such, is predictably bleak and revisionist, with a decidedly skeptical view toward authority and the brutal efforts required to "tame" a land. It has a truly extraordinary cast and all of the leads do fantastic work, particularly the ever reliable Ray Winstone and Guy Pearce. Although there are a few overwrought sequences and missteps along the way, this is overall quality stuff and is heartily recommended. Even if you are a bit burned out on the genre, the Australian setting lends it a certain novelty and gives it a different feel. As some have commented, it is a bit more graphically violent than your typical "western" but I think the violence is spread out and narratively motivated in ways that don't make it seem gratuitous, so don't let that keep you from trying this one out
Mike And Worm bet it all. Rounder is not your typical card playing movie. It's about the angles. Being able to play cards blind. Being able to know your oponent. And it's all about knowing when to bluff.Mike is a man who just lost the biggest pot of his life: 30,000 dollars. Now he wroks as a truck delivery service while going to law school. Cards were his life until that day with the infamous Teddy KGB.Worm is a man who was in trouble since the day he was born. Always looking for the higher stakes no matter what the cost is. He just got out of prison.Together, these two hit the card tables to get worm out of a hefty debt. But when both of them realize that the debt has now been taken over by Teddy KGB, they will go all out to replenish the debt and get out of dodge. But, an endless stream of bad luck and bad calls forces them into a bottle neck of more debt. Now, Mike has to decide what's more important in his life: Being able to know the law . . . or being able to be the best dang card player this time around.You'll fall in love with this gangster classic.Enjoy
Bergmanite. I saw this on Turner Classic Movies and this along with the Seventh Seal made me a Bergman fan for life. It's a film about an old mans mortality. He goes to receive an award and the film takes you through the process of his life. The script was written just for this man and he is superb. Ingrid Thulin the daughter inlaw is a magnificent actress and is great. I recommend it highly. If you want Bergman's best films buy this one and Seventh Seal,Virgin Spring,Through a Glass Darkly Box Set,Smiles of a Summers Night,The Magician,Cries and Whispers,Magic Flute,Fanny and Alexander. You won't regret it
a classic!. This film is what many of today's filmsshould be.  Great acting, directingand story make this film one you canwatch over and over
My Favorite Episode. I don't have television, haven't for 11 years. When I learned CBS was allowing free viewing over the internet I checked it out and started watching episodes of CSI, CSI NY, CSI Miami, and NCIS. I found NCIS to be my favorite and this particular show Dead And Unburied is my favorite so far. I enjoy the light-heartedness of NCIS. So I decided to download this episode from Amazon Unbox.I really wish Amazon Unbox would allow me to burn shows I've purchased. As it is they are restricted to viewing on my computer. When Unbox expands this service to allow me to burn DVDs I will likely purchase many more shows this way. I like selecting individual shows
A fun movie. I saw this movie years ago and always remebered it.  As a fan of Errol Flynn and other great "swashbucklers", I totally appreciated the tounge-in-cheek storyline.  This was one of Robert Shaw's last pictures, a great actor who died too soon.  Genvieve Bujold was never lovlier and Peter Boyles' evil Count Durant is a perfect villan.  A great film if you like adventure, sword fights, and comedy
"What are you nuts or something!?"  "Maybe.". Woodrow comes from a small close-knit town in California.  His grandfather owned the land the town was built on and his father was a brave Marine who die for his country.  So when Woodrow is kicked out of the Marines after one month for chronic hay fever he's too embarrassed to go home.  He works for a year at the shipyards and mails letters home via outgoing soldiers.One fateful evening some Marines on leave hear his tale and concoct a fake war hero story and escort him home thinking that only his poor worried mother will hear their lies.  They even gather up some medals for him.  But when they arrive on the train Woodrow's greeted by a cheering crowd and five marching bands all playing different songs at one time.  The mayor gives Woodrow the key to the city, the town folk pay off his mother's mortgage, they nominate Woodrow for the upcoming race for mayor, a statue is being erected and they even write a song about him.  Woodrow tries over and over to tell everybody the truth, but each time he does the lie only gets bigger and bigger.Made the same year as Sturges' screwball classic THE MIRACLE OF MORGAN'S CREEK this movie has a number of the same actors (I lost count at 10) and is almost as funny, but for some reason it's kinda slipped through the cracks.   Would make a great double feature with THE MIRACLE OF MORGAN'S CREEK.Why is there not a Preston Sturges DVD box set?D: Preston Sturges (THE MIRACLE OF MORGAN'S CREEK, THE LADY EVE)Woodrow Lafayette Pershing Truesmith - Eddie Bracken (THE MIRACLE OF MORGAN'S CREEK, HOME ALONE 2)Libby - Ella Raines (THE SENATOR WAS INDISCREET, BRUTE FORCE)Sgt. Heppelfinger - William Demarest (THE MIRACLE OF MORGAN'S CREEK. IT'S A MAD, MAD, MAD, MAD WORLD
Lawn Dogs. Prejudice, hypocrisy and rationalising of immoral and violent behaviour are not merely American vices, but common symptoms of all of us living in so-called western civilization.This film bitingly satirises such behaviour and reminds me that all of us come sadly short of our obligations to our fellow creatures.Sam Rockwell and Mischa Barton, supported by a strong cast, bring this sad tale to life with great charm
A MUST SEE FILM!!!!!!!!!. For fans of The Once Great Deathrow Records this is a Must see Film that adds alot of insight to the Back-story of The Late 80's Early 90's RAP Scene!Very cool and enjoyable alot of Surreal StoriesMy Only Prob with it: Not enough Focus on Both Easy-E and 2PacBut, still a must see flick!9.5/10
"I'm never more witty than when I've had a little nip.". I did some checking and I discovered this film, The Spiral Staircase, originally released in 1946, has been remade a few times over the years...once in 1961 with Eddie Albert, Hayley Mills, Elizabeth Montgomery, and Gig Young (a made for TV feature), again in 1975 with Jacqueline Bisset, Christopher Plummer, and John Phillip Law (a full length feature this time), and then yet again in 2000 with Nicollette Sheridan and Judd Nelson (this last one, also a made for TV feature, sounds like a real winner).  Adapted from the novel "Some Must Watch" by Ethel Lina White, and directed Robert Siodmak (The Killers, Criss Cross, The Crimson Pirate), the film stars the demure, beautiful, and extremely talented Dorothy McGuire (Three Coins in the Fountain, Old Yeller, Swiss Family Robinson).  Also appearing is George Brent (The Corpse Came C.O.D., FBI Girl), Kent Smith (Cat People, The Curse of the Cat People), Rhonda Fleming (A Connecticut Yankee in King Arthur's Court), Gordon Oliver (Jezebel), Elsa Lanchester (Bride of Frankenstein, Murder by Death), Sara Allgood (Dr. Jekyll and Mr. Hyde), Rhys Williams (How Green Was My Valley), James Bell (I Walked with a Zombie), and Ethel Barrymore, who won an Oscar in her previous, supporting role in the Cary Grant film None But the Lonely Heart (1944).The film, set at the turn of the century, begins with the murder of a woman at a hotel, one where a crowd of people just happen to be in attendance of an old timey picture show (the kind where a pianist plays the accompanying score), including Helen (McGuire), a mute woman who works as a servant for a local well to do family.  Around this time we learn the murder is not an isolated incident, as someone is stalking women with physical infirmities and doing way with them (the woman in the hotel had a severe limp).  Dr. Parry (Smith), who has a keen interest in Helen and her condition, makes the scene and offers her a ride home, but halfway there he's called away so Helen must walk the rest of the way, and it seems, along with the darkness (and a menacing figure lurking about), a storm is coming (in more ways than one).  Once Helen arrives at her place of employment, a very large manor owned by a family named Warren, we meet a whole slew of interesting characters.  There's Professor Warren (Brent), his secretary Blanche (Fleming), the Professor's playboy half brother Stephen (Oliver) who's just returned from a long European trip, their bedridden mother Mrs. Warren (Barrymore), Mrs. Oates (Lanchester), the cook, her husband (Williams), and finally Nurse Barker (Allgood).  As the storm outside continues to build, so does the ominous sense of danger, due in part to Mrs. Warren's continual insistences Helen leave the house as soon as possible, as she seems to have serious doubts about Helen's safety (one couldn't blame her given her sons, one a smarmy mouth ne'er-do-well, the other a bookish fop).  There's safety in numbers, but as various members of the household are called away for whatever reason, Helen soon discovers she probably should have listened to Mrs. Warren and got while the gettin' was good...I enjoyed this film a lot, especially in terms of the huge, slightly creepy manor which most of the story took place.  The distinctive shadows, darkened corridors, elaborate sets pieces, combined with masterful directing, featuring some strong and off putting killer point of view shots, and spooky musical scoring, all went a long way towards creating an overall eerie atmosphere, a continual sense of evil present as right from the beginning...that and the fact we knew from early on the killer followed Helen home and gained entry into the house.  The characters are very distinctive, and played expertly by a highly professional cast, the real standouts being Dorothy McGuire, who has practically no speaking lines throughout the film and must rely solely on her expressionistic abilities, and also Ethel Barrymore as the infirmed, but certainly not mentally impaired Mrs. Warren, once a woman of great strength, now confined to her bed by afflictions brought on by advanced age (she was actually nominated for an Oscar in her role here).  The one thing that really gave me the heebie jeebies as far as this film went was Ms. Barrymore as she would often seem to be feigning sleep, but then you'd look over at her and her eyes would be wide open, taking in everything that was going on...Bette Davis may have had peepers distinctive enough for Kim Carnes to pen a song about, but Ethel Barrymore certainly could have given her a run for the money (that and the fact the words Bette Davis comes across much better in a song than the words Ethel Barrymore).  And talking about eyes, the killer was often displayed only in much abbreviated form, hands, a foot, etc., but usually by a close up of one wide, glaring eye full of murderous intent.  As far as the identity of the killer, it was really anyone's game up until a certain point, and by then the writers wisely saw no point in keeping it a mystery anymore, as most everyone should have gotten clued in by then.  I did pick up on it a little earlier than I expected, but only because of the not entirely subtle pushing of other characters as suspects drove me to my own conclusions.  As to the motive behind the murders, that aspect did remain secret until it was revealed.  I suppose one might be able to discern it before the reveal, but I think this is a much more difficult element to peel away from the story, even though the pieces were there, which is, in my opinion, a real credit towards those who originally wrote, and then adapted this intricate story to the screen.  For me, the most harrowing sequences involved the latter ones where various characters ventured, armed only with a candle, down into the dark, drafty, spooky, cobwebbed basement, filled with niches and hidey holes.  All in all this is a wonderfully crafted film, and while I haven't seen the various remakes, I have a pretty good feeling the original is probably still the best.The picture, presented in fullscreen, original aspect ratio (1.33:1), looks beautifully sharp and clean, and the Dolby Digital mono audio comes through extremely clear.  The only extra featured on the DVD is a theatrical trailer for the Johnny Depp film Secret Window (2004), and odd inclusion, I thought, but whatever.Cookieman108
The Torch song singer. I found the movie to be wonderful, funny and true to life. The service from Amazon.com to be prompt, efficient, dependable, the delivery was on time and product in excellent condition
Splendid. This is a wonderful production, a sweeping saga indeed of the rise and fall of a noble family..Everything about this series is lavish, well acted with a stella cast..The four daughters of the Duke of Richmond [great grand daughters of King Charles11] are born into a world of great privilege which few have ever known..This story [saga] is about their lives, their loves, joys and tragedies..This is an account of an age gone by and only realised by the privileged few...A huge classic, deeply moving and very powerful..
Mansfield Park. What can I say. This is another great Jane Austin story and if you love Jane Austin, you tend to love all of her stories - AND I DO
TMNT II - Secret of the Ooze (DVD). I've loved the Ninja Turtles since I was old enough to watch TV, so I automatically love anything to do with them
follow that dream. one of elvis's best movies i purchased it for my sister and she hasn't stopped thanking me yet it's hers favorite
Love the new download!. I wanted it for my collection, however you can sift through all the youtube stuff and end up with the same video for free if you want to do the work
Well acted with a cool monster. When the First Man Into Space gets a cosmic dusting it does some strange things to his mind and body. Pretty good monster and a very good leading man, Marshall Thompson make for a better than average 50's genre sci-fi story. Close to a classic. There was some light speckling in the transfer but all in all the DVD played well and the sound ( Mono ) was acceptable
Brian Regan. First heard his stand-up on CD when I worked at Borders a few years back.  Sometimes he gets a bit carried away (a lotta comics tend to, though), and his comedy comes across dopey, yet easy to relate to.  Clean (no naughty words or uncouth situations here!), family-fun comedy (dirty or clean, as long as a comedian can deliver to the audience well, then he/she is funny in my eyes)
I suppose it should be possible to find a film as beautiful. It's funny that a critic from the new york times could know so little about film.  I will not say much except this is one of the most simple, most beautiful stories made into cinema; there is absolutely no artifice, no tricks, and every detail is pure and genuine.  Tony uses faces Kurasawa could've killed for.  You ain't seen nothing if you ain't seen this.  The music, artists like Gritos de Guerra, La Caita, Sheik al Tuni, (seemingly unavailable on record, but better than anything I've heard,) seems to capture at once the joy and sorrow bound up in human life.  Likewise the players, most not actors. In fact, the music is so integrated into the lives of the characters, in the end there is no division.  For reviewers of respected periodicals, we would explain this is what is called thematic.  So much for the standards of education in journalism.  Even reviewers who really liked this movie did not fully understand this; like most really great art, it is ahead of the curve.  I suppose it should be possible to find a film as beautiful as this, as simple and captivating, but none come to mind.  Skip "Vengo" and your life will certainly be less rich
A Western Classic. I remember this movie, when it came to the theaters.  I was just a kid at that time, when Roy Rogers, Gene Autry & all of the other Cowboy Idols were still popular.  It is definitely a Classic among the Westerns.  If you enjoy Westerns & collect the movies, this one should be part of your collection.  Also, Westerns in color were a premium treat back then
It's Jimmy Carr - Need more be said?!?. Thanks for keeping a Brit sane in a country full of "My wife says..." jokes.Your wife is fat and ugly and I don't care what she says. Because she's ugly. And fat.....and not my wife
A beach culture classic. I was a surf grommet growing up in the mid 1970's. This flick touched on Vietnam in ways that I could begin to understand. When Leroy the masochist(Gary Busey) shambles into the draft board whilst combing his hair with a dead fish, the surreal and insane nature of Vietnam becomes crystal clear. This is a true surf epic directed by a guy who knows the territory. The surf footage, for a hollywood movie, is truly outstanding. There is even a cameo appearance by Mr. Pipeline himself--Gerry Lopez
a blast from the past. This movie is one of my favorite movies.  I have fond memories of my brother and I watching this movie over and over, and every time wishing we could fly like the rocketeer.  I highly recommend this movie to anyone who's ever loved an adventure story set high in the skies.  Plus, Jennifer Connelly and Billy Campbell are wonderful fun
The First Widow. Guarding Tess is a pretty good comedy drama that becomes a fair suspense drama by the end.  Nicolas Cage (Matchstick Men) plays a Secret Service agent in charge of guarding an obstinate former first lady, first widow Carlisle, played by Shirley MacLaine (The Sheepman).  Cage wants out of the job to move on to a more important / exciting assignment, but MacLaine bends the ear of the current President to keep him.  Arguments between the two are amusing and interesting as they each maneuver to get their own way.  Cage insists on following rules to the letter to try to irritate her into releasing him - but she always seems to have more power.  The supporting cast includes Edward Albert as Mrs. Carlisle's son, and Austen Pendleton as the driver who's with the first widow .. when ... she ..... disappears.....
Damn good. Well if you like the theremin, this is an absolute must have. This movie is so entertaining and tells you so much, all you wanna know. It's worth every penny. Next step I'm gonna buy me a theremin
Worthy. Its hard to know if you would understand what actually happned at Isandlewana if all you hadto go on was this film - but all the elements are there - Screwed down ammo boxes - underestimation of Zulu capabilities - A trumped up rationalization of why we are going to anex Zulu land. The personalities - or lack of them - Overall a feast for the Military Historian. Not as satisafctory as a Movie (no happy ending here). The missing element here is that although this was a major embarase ment for the British Empire - The subsequent victory at Rourkes drift allowed them to save face - regroup and ultimately devestate the Zulu
Irresistible. Agatha Christie's 1937 murder mystery adapts well to film and television format.  It offers the obvious travelogue element, provides opportunities for the music and clothing fashions of the day to be presented, and its action involves a group of passengers on a journey.  The 1978 film adaptation exploited all these elements lavishly.  It also incorporated a series of "re-runs" of the principal murder, showing how it was possible for almost all of the passengers to have committed it.  This TV adaptation, on a smaller scale in all respects, provides enough of the entertainment, the suspense, and the final shock revelation to add up to a very satisfying treatment.Many famous actors have portrayed Agatha Christie's sleuths.  Many have succeeded though few have closely approximated to the originals.  Agatha Christie herself would no doubt wish that David Suchet could be adorned with a much more luxuriant moustache than the little "clip on" one seen here.
THE BEST VIDEO IN DENISE AUSTIN'S HIT THE SPOTS SERIES. I own all the videos in the Hit The Spot Series, but I think Arms &amp; Bust is the the best. Denise really concentrates on all area of the arms. You will look toned up, never bulky. The tape is one of the best I've  owned
"Looks like its going to be one of those days Jerry". Three O'clock High is one of the best 80's teen films there was.  Unfortunately, it didn't seem to attain the instant cult status that other films of similar theme like "Fast Times at Ridgemont High" and "Ferris Bueller's day off" did.Nearly 20 years after its release, Three O'clock High is still a film that is classic in every aspect of 1980's high school antics on the big screen.  With big hair, colorful clothes and an instrumental soundtrack from Tangerine Dream, the film takes us back to the day Jerry Mitchell met Buddy Revell.Buddy Revell (played by Richard Tyson, who in film would later go on to be a pilot in "Black Hawk Down", a sinister villain in "Kindergarten Cop" and an intense Detective in "There's Something about Mary") is a new kid in school.  The problem is, he's a problem child.  He's big, mean and has been known to go ballistic when people touch him.  Revell arrives at this new high school amid a swarm of urban legends and hallway gossip that strike fear into the student body.  Jerry Mitchell is a kid who works at the school bookstore, has an occult obsessed girlfriend who is more wannabe than weird, and a friend who works on the school paper with him.  The friend is in charge of finding someone to to interview Buddy to find out more about him.  Through an accidental meeting in the bathroom, Jerry conveys the papers intentions to Buddy, which by now has held a sneer so long he is being compared to Charles Manson.  Jerry makes the mistake of patting Buddy on the shoulder, and the rest is history:  Buddy informs Jerry to meet him at 3:00pm so that they can fight.  The problem?  Buddy looks like a large axe murder while Jerry resembles more of a kid who is on his way to becoming an accountant or something.The rest of the day plays out in a series of bizarre events that are wrapped up in some high school fact as well as teenage spoof reel.  Jerry goes through a variety of antics to get out of the fight, and in the process slowly turns his own good image into one of trouble.  By noon the entire school not only knows of the fight, but also is taking bets on how long Jerry will last.  It appears Jerry is doomed, and as he continues to try and do everything he can to change things, the acts only backfire to keep him within the walls of his high school till the sound of the final bell.  The movie does an excellent job in the execution of the overall filming, as it does many quick zoom shots as well as odd angles to add to the uniqueness of the overall experience we see as Jerry goes about his day.The film is nostalgic but not too cheesy on the time period of the 80's, which is easy to scoff at now.  The attention of the film is centered on the characters and the storyline a bit more than others of its genre.  From the school disciplinarian resembling a Prison Warden to the constant guilt trips the principal plays on Jerry about his permanent record being marred, its idealisms and humor are easily recognizable.  Tyson is superb as the scary, imposing bully type student while Casey Siemasziko does a great job portraying the small, pale student named Jerry Mitchell, who despite having a bad day, ends up finding out what its all about to stand up for yourself.  A classic 80's film that never, ever got the credit it deserved
Love Atlantis. I think this was a great spin off from stargate sg-1 which was starting to get stale even though I love watching it still.Love being able to download them all, just wish they'd get updated quicker!Honestly, when I left 2 weeks ago I saw the last episode available and I've missed the next 2
Probably the Best Drama Series Ever Made. I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out
Stayin' Alive. The triumph of Director Zhang Yimou's epic film is how deeply he makes us care about ordinary people buffeted by history and struggling to surmount their own frailty.  Fugui (a great performance by Ge You) starts out as a weak, spoiled young man addicted to the roll of the dice.  After losing his house, wife Jiazhen (a sensitive turn by Gong Li) and child, Fugui emerges from his self inflicted purgatory vowing to stand by his family.  He hits the road to make money as a puppet master, only to get gang pressed into the Kaomintang and later into Mao's Communist army.  Released after the civil war, he heads home desperate to slip quietly in to daily life under the new Communist order.History has a way of imposing itself on people living in ideological societies.  This film is so effective because Zhang makes his political points through the particularity of what happens to Fugui and his family.  Fugui and Jiazhen's young son bears the brunt of the senseless sacrifices demanded by Mao's Great Leap Forward.  What happens to their daughter and her husband brings home the inmates-running-the-asylum feel of the Cultural Revolution.  Like Zhang's Not One Less, this film is subversive precisely because it doesn't club you with its social messages.  You watch, you feel, and you draw your own conclusions about how the Communist rulers are meeting the needs of the Chinese people.To Live covers a broad swath of time, from the 1940s to the 70s.  The story unfolds with a seemingly effortless flow that reveals Zhang's true artistry.  The compositions, whether it's a landlord's palace or a peasant's alley, are perfectly staged.  Every actor's gesture serves the larger plot.  The pacing propels you through the story but pauses just long enough to let you absorb the big emotional moments.  This isn't just a great Chinese film, but a great film by the standards of world cinema, and should not be missed.
Right on Top of that Rose. This movie is awesome! My sister and I used to watch this all the time back in the day so I ordered one for each of us. The cinematography is a bit weird though, it seems to have been recorded a little differently on the DVD, it almost has a foreign look to it (like Australian or some English tv/movies). It doesn't change the viewing experience, I was just a little surprised when I watched it
Nice and awesome. I absolutely love Atlantis. From Ronon Dex, to Sheppard, and to all the faces. I'd cry if Atlantis was cancelled. Seriously though, Steve should have never have died, he should also have been put in command of SG1. Can you imagine that..."Why Steve, welcome to Earth...you're welcome to live out your life, if you only feed in self defense on enemies...'kay? Oh, you're also in charge of Sg1. :P" But seriously, the Wraith make this show so awesome. From Steve to Bob to Edward, to Gordon and Alexander, to Michael and Eric (by far James's best performance yet).The Wraith make this show what it is. But one thing??? Why don't we have Before I Sleep? Seriously, you have no idea how irked I am at that, since I began watching in S.2.12.Anyways, I think Atlantis totally pwns SG1
amazing. I'M THE BIGGEST FAN OF THIS MOVIE IN THE WHOLE WORLD ,THERE'S NOTHING LIKE THIS FILM,GREAT ACTORS,I LOVE THE MANIAC PERFORMED BY FREDDIE JONES AND THE EXPLOSIVES SQUAD TOO WITH A WONDERFUL,INCREDIBLE,AWESOME,UNFORGETTABLE RICHARD HARRIS AS THE HEAD OF THE TEAM,WITHOUT DISREGARDING THE LIKES OF ANTHONY HOPKINS OMAR SHERIFF,IAN HOLM...JUGGERNAUT I'LL NEVER FORGET YOU!!!I'LL LIVE FOREVER IN THE BRITANNIC AND I COULD SWEAR I'M LISTENING THE EXPLOSIONS...IS IT THE BLUE WIRE OR THE RED ONE ?  I WANT THAT DVD NOW !!
Twisted Love Story. This movie is definitely a different kind of love story.  It really surprised me the first time I saw it.  It's a very honest movie that deals with issues that other movies rarely touch on like self mutilation and masochism.  I think that the actors were very convincing and that this movie is worth every penny.  I don't want to spoil it, but it's a must see
I Guess There's Something "Wrong" With Me. I guess there must be something profoundly wrong with me, because I rather liked "Maniac".  Sure, I'll concede that its definately not for everyone, but what is?  As the old cliche goes, one man's trash is another man's treasure.  So, what did I like about Maniac?1) While marketed as a slasher film, it utilized none of the stock slasher film cliches that were so prevalent at the time.  Namely, the "all the sluts die but the virgin gets away" faux morality of Friday the 13th and Halloween.2) The killer is not a super human killing machine like Jason or Freddy. Rather, this character is real.  Not in a literal sense, but its easy to believe that a killer like this could exist.  "Maniac" is as much a character study as it is a horror film.  Joe Spinnel gives an outstanding performance as "Frank", a schizophrenic serial killer.  He's a three dimensional character, and the film is told entirely by his point of view.  As you will see in the film, he's not pure evil.  He's clearly trying to stop, but he can't.  I actually felt pity for him.3) I was impressed by the more than competant direction and cinematography.  The film is shot in a very realistic, almost documentary style.  The performances are natural and believable. The musical score was excellent as well.  This film is a textbook example of what can be achieved on a low budget with some imagination and skill.4) I won't be a hypocrite.  I'll admit it.  I enjoyed this film on a visceral level.  While pretty tame by today's standards, the gore effects were expertly executed by the always brilliant Tom Savini.  If this makes me a "sick person", then I'm no more demented than the millions of fans who line up to see "Silence of the Lambs", "Scarface", and hundreds of other "visceral" films.  And I'm no more sick than the millions of people who spend hours a day playing "Grand Theft Auto".  The point is that its a MOVIE.  No one ever got hurt by watching a movie, or playing a video game, for that matter.  If watching "Maniac" is all it takes to send you over the edge, you were probably pretty screwed up to begin with.  Isn't there enough real horrors in the world to get upset about???So, to those who found the film so offensive that they would condemn everyone who doesn't share in their phony moral indignation, why did you bother to watch the film all the way to the end?  Weren't you sufficiently outraged halfway through the film?And, without giving away too much of the ending, it was not "stupid" as some have charged.  Frank was clearly hallucinating.  Since the film was told by his point of view, the audience could "see" his hallucinations.  His wounds were purely self-inflicted.  Once again, the director choose to be original rather than to fall back on the old textbook cliches, which in this case would have been a final showdown in which Caroline Munro kills him.Highly underratted, unfairly bashed and dismissed by critics, "Maniac" achieves what it aspires to be; a very original and very imaginative horror film with a great performance by Joe Spinnel.  For fans of "good" low budget horror films by the likes of George Romero and Wes Craven, this is essential viewing, which is why they play it fairly regularly on IFC.  I'll take this film over "Final Destination 1, 2, and 3", or similar formulatic crap masquerading as horror films any day of the week
This Robin Hood is unforgetable. For years I've enjoyed watching this movie.  I recently joined the Disney Movie Club and picked this movie up for my 3 year old son to watch.  And of course he loved it, and as I watched him watching it, it reminded me of the first time I watched it.This movie was was made in the early 70's when Disney wasn't turning out a lot of animated movie.  Besides this movie and The Rescuers Disney didn't have a lot going on in the animation department (but they put out some great live-action films).The cast for this movie is exceptional especially Phil Harris who puts the voice to Little John.  If his voice sounds familiar it's because Harris also voiced Baloo in "The Jungle Book" and Thomas O'malley in "The Aristocats".  Some would critisize Disney by using Harris again.  They would say Little John and Baloo are essentially the same character.  And my response it, so what.  Baloo is a great character and Little John just makes Harris look that much better.The story is flowing and funny.  My favorite part of the film has to be the music.  It so great and contagious that I can't help but sing the songs hours after the movie is over.So pick this one up and enjoy this Disney classic with the whole family.***My one regret is that it doesn't have a special edition version, maybe Disney will do that soon
Somewhere In Time. If you haven't seen this you should. Great movie. Never get tired of seeing it. I think any age could watch this
MRSWLJ FACTS ABOUT BULLS**T. WHAT MOST PEOPLE FAIL TO REALIZE IS THAT MOST LIFE STORY MOVIES ARE NOT MADE FOR THE PURPOSE OF GLORIFICATION TO THE VIEWER, BUT TO LET THEM KNOW OF THE REAL LIFE TRIALS AND TRIBULATIONS OF THAT PERSON. HOW CAN YOU CRITICISE SOMEONES LIFE STORY? TO GO THREW WHAT THEY WENT THREW TO SEE WHAT THEY SAW, AND TO EXPERIENCE LIFE THREW TIMES WHEN LIFE WAS ALMOST IMPOSSIBLE TO GRASP? I THINK JOSEPHINE BAKER WAS A VERY GREAT PERSON REGARDLESS OF HER NATIONALITY ANYONE WITH THE GUTS TO LIVE LIFE TO THE FULLEST AND OVERCOME IMPOSSIBLE BARRIERS DESERVES MUCH PRAISE
Very Hilarious. Truely speaking, this is a very hilarious episode. Must see for every one
Watching Paint Dry. Can watching paint dry be riveting, interesting, and compelling? Can looking at a beautiful woman who is naked for almost three of four hours long movie be not erotic? Is it possible to watch the movie where an Artist creates sketch after sketch of his model in preparation for a painting and many scenes run in real time and not become bored but instead be totally absorbed by the painter on the screen and how he was progressing with his work? Jacques Rivette's "Le Belle Noiseuse" is certainly not for every taste but I found it immensely rewarding. It is one of very few films where creative process with all its tension, uncertainty, selfishness and self-centering of an artist who once he began working is nearly oblivious not only to his model's discomfort but to the feelings of the ones close to him have been shown on the screen with such truthful passion, technical excellence, and tremendous acting. Michel Piccoli as an aging painter Edouard Frenhofer, once famous and productive, Jane Birkin (Liz)- his much younger wife and a former favorite model, and Emmanuelle Bart as Marianne, the young, bright, and intensely intelligent woman whose presence awakened Frenhofer from semi-lethargy and made him want to paint again were unforgettable.The film also explores a vital for any artist subject - what is more important, the process of creating a work of art or the result?
Dein Perry's 'Tap Dogs'; Good show, mates!. Winner of 11 International Awards including the Obie Award, "Tap Dogs" is like nothing you've ever seen. A must see for all tap dancers and anyone with an interest in tap dancing, this spectacular show successfully gives a look at new age tap dancing of the nineties."Tap Dogs" showcases the incredible dancing talents of six Australians who simple crackle with blue-collar energy. Led by Dein Perry, the creator of the show, the other five members are Ben Read, Nathan Sheens, Gerry Symonds, Drew Kaluski, and Darren Disney.Recorded live at 'The Lyric Theatre' in London, here is a list of musical numbers for the show:1) MAIN TITLE: BEST FOOT FORWARD - As the title and beginning credits appear, we watch as Dein Perry almost casual taps on the stage.2) MIX 'N' MATCH - Only their feet are seen as five pairs of boots appear inside a frame. (caution: as one reviewer complained, there is a crude moment during this scene so parents be cautioned if watching with younger children.)3) SOLO STEPS - One by one, the six members get their solo moment to show off their talents. Favorites solo steps would be Disney's ("Helloooo gorgeous!" is yelled out to him from the audience) and Read's (I can't see how he pulls off the 'toe' steps).4) DANCING BETWEEN THE CRACKS- As a large piece of board is being lifted, slanted forward for the full view of the audience, the board is pulled apart so that the dancers dance beween and over the cracks.5) TWO-MAN ROUTINE - Dein Perry and Ben Read tap while being seated, starting from the basics until the steps become more and more complicated.6) FANCY FOOTWORK - Ben Read and Dein Perry each do a long solo number, one of my favorites parts of the whole show.7) TAPPED INTO THE BEAT - Nathan Sheens slides in carrying a basketball and does a short number, tapping as he dribbles the ball faster and faster. In a few moments, he 'discovers' six floor tiles which are actually something like a synthesizer. Eventually, all six members 'plays music' while tapping on the tiles in complete synchronization. The music gets very funky towards the end. A definite highlight from the show.8) DANCING ON THE CEILING - Dein Perry leads the others into a jazzy number and gets the audience to keep the beat by snapping their fingers. Has some humorous points with Perry keeping his men 'in line'. After a bit, we see Gerry Symonds tap dancing... while hanging upside from the ceiling!9) WIRE TAPPING - I simply love the music played during this number; lots of synthesizer and cool bass. The performers dance while pulling and dancing around wires which are strung from the ground to a frame above.10) AN UPLIFITNG PERFORMANCE - The previously mentioned wires are pulled up, lifting steel plates at angles which the performers dance on. Soon the plates are lifted straight up vertically, revealing them to be ladders on the reverse side; soon the tap dancers are actually tapping while climbing up and down the ladders!11) MAN AT WORK - Spotlight is on Dein Perry as he does a number on a grate with a type of microphone strapped to his legs which 'echo' the 'taps'. Soon he wears protective goggles and the other members of the show use construction tools to shower Dein with sparks in exact rhythm!12) REACHING NEW HEIGHTS - The guys start building a frame which in the end makes like a huge staircase. It's interesting how they can still dance while actually building this frame.13) SPLASH DANCE - What might be the 'funnest' number; Dein Perry and three other guys wear boots and 'splash dance', getting the whole couple front rows in the audience wet! Very funny ending...14) LETTING EVERYTHING SLIDE - Just the piano is heard as the six dancers do a slow but jazzy number while kicking some of the water from 'Splash Dance' onto the audience. One by one, they go off stage, each receiving a resounding applause.15) LAST STEPS - Almost like an encore, this number would have to be one of my favorites of the whole show. Cool music and the six dancers dance up and over individual little staircases.All-in-all, watching "Tap Dogs" is such an enjoyable experience. These are Aussies we're talking about so there's a lot of shouting and calling out among the members and it's so obvious they're having such a great time on stage. They are all so in tune with each other, it's amazing how they can tap dance even when there's often no music to keep beat! Good show, mates!If you think tap dancing is 'old school' and 'old fashioned', I highly recommend you to watch this. It'll certainly change your outlook forever about tap dancing
BRILLIANT !. Although his catalog is small Michele Soavi is a brilliant film maker & "Cemetery Man" is not only one of the very best zombie films ever made but it is also Soavi's masterpiece. From the opening scene of the movie you can easily tell that he was a student of Argento's. This film has all the elements that a great movie needs. First off you get an unpredictable goofy as hell & intentionally incoherent dream like storyline with some real deep substance under it's skin if you look hard enough,wich makes this film primo for multi-viewings. You've got great acting,beautifully mezmorising set design & cinematography,great zombie make-up/efx,a couple of truly lustful love scenes(with one of the most beautiful women to walk the face of this planet)and all of the strings are being pulled by one of the best Director's of all time. This film is a thanksgiving feast for both the artsy cinema lover & zombie fans alike. A genre busting must
Another great Cheech & Chong film. Not as good as the first one, but still pretty funny. As far as I can tell, there's not a whole lot of plot happening. But it's a great movie all the same. I really enjoyed it
Mambo Italiano. Nobody can send up the immigrant Italian experience like an immigrant Italian. They spoof themselves so well because they tell the truth, and the rest of us are afraid to be so truthful lest we wind up in the river wearing cement overshoes.For example, I remember Joe Dolce singing "Shaddap You Face." And so do you. When this song was popular, Mamma had married into another Italian family, and we'd be at the family-owned pizzeria, and we'd all be drinking beer on tap, and somebody would pop a quarter into the jukebox, and we'd all sing "Shaddap You Face." And hell, I'm not even Italian.This movie is absolutely hilarious. We were watching this and just cracking up. It was filmed in Canada, and even that was funny. One of the main characters, played by Paul Sorvino, was upset because there are two Americas. The real one, USA, and the fake one, Canada. They moved to Canada from the Old Country because they didn't know any better.Great, great movie. Oh, you want more? Okay, I got more right here. What's worse than being a gay Italian? Nothing! Fuggetaboutit!Seriously, it's hard to believe this is only 90 minutes. They covered a lot of ground, because they know it ain't new, and I just want to use the word hilarious again.
GREAT SUSPENSE!. I saw this movie on Lifetime TV and I would have never guessed that the ending would have been so unexpected.  I can't wait for this movie to come out on video.  All I have to say is that you need to watch this movie.  Marlee Matlin is as convincing as can be.  This movie will keep you on the edge of your seat.  Regina King, who you may have seen in "Jerry Maguire" as Cuba Gooding Jr.'s wife, is fantastic in this movie as a lawyer.  She is one to watch
GREAT SURF FILM-BUT PLEASE DON'T EDIT!. I won't beat a dead horse. Well, maybe I will. Please re-release this film in WIDESCREEN FORMAT, anything less is defeating the purpose
A MUST SEE. This is the episode that introduced &quot;Speak&quot;, the Tick's furry sidekick.  This is also the episode that sent tens of thousands of high school students running across the school yard yelling spoon.  This is 30  minutes of harmless entertainment.  No cursing, no graphic violence, or  useless sex scenes.  It is a film that is not only suitable for all ages,  but also fun for all ages.  The Tick, in general, is the funniest series  around and I recommend that one should watch every episode that was aired.    Also, if you enjoy the cartoon as much as I did, please email and write  Fox televion and ask them to continue the series
Reality with Star Power. This movie will make you laugh and cry with a who's who of hollywood.  The music alone will move you to the kleenex box.  If you have lost someone to aids, this movie will touch you deeply.  I was told not to watch this movie alone.  Watch it with someone to hug.  How right they were.  Bronson Pinchot playing comic relief was a stereotype of the obnoxious friend a lot of us have.  Eric Roberts and Gregory Harrison have a chemistry eerily familiar to many gay couples I know.  Bravo!  Get the soundtrack too for those rainy days when you just want to reflect
Christmas present. I ordered this DVD & several others as presents. They all arrived in good shape & on time for Christmas morning
This movie is ridiculous!. Funny... crazy... you might want to be sure to watch it first before you buy it... its terrible B movie material but so bad it's actually good
Still fantastic. Haven,t seen this movie for years,but it,s still the cult classic I remember, with great performances from all. Still one of my all time favourite films
4.5 Stars Good movie for a sequel, not quite up to the first. This movie opens with a bang, and doesn't let up. It's just not quite as good as the original movie. There are some rather glaring gaps that make the movie not quite as believable.First, how can there be a series of "Alphabet Crimes" if they've only gotten the letter for the second one.Second, near the end, it's strange that the first cop cars arrive well in advance of the second, and yet there are no other cops around before the second group arrive.Eddie Murphy shines bright. His fast talking almost equals the first one. The scene in the garage is classic and ties the two movies together with yet another cast member that were in the first hit.Paul Reiser is even more obnoxious this time. He just doesn't stop talking. He says "This isn't my office!" which correlates to the first with the locker room scene.Judge Reinhold, John Ashton, Ronny Cox all return successfully continuing their shining roles. This time we also get treated to Brigitte Nielsen as the tall blonde bombshell. Dean Stockwell stuggles does a decent job as the fairly inept Charles Cain. Allen Garfield joins this movie as the blunt Chief who won't listen to anyone and tells everyone else to "Shut-up" repeatedly.  Gilbert Godfried is hilarious as the C.P.A (Certifiable Public Annoyance). He plays a financial advisor in his typical over the top style. Chris Rock stars as a valet trying to figure out how to park a cement truck. Hugh Heffner has a cameo with many of his playmates.Not as good as the first but ultimately enjoyable. If it weren't for the gaps this would've gotten 5 stars from me.
My Favorite Version. I absolutely love this version of Emma; I enjoyed Kate Beckinsale and Mark Strong as Emma and Mr. Knightly. The scenery, performances, screenplay, and attention to detail combine to make this a wonderful adaptation.I have another verson of "Emma"; but nobody does Jane Austen better than A&E/BBC. Their attention to details such as costume, music, scenery, food, etc. can't be beat
Pete & Kate. Stellar performances by O'Toole and Hepburn. King Henry #2 and his fair Lady, Eleanor full of intrigue and princely plots. Love me, hate me, leave me episodes throughout. In the end King is jubilant, queen goes back to jail and the 3 naughty boys resume their plotting to seize the throne. "O well, what family doesn't have its ups and downs "?  This is an oldie but a goodie
"They Can't Take That Away From Me". The beloved "Shall We Dance" was the only Fred and Ginger film with songs from George and Ira Gershwin, and they were splendid. Songs like "They Can't Take That Away From Me" made for great entertainment when coupled with the opulent RKO sets in this Pandro S. Berman production. The lively tale of mix-ups and misunderstandings was from a screenplay by Allan Scott and Ernest Pagno, based on an adaptation by P.J. Wolfson of a story by Lee Loeb and Harold Buchman. Ginger's gowns by Irene were fabulous as always and Mark Sandrich once again took the helm.On his stay in Paris, Pete (Fred Astaire), a famous ballet dancer also known as Petrov, wants to meet musical comedy star Linda Keene (Ginger Rogers), and in fact, would like to marry her! Pete and his pal Jeffrey (Edward Everett Horton) discover she's sailing on the S.S. Queen Anne and follow her. Pete uses a fake accent for a short time but is eventually found out, and finds out that dogs are the way to a girl's heart.A wild story Jeffery told Lady Tarrington (Ketti Gallian) in Paris comes back to haunt Pete, as suddenly everyone on the cruise thinks he and Linda have been secretly married, and are going to have a baby! It's a bit much for Linda, who has sworn off reporters, and they decide to really get married, so they can get divorced. But it's too late for Linda, as she has fallen in love with the pursuing Pete, and there is a sadness as Pete sings "They Can't Take That Away From Me" on a ferry to Manhattan after it's all done. The tune was nominated as Best Song but lost the Oscar to "Sweet Leilani" from "Waikiki Wedding."Hilarious moments in the film include Edward Everett Horton and Eric Blore in a "hushing" duel with ballet patrons, Horton and Jerome Cowan getting tight, with Horton getting ill afterward, and Fred convincing Horton that he's seasick, even though the water is perfectly calm. Blore ends up in jail for the second time in one of the couple's pictures and is once again a riot.Ginger sings "They All Laughed" and she and Fred share a lovely dance that culminates with a smile, as the couple sit on a piano. A fun and famous scene has them on skates in the park, dancing to "Let's Call the Whole Thing Off." Fred's character Pete wants to dance with Linda all his life, but what's he to do when she won't consider it? Dance with images of her, that's what. A charming conclusion has Linda joining the other girls, but Pete can't figure out which is the real Linda. Will Linda say yes to Pete? If you are a fan of Fred Astaire and Ginger Rogers you know the answer to that one!Devoted fans of one of the most fondly remembered couples in screen history might be shocked to learn that during production, there were plans for this to be their final film. "Swing Time," their previous entry, now widely regarded by film historians, along with "Top Hat," as the zenith of their films together, had done huge box office business in large cities upon its initial release. But that business had quickly subsided and there were those at RKO who felt they had gone to the well once too often.Fortunately for us, that theory was squashed, and we got to see the hilarious "Carefree" and the tender "The Story of Vernon and Irene Castle" before the couple said farewell. Again, fortunately, we don't have to say farewell, only "see you later," because we now have the ability to watch these wonderful films at home whenever we want. "Shall We Dance" is a charming reminder of a magic that passed this way only once, and something you'll want to capture forever by picking up a copy today
One of the Most Underappreciated Movies of the '90s. One of the most underappreciated movies of the '90s, "Mumford" is written & directed by Lawrence Kasdan and is both really entertaining and funny. Loren Dean plays a psychologist named Mumford who lives in a small town called Mumford. Mumford is the most popular psychologist in town, although his methods are a bit strange. He tells other people what his clients have told him, he kicks people out of his office and still maintains a level of popularity. Among his patients are Pruitt Taylor Vince (Trapped, Monster) as a man who has film-noirish fantasies in which he sees himself as a large muscular man. Jason Lee (Mallrats, My Name is Earl) as a young billionaire who can't find happiness. Zooey Deschanel (Winter Passing, Elf) as a young girl who's addicted to...magazines. Mary McDonnel as Althea, a woman obsessed with buying things. And finally, Hope Davis (About Schmidt, The Weather Man) as Sofie, a woman suffering from Chronic Fatigue Syndrome.While some of these characters are just there, Mumford befriends Jason Lee's character Skip and falls in love with Sofie. Martin Short is also in the film, an extended cameo basically, as a criminal lawyer who was kicked out of Mumford's office and seeks revenge. All the actors are great in their performances; Dean is perfect as Mumford, Lee is hilarious, Davis looks hot which I've never percieved in any of her other movies, and Deschanel is great, but almost unrecognizable. This is truly a delightful movie and I hope that this will inspire someone to see it. It's well made and very funny.GRADE: A
ever seen a window kill a person?. this is a very weird little video nasty thats a sequal to suspiria it has beautiful colors but its a little random its still enjoyable the soundtracks unbelievabl
Incredible symbiose between music and images. A regard on our crazy lifestyle that will surely make you think and reflect. If you have the chance to watch this powerful film you willremember it forever. I saw it 2o years ago and i cant forget this movie or the amazing music of Philip Glass, trully inspiring
Downloading is easy. CSI is great and Downloading was very easy.  This is my fourth video, and I've only had problems with one, and Amazon quickly walked me through fixing it.  Gotta agree with A. Huck on the DSL, though.  While it's certainly useable the higher speed of cable would be great
Too Gorgeous 4 words. 1st of all if you are a Prince fan, then it is ofcourse the norm, that you have some favortism directed to the film. That would be me included!!! Does he ever not look good on camera??? I love his hair styles throughout the movie. O.K. now on the movie itself; I find the plot of it beautiful. I wish it did; however, show more erotic love scenes. I love the idea of this movie pertaining to the fact to w/ being a male gigolo, and finding love. THIS IS A PRINCE FILM that does not come on to often...this is simply beautiful B&W so clean looking. (...)! to all the naysayers, because Graffiti Bridge is sexy too! This could be a silent film, and I would still get it just to watch him sashay his cute (...)on screen...everything about him is art. More than half of all people even if they tried could not be such as he: An animated piece of expensive art on screen that you want to just watch...cut it out you haters he is GORGEOUS!!
Best of Guest. Of Christopher Guest's mockumentaries, "Best in Show" is definitely the best. The characters and story gel in a perfect comic concoction. "Best in Show" is very different than "Waiting for Guffman" (the first film in the Guest trilogy), although it brings back many of the same actors. While Guffman has a cruel streak in it, "Best in Show" is a little kinder to the characters it skewers -- without losing the laughs. I would skip the third film in the trilogy (A Mighty Wind) unless you are looking for a bittersweet drama. It's just not that funny. If you are Jonesing for a mockumentary fix, search for "G-Sale" -- a quirky comedy very much in the Christopher Guest vein. It got a lot of great reviews and was even labeled "the movie Christopher Guest should have made instead of A Mighty Wind.
Great acting by Hollywood's most underated actress... I saw this movie without really knowing what it was about and was completely suprised by how good it is.  Diane Lane, who is not only beautiful, but talented, plays a yuppie housewife who is given a gun by her  husband. After she gets her neighbor involved, James Legros, they embark on  series of strange, and mysterious events. This movie won best picture at  the Sundance film festival in 1992, and is worth renting, but don't buy  unless it's under $20.     Diane Lane is truly underated in Hollywood and  &quot;My New Gun&quot; proves why
Hot view of the fall of imperialism. Gibson and Weaver star in theis steamy view of the fall of imperialism in Indonesia.  They start living the expat life in Jakarta, and live the transformation as the country moves to military rule.  The movie is interesting on many fronts:  Seeing the leads before they became megastars, watching the subtle condemnation of expats amongst locals, and the history woven into the fiction.  Supporting roles are played superbly as well.  It's a great movie
Extra! Extra! Read all about it! Bond Bond ! James Bond. Everythig you wanted to know about the James Bond phenominon but were too shy to ask.  Then this Bud's for you.  Do you like your Martini's shaken but not stirred? Do you like your women exotic and action starved? Is your company car an Aston Martin?  Do you have a lot of cool gadgets in the workplace?  Then maybe this is your life and your name is James Bond secret agent 007 licensed to Kill
Great Service. We thought the tape was in excellent condition and the delivery service was very efficient
Perfect!!!. The best dvd that I ever saw!!! Perfect to make a party and play this dvd and everyone is gonna like your party
Fast shipping. The shipping was fast and I got it within a few days of purchase. Thanks for having such a great movie in stock
Not bad for action!. I liked this movie a little bit 'cause "White Men Can't Jump" stars Wesley Snipes and Woody Harrelson kick some butt in this story of Transit Cops on the search of a lot of money on a train. While searching for the money, They encounter some trouble! 2 1/2 Stars! J-Lo is great, too
Not for the easily offended. I find most "stoner" movies to be too juvenile to bother with. This is not a typical stoner movie, though, because the leads are not slacker losers, they're intelligent guys (one's an investment banker, the other an aspiring med student) who happen to like to hang out together and smoke dope. Which, truth be told, is pretty accurate of a lot of twenty somethings today.The best bits are hilarious. Watch out for the British twin sisters, the evangelical tow truck driver, and Neil Patrick Harris (Doogie Howser) as a sex crazed drug addled party animal. The only scene that fell flat for me was the one with the cheetah. Pointless and not funny. That said, this is not highbrow humor. But if this were just a series of frat boy jokes it would have fallen as flat as most other movies of the genre. What really elevates this movie is the Harold and Kumar characters. Silly antics aside, these guys are really likeable and have great on screen buddy chemistry.I don't know why I haven't seen John Cho and Kal Penn in more movies, but the ending makes me hopeful that there will be a sequel
Excellent. Again, this product was really new like you always say it and there was no defect whatsoever.Also, the picture quality was clear as well as the sound and I really want to thank you guys once again for the good job you do in reminding people for theirorders with you.In conclusion,I look forward to doing more businesswith you in the future and thank you for being one of earth's biggest selection on the planet
Family Dissolution, Lust for Power, Madness ... The story line is superb ... the scenery is stunning and gorgeous, vast mountains and green valleys, walled castles and fortresses. Hidetora, the aging warlord, holds a conference with his three sons and local chieftains on a mountainside. He announces his decision to relinquish the leadership of his kingdom to the eldest of his three sons. Only one son, the youngest, dares to speak up and state that during his lifetime he has known only war and fighting, he predicts the same after the transfer of power. He believes there will be power struggles between his two older brothers due to jealousy. The youngest brother personally has no desire to be warlord. Hidetora planned to leave one castle to each of his three sons. He has each son hold an arrow and asks them to break it in half, which they easily do. He gives them in succession, three arrows bundled together, representing the unity of the family, none can break the bundle. This is Hidetora's example of how the family will remain strong if they remain unified. He envisions the House of Ichimanji to be powerful and his eldest son to be overlord of the kingdoms attained during Hidetora's own reign of power. In his anger, Hidetora banishes the youngest son accusing him of defying his wishes ... Yet Subarua, the youngest, holds his father in esteem and respect throughout the predicted battles which come to pass.Hidetora visits Taro's castle after the power transfer and finds his concubines have to bow and kneel to Taro's wife, Sue'. They are forced to move out. Hidetora discovers after the transfer of power, he is no longer respected. Sue' married into the family to consolidate land holdings and property attained as the spoils of war, a war in which her parents were murdered. She harbored revenge in her heart ever since and now urges her husband to fight his brother, Jiro. Hidetora's court jester creates a mocking song about Taro being like a gourd, spinning this way and spinning that way, implying he can not make a sound decision and stick with it. At a family gathering Taro hears the song and is outraged ... In a surprise move, Hidetora and his guards leave to visit Jiro. Hidetora discovers he is not welcome there either, not at all what he expected. He left abruptly ...The treachery to gain power and control over the lands and castles by the two older brothers consumes them. As predicted by Subaru, the younger brother, war is inevitable. Local chieftains must decide where their loyalties lie, which brother to support. Hidetora goes into hiding. Eventually he goes mad. His only guard and caregiver, the jester, does not leave his side. This film contains very strong battle scenes. The desire for control and power is the true motivator for both older brothers. Loosely based on Shakespeare's King Lear, this Japanese version is astonishing in scope and grandeur. The costumes and scenery are fabulous. In the film, there are tender moments between the jester and Hidetora. There are moving scenes where Jiro's wife escapes to find her brother who was blinded in a past conquest and lives alone in a cottage ... The producers and directors create a phenomenal ending and conclusion. At some point, Hidetora reawakens from his madness long enough to recognize the impact of his decision on his family and the near destruction of the kingdom he once ruled.  The ending is climactic and leaves a major impression on the viewer. The film is amazing!Erika Borsos (erikab93
Westerns. Classic Duke!!  One of the best, great cast, Opening scene remindes me of his early movie Red River
Only one question. My only question is - When can I buy season 2?  This is the perfect medium to continue the most enjoyed show that TV execs killed this decade
Thoroughly Entertaining. This is a really good movie with an excellent excellent screenplay. The movie begins with the birth of punk, when a small roomful of people were fortunate enough to catch the Sex Pistols when they first came out, changing the course of music, and ends with the death of acid. As Tony Wilson puts it in the film, it is the "story of Manchester," that begins when a group of young and idealistic local boys decide to screw London and its record companies and start producing their own records out of Manchester, and boy, has music history benefited from this decision. It's interesting to note that as these young lads on the forefront of the music scene in Manchester began to age, they become less idealistic as they were in their youth, and more acknowledging of reality and its limits. My only complaint is that I wish the movie could have had more on Joy Division and New Order, than on the Happy Mondays. Why did Tony Wilson ever sign a band that came in last place in Manchester's Battle of the Bands??? The casting for this movie is outstanding, as well.Two big thumbs up.P.S. I don't know why they used the cover that they did for the DVD. It really has nothing to do with the film
A Grand Slam!. Tom Berenger, Corbin Bernsen, Charlie Sheen, and Wesley Snipes star in this fun film about the woeful Cleveland Indians baseball team and how a group of misfits and castoffs came together to make the Indians pennant winners again.Berenger stars as Jake Taylor, a former all-star catcher who has been toiling in the Mexican league.  He gets a call from the Indians GM to come to spring training to be the team captain and help mentor the younger players.  These players include Willie Mays Hayes (Wesley Snipes), a speedy outfielder who can only hit pop flys, Rick Vaughn (Charlie Sheen), a flame-throwing pitcher fresh out of the California penal league who possesses a blazing fastball but has no control, and Pedro Cerrano (Dennis Haysbert), a hard-hitting Cuban who defected for religious freedom.  He can crush fastballs, but nothing else.  He also has a shrine in his locker with an idol named Jobu. Roger Dorn (Corbin Bernsen) is a high-priced third baseman who cares more about his investment portfolio than he does about baseball.Rachel Phelps (Margaret Whitten) has inherited the Indians after the death of her owner-husband.  A former showgirl, she is determined to move the team to Miami, where she will cash in on several perks from the city.  But to do this, the team's attendance must fall below a certain level.  Determined to get what she wants, she begins taking things away from the team, such as whirlpools, and even their private plane.  Soon the team is travelling to games by bus.  However, the team has Lou Brown (James Gammon) as their manager.  He is determined to make the Indians winners, regardless of what Rachel does.The season starts off slowly for the team, and they are in their traditional last place position.  But the GM lets Lou in on Rachel's scheme, and things begin to change.  The players realize that the only option they have other than becoming free agents or being released is to win it all.  And that's what they set out to do.I'm a big baseball movie fan, and this movie is one of my all-time favorites.  The story is excellent (being a Cubs fan, I'm glad the producers didn't pick them as their team to use), and the acting is tremendous. The choice of Bob Uecker as Indians announcer Harry Doyle was a stroke of genius.  His announcing and one-liners really add a great dimension to the film.  Rene Russo does a good job as Jake's on again, off again girlfriend Lynn Wells.  Its fun to watch their ups and downs throughout the movie.  There's even a take-off on the then-popular "do you know us?" American Express Card commercials.I give this teriffic movie my highest recommendation.  Watch and see how a bunch of no-names and has-beens bond together for one magical season to become winners
At the show. I was pleased with the DVD, but disappointed that there were no behind-the or deleted scenes included in the special features.  It is still one of my all time favorites
Family Dissolution, Lust for Power, Madness ... The story line is superb ... the scenery is stunning and gorgeous, vast mountains and green valleys, walled castles and fortresses. Hidetora, the aging warlord, holds a conference with his three sons and local chieftains on a mountainside. He announces his decision to relinquish the leadership of his kingdom to the eldest of his three sons. Only one son, the youngest, dares to speak up and state that during his lifetime he has known only war and fighting, he predicts the same after the transfer of power. He believes there will be power struggles between his two older brothers due to jealousy. The youngest brother personally has no desire to be warlord. Hidetora planned to leave one castle to each of his three sons. He has each son hold an arrow and asks them to break it in half, which they easily do. He gives them in succession, three arrows bundled together, representing the unity of the family, none can break the bundle. This is Hidetora's example of how the family will remain strong if they remain unified. He envisions the House of Ichimanji to be powerful and his eldest son to be overlord of the kingdoms attained during Hidetora's own reign of power. In his anger, Hidetora banishes the youngest son accusing him of defying his wishes ... Yet Subarua, the youngest, holds his father in esteem and respect throughout the predicted battles which come to pass.Hidetora visits Taro's castle after the power transfer and finds his concubines have to bow and kneel to Taro's wife, Sue'. They are forced to move out. Hidetora discovers after the transfer of power, he is no longer respected. Sue' married into the family to consolidate land holdings and property attained as the spoils of war, a war in which her parents were murdered. She harbored revenge in her heart ever since and now urges her husband to fight his brother, Jiro. Hidetora's court jester creates a mocking song about Taro being like a gourd, spinning this way and spinning that way, implying he can not make a sound decision and stick with it. At a family gathering Taro hears the song and is outraged ... In a surprise move, Hidetora and his guards leave to visit Jiro. Hidetora discovers he is not welcome there either, not at all what he expected. He left abruptly ...The treachery to gain power and control over the lands and castles by the two older brothers consumes them. As predicted by Subaru, the younger brother, war is inevitable. Local chieftains must decide where their loyalties lie, which brother to support. Hidetora goes into hiding. Eventually he goes mad. His only guard and caregiver, the jester, does not leave his side. This film contains very strong battle scenes. The desire for control and power is the true motivator for both older brothers. Loosely based on Shakespeare's King Lear, this Japanese version is astonishing in scope and grandeur. The costumes and scenery are fabulous. In the film, there are tender moments between the jester and Hidetora. There are moving scenes where Jiro's wife escapes to find her brother who was blinded in a past conquest and lives alone in a cottage ... The producers and directors create a phenomenal ending and conclusion. At some point, Hidetora reawakens from his madness long enough to recognize the impact of his decision on his family and the near destruction of the kingdom he once ruled.  The ending is climactic and leaves a major impression on the viewer. The film is amazing!Erika Borsos (erikab93
Excalibur. This is the best rendition of Excaliber that was ever made. I"ve watched several and this is the one I prefer above all others. It's a great move and suitable for the whole family there is a tad bit of nudity but only a hip and part of a buttock... So if your looking for a Great movie about King Arthur, Please check this one out..
Technically a B movie but has the heart of an A!. This has been one of my favorite movies for as long as I can remember.  Even when I was young and I didn't understand all the jokes, but when I recently rewatched it...well my love of it was rediscovered.This is a film that basically takes a pridictable and unoriginal story of two people trying to succeed in their sport and end up falling in love and makes it instantly memorable for its snappy dialogue and fun one upmanship of the main characters.  This film would be worth it for some its insults alone! Overall, I would say it is a diamond in the rough.  But if you are looking for a serious film then this might not appeal to you, The Cutting Edge is pretty much a fun filled romp from start to finish
Controversial classic that's more than historically interesting. Melville Farr (Dirk Bogarde), a married and highly respected barrister on the verge of making QC, becomes embroiled in a homosexual blackmail plot when a youth he befriended is arrested and commits suicide. As Farr attempts to track down and expose the blackmailers, much to the distress of his secretly gay acquaintances and colleagues, Farr and his wife are forced to confront his own ambiguous sexuality... I hunted this film down because it came up time and again in reviews and discussions about "Brokeback Mountain" and I wanted to see what all the fuss was about. It was apparently a pivotal moment in the history of British cinema, being the first movie to use the word "homosexual" let alone pitch an argument against Britain's anti-sodomy laws. That's all a bit irrelevant - almost comical - these days, and certainly no reason to bother watching this unless you're particularly interested in film history. What struck me, however, and what prompts me to recommend this film, is the way it still stands up as a dramatic thriller even today. It's beautifully paced, finely crafted in terms of shooting and editing, and the writing is marvellously fresh. It feels almost contemporary. The way the opening thirty minutes unfold are a short course in screenwriting: just enough information is revealed to keep you engaged, while enough is held back to make it intriguing. For the duration it remains true to the demands of a mystery plot. Never becoming just a social essay, it almost completely resists the urge to preach to the audience, notwithstanding the controversial topic. My only reservation is around the ending - Laura's final decision strikes me as both too needy and too generous to be quite credible. But overall this is an excellent film
SPOON!. The Tick kicks ass. This is one of the best episodes.  It's a must have
catch a rising star!!!. You should see this because it has an eary appearance by America (yes, peo-ple, that is HER real name) Ferarra!!!  WHo, you ask?? Oh (casually) only the star of UGLY BETTY.   (looks up, says ala Pulp Fiction) "Oh, do I have your attention now????  Also in this movie is Roary from GG (gilmore Girls for the ignorant).  The only thing I didnt like was the blonde who had sex with the older man, not only was it innapropriate, but also illegal!!!!  WSo, parents be aware of this if you're daughter's want to watch this movie.  It has sexual content!!!!  Especially if they are under age!  Now, peo-ple, I am a male and also over 18 so i can watch what I want, but I'm just saying that for young girls they shouldn't watch this one!!!  But we ALL can watch Ugly Betty!!!!
A Christmas Must. This movie is now included in my collection of "must see at Christmas time" DVD's together with the likes of "The Vicar of Dilby" and "Lampoons".Great cast, great acting, cute story and even cuter legs on Will Ferrell.
improved Lolita, incomplete Psyche, seven stages of an affair. An alliance of convenience between a rich man and a needy young girl is explored through all its phases and taken to its final conclusion, decades later.  If you have an interest in this subject you will like the movie and see it as deep and profound, otherwise it will seem shallow and bore you because of the incompletely developed side plots.There are many side plots.  Sexual awakening of a young girl, mentioned in other reviews, seems to be a side plot, though fairly well developed.  Chemistry between adolescent girls, the jealousy and competition among siblings, these are introduced but left frustratingly undeveloped.  It would have made the movie too long.It works out much better than Lolita where the girl dies and the man is jailed for murder, but not as well as Psyche where through the diligence of her magical helpers and the deviousness of Venus there is a complete conversion from secret mistress to immortal wife, the oldest and most famous in literature.  The difference I believe is in the respect the older lover shows for the girl and her family, even though they don't deserve it.  This redeems his character as compared to Lolita's blundering lover who covers up his mistakes and takes no responsibility for outcomes.  But though responsible in the present this lover takes no responsibility for the future, unlike Cupid who insists on charging against fate and tradition (though sensibly so, and only after he has tested his companion).The young girl also takes responsibility, entering the relationship with deliberate awareness.  The whole film/novel is in fact an exercise/lesson in self awareness.  But she is incomplete compared to Psyche, who allows herself to feel deeply enough to be moved while movement still matters.By comparison the story also shows the role of circumstance.  In Psyche's story, Cupid's mother (wittingly or unwittingly, a subject for debate) plays an important role in putting the couple together.  In The Lover, his mother has died but her strong memory as evidenced by the sad state of his father sets the stage for love.  In Lolita, the man's mother is absent altogether and so is his respect for his partner or her family or any sense of personal responsibility.What follows is somewhat of a spoiler.  I believe the movie shows the seven stages of an affair: infatuation, lust, love, rape, impotence, longing and reunion.  By omission it shows what an affair is not.  It is not the long term building of a family.  Had the girl become pregnant as Psyche did what would have happened?  It seems likely that in real life this would have happened, and then real choices would have to be made
Brilliant. Virtually unnoticed by critics and the public, you've probably never heard of this one, but it's one of the best teenage coming of age movies. Not a big budget movie but nonetheless very well made. While the basic plot is fairly simple, the twists and turns that occur along the way are creative and hilarious. The cast put everything into this one-excellent performances all around. You could tell they believed in this movie. Clever and funny from start to finish, this is a delightful movie
pirates. This is a great movie. It has everything I like, adventure, sword fights, romance. It also has Tyrone Power, Maureen O"Hara and George Sanders
One of the best musicals ever made. I have watched at least 7 times.  Great film to watch with your childre
If you want to have a great time then  see this Film!!!. This is the standard for all other Musketeers films. (Save your time as they are generally not worth the time & money) If you want to see and get the feel for what the 17th century was like then this is the place to go. It is obvious that the high power cast and the staff was having blast while doing a labor of love.I can not recommend this classic too highly! A well done to all hands especially for the DVD Version.
Rocket Gibraltar. It is a great movie I dont have to write much just buy it, it is the type of movie that you smile and cry at the same time when your watching it
My all time favorite comedy. This movie has it all -- wonderful humor, social commentary, and noone can beat the comedic skills of the incredible cast.  Please check out the scene of Roland Young being carried out of the hotel by the ghosts.  The movie  really asks the question, &quot;What's life all about?&quot; and comes up  with a terribly unPC answer
Old message that still applies. Great movie with young actors that are still out there making movies. This coming of age movie is clean and yet very real now as it was then. The names and places have changed but the truth still applies. Highly recommended, somewhat predictable but still very enjoyable. There are enough characters that one of them must apply to someone in your group
Another great Slater Film. Having seen parts of this film over a span of the last decade or so, without fully seeing all of it, I noticed this DVD on sale at a huge retailer.. (Rhymes with Ball-Mart), for only $4.88, I couldn't resist picking it up to see it all finally.Was it worth it? Yes. I am a straight married guy, and a huge fan of Christan Slater. I have seen damn near every movie with him in it, and Pump was another classic. Did I love everything about this movie? No. It definately reeks of late 80's references and inuendo. I.E. "Bill and Ted" Clones. The story was very well done, however, it contains 2 major flaws.(1) I am a cop, and I know for a fact the Federal Government, would not send the FCC after a lone pirate station who is not screaming for the downfall of government. But is ranting about the local high school administration.(2) I didn't like the ending. I won't spoil it for you, but just say it could have been better.Overall it was a 4 out of 5. Not bad for a film from 1990.
Talk about Christmas spirit... I really love Bones.  It has everything: suspense, drama, humor, pretty people, fun storylines.  I have yet to miss an episode, and even into Season 2 this is probably my favorite.  It adds depth to all of the characters.  Also, the winter holidays are my favorite time of year.  I like holidays that are about what is good in the world.  Bones is about people standing for the good in humanity even though they explore the very worst every day.  I cry through half this episode, but in a completely good way.  Buy, watch it, love it.  But watch it with a friend if you don't want to cry alone.  So moving, great performances by the whole cast.  Emily Deschanel was powerful in this one, she brings real vulnerability to Brennan here.  David Boreanaz, as always the perfect sympathetic hero, loveably old-fashioned. Cute, funny moments.  Touching, poignant moments.  This really is the best of what is great about Bones
Not as good as the book. If you enjoyed reading the book as much as I did you might be disappointed with the film. The film cut good character development that I felt was sorely needed. But you can't help but to enjoy a good ol'pirate movie.
I can't believe the studio execs cut this show. This show is an amazing concept with superb execution for a TV drama.  It's the kind of show that should be on HBO or Showtime but the hacks who run the TV studio said it was too expensive.  Better to produce three brainless sitcoms instead of one well done drama.  I really hope someone else picks it up and brings it back
The ultimate "Wow" movie. This movie is a non-stop adventure in  "how did he do that" and "can he top this".  While movies like Crouching Tiger and Heroe were as notable for their special effects as the stunts, Legend of Drunken Master shows that physical grace, athletic prowess, and, yes, guts can create an eye-popping experience for modern movie goers.  This movie builds on one great set piece after another but when Chan's character really starts drinking....WATCH OUT!  The last fight scene in the factory will have you rewinding and laughing in delight....it's that good.  Highly recommended
Vietnam without the cynical viewpoint. The main thing that sticks with me after watching this excellent depiction of the early days of the Vietnam War is towards the end of the movie (after the battle) when the press helicopter lands and all the reporters gather around Gibson and the other soldiers and start asking inane questions. It just seemed so jarring and surreal. I mean what the hell do you even say after an experience like that. I kept thinking, in regards to the reporters, that they so couldn't even understand ... and I was only watching the battle (in the comfort of my living room), not fighting in it!!That's realistic moviemaking when I as a viewer felt like I was part of the experience.
I loved this video!. This is an amazingly soothing, relaxing routine that leaves you feeling mellow and at the same time is good for you.  As on her other videos, Mirabai Holland provides lots of information, in this case about the importance of stretching for flexibility and slowing down the aging process.  She explains the physiology of muscles and connective tissue in an easy to understand way.  Clear explanation of all the movements, no equipment needed.  An easy to follow routine that is de-stressing and soothing.  It leaves you feeling incredibly mellow
The King's Whore  -  "Was She Worth It???". I think not!!!  Ultimately, she cost him everything imaginable.  True, he was obsessed with her and tried to manipulate her into this relationship.  But no matter how it is presented, SHE was the one who made the decision to go to him.  On the first night with him she was obviously more than cooperative, refusing the offer of a change of clothing and disrobing in front of him willingly.  She seemed intent on using him to the max. You think their first encounter is blissful but you see the King's happiness begin to fade as she begins to outline her "requests"; she wants him to dismiss her husband's family from court, his minister she wants exiled, the home she shared with her husband she wants destroyed so no one else can ever live in it.  You name it she asks him for it.  He gives in to every one of her demands.  We see her in his bed being coquetteish and manipulating him.  Then when he makes overtures toward her, she becomes livid.  He doesn't understand what is happening to him since he has never had nor wanted a mistress before.  Now he finds himself consumed with his need for this woman to the point of striking her when she refuses his advances.  (You just know this King has never struck a woman before in his life)  But she's all he can think about; he needs to know where she is every minute.It becomes obvious this King does love her when she contracts smallpox.  He takes total care of her, applying balms, bathing her, staying with her night and day to keep her from scratching herself so she won't be scarred for life.  Still, this is definitely an unhealthy relationship.  Women in those days married and had trysts with men who meant nothing to them all the time because they had no control over their lives.  The men in charge (fathers, etc.) made those decisions for them and they followed whatever path was laid out for them.  Doesn't mean it was right, but that is the way women were treated.  Therefore, it is difficult to relate to her rage increasing as the relationship becomes more intense.  She becomes as obsessed with getting free of hiim as he is with keeping her.  This even seems to have become a love/hate kind of game between them.  By now we are sure she loves him even though she is unwilling or unable to show it.  Meanwhile, she is constantly given and accepts jewelry, art, clothing -- whatever she wants and then some, but does not give him any real pleasure in return as far as can be determined.  This review is muddled I know but so are the emotions in this film.  In the meantime, Timothy Dalton is absolutely gorgeous.  Definitely at his peak in every way.  I am not impressed with the Countess.  I think she was miscast and not nearly pretty enough to have this obsesssion be believable...Why do I love this film???  I don't know, but it doesn't matter, I do
Bob Dylan vs. Donovan. This DVD was a fascinating view into the life of the greatest song and dance man of all time. The music video of Subterranean Homesick Blues is humorously primitive, but none the less, captivating and enthralling. After watching this movie I will never throw glass out of a window or wear a Dylan shirt to a Donovan concert again. If you like Bob you will love this DVD. It is a true necessity to any self-proclaimed Dylan fan. It's worth the money to see Bob and his manager make fun of Donovan. The tension is hysterical. I also recommend to any Dylan followers to buy his book "chronicles pt1". It's so well written I began to wonder if Bob missed his calling with that one. But then I remembered he released at least 10 albums worth seriously leaving your seat right now and buying, but none the less he is also an excellent writer. As for any Folk fans out there I also recommend buying The Newport Folk Festival DVD. Artists including but not limited to Bob Dylan, Donovan, Joan Baez, Odetta, Buffy Sainte Marie, Johnny Cash, Peter Paul and Mary and many more are shown performing at this infamous gathering. This, including comments and footage of the crowds, builds a feeling of unity that has quickly diminished in this overly unappreciative world. Buy it and you'll long to be there, I guarantee it
This Has Been...a Love Story. I finally made my first purchase from Amazon's Unbox Video Downloads just to try the service and am happy to report a solid customer experience. For $1.99, I purchased and downloaded one of my favorite episodes of "The Twilight Zone", and it took about twenty minutes to download through a broadband connection. I don't think it's the most ideal way to see full-length motion pictures, but for a 26-minute classic TV program, I think my 17" LCD monitor makes for a suitable viewing experience, and the video quality of the downloaded file is clean.Aired on September 15, 1961 as the show's third season opener, the episode is a Cold War fantasy appropriately called "Two" about the last two survivors on earth, a man and a woman, after an apocalyptic world war in 2109. Written and directed by TV veteran Montgomery Pittman, the simple plot revolves around the complicating fact that he is an American infantryman and she is an invading Russian soldier. Like two feral animals, they glare at each other among the debris of a deserted town destroyed by the war. He even knocks her out her after she aggressively throws pots and pans at him. The reality of their solitary existence, however, gradually dawns on them, especially after they see an evening dress in a shop window inspiring her to speak her only word of dialogue - "Prekrassnyi" - the Russian word for "lovely".What really makes this episode memorable is the unlikely casting. Two years before she twitched her nose on "Bewitched", a brunette Elizabeth Montgomery, looking appropriately ravaged and sporting a deadly ray gun, plays the untrusting Russian soldier with surprising fierceness and vulnerability. The American is played by perennial tough-guy Charles Bronson, fresh from "The Magnificent Seven". Even though he has to spout some inane philosophical lines to describe the futility of war, he leavens his natural sullenness with a determined romanticism. They make an odd couple, but it works splendidly. I also learned that canned fried chicken will become a staple in the 22nd century. Narrated by Rod Serling in his inimitably halting manner, the show ends with my favorite line in his signature postscript: "This has been...a love story." This is classic TV
Old plot but overall great!. Sure it's the same old plot you see in every ski movie, some rich developers trying to take away the ski resort from the locals, but the characters in this movie are really interesting, some parts are really funny and the music is good too, I highly recommend this movie if you like snowboarding at all, also check out Ski School 2
Way to Go Amazon!  Very cool. Just got done watching the show and it was awesome. Of course I had to download the tool, how else do you get started? Once it downloaded it worked very well and the video was right there to watch when I was ready. Note to self get cable, DSL is a slow download but it worked great and the picture quality was awesome. No commercials!I didn't have any troubles installing it on my computer and the help tool walked me through it.
One Of The Best Sitcoms On TV. &quot;All In The Family&quot; Is 1 Of The Best Sitcoms Ever. On This Cassatte It Has Lional From The Spinoff &quot;The Jeffersons&quot;. Archie Meets His Future Son-In-Low Mike &quot;The Meathead&quot;. Gloria And Mike  Put On A Anniversiry Party For Edith And Archie, Lional From &quot;The  Jeffersons&quot; Visits The Bunker House, And Gloria And Mike Celebrate  Their Wedding Anniversiry. This Is A Funny Tape. You Must Buy It
unflinchingly realistic look at Latina gang life in Echo Park. When I first saw this film, some five years ago, it truly knocked the breath out of me.  For the first time, director Allison Anders gives us a glimpse into Mexican-American gang life in East LA's Echo Park, from the female perspective, this time.  In the past, we have seen our share of male experiences (example being Zoot Suit, written by the playwright Luis Valdez).  For once, we see the gritty side of the gang life, as young Mexicanas (or Chicanas, depending on who you ask) struggle to stay alive, amidst rampant drug dealing, the violence of gang initiation and their relationships with men who are less than honorable to them.Mi Vida Loca is actually a trilogy of stories.  (Mousie & Sad Girl, Lowrider and La Blue Eyes)  The first is the story of a life long friendship between fellow gang members, Mousie (Seidy Lopez) and Sad Girl (Angel Aviles).  These young women are best friends, until the day that Sad Girl sleeps with Mousie's boyfriend, Ernesto (Jacob Vargas), and becomes pregnant with his child.  The world they knew before is ruptured, as is their lifelong connection as friends.  The second story takes a glimpse in LowRider culture.  This culture is perpetuated by, predominantly, young Chicanos who build their lives around re-finishing and airbrushing "low rider" cars (many, old school Chevies), complete with flashy airbrush images (example being voluptuous women and gang affiliations), trick tires and rims.  This story is actually a wonderful example of modern magical realism, when the car takes on a life of its own.  The third story is centered around La Blue Eyes, a beautiful BROWN-EYED woman who is writing to a convict, that she falls in love with through the exchange of letters.  The question is, when they finally meet, will the sum of those letters even measure up to their encounter, or has the young woman ultimately been deceived, the whole time?I reccomend this film, if not for the fact that it is compelling, but that this is an important culture in society we should all learn something more about.  A very important study in gang life, and how it evolves in a neighborhood that many only hear about on the evening news, but never get to know
A Masterpiece. This by far is Pauly Shore's best work yet.  I mean who thinks of this stuff a hippie marries someone who is related to farmers and I mean Pauly Shore could care less about a family of farmers.  But throughout the movie the unthinkable happens a hippie bonds with farmers.  This is better than Bio-Dome times 2 and throw in a movie like Cabin Boy and you will have a masterpiece like this.  If Pauly Shore was a chef andSon-In-Law was the meal he made he would be working in the finest restaurant in France
I wish I was in Dixie... This is one of the best movie about the civil war I've ever seen. It is the most instructive, realistic, with very good actors playing in it ! For once, just like in "Gods and Generals", the movie is more focused on the southern side, which is not very often the case.I am a fan of this part of the U.S. history, and especially of the South, and I was really captivated by this movie from the beginning to the end
Generally Speaking. One of the better performances I've seen from Travola.  With that said I liked the story line and the plots twists and turns.  I would have liked to have seen more stories with this character made, as I am an avid fan for detective stories and what not
great movie. i havent seen this film in a while but its a damn good film and mesage behind it.. alot of people didnt know and still dont know how aids gets in your system which leaves people almost scared to be around a person as well, and they all thought that you it was a gay thing only.. but in this film it shows that no matter what people say nothing can stop a friendship no matter what the person looks like or if they have aids and there mom tries to keep them away.. great fil
Spectacular. This is one of the finest productions I have ever seen..Too bad more aren't being produced
Shattering. This film is slick and shattering with an underbelly of sobbering disatisfaction. Christie is pognient. Harvey is cool with cracks of vulnerability that informs the emptiness of his life. Bogarde is sympathetic and callow, a basically good man who is seduced by an elusive beauty that could never be. The direction is crisp. the music and sound very good.
Reassuring. This is the least preachy bible study I've ever read.Kushner divides his chapters by themes and suggests, but does not demand, a theological answer which supports his thesis: that an all-knowing God can server the cause of good yet not function as a safety belt.He supports it with elements from his own experience.Since his language is comforting and conversational, anyone can relate to him as a speaker. Well worth it!
Hard Candy... After chatting online for 3 weeks, Jeff Kohlver, a 32 year old photographer, and Hayley Stark, a 14 year old honors student, finally meet in real life at a cozy local coffee shop called Nighthawks.For a `normal' person, just knowing this age different would make you feel.. Uncomfortable and you would think that what they are doing is `wrong'. But what exactly are they doing? Nothing illegal.. Yet.As Hayley attempts to flirt with Jeff, she is not getting the feedback that she wants. Sure, Jeff is replying and some of his replies seem as if they would be very sexual. But the way he talks and presents himself to Hayley, he seems as if he is not interested in her, even claiming he would have to wait 4 years for her.But when Hayley invites herself over to Jeff's home, he accepts. So he must have some interest in her, right? Well he does, but he isn't able to make his move, as Hayley makes her move first.After intensive research, study, and stalking, Hayley discovered a gruesome past that Jeff never wanted to surface, which is the only reason Hayley met with Jeff. To do justice to.. In her own special way.Our knowledge of Jeff and Hayley now change.Jeff Kohlver, not only a 32 year old photographer, but a pedophile and a murderer. Or at least the accomplice of a murderer. Hayley Stark, not only a 14 year old honors student, but a vigilante who literally takes the law into her own hands.Through torture, which includes castration, stun guns and a call to Janelle, Jeff's ex girlfriend whom he is still obsessed over, Hayley digs deeper into Jeff's memory and the complete truth is out.Hayley gives Jeff two options.Jeff must commit suicide by hanging himself. Making others, including Janelle, believe he was just some sad lonely man. In return Hayley will clean up all the evidence that would lead police to finding out his crimes.Or she will let Jeff live and she'll take off her clothes.. Run into Janelle's arms. And the truth about Jeff. About his pedophilia. And about his murderous acts. Will be out to the public. And his name will be put to shame.Jeff chooses suicide.And at the last minute, Hayley tells him.She will not hide his past.It is now for everyone to know.------------------------------Hard Candy is a psychological drama with a very unique and twisting storyline and plot. One that makes you question the movies, the characters, and even question yourself.What kind of person are you if you side with Jeff? Sure, he is a pedophile, but does he really deserve all this torture? And what kind of person are you if you side with Hayley? Sure, she is ridding the world of 'evil', but shouldn't she have just gone to the police?Most people just get stuck on the storyline and plot itself and don't take time to notice the acting, dialogue, and cinematography. Patrick Wilson and Ellen Page did an amazing performance, I have never seen better.And the dialogue is so impressive and so striking. Some times heart moving, as well as heart chilling. As for the cinematography, the movie is absolutely beautiful. The colors, the shots, really look at it.This movie is definitely a favorite of mine and I give it a 10+
The Thing from Another World. This is the original.   The remake is 'The Thing.'Both movies are great.  I suggest that you own both of them and compare
A real thriller!. I love this movie, and it is the type of film that was made a long time ago that is just "creepy" enough to be fun rather than nauseating.  Thesuspence level is great and the performances (especially Ethel Barrymore's) are first-rate.  It's really very enjoyable
Dark Love Story. This film should be up there on your need to watch list.  It's a brilliantly casted and wonderfully scripted story of blind love.  When Luis (Bandaras) meets his mail-order-bride Julia (Jolie) he is stunned at her beauty.  She is nothing like he expected, yet he marries her immediatly.  Luis is the perfect gentleman, and that makes Julia's next move even harder.  Once she has gained Luis' trust she leaves him, taking him for every cent.  Luis then, with the help of a P.I., decides he will find her, and kill her.  The problem is that he still loves her.  But does she love him?  This film shows the dark side of love, the side that allows you to love someone you don't even know, but can feel, someone you connect with, someone that makes you whole.  Jolie and Bandaras are spot on (especially with their clothes off...HOT HOT HOT) and they work wonders with this script.  I have watched this film over and over and still can't get enough of it.  The unrated version of this film offers a steamier and much more explicet love scene with movement and lots of nudity (no full frontal Bandaras shots though, you'll have to settle for quite a few butt shots) and it includes a few other sex scenes, less explicet, that were cut from the movie entirly.  Either way you'll be pleasently pleased.  The unrated version doesn't add anything new to the plot and or the flow of the film so pursue only if you're in dire need for a near-porn-like nude scene...otherwise, the theatrical version is just fine (and you still see quite a bit of nudity)...Great acting, great story, great bodies...what can I say but Great movie
Cute! Funny! Fashionable!. GREAT movie - one of my favorites. GREAT cast, wonderful costumes, romantic dialogue, and a funny plot line. Is definitely light hearted and classic British comedy. Also a great introduction to Oscar Wilde
Compellingly masterful rendering of A Day (or two) in the Life. Read Alex Grayson's articulate and thoughtful review (Jan. 3, 2007) which nails it.Apparently Chelsea Walls is not for everyone, but if you watch this movie with an open heart and mind, I promise it will provide a compelling and realistic portrait of actions, interactions and reactions so common among my fellow artists it breaks my heart.  The one element I find lacking is the artist (writer) who is truly grounded --- that absence detracts only a little though from an otherwise truthful portrayal of the life of many artists, at all stages of life, love and the pursuit of creativity.Despite the tawdry details of life among the creative, with its erratic narrated background of Dylan Thomas' masterful Under Milkwood, an edgy musical score and the realism of the indie lighting style to set the tone, the visual and actual poetry of Ethan Hawkes directorial debut sing with beauty, truth and love
The Most fun you can have in a film. This is a great film, and they really dont make them like this anymore. It's funny, has some good action scenes and a light hearted story. It's even got Shemp in it. I saw this for the first time yesterday and I enjoyed it so much i went out and bought it.
Awesome!. Avatar is so awesome! I saw one episode by chance and was determined to watch them all. It's got an excellent story line, great characters and awesome animation. I'd say it's the best show on TV out there right now, not just considering the cartoons either. It's got a real depth to it and isn't only fit for kids but teenagers(like me) and adults alike. Highly recomended!I don't know if the downloading was not working in the past but it's definitely working now. I've downloaded a few and they all work fine for me
I hate Football....I love this movie!!. Not to bemoan the people of small town america but i'm glad I had the good fortune to grow up in a big city. Seeing the insane obession of people who live there lives for high school football is hilarous! If you love football and are from a small town, you'll root through the whole film, if you don't live in a small town and don't care for football, you'll chuckle through most of it. I recommend watching "Hands on a Hard Body" after seeing this, another great doc
Great potrayal of the infamous rogue trader. This movie captures well the story of the rogue trader.Ewen MacGregor does a superb job, and manages to create some real tension. You can almost feel the tension in your living room when you watch this one!When he first made the money back, you almost wish he would have stopped there, but somehow, like an addicted gambler, continues on, inventing ingenious ways to cover up, and get more money to trade.All the cast does a good job, the locations are also excellent.An underrated excellent movie, and well worth a look, if you have even the slightest interest in finance or banks
Other People's Money. Very good copy of the original movie. The movie itself is a classic situational comedy about our comtemporary business world. Danny Devito brings his classic irreverant character to the screen with all of the style you have come to expect from him. This is a timeless must have movie.
I enjoyed this movie...... I cannot believe all of the negative reviewers.  Obviously you have never had an adult party where people behave like teenagers after being delt alcohol mixed with a drug nobody has ever tried before at their age.  At least not here.  But I had a similar party, and it ended similarly.  Fights happen, but not as serious.  You have to take things that happen at party's with open mindedness or not have them.  Your husband or wife or girlfriend...etc., is not going to behave as usual and you see a bad side of them.  If a relationship can't handle one party like this one, it probably can't survive a marriage.  The story kept me interested almost the whole way through except for the female gossip got alittle boring, otherwise very watchable, funny and tragic.  I would like to see it again
TEEN WITCH. I LOVED THIS MOVIE WHEN I WAS A TEENAGER AND I STILL LOVE IT TODAY!  I LOVE THE MUSIC...IT WILL HAVE YOU SINGING THEM TOO!  IT'S A FUN MOVIE!  A GOOD MOVIE THAT ANYONE CAN WATCH AGAIN AND AGAIN!  THIS MAKES A GREAT SLUMBER PARTY MOVIE.  I THINK IT TEACHES A LESSON TOO THAT WE ALL DEAL WITH....TRYING TO FIT IN, WANTING TO BE LOVED AND ACCEPTED TO LEARNING HOW TO JUST BE YOURSELF.  I HIGHLY RECOMMEND!  IT HAS COMEDY, ROMANCE, DRAMA, MUSIC, DANCING....IT'S A GREAT PICK!
Kiss Me Kate 1953. When two squabbling ex-marrieds are cast as squabbling  Renanaissance romantics in a musical "The Taming Of the Sherew 1952" , life imitates art , art imitates life -and it all proves no musical comedy imitates KISS ME KATE , the backstage / onstage delight from the 1948 Broadway smash and featuring 14 peerles Cole Porter (1891-1964) songs . Howard Keel (1919-2004) and Kathryn Grayson (1922- ) are the tangeled twosome So in Love despite her i hate men flashpoints . Ann Miller (1923-2003) adds heat , razzle-tap-dazzling .Zesty Choreography by Bob Foss (1927-1987) and Hermes Pan (1909-1990)Under George Sidney (1916-2002) nible direction . So brush up your Shakespeare and Enjoy . Kaste wont just Kiss you . Shell floor you !. DVD includes vintage documentary shorts : Mighty Manhattan and New Yorks Wonder city , the pure digital transfer in high resolution and enjoy both movies . Highly recommende
Lotte Berk Kicks Butt. I'm in my mid-30's and this is the first exercise video I ever bought because the model doing the backbend on the cover caught my eye, (I'm big on flexibility).  I'd never even heard of Lotte Berk before.  The editorials that wrote Lotte Berk is a good workout without breaking a sweat lied!  I sweat and my body parts trembled as I held on trying to get through the reps.  I'm very active and usually exercise outdoors (biking, jogging, hiking, kayaking) but Lotte Berk found muscles that I obviously wasn't using and I was impressed.  Lastly, I think the instructors are classy and I want to look as fit and sexy as they do so of course I bought the rest of the series.  Lotte Berk kicks butt!
Endearing Sequel. This is an impressive sequel and a very good looking follow-up to ANNE OF THE GREEN GABLES. It is great to see Megan Follows as Anne Shirley once again. Megan Follows is just perfect in this role. Anne Shirley is now a bit older, has become a teacher and is quite involved in a society away from her rural settings. This gradual progression of characters and story from this original is very welcome and enjoyable. It is very endearing in many ways as was the original
Epic sci-fi from a bygone era. "Logan's Run" is great nostalgic 1970s science fiction.  The 70s was a great era for sci-fi, where the future was viewed with optimism, awe and wonder, unlike the digital-age, cookie-cutter sci-fi we get today, that offers nothing but gloom and doom.I was just a little kid when "Logan's Run" was first released, but I do remember being blown away by it's premise--a futuristic society of young people living inside a futuristic domed-city, where you're not allowed to live past age 30. And there's really no where for the runners (those who refuse to end their lives at 30 voluntarily) to go to elude the Sandmen (the city's police), for outside the domed-city is a post-apocalyptic, laid in ruins Earth outside-somewhere near the old city of Washington D.C..  Michael York plays Logan 5, one of the Sandmen who turns out to have more of a heart than the city would probably prefer.  And Richard Jordan (Francis 7) is his fellow sandman/friend who's fiercely loyal to the city's status quo, and begins to have doubts about Logan's loyalty to this status quo after he finds Logan hanging around the nursery.  The reason for all this you'll find out when you watch the movie.I actually wish they had shown more of the domed-city than they did.  It was really a cool-looking structure, and a fascinating sci-fi concept.  But you see exterior and aerial visual-effects shots of the city at the movie's opening, and then a few glimpses afterward, but after the opening shots, the movie quickly gets on with the story surrounding the characters, and a lot of the scenes take place in sets and scenes on location.  Like redressed shopping malls, because indoor malls were new in the 70's, and people were still fascinated by these indoor shopping arenas, so it made sense to redress one of these new malls to represent the interior of a futuristic city.  But the miniatures that were built for the exterior and aerial shots of the domed-city are really cool to look at.  Some people, probably younger people who grew up in this CGI age, ridicule the film for the city looking fake and like a model.  Yeah, if you squint, you can makes out a few imperfections, but so what?  The minatures look spectacular for their time.  But all the dated aspects of this film is what makes it all the more interesting.  Imperfection is more interesting than perfection anyway.But "Logan's Run" is one of the last of the sci-fi epics.  Those stand-alone films with like the grand MGM stamp on them.  Everything today is so cookie-cutter and bland, with production companies you've never heard of putting out direct-to-DVD caliber movies faster than the Bic corporation is putting out pens.  It's just not the same anymore.But definately purchase "Logan's Run" on DVD.  It's even better viewing it in widescreen, as it was shown in theaters
Grandfater for slasher flicks. I LOVE this movie.  This movie is an blue print for all the revenge horror movies we have now.  Its a slasher movie with real characters.  Most slasher movies have characters who are over the top with whatever the sterotype that movie character is, and look like J Crew models lol.  With the looks of the cast, I can tell that the studio didnt do a tight cast call for the roles in this movie.  Unlike most slasher movies, I didnt want the whole cast to die, even though sooner or later they would have to face their fate.  Even Wendy was a pretty tame mean girl compared to some of other B***** in the newer slasher movies. They were actually likeable kids, that happened to make one little mistake LOL.  The ending sequence was one of the best and saddest I ever seen in horror movie ever (even inched passed "Carrie").  Main reason for that was one of the songs "fade to black".  Listen to the words and they actually follow the story line.  Yes, the soundtrack made this movie.  Every time you hear music it fits that scene perfectly.  I wonder what would happen if you did the dance number that jamie did at your prom. LOL I just wish it comes on tv more. I just ordered the dvd, and I heard word that a remake of this classic is underway sometime coming up REAL SOON.
Hilarious childhood movies reveal a genius in the making. I've never laughed and/or smiled so much in my life. My face literally hurt after watching this movie. The films Darren Stein (the director) made with his childhood friends were way more ambitious than anything my friends or I made as a child. We pretty much stuck to straight horror, whilst Darren and Company tackled such heady themes as the holocaust, child abuse, and nuclear war. My favorite part: a little girl screaming "no, mommy, no!" in a monotone while her mother "beats" her (the little girl's barely suppressed laughter audible throughout). Other parts worthy of mention include the concentration camp "execution" scene (shot in a suburban living room) and the "bank robbery" scene (also shot in what appears to be the same living room). What makes the film really special, however, is watching a young Darren exhibit signs of being a truly manipulative, megalomaniacal film director. It's sweet, and also a little bit scary. This film is a must for all artists, writers, filmmakers, and musicians who knew what they wanted to be at an early age.
tORTILLA SOUP. LOVE THIS MOVIE!!!! THAT'S WHY I BOUGHT IT. AND I LOVE MY CUSTOMER SERVICE FROM AMAZON.THANKS GUYS AND GALSSUE SWEENE
Pop Culture bliss. Before "Anime" was a household word, kids were tuning in to see the ultimate mecha, Voltron:Defender of the Universe every afternoon. A sort of Holy Grail of an episode is the "Fleet of Doom" installment, in which the the Golion (Lion Voltron)team and the DairuggerXV (vehichle Voltron)team up to battle an evil alliance between their respective nemesis, King Hazar, and the Drule Empire. I caught part of it once when I was a kid, and was never able to catch it again.I recently got this tape, however, and it does not dissapoint. Cheesy? Sure.Dated? You bet. Fun? YOU BETTER...BELIEVE IT!I could vege in front of this wonderful escapist fare for hours right now, just as easily as I did all those years ago. In fact, I think I'll order a few more tapes and do just that
Fantastic Family Film!. A family oriented film that is humorous, fun, exciting and very entertaining! After seeing this movie for the first time, I had to own it! It is hard to find a good comedy that is enjoyable for all ages that is clean. This is a must own for the family
My maximum 1 to 10, a true 37. I love stories, good stories and sincere love for historical  or historical fiction.    Its the story thing...  So "Dangerous Beauty has it all".    If I could give one emmy for fantastic photography and perfect, solid, director management, this work is my nominee.    From the truth about the ever, on-goings, of religious fundimentalists, love and the wonder and joy of sex, the speed bumps of relationships, the need for income, resources and, of course, to the reality of politics.   If you can't find yourself in at least three of the life events of the citizens of Venice, you may not have had a very interesting life.   This film/story is both part of me and my passion for quality in the same way that "Waking Ned Devine" raised my spirits and let my mind float on gratitude.   Yes "Dangerous Beauty" on an aboslute, nothing higher than 10, is and always will be, my 37
"When The $@&% Did We Get Ice Cream?!". "The Ringer" is the kind of movie where, upon a quick glance, most people would assume is made strictly to shock and offend. Considering the infamous Farrelly Brothers ("There's Something About Mary," "Me, Myself & Irene") stand by as producers, one could imagine the many cheap-shots this movie would take. Surprisingly, though, it doesn't. And despite the restrictions the movie gives itself, it's quite funny at times. And despite a somewhat predictable plot, it's actually a bit heartwarming and sentimental.Apparently, I'm in the minority of people who actually enjoyed this movie. Then again, I tried not to keep my expectations up too high. For starters, this isn't exactly a Farrelly Brothers movie, so don't go in expecting that type of humor. Sure, it shows up at times, but "The Ringer" is more conventional than those movies. Johnny Knoxville (from "Jackass") is perfect as Steve, a reluctant participant in the Special Olympics, coerced by his uncle Gary, played by Brian Cox ("Manhunter," "Red Eye"). Steve is forced into the games in part to pay off his uncle's bookies, but also to be able to afford surgery to replace the three severed fingers of the man he hired to mow his lawn. The plot does get a bit ridiculous at points, and you can see Steve's happy-ending with Lynn (Katherine Heigl of "Bride Of Chucky"), a volunteer at the Olympics, coming miles away. But despite all that, the movie does a good job carrying a message without being condescending or losing it's sense of humor.If you look at the cover of the DVD or read any reviews and feel the urge to be instantly offended, don't. "The Ringer" is quite well-done, and actually features many mentally-disabled actors in prominent roles. And if that's not enough for you, it's also flat-out funny. It's simply a good comedy with a decent story and an interesting and original angle. Just don't take it too seriously
Excellent Period Drama. The house of Eliott is an excellent British series about two sisters suddenly left penniless in postwar England. To make ends meet they take in sewing, and eventually open a dress shop. The two sisters are very good friends with the older sister (Bea) being the more practical sister and the younger sister (Evie) more impulsive and kind hearted.I liked the series a great deal. The costumes, historic detail and characters are wonderful. At times I found myself annoyed by Evie (who I thought was occasionally inconsiderate and selfish), but that's what makes great characters. They are memorable and flawed. I also didn't care for the suffragette character who was a bit harsh in her judgement of her fellow man. Sometimes listening to her scolding other characters for their selfish ways ruined the mood (at least for me). While I concede poverty and inequity are serious issues, having her bray about it bored me.5 stars. Excellent
A little morbid, but... I don't like sad movies, but I have to say that this movie is really good.  The characters have depth and the storyline is intriguing
Loneliness can be very dangerous. Nobody knows what to make of May (Angela Bettis). Born with a lazy eye, for which she wore a patch while growing up, she became a loner oddball whose only friend was a perfectly kept doll. She moves to L.A. and takes up with a filmmaker (Jeremy Sisto), but the relationship sours quickly -- and dangerously. She then befriends an alluring lesbian colleague (Anna Faris), but that, too, along with every connection May attempts to make, turns deadly.I found May accidentally one day while surfing the web. There were several very positive reviews, and as I am always open to discovering new independent films, I rented it as soon as possible. May  is the story of a girl who is born with a lazy eye and becomes very socially isolated as a result. Her only true friend is a doll enclosed in glass that she can never touch. The movie focuses on how May as an adult has reached the brink: she is either going to begin to learn to make friends and interact with people normally... or not. The movie is hip-deep in imagery and metaphors, most of which are fairly disturbing. May's attempts to interact with people will make you cringe with embarassment; many of the scenes are very bloody and the movie climaxes with some fairly graphic violence. But it's the more subtle imagery- primarily focusing on May's doll- that really set the creepy, uncomfortable tone. You can't believe something like this could ever happen... but on the other hand, you almost can. The underlying idea is a fairly common and basic one: the desire to make a connection with another human being. May takes that promise and puts a new, disturbing, and fascinating spin on it. If you are not able to handle graphic and disturbing images, May is not for you. If you like unique, disturbing, intelligently made movies that actually make you think, then you will love this film. Absolutely one of the best movies I have seen in years; I immediately bought a copy after watching it, and I can't give a much better review than that. My only complaint with the DVD is a lack of a "making of" segment; I would have loved a behind-the-scenes loo
Movie from R. Massey's book. The movie is Robert Massey's book come to life.  Wonderful movie
Doctor Who and the first Download. Doctor who materialised without his Tardis on this, my first timelord download in the amazon unbox, which is much larger on the inside than it appears on the outside.For a very reasonable sum, $1.99, my family and I were able to enjoy the first Third doctor adventure after his regeneration, where he encounters the Nestene Conciousness.The down load took only a few minutes although I had some considerable difficulty installing the microsoft program. thanks to the good people at amazon tech support I was able to obtain an alternative download from the gates empire itself which allowed me to enjoy our rental.a great experience and will not be the last. easy to navigate and fun for all the family. someone should tell the timelords on gallifrey about unbox and perhaps they could get rid of all the old type 40 tardis'
Not as gory as one may think... I'll try not to add comments that others have already made.One thing I'll say is that it is not the horror flick that many make the film out to be.  Grow up!  Yes there were some scenes that make you "shiver"  but this is not a film just going around maiming animals and characters that like S&M as other reviews tend to portray.  Maybe I grew up watching too many horror movies or else reading all these reviews about the gore and violence built up my expectations of what I was to encounter, or else I just watch too much of the daily news.  Whatever, the reason, don't go watch the film thinking it's going to be an all out horror show.It's about emotions conjured up through anger, betrayal, and love.  It hits the sensitive areas of relationships.  Put yourself into the character's place.  How would you feel and what would you do?  (Maybe not the fish hooks.)As far as all the PETA comment, (of which I'm not a member) they cry foul over eating a chicken!  Worse stuff happens over here in the US.  Keep in mind it's a different culture you're seeing in the film.  In Vietnam and other parts of Asia they eat dogs.  Other parts of the world may frown on us eating chickens and cows and pigs.  We don't have to "prepare" our animals.  We just buy it packaged and ready to cook.  The gross stuff is done for us.  The so called gross animal scenes are fast and the camera doesn't "loom" on the animal so it's an inconsequential part of the scene.  So what, they put it in a film.  I've seen documentaries on how steak and pork chops are prepared and no one says it's a no-no to show.The frog incident-She knocked out and skinned a frog to eat/feed to the guys bird.  She didn't skin it first when it was alive.  It's not like we don't eat meat over here.  Her economic status didn't allow her to go to the local Shaws Market and get one skinned and trimmed.  You see last year what people did to chickens being raised for I think KFC?  They were stomping and kicking them for the fun of it.  On the internet I saw a clip of kids putting a live kitten in a cage, pour gas all over it then light the poor thing on fire.The fish incidents- If you've ever prepared a fish its no big deal.  Yes, it was mean to hack up a fish (guys was pissed) or to run current through it (lady was pissed) but it was trying to convey the anger the characters had in them.  Same with the lady slapping the dog around.  She didn't beat it to death.  She was mad it didn't want to go out on the boat and boat house, plus she wasn't very happy.  (Although it doesn't make it right.)Fresh sushi-  Can't get it any fresher than that.  If you watch the movie, the fish didn't die as it was caught by the male main character later, then set free, to show his pity for it.Yes, the fish hook scenes were not pleasant to watch but a) the guy didn't swallow the hooks that far as evidenced by the lady taking them out with a pair of pliers, and b) you dont see her inserting the fish hooks into any place, just up her dress.  There's no clear shot of what she does.  She did bleed quite a bit but wouldn't you if you did that?  I've seen much worse in horror flicks and the news.Anyway, there's lots more to this film than just the gore and animal mistreatment.  Go see the movie with a blank slate and you'll like it better.  But the ending is a little curious
...When I was very small... This episode of Star Trek, "The Man Trap" is my earliest memory of what would become a lifelong enjoyment of the franchise. Truthfully, "The Man Trap" terrified me (I was maybe two, or three, although I am sure by that time the series was limping along in it's third season and I was seeing a repeat for the first time); Star Trek was considered "adult programming", and as such I was not allowed to watch it - I used to sneak behind the couch while my grandfather watched it on nights I stayed at their house, then would lay awake in my bed scared by what I'd seen, but excited just the same. Like another space show I enjoyed and was terrified by (Lost in Space), I didn't recognize Star Trek as anything but a world I wanted very much to be in, but remained frightened of anyhow (I was, as I said, very young).
A fascinating slice of Pennsylvanian coal mining history. The more historically accurate the film, the more it tends to drag.  The Molly Maguires certainly passes this test!  Still, it presents a fascinating account of an oppressed people and a wrong-headed response which brought them into conflict with the Church
Robert Altman, fresh off his hit 'Mash' made this great. film.  Terrific use of lighting and camera work.  If you like HBO's 'Deadwood' series you'll see where they got there story line here.Leonard Cohen's songs fit perfectly with the story.  Cohen, so it goes was very taken with Altman's work on 'MASH' and after 'McCabe' was finished gave the song's to Altman to use.  That's right gave.  He didn't take any money for hits like 'Sisters of Mercy' and the 'Stranger Song'
A very good movie... with only one small problem, the guy playing Frankenstein looks almost exacrly like Michael Palin from Monty Python, making it a bit hard to take serious; you expect the Knights who say NIH to jump out of the bushes at  any moment
The Gnome Mobile. This was purchased as a gift for my mother.  She had an old copy on VHS that had started to corrode.  Now she can watch it as often as she wants and not have to worry about wearing out the copy
A great leadership movie. As an Active Duty Air Force Officer, this has to be by far the best leadership movie ever for newly commissioned Officers and NCO's.
Always a classic. As a teacher of Romeo and Juliet, this version stays pretty close to the original.  There are some parts that are left out, but most students do not notice those.  They are more likely to notice the "skin scenes" of Romeo and Juliet's wedding night than the comic relief that has been excluded.  While the Luhrmann version always hits closer to home, this one is good ancillary material for more reluctant readers, or those struggling to find a theme in the pages of something supposed to be watched
Cat lovers delight!. I have loved this movie since I was a little girl.  It wonderfully captures the loving bond between a cat and it's owner
SUPERB NOIR -- INVOLVING, COMPLEX MORAL  DRAMA. Otto Preminger's WHERE THER SIDEWALK ENDS (1950) is another color noir, this one's about a troubled, brutal cop already on probation who accidentally kills a murder suspect.  Desperate to protect himself, he pins the whack on a hated shark who's committed similar kills.  When the cop falls in love with the stiff's widow, he remains mum when her father is charged with the murder.  Oh what webs we weave when we first deceive...This complex and involving moral drama about a guy who puts off doing what's right until it's almost too late will keep you involved and guessing until the final fade out
Hot show. I loved this concert! I always liked the routine she did for Bye Bye Baby. Very clever. She had a very tight band on this tour, including Omar Hakim on drums, who has played with Sting and many other artists. He keeps the beat like no one else. This was such a playful show. Her later tours were a bit political in overtone, but this tour was like a circus. I much prefer Madonna in this context. No message - just singing and dancing. Hot.
Perfect!!!. The best dvd that I ever saw!!! Perfect to make a party and play this dvd and everyone is gonna like your party
Hilarious. I love this movie.  I laughed through the whole movie. If you haven't watched this movie, then I suggest that you do.  However, DO NOT LET YOUR KIDS WATCH.  That is, unless you don't mind them watching 'R' rated movies.  Just remember its rating, so you can know what to expect
Simply Beautiful. BUY this DVD today.  Be sure to purchase the boxset as it is the only way to get the RICHARD PRYOR SPECIAL? and Mudbone bonus footage.  This groundbreaking series paved the way for not only (the obvious) IN LIVING COLOR and CHAPPELLES SHOW, but other subversive TV like South Park which attempt to inject social commentary while challenging the censors.  It not only captures Pryor at his comedic peak, but gives us early glimpses of folks like Robin Williams, Sandra Berhard, Marsha Warfield and John Witherspoon.  This show has never been available on home video and has basically been out of circulation since its initial run, thus it is a jewel to behold.  Watching Pryor as &quot;The &quot;Mojo&quot;, &quot;the First Black President&quot; and &quot;Rev. White&quot;--who has his own way to drum up &quot;the big bucks&quot;-- will have you laffing for hours.  But  Pryor also presents scketches that weren't designed to be laugh out loud funny, but challenge you in other ways, like the wino sketch that turns into a Maya Angelo performance. Or the &quot;Satin Doll&quot;  sketch, which has no laughs at all, but aims to capture the feeling of post WWII Black america with a fantastic song-and-dance number starring Paula Kelly (choreographed by Michael Peters.)  I seriously doubt these five hours of television would have come out the same if the NBC censors had been completely undertanding, sensitive and supportive of Mr. Pryor's vision.  The Special is an extension of Mr. Pryor's hosting of SNL. The  subsequent series itself reminds me of Marvin Gaye's HERE, MY DEAR. While it is not Marvin's most listenable or even best work, through pain he finds beauty and truth.  This boxset is a must-have for fans of TV comedy and shoud be copped by any means necessary
Acting Saves the Day. The movie doesn't really go anywhere but that's ok. Sort of a bittersweet examination of the difference between talent and morality. Just because you play a great flute doesn't mean you're a great guy. Woody Allen himself plays the flute.  Autobiographical anyone?  Sean Penn and Samantha Morton are spot on as the user and the used. A pleasant respite from a lot Allen's late 90's early millenium junk
Mark the Shark. Great insights; worth the time and money; wateched it many times and always see something ne
A sleeper with some big-name actors and a plot about confronting one's own demons. (I am slightly confused about why this movie is called "Badge" on Amazon and "The Badge" on IMDb and the rental site Netflix.)  That being said...The Badge is a movie about small-town Louisiana politics, about family struggles, about coming to terms with suicidal mothers and homosexual brothers, and about the life-long struggle for justice in crimes against strippers and transsexuals.  The plot focuses on the murders of a New Orleans transsexual within the conservative LaSalle parish.  The reigning politicos of the parish don't want the alcoholic, local-boy sheriff (played by Billy Bob Thornton) to investigate the matter _too_ seriously and draw too much negative attention to the parish.  Sheriff Billy Bob is willing to play along with the game until his party tries to run him off the ticket for the next election.The action is truly about Billy Bob's sheriff character finding his own true self among the corrupt local and state politicians.  He manages both to find himself and to serve justice to the underground sex community (which serves the state politicians in a no-questions-asked deal).The filmmakers perfectly portray the atmosphere of lose parishes in Louisiana.  The viewer will be absorbed into the good-old-boy network  of doing business, as well as the desperation of anyone who tries to buck the system or hurt Louisiana's political advancement.Anyone who enjoys this movie should check out Billy Bob Thornton in the sleeper Chyrstal.
Great Baseball Story. I have the second part of this movie Major League Part II and knew that I had to get the first part to add to my DVD collection.
Cats A to Z, come play with me!. The Cat returns! This hilarious sequel is great! The reason why I gave this review its title is because the Cat in the Hat brings all his friends, Cats A to Z. Just like Thing 1 and Thing 2 in the original story, these cats reek havoc in the Walden home. Also check out the stories of Fox in Socks and There's a Wocket in My Pocket
Heartwarming John Wayne / John Ford Classic! Now on DVD!. All the positive comments you read here about this film are true.This classic western stars John Wayne, Pedro Armendariz and Harry Carey Jr, along with a great supporting cast lead by Ward Bond -- the usual John Ford suspects. Ford strikes a balance between action and sentimentality, directing this simple story in a straightforward fashion with a great sense of style. This is Ford's first color film and cinematography by Winton C. Hoch looks really, really rich and with enough sand to make you wish you had some lemonade.Duke really shines in this film -- just watch those expressions.Restored to its original pristine 1948 35mm real Technicolor glory, "3 Godfathers" is a natural for the Christmas season. This heartwarming drama is a gritty, tender, timeless classic. A film the whole family can watch.This sleeper film in the WB/MGM catalog was way, W A Y overdue on DVD in the US. But here it is, most welcomed and highly recommended!(I've revised my original 2003 review to reflect this title's availability on DVD. Released with zero fanfare, I was first aware of its release when I saw a newspaper ad for it one week before Christmas 2005.
True Gonzo Classic. ****THIS COMMENT MAY CONTAIN SPOILERS!***Anyone who saw this growing up has a soft spot in their hearts for it; I've encountered enough people over the course of my 37 yrs who perk up at the mention of it to be aware of its place in a lot of our memories. This has been satirized on the Simpsons, which proves it has embedded itself in the national pop culture consciousness. Anyone who has read the book its based on, the incredible "I am Legend" by Richard Matheson, knows that this film has very little in common with it beyond its intial premise--and even that is not followed too closely. All of the criticisms of THE OMEGA MAN are valid: It is very dated and not at all scary or intense and some of the stunts and special effects are laughably, ludicrously cheesy; the villains--who should have been more terrifying than even Romero's zombies--are just crazed albino hippie Luddites and the last half of the film, once Chuck hooks up with Rosalind Cash and the kiddies, is really a let down. But the scenes that open the film of Heston hefting a cool-looking machine gun while decked out in Austin Powers-style finery (!) staring in angst at an old calendar or losing his mind for a moment hallucinating the sound of telephones ringing in the deserted city still pack a punch. This was the second movie, after 1959's THE WORLD,THE FLESH, AND THE DEVIL, to successfully pull off the eerie effect of being the last living human being in a huge empty city. Both films established the visual motif of streets  filled with blowing waves of newspapers and swirling trash.After years of seeing this on tv -- a guaranteed late September or early October event every year for a few years on the local tv station during my Pacific Northwest childhood in the old dark ages before CABLE TV and the videocassette revolution, its nice to see this movie on DVD with a beautiful widescreen transfer. It looks and sounds great. As a child I always liked the music, particularly the "surprise party" theme that plays when the villains make thir first appearance.It rocks here in all its xylophone and funky electric organ and horns glory
The General's Daughter. A taut, well made thriller with a lot of nuance and details that make seeing it a second or third time equally enjoyable. Strong acting keeps one's attention to the flow of the story. The glimpse into military politics is also illuminating. And it's one of the best movie scores I've heard in a long time. It's nice to hear that blend of music anywhere these days
A good buy. I bought this for my husband and had never watched it before. Its a good movie with a good plot. It keeps you intrested and has some parts that make you do a double take. Its not really scary but its susupenseful but it is not for young children. At least ones that are used to horror films. There were parts that it lagged in but it was quickly picked up again. Plus it ends the way you want it too
FUNNY MEMORIES. I first saw this movie with my husband when we were only dating as teens. We really enjoyed it then and I have been looking for it since. I was happy to have found it and enjoyed the funny memories it brought back. Love seeing Zero and the other old actors. Some of the music, especially "Everybody ought to have a Maid" gets pleasantly stuck in my head.
Strangers on a Train. I'm not a real Hitchcock fan, but this movie by far is my favorite of anything he's done.  The story line, suspense and drama is absolutely first rate.  If you want to try a Hitchcock film, this one is it
Master Harold and the Boys. If you need convincing that Matthew Broderick is a fine actor, this is the film you must see
Funny movie. This is one of my favorite movies.  I've watched it for years on cable and finally decided to buy the dvd.  It stars the great John Candy and the late Richard Crenna.  It's a fun movie to watch!
One of the best films of the Hollywood Renaissance. Terrence Malick has acquired a tremendous cult following as an auteur, but this, his first film, is the only truly successful one among them--and is one of the finest films ever to attempt to capture the donwside of the American Dream (and to do it without pretentiousness). Although many films have been inspired by the notorious 1950s killing spree of Charlie Starkweather and Caril Fugate, from NATURAL BORN KILLERS to THE FRIGHTENERS, BADLANDS is really the only one to resonate--in part because it treats its Starkweather-Fugate analogues not as the quintessence of gleeful evil but rather as polite and disaffected, making their killing spree all the more astonishing. Kit Carruthers (Martin Sheen) is handsome, well spoken, and very gracious; he chastises himself when he speaks ungrammatically and records notes telling children very pietistic and typical homilies about playing fair and listening to minority opinions but acceding to the will of the majority. He shoots the father of his girlfriend Holly (Sissy Spacek) only when the man threatens to deny Kit what he feels is fairly his--Holly--, and thereafter he uses his gun as a means to rid himself simply of people who attempt to arrest him. It becomes basically an adolescent wish-fulfillment scenario. When Kit and Holly escape to the forest and build themselves an elaborate treehouse, they become like the Swiss Family Robinson or Huck and Joe on the raft escaping their pursuers. The cinematography of the film has been widely praised, as has its extremely inventive use of music (Carl Orff's "Musica Poetica" as well as songs by mickey and Sylvia and Nat 'King' Cole); Sheen and Spacek could hardly be improved upon in the central roles
If Only.... Sometimes you watch a film and it inhabits you.... it gets under your skin. Ballad of a Soldier is such a film. And sometimes a work of art provides an affirmation of what you've always believed. This too is the case with this remarkable, deeply moving film from Kruschev's Soviet Union.The camerawork is exceptional, the black and white tonality is exquisite, and even though the tale told could be minimalized by labels such as corny and manipulative and obvious, at heart it's a classic story of love desperately trying to survive in the midst of madness. It's riveting - you can't take your eyes off the screen - and it's compelling, in that during this film (and for days after it) the most important thing in your heart will become the hero's reuniting with his love. Deeply moving... and I don't know if I will ever forget this performance by the shimmering Zhanna Prokhorenko.The tragedy of this remarkable film is that it could have been used as an instrument to teach the American people they were being sold a lie by their government. That lie, endlessly hammered into our heads in grade school and junior high, was that "The Russians don't value life like we do."  We were taught to view the Soviets as grey, unattractive potato-like people in shabby clothing who wanted to conquer Main Street America, though it was never really explained to us why they would ever want to do that, especially after losing over 22 million of their own citizens in the last war... (oh I forgot, they don't value life like we do.) We were taught there was a missile gap...with JFK claiming that the Russians had thousands of missiles aimed at our back yards...  which we now know was an enormous and conscious exaggeration (sound familiar?)If every American had had the chance to see this film in the early Sixties and had mustered up the inner strength to speak truth to power, the contemporary history of the United States and the world just might have been different. You could have shown this film to an audience of farmers and their families in Kansas in 1960, and that audience would have seen themselves on the screen. And they would have wept as they left the theatre.The Soviet people were not our enemies. Their government definitely at times was our adversary, but the demonization of the Soviet people by our leaders and our media was and remains absolutely unforgivable, a historical sin.A brilliant, heartwarming and sad film, with a profound lesson not too late for the learning.
SOUTH PACIFIC, redux. This movie is an excellent rendition of the original Broadway production by Rodgers and Hammerstein that opened in April 1949 and ran for 5 years.Mitzi Gaynor and Rossano Brazzi do very well following the original cast of Mary Martin and Ezo Pinza. Having seen the original play shortly after it opened, and as a Navy veteran in the same South Pacific area during WWII my impressions then make it unfair to compare the impact of the movie with the original. All in all it is very good DVD which includes a wealth of information about the filming, location, and the cast
Words can't express the pleasure. I have enjoyed this film many times and am gratified to see that Warner Home Video finally sees fit to release it on DVD.  It will be part of my DVD collection when released.  However, I'm going to wait briefly before I buy it ... and this is why.As you know, Boys Town began in Omaha, Nebraska.  Since then, they've changed their name to Girls & Boys Town and have expanded to include a number of facilities in many locations.  But sadly, two of those facilities were located in Louisiana and they were both damaged or destroyed by the fury of Hurricane Katrina.  Currently, the organization is asking for funding to help feed and clothe the children and volunteers who are now refugees in San Antonio, Texas.But ...Since I knew of this DVD release, I sent an email to the public relations department of Girls & Boys Town.  I suggested they contact Warner to see if a partnership could be arranged.  If Warner was willing to donate part of the proceeds from this DVD sale to Katrina relief for the organization's Louisiana facilities, and if the public was made aware of this, it might serve to spur both pre-orders and general sales of the DVD ... not only benefiting Warner and DVD retailers like Amazon, but also benefiting this worthy organization now desperately in need of help.I also suggested that they tell Warner something else.  The timing of this DVD release being so close to Katrina's devastation may not be "just a coincidence."  A partnership between Warner and Girls & Boys Town may be God's will
A Simple Plan  (1998). Director: Sam RaimiCast:  Bill Paxton, Billy Bob Thornton, Bridget Fonda, Brent Briscoe, Jack Walsh, Chelcie Ross, Becky Ann Baker, Gary Cole, Bob Davis.Running Time:  121 minutesRated R for violence and language.This is a diabolical tale about the wages of greed. Although it is played straight without intentional humor, the irony is so delicious at times that you might find yourself laughing.  Jacob Mitchell (Billy Bob Thornton) is the one who begins to feel evil, and rightly so as the bodies begin to pile up. His presumably smarter brother Hank (Bill Paxton) feels mostly fear as he struggles to cover up one mishap after another. Their problems begin when they and Jacob's buddy Lou Chambers (Brent Briscoe) stumble onto a downed airplane in the woods covered with snow in which they find one dead person being feasted on by crows and a duffle bag full of hundred dollar bills. Lou, who might represent the common man, says, let's keep it. Hank, who could be rational man, says, whoa, this money belongs to somebody and besides we could get into trouble. We better turn it in. And Jacob, who is the natural man, sides with his buddy Lou. After all they're country poor and this is probably drug money that nobody is going to miss. And anyway, what can go wrong?Well, as Ben Franklin observed a long time ago, `Three can keep a secret, if two of them are dead.' As they wait for spring to come and the plane to be discovered before they risk spending the money, the `simple plan' begins to unravel with horrific consequences.  Thornton and Briscoe play country boys to perfection, and Paxton does a great job as a small town golden boy seriously compromised. Bridget Fonda plays Hank's pregnant wife, who turns out to be the brains (as it were) of the group. There are some very nice plot twists as the all too human emotions of the characters begin to crash into one another. Inevitably we have a morality tale in which the wages of sin are fully realized.  Sam Raimi's ("The Evil Dead", "Spiderman) direction captures well the atmosphere of North Country America without any obvious straining for effect. He gets great mileage out of a few crows (actually some of them are ravens, I think) and a whole lot of snow. Scott B. Smith's script (from his novel) is clever and morally astute. The characterizations are excellent and the story psychologically satisfying. Particularly agreeable was the very sad, ironic end for Hank and his wife, who find that all the self-created hell they went through led them back to where they began, but without their souls.  A dark message about greed and honesty is a topsy-turvey roller-coaster ride with beautiful cinematography and slick direction from horror-master Raimi.  Not one for those who need a cheering-up session.
Cold war based British espionage drama. Micheal Caine plays Frank Jones a decorated ex-British Navy veteran and now businessman.  His beloved son Bob played by Nigel Havers is a Russian linguist working for the British Secret Service before the days of detente.  He tells Caine that he suspects some strange things are happening in his agency, that he would like to expose.The Secret Service suspicious of Havers has been bugging his conversations and ultimately liquidate him, covering up his death.  Caine, unsatisfied with the official declaration of an accidental death, commences his own investigation.He eventually is lead to John Gielgud playing high ranking politician Sir Adrian Chapple who acting as a Russian mole, has been feeding them sensitive bits of intelligence for years.With a distinctly British flavor, "The Whistle Blower" is an above average vintage Cold War drama that uses at it's conclusion the incredible pagaentry of a monarchy sponsored parade filmed in the streets of London
Individual and society a la Kurosawa. I agree with all the other reviews which have discussed "Ikiru" in terms of its message for the individual: live your life with meaning and purpose, take pleasure in helping others, cherish and nurture children.  However, there is one other aspect that I'd like to highlight: Kurosawa's thoughts on the individual and society.As the commentary by Stephen Prince makes clear, one of the main points behind Kurosawa's work was a head-on critique of Japanese society in the immediate post-war era.Although this period laid the foundation for Japan's economic recovery, Kurosawa is not alone in pointing out that the drive for economic prosperity was accomplished at huge human and spiritual cost.  This idea is also one of the prime motivators behind the work of other Japanese artists from humanists like Hayao Miyazaki ("Spirited Away", "Princess Mononoke") to the lunatic right as exemplified by Mishima.Kurosawa uses Watanabe Kenji as a foil to expose the hypocrisy and selfishness of a society that values materialism and order above humanity and mindfulness.  On the one hand, as most of the other reviewers have pointed out,  Kurosawa condemns the way the bureaucratic small-mindedness of government stifles any real concern for the well-being of ordinary people. On the other, Watanabe's son and daughter-in-law embody the new age's impatience with its elders and their inability to see beyond their own concerns even when the people around them are clearly in crisis.A number of people have complained about the length of the second half of the movie, but (as Prince's commentary again makes clear), the flashbacks are important to establish a stronger  sense of Watanabe's co-workers as characters both to illustrate their gradual understanding of the meaning of Watanabe's life but also to highlight their inability to really follow his example.  Kurosawa's view of society is pretty cynical when you come right down to it. Even though many of his works are celebrations of individual creativity and spirit, he is also forthright about the forces arrayed against it: small-mindedness, fear of making mistakes, greed and the herd mentality.  It's no wonder that he has often been accused of being "un-Japanese".One can also see this thread in Kurosawa's later movies including his period pieces such as "Seven Samurai" and "Kagemusha":  in both of these films, the ordinary folks and the high and mighty are also found wanting as groups.  While there may be individuals of principle, they will not prevail in the end. But, and Kurosawa makes this point in each of his movies, the efforts of such individuals are the true definition of nobility of spirit, and it is this message which provides the power behind all of his works.This is a wonderful piece of movie making.  It is humanism at its most trenchant and finest.  You must see this film, it is one of the  best movies of all time.
No Other Even Comes Close. This is my absolute favorite Biblical Epic.I will concede to only one flaw and that is Jeffrey Hunter having blue eyes! I wish he had worn brown colored contacts.Otherwise he is the ONLY Jesus portrayed in film that I think exudes the kind of persona that I picture Jesus having. I know two others who feel exactly the same way,about King Of Kings. I love this movie from beginning to end,and I consider myself blessed to own it. Ok, it is also not 100% scriptural, such as does anyone still not know that the three wise men never saw the infant Jesus in the manager? They Saw "the child" Jesus in the home of Mary and Joseph! I have yet to see a single Biblical movie that IS 100% scriptural,however!All other films that have attempted to portray Jesus have been a major disappointment for me,and I am now awaiting "The Jesus Film" to  arrive at my library,to give it a chance. So far I cannot stand most such films,such as the horrible "Jesus Of Nazareth"(must be the most unlikeable Jesus ever portrayed) and the even worse,"The Greatest Story Ever Told,the Greatest Bore Ever)"!The Robe,A Perfect Stranger,Ushpizin,The Miracle Of Marcellino,The Maldonado Miracle, and the biblical ones ones done by Turner such as Joseph, are wonderful,and highly recommended by this Christian,but for a movie about Jesus,King Of Kings has no competition,in my opinion
Beauty, and other charms of waking life. The beauty in "Henry and June" is full-throttle. There's the bike race through a sunlit forest; there's a colorful bohemian festival with tribal dress and sexual opportunity; there's a series of postcards, accidentally discovered, that picture erotic delights. In the most sublime scene, Nin, in a red dress, dances to sensual, rhythmic music, and her face is given a fantastic close-up. All of the film's beauty, all of its detail and technical mastery, create a luscious idyll.The film balances between dreams and waking life. Its rhythms vary, and are a vital part of its narrative. There are many moments in it when time slows, focusing our attention on a mood or an object, inviting our reverie. The narrative depends as much on music, color, and editing as it does on dialogue. Each scene is thoughtfully made; each part of each scene has been considered.Watching it, we experience an intelligent world full of strong, interesting personae. Nin and Miller, fearless and imaginative, have high goals, and appetites possibly insatiable. Miller is emotional, articulate, and experimental. He appreciates the sensuousness of life. He begs and at least once steals; he struggles to write and to think for himself. Nin is his equal, tenacious and curious, sometimes cruel, trying to understand her desires and trying to bring them to fruition. Watching two dancers with her cousin, she says, "Oh, look at them, Eduardo. They're so exquisite. If I were a man, I'd be swept away." At one point, she writes in her diary, "I feel restless... spirited... adventurous. To be absolutely truthful, I hope secretly to meet someone else. I have erotic imaginings. I want pleasure."Beauty and strong characters give the film an essential lyricism and lightness. For instance, when June returns, the extended scenes are nightmarish, appropriately raw and claustrophobic. But these scenes conclude in the fog. The fog shifts the mood of the film from the sense of heat and the fire in the claustrophobic rooms to one of regenerative possibilities, a drowsy, dreamy, shadow-heavy world returned. Daylight follows, and the sense of renewal suggested by the fog is made explicit, and further elaborated, by ensuing character development.The beauty is constant and illuminating; the characters seek their satisfactions from life. Stunningly accomplished, director Philip Kaufman's fluid filmmaking is ultimately about delight.
GENIUS. Whether people like him or not, there's no doubting that this man is a musical genius! He started his career as a rock star aiming his music towards white teens but everyone of all races and ages was curious as to who this little man was. When he realized how much attention he could get from people just by being different, he figured why not try different things like movies. If you're from the '80's then you have at least seen 2 out of the three movies that were made and you owned at least one album. I loved him then and still do today, and I'm not alone, I've been to his recent sold out concerts. Don't hate because he's different, learn to embrace and appreciate the differences!
A Possible Future???. This is a rather scary look at what could be a possible future if things continue the way they are heading. Our food supplies becoming more depleted due to unfavorable growing conditions, climatic extremes, lack of water and nutrient-poor land as well as overpopulation continuing at an uncontrollable and alarming rate.  This type of recycling may become a necessity.  Hopefully, it would at least be voluntary as the movie depicts.  An eye-opener for sure
"A Circus of the Mind". Young Casey (Nathan Forrest Winters) has an acute case of coulrophobia (fear of clowns), so when his two older brothers suggest a trip to the visiting circus, Casey is understandably reluctant.  Being aware of the young boy's fears, his brothers--especially the oldest, Randy (a young Sam Rockwell in one of his earliest film roles)--tease him a bit, and Casey eventually relents to prove to his bros that he's not a wimp.But at the circus, one of the clowns singles out Casey and tries to get him to come into the center ring to participate in a skit.  Casey freaks, of course, and bolts out the nearest opening in the Big Top.  "Their faces are fake," he later tells his brothers, trying to justify his behavior. "Big happy eyes; big painted smiles. They're not real. You never know what they really are."  As the boys walk home, Randy, who has been put in charge of his brothers Geoffrey (Brian McHugh) and Casey while their parents are away, is hardly sympathetic and harasses Casey relentlessly about such "sissy" fears.After the circus closes for the day, three patients who recently escaped from a psychiatric hospital for the criminally insane--what other kind is there in a horror flick?--murder the clowns and assume the harlequins' identities by donning the makeup and costumes themselves.  Then they demonically frolic into the night and wind up at the home of--you guessed it!--Casey and his brothers, and the young coulrophobic is forced to not only face his fears, but to defeat them.Thus runs the plot of 1989's CLOWNHOUSE.  And while it takes a wee bit of effort to suspend disbelief and accept the coincidence of the evil clowns winding up at the home of young Casey, the skills of auteur Victor Salva turn this simple story with its somewhat cliche setup into a polished, well-paced horror flick that is actually quite scary.  As a screenwriter, Salva has a knack for creating frightening situations and making them believable, and as a director, he is very adept at milking all the emotion he can get from a scenario without pushing it too far over the top and into parody.With the exception of the performance from a young Sam Rockwell--genre fans have seen Rockwell most recently in SF hits like GALAXY QUEST (1999) and the remake of THE HITCHHIKER'S GUIDE TO THE GALAXY (2005)--the acting in the film is pretty average fare for a 1980's low-budget thriller.  But the characters do have a comfortable family dynamic, mainly due to Salva's masterfully realistic, believable dialogue.  (Indeed, Salva seems to have a genuine talent for writing dialogue for youngsters, as is evidenced again in his later films like 1995's critically acclaimed POWDER and 2001's boxoffice megahit JEEPERS CREEPERS.)Overall, CLOWNHOUSE is a well-done horror movie basted in slasher overtones, one of the few of the post-HALLOWEEN (1978) horror flicks of the 1980s that is able to generate scares via the threat of violence rather than through the relentless depiction of gory murders. (There is, in fact, very little by way of graphic violence or blood-and-guts gore in this flick.) And CLOWNHOUSE is actually more than just a spook show. It is also a rather interesting comment on childhood fears, the psychological legitimacy of some of those fears, and how a child's life can be negatively affected by such fears if they're not dealt with effectively.Ironically, the public perception of CLOWNHOUSE has been the victim of real-life childhood horror that took place behind the scenes during the film's production. This horror came out of the darkness and into the light in 1995, soon after the release of Salva's film POWDER, when it was revealed that the writer/director had served time for the molestation of Nathan Forrest Winters, the young star of CLOWNHOUSE.  Not only did this hinder the boxoffice success of the critically revered POWDER, but it understandably placed a stigma on CLOWNHOUSE that has caused some critics and viewers to read into the film's plot and visual imagery innuendo that really isn't there.Fortunately for Salva (and for filmgoers), he was able to remove the dark cloud from over himself--if not from over his previous films--with the release of his very successful (both critically and commercially) non-genre drama RITES OF PASSAGE (1999), and he later redeemed his reputation in the horror genre with the very financially successful JEEPERS CREEPERS in 2001.But reviews should be impartial and examine the merit of the film in question ONLY, not taking into account any personal problems that the filmmakers may be struggling with.  With that in mind, CLOWNHOUSE is an excellent little '80s horror flick that transcends much of the HALLOWEEN rip-offs that deluged the theaters during the decade.  The DVD from MGM is a no-frills disc that contains only the theatrical trailer as an extra, but it does offer a good digital transfer of the flick at its original aspect ratio.  And while the disc may be hard to get these days, it is well worth the search.  Fans of horror or 1980s slasher flicks will certainly want to add this disc to their collections
Talk about Christmas spirit... I really love Bones.  It has everything: suspense, drama, humor, pretty people, fun storylines.  I have yet to miss an episode, and even into Season 2 this is probably my favorite.  It adds depth to all of the characters.  Also, the winter holidays are my favorite time of year.  I like holidays that are about what is good in the world.  Bones is about people standing for the good in humanity even though they explore the very worst every day.  I cry through half this episode, but in a completely good way.  Buy, watch it, love it.  But watch it with a friend if you don't want to cry alone.  So moving, great performances by the whole cast.  Emily Deschanel was powerful in this one, she brings real vulnerability to Brennan here.  David Boreanaz, as always the perfect sympathetic hero, loveably old-fashioned. Cute, funny moments.  Touching, poignant moments.  This really is the best of what is great about Bones
NEARLY DARK. This is one of my all-time faves.I own it already but need another copy in case something should happen to mine.I first saw this movie years ago;and had to have it.The lines that the cast uses are hilarious-altho it wasn't meant as a comedy,it has it's moments.All in all,my fave Bill Paxton flick
a should-be-better western fell flat by a deteriorated screenplay. it was when the mass hanging scene was stupidly inserted two , not just one, long church hymns, with a cardboard-like preacher on the gallows to conduct the crowd to sing them, and a condemned-by-hanging rapist kept monologuing about 10 minuntes to synchronize those two hymns, this movie was beginning to fall flat miserably.the other ridiculous and illogic part was when the marshal escorted the two young rustlers and that murderer back to where the hanging judge resided, why he suddenly had to take a route across a vast desert instead of going back by the original path where the posse came from? there's no way and no excuse to make such stupid arrangement simply just because the director and the screenplay writers wanted to show how difficult and tough the marshal got to do a heroic dead-man-walking mission, then turned himself out for the next lame a-hero-was-born scene.there were wonderful moments of this film, but it started to drag along and lag behind gradually. it often gave you an impression that both the screen writers and the director didn't have a clue how to make this movie going, they could only asked clint eastwood, the marshal, to do lot of unnecessary hollow scenes.
A MUST SEE!!. I have long owned the three-tape vhs version of this title.  In the days before David Shephard, et al. put out all those magnificent restorations (and before Warner Bros. rereleased some early Chaplins), this series was the ONLY place to find high quality Chaplin films, albeit not complete, and incredible outtakes.  I can't recommend this series enough to any Chaplin fan.  My pre-order is on file!!
Great Rainy Day Fun !. This is the kind of movie that you can pop in on a lazy, rainy day when you need to be lifted up a little. It's a wonderful movie with a lot of great jokes and physcial humour. Kind of like Mighty Ducks, but in my opinion, a lot better with greatly funnier jokes. The only thing keeping me from giving this a full five stars, and a lot of you will think it's a stupid reason....as do I, but on the original VHS version, there was a Michigan J. Frog cartoon short before the movie. This is absent on the dvd version. That said, the dvd is a lot better for many other reasons. There are really cool bios about the people who helped invent football, a theatrical trailer for the movie, a really awesome special introduction by Shawna Waldron, who played Becky The Icebox in the movie (man, she got really hot) and a really fun commentary by the director, one of the writers, and Shawna Waldron. If you have the chance, you should get this dvd. You can't beat such a low price for such a great movie
The most surrealist film of John Huston!. Once upon a time in Texas a roguish Judge :Roy Bean magnificent acted by Paul Newman . And also a weird preacher : Anthony Perkins and an albino gunman named Stacy Keach .Blend this cocktail and you will obtain a clever, ironic and unencumbered film winking to Luis Buuel.Watch  this hidden and treasured movie .
Anatomy of a Hate Crime - Long Before the Term Was Coined. Movie: *****   DVD Transfer: ***   Extras: ***1/2Director Edward Dmytryk's stark, hard-hitting examination of a hate crime was way ahead of its time in 1947, and has lost neither its topicality nor its punch in the years since.  Based on a Richard Brooks novel ("The Brick Foxhole") about the senseless murder of a gay man, the script dropped the book's sub-theme of homophobia to focus on the more cinematically "acceptable" topic of anti-Semitism.  Despite this concession to the Production Code, what emerged was a mature, pungent indictment of all crimes motivated by discrimination and blind hated that was nominated for five Oscars: Best Picture, Director, Adapted Screenplay, Supporting Actor (Robert Ryan), and Supporting Actress (Gloria Grahame).  Also deserving award consideration were  top-billed Robert Young (arguably giving the best performance of his decades-long career as a taciturn police detective) and supporting actor Robert Mitchum, as well as J. Roy Hunt's masterful black and white cinematography.The Warner Brothers DVD release of this classic film noir is, in all honesty, a major  disappointment, mainly because the film-to-video transfer is not up to their usual high standard of quality.  There is very distracting jump in one of the earlier scenes, apparently caused by a break in the film which was subsequently spliced together by an amateur; one or two scenes are unacceptably grainy; and there is a flurry of horizontal visual "snow" toward the end of the movie.  Surely such a key title deserved a little restorative work before being transferred to DVD!  (That's a statement, not a question.)  Furthermore, the DVD does not include a Theatrical Trailer; however, it does contain a very informative snippet from an interview shown on TCM featuring director Dmytryk reminiscing about the film's production.  There is also an audio commentary by film noir authorities James Ursini and Alain Silver.  Overall, despite the inadequacies in the master print, "Crossfire" remains a must-see film, and therefore this DVD edition is definitely recommended
Great thing. Recommend for all who is the fan of Transformers. Great thing. Recommend for all who is the fan of Transformer
HG WELLS. This is an amazing service! For only 2 bucks i can watch what i like for the moment. In this case it was HG WELLS. Great biography
John Ford's take on Africa is good enough. It seems like this film has either been poorly edited or shot  in quite a hurry, because the story plot is not developed well enough. Things happen too brusquely. It has a beautiful photography, though, interesting scenes and characterizations. But it needed more minutes. I want to believe that it wasn't Ford's intention to tell the story this way, but the film is failed nontheless.I can't help compare it to Hawks' Hatari (great classic) or Huston's African Queen (good) or many other great directors take on the African splendors.As a homage to the best director in film histoy, John Ford, it is a mandatory film to be watched, and respected as what it could have really been, another great classic.
competition. this is a good cartoon for competition with rocket robin hood hope they come to quick agreable turms ... msp... didnt see the black wolf or fox??
Essential, Quintessential, Profound, and Disturbing. The greatest movie that many Americans have never heard of, "Naked" won best director and actor at Cannes in 1993.  The action revolves around Johnny, played by David Thewlis, who rampages across the London night in a series of encounters in which he uses, abuses, and hurls vitriolic scorn laced with brilliant humor.  Everyone Johnny meets is twisted in some way, and the effect is only heightened by the couple of seemingly sane people the film offers, amongst them Johnny's original love interest played by Lesley Sharp.In one scene Johnny is admitted into an empty office building watched over by a security guard, and rages aloud his dark world-view that includes both time and space, and the illusion of the present, "But you're not in it now; you're not in it now," because the future is constantly kicking the present in the behind.  He is as merciless to a tourettic stutterer as he is ultimately to himself, and Johnny pushes to the very brink of madness in a film that uniquely captures the razor-thin divide between genius and savagery.From a brutal landlord's wonderfully mangled French to another superb performance by Katrin Cartlidge, "Naked" stands testament to the sheer raw power and insight that occasionally graces our screens.
Darren McGavin's (and Pete Billingsley's!) best. A fine film that recaptures that period well!. "You'll shoot your eye out." How manytimes did Ralphie hear that? Well worththe time to see, any season of the year.Poor Schwartz got blamed for everything!"Ho, ho, ho...
Real Future for Humans?. Even though this movie is classified as a fictional comedy, and is quite outrageous, I can visulize that current events taking place in our time could realistically lead to this new type of incredibly low IQ human.It is somewhat entertaining from an entertainment standpoint; but, the true brillance is in the concept hidden in the dumb humor.  This movie is good for simple entertainment and excellent for anyone contemplating the future of the human species.
competition. this is a good cartoon for competition with rocket robin hood hope they come to quick agreable turms ... msp... didnt see the black wolf or fox??
Rollicking Western. A routine but enjoyable western yarn that was pretty violent for its time (the fight between George Peppard and Slim Pickens in particular).Dean Martin goes against type as a villain out to destroy Jean Peter's stage  line. It's up to hero George Peppard and crusty old John McIntyre to set  things aright - which they do amid much gunfire and fisticuffs
classic Christmas movie. This is the Christmas movie I saw when I was a child and spent years trying to find again. It has great actors and is very entertaining for all ages.
awesome. This is the greatest movie that i have ever seen.  It is funny and the cast does some sweet moves.  I personally like the king of the mountain part. [...] Anytime by Eve 6 and makes no differece by Sum 41 is sweet
Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST!. The Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST drama I have seen ever. Korean, American, doesn't matter! This is better than anything I have ever seen on TV or in the movies. Hollywood cannot touch this one! Kim Myoung Min(Yi Soon Shin) is outstanding in this!(no wonder he won the 2005 KBS BEST ACTOR AWARD FOR IYSS)It starts from when he was a child to his adulthood and can be emotional, funny, sad, and can make you angry!! The numerous obstacles and prejudices this man had to overcome and then always bounced back with no complaint because of the love of his country is phenomenal!! He put his country above all else and Kim Myoung Min did a great job of portraying that!My whole family, kids and all, watched this with me and loved it!I can see why Yi Soon Shin is Korea's hero and why other countries teach his methods
Truly breathtaking!. In a nutshell -- this version of Hamlet left me speachless; Branagh's interpretation is magnificent!!  Not to be missed!  I highly recommend!!
Hilarious!. Martin Lawrence is one crazy man. Anything he is or will be in is worth watching
The Earth Stood Still This Movie Moves On. After so many years this movie couldn't have been written better today than it was back then.  A great theme ahead of it's time with a great cast.  I wish they could still make movies today like they did back then.  Unfortunately most of these older movies have lost their moral meaning throughout the 60's, 70's, 80's, and whatever was the 90's.  It just goes to show that just because something is new doesn't make it better. Watch this movie and you will know what I mean
The 2nd best cannibal film. This is the second best/most disturbing film next to Cannibal Holocaust which will always be the champion.  But thats not taking anything away from Cannibal Ferox which was banned in 31 countires and contains some of the most brutal scenes ever filmed.  See this film it wont dissapoint
Pickpocket Brilliantly Dissects the Human Psyche in the Shadow of Morality... Robert Bresson's genius rests in his awareness that actions often reflect on reality, as the action is something that physically affects its surroundings.  By stripping the scenes from emotions and only displaying the actions with complete strangers, the audience gets a sense of genuine presence through the character's actions.  To further the meaning of the action, Bresson displays a minimal amount of reactions to the acts taken by the characters such as facial expression or body language.  It leaves the viewer with the cold atmosphere where the interactions bring out a true sense of what is taking place on the screen with a clear impression without misunderstandings.  Thus, the deeds committed within the film tell the truth without the combination of acting and pointless gibberish of words that often blurs the situation through truths, half-truths, and lies.Interestingly, Bresson opens the film with a shot of a hand writing down the beginning of self-confessional statement, which belongs to the main character.  The initial statement remains enigmatic, as the film lyrically transitions the film into progression where the audience will learn what the main character has to confess.  Through superimposing, the first scene with a pair of gloved rich female hands and a wad of money it allows the viewer to learn the truth of the confession.  The gloved hands transfer the money to suited man who enters a line for on-site racetrack betting.  Throughout the sequence, the hands are fiddling with the cash between the fingers, as the protagonist and antihero Michel's (Martin LaSalle) ogles the wealth switching hands while being within his reach.  Bresson triggers a similar reaction that Pavol's dogs experienced when they salivated to the stimuli of the bell, as the fingers are fondling the money.   It helps the audience to identify with Michel on various levels such as thinking about what the money could help provide.  In this opening the audience learns the hands significance, as hands are what nurtures the protagonist's actions, which will inevitably lead to trouble.At first, it seems that the internal desire is driven by greed, but shortly after Michel's first pick pocketing the emotional high of the possibility of apprehension due to the illegal act seems to be one of the motivating factors.  Michel's voice-over statement strengthens this notion when he states, "I was walking on air, with the world at my feet."  Clearly, he senses an emotional high, which also displays emotional arrogance nourished by his recent success.  However, to Michel's dismay, he goes down in flames, as the police arrest him fleeing the scene, but they are forced to release him due to lack of evidence.  In addition, his home seems to support the idea that wealth does not have a significant meaning to him, as he leaves all his doors unlocked for anyone to enter at any time.Some of the motivating forces within Michel appear to be shame, guilt, and paranoia.  These emotions seem to emerge through the Oedipus complex that he possesses in relation to his internal desire to pick pockets.  He knows it is wrong, yet the desire overcomes his awareness of its immorality, which feeds his feelings of guilt, shame, and paranoia.  At the same time, the exhilarating stimuli of succeeding, as he puts it "I was walking on air, with the world at my feet" is worth the risk of shame.  These feelings remain throughout the film, but as Michel becomes a student of a master pickpocket he also begins to defeat his feelings with confidence.  Nonetheless, the police remain in a not too far distance to remind him of his illegal activities, which allows for shame, guilt, and paranoia to linger throughout the film.Pickpocket provides a fascinating tale of a man and his vocation, as it allows for the audience to drift into a deeply personal perspective on the motivations that drive a man to do what he does.  With the help of Fyodor Dostoyevsky's Crime and Punishment Bresson brings out the psychological and moral aspects of the story.  However, he is far subtler, as he does not deal with the axing of a human. Together with the music and the scene framing the acts of the characters deliver several absorbing ideas in regards to how and why Michel acts in the way he does.  The minimalism that Bresson is known for also helps highlight many of these vital aspects of the film, as it does draws attention to what truly is important - the acts of human beings
STILL GOOD ENTERTAINMENT --. I thoroughly enjoyed the animals and would have liked more info given about them.The movie is pure entertainment with wonderful color [except coloring the tiger black] weird!They can leave off the technical jargon - I want to hear about the animals and how some of the scenes were shot - how the actors played their parts etc.What rigors did the actors have to go through? The set making was interesting and oh, yeah, didn't they know anything about horses?Definitely a fun movie
A Poignant Masterpiece. There are very few films that have literally brought tears to my eyes. They must be films of uncompromising emotional power. Films like Magnolia, The Passion of the Christ, and now Johnny Belinda.It is the story of a deaf and dumb young woman named Belinda. Treated as an unintelligent workhorse all her years, Belinda's life changes forever when a lonely new doctor moves into her small coastal Nova Scotian port town. He takes an immediate liking to her and, proving to her family that she is not the "dummy" they think, he teaches her to read lips. But after a drunken sexual assault leaves her pregnant, rumors begin to fly throughout the small town, and both Belinda and her loved ones must fight for what's right.The performances are wonderful. Of course, Jane Wyman simply steals the show in her Oscar-winning performance. She brings an incredible heart, warmth, and emotional resonance to the character of Belinda, and she does it without ever saying a word. The rest of the cast is marvelous as well, especially Charles Bickford, who lovingly portrays Belinda's father, and Stephen McNally, who turns Belinda's attacker into one of the most easy to loathe characters ever put on celluloid - yet the film still brilliantly keeps him at the level of a realistic personality - no one is a caricature.Director Jean Negulesco brings an understated visual beauty to the film reminiscent of the silent ages, when one had to use aesthetics to make up for the lack of aural stimulus. Every shot is a perfectly composed work of art, turning every moment of Belinda into a masterwork of lighting and raw, majestic nature. The seaside settings are utilized so well that they put Johnny Belinda in league with such legendary jaw-droppers as L'Avventura and Black Narcissus.But this film is much more than just visual appeal. It is both heartwarming and heartbreaking, often simultaneously. There are so many thought-provoking themes to gnaw on in Johnny Belinda - the way people view the handicapped, the bonds of parenthood, the power of rumors, the justification of violence as self-defense, and overall morality and humanity. Even the film's setting could be considered an allegory on Belinda - the brutal waves of the ocean constantly pounding against the serene shores.The film is also, as I mentioned before, emotionally overwhelming. While it certainly has a focused narrative, Belinda is foremost a progression of feelings, and they are so well conveyed that I was simply overcome with joy, pain, heartbreak, and hope. While the film is often described as a melodrama, it is far from a soap opera. There are no miraculous moments of sudden verbal triumph for Belinda, no ridiculously overacted moments of teary-eyed abandon - Johnny Belinda is a terribly real experience. There are aspects of the story that remain unresolved - not loose ends, but difficult problems that would most likely also remain unresolved in reality.However, I don't want to give the impression that Johnny Belinda is depressing. I felt uplifted and rapturous just as often as I felt overcome by grief and fear. I felt so much for these characters and I wanted so sorely for things to turn out a certain way - but I won't reveal whether they do or not. I will say that the film ends on a note of nearly unbearable poignancy, and this is the moment that massaged my tear ducts.My only complaint concerning the film is Max Steiner's score. He is perfectly suited for epic films like King Kong and Gone With The Wind, but here it feels somewhat overdramatic and occasionally awkward. He tends to play up the melodramatic angle and spot score in a ubiquitous manner, which simply doesn't fit with a film like Johnny Belinda. Still, it tends to work more often than not, and it is not a major enough problem to work seriously to the film's detriment.This picture is a true gem. It has been unavailable for years, but thanks to Warner Brothers, it finally has a DVD release, and the restoration is simply glorious - it more than does justice to this cinematic treasure. Do yourself a favor and see Johnny Belinda
Probably the Best Drama Series Ever Made. I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out
World's Finest Heroes... In 1997, after producing at least 3 seasons of "Batman:  The Animated Series" and one season of "Superman:  The Animated Series", the creative minds behind both TV sensations decided to craft a story focusing on what would happen when the two greatest heroes in the DC Universe came together."The Batman Superman Movie" finds Batman (voiced by Kevin Conroy) and Superman (voiced by Tim Daly) having to join forces to thwart a new evil scheme being hatched by the nefarious duo of the Joker (voiced by Mark Hamill) and Lex Luthor (voiced by Clancy Brown).  One problem for Superman and Batman being able to work together, is that they both know the others secret identity, and making matters even worse is the fact that Bruce Wayne has begun a relationship with Daily Planet reporter Lois Lane (voiced by Dana Delany), and this is just what was needed to make Clark Kent jealous.  Will these two heroes put aside their differences to save Metropolis from the clutches of the Joker and Lex Luthor, or succumb to their petty rivalries?After a very successful outing with their first animated feature film "Batman:  Mask of the Phantasm", and a not as successful, yet still entertaining sequel "Batman & Mr. Freeze:  Sub Zero", both Warner Brothers and the producers of the two series' were leery of jumping into another animated feature film.  So instead of trying to come up with a story that exists outside of the standard continuity of either series, they opted instead to have the movie's storyline take place over the course of 3 episodes within the second season of "Superman:  The Animated Series".  This way, the continuity is left intact for both characters, and if the 3-part story arc is successful in terms of ratings, then release them all together as a feature length direct-to-video film.  Well, obviously since I'm reviewing the film, it means that the 3-part arc was successful, and proved to be very entertaining.One nice piece of trivia about the 3 Batman animated movies that had been produced thus far, including this one, is that with "Batman:  Mask of the Phantasm" and "The Batman Superman Movie" the two series' creators Bruce Timm, Alan Burnett, and Paul Dini were producers for those movies and also served as co-writers; however, on "Batman & Mr. Freeze:  Sub Zero" none of them are credited.  This piece of trivia may prove to be why the two of the movies were very successful and entertaining on many levels, while the latter was somewhat inferior.One more thing for fans of these two characters respective animated series' and their animated movies, you can find the entire 3 episode story arc that comprises this DVD movie in the recently released to DVD second volume of "Superman:  The Animated Series".  It's up to you whether or not you choose to view the episodes as they originally aired within the season, or stand alone as a movie.  Either way, they are still great additions to 2 excellent animated series'."The Batman Superman Movie" is unrated and contains violence
for John and Olivia. Ok I agree with other viewers this move is not the best in world. I also feel it is not the worst either. I will never give up that the chemistry between John and Olivia is awesome. They did it in Grease why is it not in this move. I think the acting between them made the movie at least good if not a masterpiece. I agree the story line and the direction could be much better. The bottom line in this movie is that John and Olivia has the charm to make romance on the big screen. The whole freezing and rewinding thing gets a little out of hand. It is a fantasy that is a make believe story if you will. A fantasy like Xanadu that turned into a cult classic, failed at the box office. I think it is a fun a light movie that is goofy and cool at the same time. John and Olivia made the acting work were direction was short. I think they should try another romance/comedy type movie again. I think with a great director and producer it just might be something really worth seeing. John is still in the spotlight with movies. Olivia just cut a new album called "Grace and Gratitude" that she just finished a tour early in Dec 2006. I agree with others the soundtrack is great as well.
Those were the Years... To say this is a great film is probably an overstatement, but it certainly is a great idea for a film. Gibson looks good, Weaver looks good, Hunt acts good, Weir directs good, and the script is better than good. Much. It's a movie about ideas, which earns high marks these days, as so few flics can make that claim. Sure, it stumbles a bit, and the ending is purposely frustrating, to carry forward the theme of White Guilt and "What then shall we do?" Beyond all that, it's sensual, and unpredictable, and pretty damned intelligent. Seen anything lately in the multiplex that fits that bill? I ain't. See it for yourself.
Outstanding Movie. This movie has everything you need in a great "Who done it." I will watch this over and over.
Journey to hell with your inner demons. In a rare case of art imitating life, Woody Allen gives us his comedy Deconstructing Harry, where we meet Harry Block, a neurotic writer unfaithful to all of his wives, addict to sedatives, obsessed with sex and prostitutes; a man who shamelessly offends family members and friends with his books. In a jiff, a classic Woody Allen character, but darker, sadder, more isolated and more immature.Now, on the verge of a famous University tribute, Harry must deal with his insecurities, bad habits and nerves while he begins a journey where he will interact with dual realities -the ones in his agitated life and the ones reflected through the characters of his books- and will show the audience with very black humor his incapacity to have honest relationships and his absurd excuses to defend his nasty actions. He will revolve in the deepest caves of his destructive side until literally go to hell, as never had done an Allen's characterTo recommend Deconstructing Harry implies to warn you that you`ll be part of a sordid world of phobias, obsessions, fear of death, hypochondrias and neurosis, all of this wrapped up with a coat of vulgarity and repulsiveness that won't run out through the 96 minutes of the film.It's a respectable, intelligent, witty and crude work. Here, Allen has consumed himself as an irreverent. Honest and brutal, he gives us a stellar cast with colorful characters, with Harry as the center of everything. The dialogs are quick, witty, full of cynicism, and will get as many laughs as many stomach kicks. But let's appreciate his honesty, not criticize it.It's inevitable not to compare Allen's life and personality with his Harry: his ability to create memorable and valuable works, in spite of the scandals surrounding his life, his personality, a little neurotic and lonely. "Why can't I function in life I only function in art"...His willingness to use himself as a joke, his toughness with himself is a hit in Deconstructing Harry, even when it brings him near to self-destruction.Allen`s creative genius and his talent as a filmmaker once again are here on the top. Just like Harry, Allen's life has been full of chaos and scandals, but he has proved, if anyone had a doubt, to be an exceptional artist. And that's the only thing that should matter to the audience.
I LOVE this movie!!. This is one of my favorite LOVE movies. I just left another review for another movie and decided I needed to leave one for my FAVORITE movie as well. GREAT job to Nia Long and Lorenze Tate. Nia Long's Father was my high school teacher and that is how I got introduce to her years ago. This movie is cozy and cute and I enjoy every time I watch it.
Probably the Best Drama Series Ever Made. I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out
christy. I have 1-11 of the Christy videos..#1-3 in spanish...I love them and would like to know how many are in spanish and how many videos are there total? Does christy marry? who?  #11 did not show who she decided to marry.  I would LOVE to know!  Thanks
Spy Kids 3. The kids really loved this. We liked it too. Exciting. Nice to choose 3-D version or standard version
I like this movie. When I was looking at this movie from the gay and lesbian list of films on border I didn't really think I would like it since I'm a gay male and couldn't possibly like anything that had to do with lesbians. Let me tell you I was wrong. I feel ashamed to even say that I couldn't like this movie. Let me explain the movie to you and you see if you wouldn't like it. We start off with Natasha Lyonn playing the character Megan Bloomfield. A cheerleader who is popular, kind, and the girlfriend of the star quaterback in highschool. We see that she doesn't really like to kiss her boyfriend and her family at dinner prays to make things just the way god intended them to be. After school her family, some of her friends and her boyfriend meet her at her house for an intervention. They claim that they fear she is a lesbian. Proving it with evidence of girls picture in her locker, gay memoribilia in her room, she's a vegetarian and the biggest one of all that she doesn't like to kiss her boyfriend. After that she is taken to a sexual redirection camp run by Mary J. Brown played by Cathy Moriarty with her staff RuPaul playing the character Mike who is an Ex gay and her son Rock played by Eddie Cibrian who isnt so manly himself. Where queer boys learn how to be men and Dikey girls learn how to become happy homemakers. (sorry for the rude example). This is where she meets Clea DuVall playing the character Graham Eaton. Seeming like the tough lesbian girl who will never surrender herself to the school. Unfortunately Graham has problems of her own when we discover that she will not be aloud back home, no car and no trust fund if she does not succeed this task. The girls ultimately become friends and attracted to each other. They even have a kiss session when they are rescued from Richard Molls character Larry Morgan-Gordon and his lover Wesley Manns character Lloyd Morgan-Gordon. The training sessions are funny to watch especially with the men. I don't want to ruin any more of the movie for you. If you haven't seen this then you should. I hope this review will get you to watch it
It almost goes the whole way to perfect... This movie was really on track to be an earth shattering experience for us sci-fi geeks.  Here's why:*creeped out techno music.  not creepy and etherel in itself...but creeped out in the sense that everything is angled and black and white in contrast to the driving beat.  it's incessant, and a great effect. Max's voice-overs add to the overall creepiness.*fantastic concept.  brilliant, really.  every pattern can be graphed.  What if you could graph the pattern of nature and discover a secret "formula" to life?  Max is in it to win it for the sake of knowledge...not $$$.  Great stuff.*tons-o-suspense.  the movie really builds up well.  almost too well, as my one negative comment will show.  you will get a really strong sense that SOMETHING of major importance is going to be revealed if you keep watching.*tripped out lead character...complete with hallucinations, quirkiness and the obligatory disdain for normal human contact.  we're talking visions of brains that shriek and vibrating walls.  The lead character is great...if not a little contrived at times by the actor.  I mean, he's getting revelations to the meaning of life, the universe and everything by the swirling eddies in his coffee!  YES!But, i only gave PI 4 stars for a reason:*the letdown.  i mentioned that this movie makes you feel like it's building up to something so grand that it may even aid you in your own life.  I mean, i was right there...hook line and sinker.  But i was left on the line at the end.  The ending isn't bad...but it seems like a cop-out.  Max solves the problem by drilling a hole in his skull.  No more special gift...no more math at the speed of thought...no more secret formula or mystery.Dang, i was disapointed.I tried really hard not to be, because the movie had me so enthralled...but I didn't get the "wham-bam" experience i was hoping for at the end.HOWEVER!  I would HIGHLY recomend you checking it out for yourself.  I've spoken with a lot of folks who totally disagree with me and dig the ending.Great addition to your underground sci-fi.  Pick it up!ste
Bleak, powerful, honest. Given the recent spate of chest-thumping, rough-but-noble-soldier films, complete with overblown "stirring" scores & slo-mo "hero shots" about WWII, it's refreshing to return to a truly honest film about that war ... and about all wars. What we have here is the reality: tired, dirty, emotionally shocked men unprepared for the randomness & casual cruelties of war. Ironic that it takes an absurdist tale such as this one, complete with time travel & aliens, to present the indifference of the universe far more accurately than supposedly realistic films. But it's so: there's no divine, historic mission -- no larger-than-life heroes -- no ultimate glory & honor. There's just the destruction of civilization & the slaughter of the innocent, all in the name of the State, or the Flag, or Our God, or some other empty platitude.Like many late 60s/early 70s war films, this one has a stark look to it, with all the gloss wiped away, revealing the senselessness of war & the hollowness of its justifications. It doesn't excuse the evils of something like fascism, or the necessity of stopping it -- it simply points out that "the good guys" tend to become what they're fighting, that it destroys their humanity, that it swallows human beings whole & sucks out their souls. War is simply an ugly, filthy business, and it shouldn't be decked in patriotic ribbons & noble-sounding phrases.The cast is superb here, with Valerie Perrine's soft porn actress Montana Wildhack a standout, full of joy & life, the antithesis of war. Tellingly, Billy Pilgrim only seems truly happy & content during his time with her, rather than in his by-the-numbers marriage, where the only true affection in his life seems to be his dog. Ron Leibman's psychotic Paul Lazzaro ("That's two Zs, dammit!") is all too real, a wounded, self-loathing shell driven by his own consuming fear & hatred & insecurities, while Eugene Roche's kindly but fatally naive & trusting Edgar Derby is both comic & tragic at once.The transitioning between time periods is cleanly & subtly accomplished, one memory leading to another, as well as suggesting the randomness of the universe itself. In short, an underrated gem from the golden age of American filmmaking, and a welcome antidote to films that pander to the most simplistic worldviews. All in all, most highly recommended
Exceptional WWII Spy Movie. Rather astonishingly, "5 Fingers" is based on a true story of WWII espionage in Turkey.  In the British consulate in Ankara, an enigmatic spy is selling confidential information to the Germans.  James Mason plays Ulysses Diello, a practically perfect manservant who dreams of a better life.  He plots to become a 'gentleman' via his spying and teams up with an impoverished Polish Countess (Danielle Darrieux).  Buckle your seatbelts, because it's going to be a bumpy night!Mason's suave British demeanor has never been used to such perfect effect.  He's spectacular as the pragmatic spy, who is given the codename "Cicero."  Danielle Darrieux is nearly as good in her role, as are the supporting cast.  The film is as enjoyable and well-made a spy flick as you're likely to ever see.  The Oscar nominated script is filled with sharp writing, unforeseen plot twists, and some genuine laughs.  Joseph L. Mankiewicz ("All About Eve") directed and received an Oscar nomination -- it's among his very best work.  Why this movie is not better known is a mystery.  "5 Fingers" has every element of a true classic -- most highly recommended.Trivia: The movie was made into a short lived 1955 TV series ("Operation Cicero"), with Ricardo Montalban in the Mason role!
Laugh out loud funny. I've seen Stephen Lynch live, in this Comedy Central special, and heard his audio cds.  Live is by far the best experience but this video is a close second.  The live audience really enhances the experience.  This is some truly funny stuff
It's Jimmy Carr - Need more be said?!?. Thanks for keeping a Brit sane in a country full of "My wife says..." jokes.Your wife is fat and ugly and I don't care what she says. Because she's ugly. And fat.....and not my wife
teen wich is probably the best movie i have ever seen. i was so happy when i watdched this classicc of my childhood and found that it had aged so wonderfully.the scenes where the people rap are so amazing, it reminds me of westside storyi think therei s not a better 80s movie,a nd i like the girl in it because she is redheadeda nd not molly ringwald.anywone and everyone should see this movie and stock up on it before it goes out of print!wonderful drama.
Beautiful people don't always do beautiful things. The people are beautiful, especially the female leads. Their childhood years were acted by two lovely, coltish teenagers who only hint at how gorgeous the adult women will be. Low-caste Maya adds training to beauty in becoming a courtesan, with men her life for her pleasure as well as men in her life for their own pleasure. High-born Maya's looks seduce a king into marrying her. The years in front of each one promise happiness, even a chance at love.Their own jealousies, combined with jealousies around them, break that promise. Maya resents Tara's wealth, Tara envies Maya's grace and allure, and so on until utter collapse. In the end, only Maya seems to escape unharmed - she starts life with nearly nothing, and in the end walks into exile with neary nothing, just the clothes on her back. But, in between, she gains a wealth of knowledge and memory that can never be taken away.Intimate encounters vary, as they do in real life. The finest are warm, gentle, enticing expressions physical love, with real feeling enhanced by training in the skills of love. The worst come from a terrible mismatch of wedding-night expectations: Maya's virginal fear against his animal urges and belief in a skilled seductress, a failure that contaminates their feelings forever.The story of loves gained, lost, and stillborn will appeal to some viewers. For me, the simple beauty of the actors and the scenes around them is enough.//wiredweir
My Favorite Episode. I don't have television, haven't for 11 years. When I learned CBS was allowing free viewing over the internet I checked it out and started watching episodes of CSI, CSI NY, CSI Miami, and NCIS. I found NCIS to be my favorite and this particular show Dead And Unburied is my favorite so far. I enjoy the light-heartedness of NCIS. So I decided to download this episode from Amazon Unbox.I really wish Amazon Unbox would allow me to burn shows I've purchased. As it is they are restricted to viewing on my computer. When Unbox expands this service to allow me to burn DVDs I will likely purchase many more shows this way. I like selecting individual shows
Carmen Jones. I was so impressed as a teenager when I first saw this movie that since then the opera "Carmen" has been my very favourite music.  The story is set in the US during WW2 instead of Spain.  The film has an all negro cast with some wonderful voices.  It is colourful and exciting.Patricia Longrig
Trapped in the cube. "Cube" is a cult hit. That basically means that it's good or innovative, but not many people know about it.Vincenzo Natali (also creator of "Cypher" and "Nothing") made his full-length directorial debut with this film -- a low-budet, innovative sci-thriller that feels like an episode of the "Twilight Zone," as written by Mark Danielewski and Franz Kafka. Yes, it's that surreal -- and that intelligent and well-written.Seven people have been placed in a cubical room, which is connected to a bizarre maze of thousands more. Among are a cop, a disabled man, an architect, a student, a doctor and a criminal, and all of them have wildly disparate personalities. But they soon learn that behind the countless doors, there are deadly booby-traps.So of course, their chances of survival don't seem so good. But they soon learn that their placement in the Cube is no accident -- each one has skills that the group needs. To escape, they will have to band together and use their brains. But why are they in the Cube in the first place -- and is the maze even the same as when they started?Vincenzo Natali's "Cube" is a perfect example of what Hollywood can't seem to grasp -- it doesn't matter how much money is poured into a movie, because it's the concept, brains and skill that make it good or bad. Not the special effects or the big names.And Natali did a magnificent job with his first full-length movie, infusing what seems to be a straightforward thriller with a taut, claustrophobic atmosphere, and some ominous hints about morality (or the lack of it) and sociology. It also has an unusually intelligent script, with prime numbers and their powers playing a big part, right next to the gruesome deaths. And of course, the solid dialogue. ("You've got a gift." "It's not a gift. It's just a brain.")At the heart of the creepiness: Natali only reveals the secrets of the Cube as they are revealed to the characters, which adds to the suspense. What is this thing? Why are they in it? We know as much as they do. And we're only going to find out more about it when they do.It's also a movie that bothers to have real characters. No screaming teens here -- the movie's plot depends on them being very different. Natali and Andr Bijelic reveal the characters through their action and dialogue -- some are whiny, some are cruel, and some are just annoying. Some of the acting is rather flat, and a few of the arguments ring hollow, but overall it's very like watching real people.Vincenzo Natali's "Cube" gives a good name to shoestring budgets and eerie plots. Definitely deserving of its cult status -- bizarre, twisted and creepy
Long waited release. I have seen this movie on VHS back on 80-es and it just stucked in my heart. I am really glad for this DVD 2 disc release by Criterion collection. Good transfer and very interesting stuff on second disc about Mellvile, about production and etc. Worth to have on your shelf.
A blast from start to finish - plus a message. Maybe I just don't get it.  But I've loved this film ever since I first saw it in the eighties, and was mesmerized and thrilled by the opening sequence of Mr Gere practising drumming on a practise drum skin to the music of Benny Goodman's version of SING SING SING with Gene Krupa drumming.  An opening sequence does not a movie make, but I knew I was in for an exciting ride with Mr Lumet who has rarely failed to thrill me from his first film TWELVE ANGRY MEN, and thereafter with PRINCE OF THE CITY, THE ANDERSON TAPES, DOG DAY AFTERNOON, NETWORK et al.  In POWER, part of the deal is to GO WITH IT, that is, willingly suspend disbelief and take the dramatic ride.  For my own part the ability of Pete St John (Mr Gere) to manipulate public opinion and get politicians elected has more than a touch of truth about it and the relish with which St John does his job is fascinating to see - he's a professional without a principled bone in his being and Mr Gere (ironically a professed Budhhist) is brilliant , playing that character.  He survives - one of the great lines he gives to his ex-lover (played by Ms Julie Christie) is "don't blame yourself".  Those in the film who HAVE principles, either commit suicide (Senator played by the great Mr E.G. Marshall), descend into embarrassing alcoholism (Mr Hackman playing a rival media adviser wonderfully comic) or suffer the apparent loneliness and unremunerative fate of the loser (Ms Christie, though that might be stretching it a bit).  I can't think of a parallel to this film but PRIMARY COLORS or NETWORK come close, although this film is superior to it.  Mr Maltin, and I guess, many others, have got it badly wrong with this film, as I consider it one of the best political films of all time. It's a blast from beginning to end, fuelled by some of films greatest actors, including DENZEL WASHINGTON, superb set design, pungent writing, and great direction, not to mention GENE KRUPA's drumming.  Then again, maybe I just don't get it
Ghosts! Witches! Pirates! All around Halloween fun!. Disney comedy staple Dean Jones stars as Steve Walker, the well-grounded and highly principled new track coach for little Godolphin college, located all too unfortunately near the resting place of Edward Teach, AKA Blackbeard the Pirate! Coach Walker arrives in the quaint harbor town, coincidentally enough, on the same night as a charity auction for the "Daughters of the Buccaneers" is being held to save their historic home from being turned into an upscale casino by local shady businessman Silky Seymour. In an attempt to capture the favor of fellow faculty member Jo Anne Baker (Suzanne Pleshette) and defy the threat-making Silky, Coach Walker soon finds himself the owner of an antique bed warmer, formerly the property of one of Blackbeard's wives, a vengeful witch who cast a spell over the old cutthroat to suspend his ghost in limbo until some shred of human decency could be found in his soul. When Steve discovers the witch's spell book and invokes the spirit of Edward Teach, he quickly learns that finding decency in the rascally pirate will be no easy task, but the pair concoct a scheme to use the college's struggling track team and the local gambling establishment to save the "little old ladies" and their mortgage, and in turn, save the soul of "Blackbeard's Ghost!""Blackbeard's Ghost" is one of those fantastic family laugh-fests from the heyday of Disney comedies. Dean Jones is in top form, as usual, and his chemistry with Suzanne Pleshette is so strong that there's no wonder why Disney paired the two so often, always with fantastic results! Of course, the real star of this film is the legendary Peter Ustinov, whose mischievous, teddy bear take on the bloodthirsty Captain Blackbeard makes this a comedy that can be watched over and over again! Though the high ideals of Jones' character seem to get left in the lurch in a film that saves the day through gambling, and cheating at that, it's all in good fun and only the bad guys get taken for a ride! Joby Baker, Elsa Lanchester, and Richard Deacon round out the cast with terrific character performances. For fans of old-school Disney comedy, this is a five star affair. This DVD edition, on the other hand, leaves much to be desired, bringing the over all score down at least one notch. There are no extras to be found, and the film is presented in a disappointing full-screen with plenty of picture flaws. Nevertheless, the image is as watchable as it ever was on the Disney Channel, and the movie itself is a necessity for any Disney fanatic's film library. You could wait for a better edition to come out in the future, but I wouldn't hold my breath. At the affordable price this film has recently dropped down too, I recommend picking up a copy now. Who knows when a definitive version will be released. Besides, with a ghost, a witch's spell, and pirate antics galore, "Blackbeard's Ghost" is a must for annual Halloween season viewing at the very least
Cyrano And Depardieu, With Panache. In a Parisian theater, where Cyrano has just run off a portly, mannered spouter of bad verse, a man makes the error of noticing Cyrano's nose. "Why are you looking at my nose? Does it disgust you," Cyrano asks with dangerous politeness. "No, not at." "Is it soft and dangling/" "I did not look at it!" the man protests. "And why did you not look at it?" Cyrano persists. "Sickened you, did it? Is the color all wrong? Is it obscene?" "Not at all," the man says, looking for a way out. "Why, then, do you criticize? Do you find it too large in size?" "It's terribly small, miniscule," the man stammers. "What was that?" Cyrano glares, "Is that an insult? My nose is small then, eh? My nose, sir, is enormous! Cretinous moron, a man ought to be proud of such an appendix. A great nose may be an index of a great soul...kind, endowed with liberality and courage...like mine, you rat-brained dunce, unlike yours, all rancid porridge. It would be grotesque to fist your wretched mug, so lacking as it is in pride, genius, the lyrical and picturesque, in spark, spunk...in brief: in nose!"Cyrano (Gerard Depardieu) is a man with heart and spirit as large as his nose, a man who loves deeply, yet must love through another. When Roxane (Anne Brochet), his cousin whom he loves more than his life, gives her heart to Christian (Vincent Perez), he is so determined to bring her happiness that he provides the passionate words that this handsome young man, whose brain is as thick as mutton, will use to win her. Cyrano is convinced that his face will forever doom him to solitude, much less enable him to speak his heart directly to Roxane. "I can never be loved," he says to le Bret, one of his few friends, "even by the ugliest. My nose precedes me by fifteen minutes. Whom do I love? It should be clear. I love the prettiest far and near...the finest, the wittiest, the sweetest...the wisest...yes, Roxane." There will be years before Roxane realizes she had loved the man whose words she loved, not the man whose handsome face she saw.Cyrano is a swordsman, a poet, a soldier, a playwright. He uses words with as much skill as he uses his blade. He'll fight a duel while reciting a poem he creates as he fights...and at the end...hit. If someone is rash enough to comment on his nose, he'll make a fool of the fop by describing all the comparisons a truly imaginative man would have used. He will never bend the knee, accept a sponsor, praise a mediocrity or knuckle to authority. None of that is for him; what he wants is to "sing, dream, laugh...move on...be alone...have a choice...have a watchful eye and a powerful voice...wear my hat awry...fight for a poem if I like...and perhaps even die."This version of Cyrano features terrific production values, with great attention to settings, costume and style. The story moves along with duels and battles, love and lost love. Most of all, it moves along on the language and on the situation of Cyrano, himself. It's a French movie, but the subtitles were written by Anthony Burgess. The are soft and caressing, pungent, funny and sad. At times they move so effortlessly into couplets that it's only after you've read them that you realize how much they added to a scene. Depardieu is one of the great contemporary actors, and he creates a riveting Cyrano. Depardieu is a big man with thick shoulders and a deep chest. No one would likely call him handsome. He is a phenomenal actor, however. His Cyrano is imposing as he strides along a cobblestone street in his red cloak and black, plumed, wide-brimmed hat. Depardieu creates a Cyrano easy to imagine you might be a little like, or could be...if you had Cyrano's panache.Tragedy, Cyrano isn't, but it's a wonderfully robust, sad, romantic melodrama. The DVD from World Films MGM looks fine to me. It's not anamorphic. There are no extras.
Classic Cosby. This is just classic Cosby stand-up.  I think he has done better stuff, but this is a good DVD
A classic. This is a horror sci-fi masterpiece just watch it...This film reminded me of videodrome and the fly and a little bit of eraserhead it might not be up there with them but its a classic for sure
the  boy. i  want  to  see   adams   butt
.."Your about to become history!! State of the art!!!!". This movie was damn funny!! Excellent spoof on the arms race, with a hint of truth on Christianity...genious!! Guaranteed to make you laugh!! Gregory Hines does just a great job as a sidekick, and Checy Chase with his interaction with Vince Edwards (Ben Casey)to make "The deal of the Century" for 1 million bucks is just great...funny name of the Corporation "LUCKUP" need I say more if you change the L to a F ..tee hee.
Tuesdays with Morrie. It took me all of 4 hours to read this book.  It was insightful and entertaining.  It was also sad.  I cried so hard at the end of the book that I hiccuped for 3 hours.  I work at a children's home and have passed this book to several of my 'children' who returned the book damp with tears and facing challenges with new resolve.  I highly recommend this book to anyone who has to face ANY TYPE of challenge, whether mental, physical, financial, whatever
Cute...and truthful about the ups and downs of friendship. When the Party's Over is a movie that one in bad situations can releate to. Bullock gives one of her best performences in her early career. When the Party's Over  is about roomates that thought there world was perfect.  Until there party life settles down and they relize how truly screwed up  they have made there lives. Funny, cute, romantic, a definite chick flick.  If you liked Hope Floats or As Good as it Gets this one's for you
Comes a Horseman. COMES A HORSEMAN is a romance wrapped in a western.  The local cattle baron (Jason Robards) wants to drive out rancher Jane Fonda, who has hired on local wrangler James Caan to help her make it through one more hard year.  Complicating things in this World War II era tale is the oil company that wants everybody's land.With some truly beautiful wide angle photography, a plethora of establishing shots and a dearth of tight close ups, COMES A HORSEMAN is an more an actor's than an editor's movie that works as well as it does because it has an excellent cast at the top of their game.  Director Alan Pakula often pulls the camera back and allows his actors room to discover their character and the meaning of the scene.I only had two problems with this movie.  I felt the ending, the final confrontation between bad guy Robards and good gal Fonda, was a bit contrived .  The other problem was a puzzler - weren't their any doctors in cattle country America in 1945?  A couple of characters get busted up pretty badly in the course of things and they're dumped into a bed with a damp handkerchief on the forehead with nary a doctor in sight.  It didn't bother me much when Caan was laid up without professional medical care, but I hated to see poor Dodger (Richard Farnsworth) treated in such a manner.
I LOVE this movie!!. This is one of my top ten favorite movies of all time.  It's funny and beautiful, with a perfect cast.  The music and the scenery is breathtaking.  I agree with a previous reviewer, I can't think of anything that isn't perfect with this film
original nestor claymation cartoon. this dvd has the original version of nestor the long eared chrismas donkey. was the only show on the dvd i watched.  was great
ONE OF THE BEST HALLOWEEN TOONS EVER!. Until this was recently released on DVD as part of the Garfield Holiday Celebrations, the only way to see this was if you had owned in on VHS since they don't show this one on TV anyore.  That's such a shame as this is one fantastic Halloween special.  It originally appeared on CBS in 1985.  Garfield and Odie go trick or treating and wind up in a real haunted house..much to their horror.  Lorenzo Music was hilarious as Garfield and Tom Huge was fantastic as John and Binky the Clown.  If you love the season of Halloween and autumn time then this is the perfect animated feature to watch.  What a treat that this is now on DVD
An unusual sci-fi allegory. This film is best interpreted in a symbolic and allegorical way.  The plot is too implausible and riddled with inconsistencies to be taken literally.  Instead, what Logan's Run offers is a bizarre vision of the cult of eternal youth evolving into a police state.  Some of the scenes are riveting, such as the early depiction of sanitized mass murder carried out in a spectacular ceremony.  There are clear references to a commercial culture that glorifies youth and lives in denial about death.  The world depicted here is at once hedonistic and claustrophobic.  The environment is a kind of shallow, Disneyesque paradise from which there is no hope of escape.  The implicit subtext of the movie, that hedonism is a kind of deathtrap, is well taken.
Blackmail, death, and sex invade a family. This fine film has many stories - one might be the story of individualism versus society where the former is represented by two blackmailing men out to make a dollar and the latter represented by a woman and her three children and absent Navy husband maintaining a family. But the strongest and most interesting one to me centres on the journey the handsome character played by Goran Visjnic makes from criminal to something of a rdeeming figure when he cannot effectively carry through the task assigned to him by his partner in the blackmailing strategy they have devised.  With an excellent music score, strong design characteristics, fine acting by all concerned, this is a very fine film indeed worthy reviewing from time to time
Swiss Family Robinson  CD. It was great fun.  It helps to read the book first so that one can imagine before Disney presents their version
Humor In the Middle of War. This is one movie experience that you shouldn't miss! Get a dose of Robin Williams' outstanding comic yet brilliant acting for this Barry Levinson film about the era when war torn out Vietnam. I have seen this fil for four times already and I could say that this movie truly capitulates the importance of humor in the middle of tense and severe situation. Yeah, we all know that we shouldn't take this situation as funny but hey, life isn't all about struggle...humor lightens it
Unique Time-traveling Tale from Germany. People like me who lived through the fall of the Berlin Wall (1989) but were a little too young at the time to be paying much attention will like this blast to the past. Much of the wit is summed up in one of the scenes (which is only seen in the deleted scenes) when the lead character's friend mentions his situation is a little like the delicate situation in "Back to the Future" (a big hit that was just reaching the Eastern bloc at the time the movie is set). The tale revolves around a boy who has to keep the past alive for the sake of his mother's health and it illustrates both the excitement of those who experienced the west for the first time and the betrayal (in this case felt by his mother) of those who upheld the former regime. It's a clever look at social change in general and a bit of history that hasn't yet been seen often in film. I loved it
Perfect...Until The Sickness Begins. "The Secret Lives of Dentists" is an interesting, low-key, and mature film about the life of a dentist. It's odd and that oddness makes it perfect, until halfway into the movie (which I'll get too). It's got a great cast that features Campbell Scott (The Dying Gaul), Hope Davis (The Weather Man), Robin Tunney (TV's "Prison Break"), and Denis Leary (Jesus' Son). Scott, Davis, & Leary deliver some of the best performances of their career, without even trying. Scott plays Dave Hurst, a dentist who seems to have a perfect life. He's got a thriving dental practice that he shares with his wife Dana (Davis), he's got a nice house, and three young daughters. Everything's perfect. But then, when he drops his wife of at an opera that she's in he catches her in the arms of another man. Trying not to think about it, and succeeding for a while, Dave eventually begins harboring semi-sexual & violent fantasies that are brought on by an alter-ego named Slater (Leary, who's very very good).This alter-ego is actually a rude patient that Dave forms into his ego, but it works. Now the first half of the movie (60 minutes or so) is perfect; It captures a low-key sense of real life. In these 60 minutes it's a movie you can rank with "About Schmidt" or something like it, but at about this point in the film, the movie takes a different turn. Suddenly, every character gets the flu and we spend the next 35 minutes with a bunch of vomiting characters; Yes, some of these scenes were fine but it lost the magic & momentum that it had in that first 60 minutes. I still liked the movie and I was satisfied with the ending, and even if I didn't like the movie Leary is fascinating to watch. Tunney co-stars as Dave's assistant who shows up in a few of his fantasies, looking very sexy at that.GRADE: B+
Atomic Cafe. A great documentary (with a dark, ironic, humorous side) of American culture as shaped by the Cold War (paricularly 1950s and 1960s).  I use parts of this in a class I teach, and the students love it.  How can you go wrong with the Duck and Cover turtle song and the kid riding his bike in an oven mitt to protect against an unexpected blast?
Fascinating ground-level view of Japan... For the record, I thought 'Lost in Translation' was an extremely OK film, in every way tasteful, thoughtful and, hey, there's Bill Murray and panoramic views of Tokyo and so forth and ... well, like a lot of people, I couldn't quite explain what it was about Sofia Coppola's film that bothered me, and I ended up taking a swing at poor old Paul Thomas Anderson.  I am not an Asian film specialist, nor an Otaku, nor deeply enamored with Ozu or Mizoguchi, so my first impressions of 'Love and Pop' are simply those of a general film afficianado (read: not a snob) who was baited with the promise of 'maximum eye candy' (DVDBeaver.com) and the opportunity to make a blind purchase during a release schedule slow patch.  Anyways, imagine if you will, the nooks and crannies of everyday urban Japan, downright attractive Japanese schoolgirls (Scarlett who?), and the there-you-are quality of video windowboxed with immersive, eavesdropping elan and, voila, the unlikely (single disc) DVD of the year so far.  As with LIT, the storyline is merely a tether for 'emotional scenery' and the usual Zeitgeist-y rambling of artier fare.  In L&P, however, the rambling is easier to appreciate as we aren't constantly reminded that feelings of alienation are kinda like 'being a white person in Tokyo'.  The cultural imposition of watching Japanese catering to the whims and expectations of Westerners--or self-consciously going against type--is supremely distracting.  No amount of beautiful cinematography can compensate for this, or for the apprehension of watching people of another culture being objectified
A Great Balanced Dramatic Comedy about Real Addiction. As an addiction counselor, who happens to be an addict and alcoholic in recovery, I found the film to a great depiction of various aspects of addiction. The satirical comedy scenes of the chanting were delightful and depicted the sense of silliness that most addicts or alcoholics see them as at first. The dramatic scenes of withdrawal and attempted suicide are very true. The need to change from an addictive social network to a sober support network is also true. I loved the horse scene at the end where the main character finally got a sense of spiritual victory when she finally submitted to the need for help. This is a film that captures the serious nature of addiction with a hint of humor in a manner that will allow the largest audience to gain insights into addiction and recovery. I am using this film in a family systems approaches in addiction course that I teach at a university. I also use the film in groups to serve as a conversation starter. Watch, laugh, cry, and learn
Great show, works now!. Avatar is one of my favorite shows. I am so thrilled that it is on Amazon. At first, the episode I downloaded didn't work, but they fixed the bugs. I have it on my Creative Zen Vision:M and it looks great
On the set of Hard Justice. I played one of the many prisoners in this film.  The special effects and the stunts were great, as well as working with the other actors.  I find myself watching this video again and again because of the action.  It is  definitely a video to add to your library if you are an action fan
Talk about Christmas spirit... I really love Bones.  It has everything: suspense, drama, humor, pretty people, fun storylines.  I have yet to miss an episode, and even into Season 2 this is probably my favorite.  It adds depth to all of the characters.  Also, the winter holidays are my favorite time of year.  I like holidays that are about what is good in the world.  Bones is about people standing for the good in humanity even though they explore the very worst every day.  I cry through half this episode, but in a completely good way.  Buy, watch it, love it.  But watch it with a friend if you don't want to cry alone.  So moving, great performances by the whole cast.  Emily Deschanel was powerful in this one, she brings real vulnerability to Brennan here.  David Boreanaz, as always the perfect sympathetic hero, loveably old-fashioned. Cute, funny moments.  Touching, poignant moments.  This really is the best of what is great about Bones
Good bye -- illusions. I became interested in this movie after reading the book "Ishmael" by Daniel Quinn and learning from a friend that this movie was based on the book. It was a very good movie and Anthony Hopkins is wonderfully persuasive but all the suggestion from "Ishmael" there seems to be is just that living in nature is better than living in civilization. There was nothing that indicated the precariousness of civilization - "takers" are mentioned but it comes across more as you just don't know what you are missing by being one - not that all of nature has had it. Heck, the movie makers would be shooting their own business in the foot if they were really to try and convince us to head back to the trees. But of course that was the main point of "Ishmael". If we don't give up being takers and go back to being part of nature, then nature has had it and so have we
Maybe I'm biased but... this just could not fail with me.  I love Oscar Wilde and this story.  I love Rupert Everett and Colin Firth.  Put them all in one movie together and what you have is a delightful production complete with wonderful sets, costumes and actors who know how to deliver Mr. Wilde's acerbic wit with brilliance.  If you're not acquainted with Oscar Wilde's work this is a good place to start.  Then move on to "An Ideal Husband" with the, again, fabulous Rupert Everett and the ever charming Jeremy Northam.  You'll not be disappointed
Cinderella Rocks. We've seen several versions of Cinderella now and like this one the best. When my kids were smaller they liked the Disney version with the little mice but now they have thrown the Disney version out the window. I personally really liked the Julie Andrews B & W version due to the GREAT singing but my girls prefer and love watching this version while singing and dancing around the room as the DVD plays
how to hunt a mammoth. The devil's backbone is a horror movie like you've never seen before - a good and intelligent one.. It really is not a horror movie, however, but a story which involves ghosts (or the past) and how they fuel our present actions and decisions.. It is a strange and memorable film from spain which will make you think as much as it scares you.. worth seeing..
The Glory of the Beatniks. This movie is a fast ride and a lot of fun.  It is the furthest thing from a slow-moving documentary.  The technical style and flair would appeal to practically any viewer.  The Source is glossy and gorgeous.  The director's clout is also impressive. Johnny Depp gives a performance monologue as Jack Kerouac and John Torturro gives an emotional reading from "Howl."  Dennis Hopper imitates Burroughs as well later in the film.  Their efforts are impressive.Just to let the skeptics out there know, there is no room for doubt in this documentary.  The beats are heroes and saviors--and not much else is considered.  That some of them were minor talents is brushed over.  Massive beat generation fans would give it five stars.  A totally sanitized version of William S. Burroughs is presented, and it is implied that Kerouac was only a heterosexual, which is something that most commentators would regard as dubious.  The film's attitude towards drug use is rather slanted.  One memorable quotation was, "you can overdose on anything including sushi."  Well no, not really.It does not matter though, the movie is an amazing sprint and it succeeds in making itself impossible to turn off.
A high water mark for journalism and film. One of the productions of which he is the most proud, Robert Redford's ALL THE PRESIDENT'S MEN should be required viewing (and the Woodward/Bernstein book should be required reading) for all who aspire to the profession of journalist.  Redford was fascinated with the story of two young, untested newspaper reporters who worked and worked and worked the story of the Watergate break-in until it led to the highest office in the United States.  Redford's involvement actually went back to the first news of the bungled burglary, so he followed as the story developed.  He got to know Bob Woodward and Carl Bernstein when they were still at ground level, still unsure as to where this would all lead, but all three knew that it smelled of very big dirty politics.Redford has always been a political animal, with a reporter's instinct, and several times he has been able to bring a story to the screen to illuminate the American political climate.  Earlier, he and director Michael Ritchie had made THE CANDIDATE, a very funny and acid look at how politics changes even the most well-meaning of men or women (and a film well worth your time).    It took two years of hard work to get ALL THE PRESIDENT'S MEN off the ground.  It was turned down by several studios, with the excuse that people were tired of Watergate, but he was finally able to get Warner Bros. to say yes, provided Redford himself would star.Dustin Hoffman was enlisted to play Carl Bernstein, Redford's old friend Jason Robards won an Oscar as Washington Post Editor-In-Chief Ben Bradlee, Jack Warden was cast as Editor Harry Rosenfeld, Martin Balsam was Editor Howard Simons, Jane Alexander was Judy Hoback, bookkeeper to the Committee to Re-Elect the President (C.R.E.E.P.), Ned Beatty was Martin Dardis, who provided an incriminating piece of hard evidence, Stephen Collins was Hugh Sloan, whose wife Debbie (played by Meredith Baxter) kept his conscience working on the right side, Robert Walden (who would go on the the fine television series LOU GRANT) was Dirty Trickster Donald Segretti, and Hal Holbrook was given the pivotal role worthy of any spy story:  the mysterious Deep Throat, who helped Woodward along in a darkened parking garage whenever the trail led to a brick wall.  Of course, we now know that Deep Throat was the FBI's Assistant Director W. Mark Felt, an old friend of Woodward's and a man torn between his loyalty to the FBI and the need to shed light on some very dirty goings-on.Redford asked Alan J. Pakula to direct and Gordon Willis to handle the cinematography, and they crafted a look that is part documentary, part thriller. (If you get a chance, also see Pakula and Willis' THE PARALLAX VIEW, starring Warren Beatty.  Another outstanding, scary political film.)  William Goldman, who won an Oscar for BUTCH CASSIDY AND THE SUNDANCE KID, wrote the tight, exciting screenplay for which he won again (this was actually the fourth time Redford and Goldman had worked together; Goldman also adapted Donald E. Westlake's THE HOT ROCK, a very funny caper film, and the poignant THE GREAT WALDO PEPPER, which was out for a short time on DVD in Pan and Scan, but is now out of print and really should be seen in its beautiful Widescreen splendor.  Universal, where are you?)The efforts of all the principals to adhere to reality down to the smallest detail makes ALL THE PRESIDENT'S MEN a smashing success.  It succeeds as an exciting, suspenseful procedural, as a statement on the neccessity of a free press, as a character study, and as a great movie-movie.The double-disc DVD set is the one to buy:  the first disc includes a new transfer of the film in crisp, clean 1:85 aspect ratio picture and sound with a very enlightening commentary by Redford himself.  The second contains three new short documentaries on the making of the film, on Woodward and Bernstein, and on Deep Throat.  There is also a vintage 1976 documentary on the making of the film, and an interview with Jason Robards on the Dinah Shore show.A deserved landmark in film and in journalism, ALL THE PRESIDENT'S MEN is a must-see and for all who aspire to what journalism should be, a must-own.  In our darkest hour, when all seems obfuscated and hopeless, it reminds us that light can be brought to bear.  People CAN make a difference
The 80's Are Back!!!!. I thought it was a pretty funny movie.  It defintely brought me a flashback from the 80's.  I loved it then and I still love it now.  Thats why I absolutely had to add it to my 80's collection!
Rikki-Tikki-Tavi and Kotick too!!!. Many people remember the mongoose that saved the garden from the wicked cobras, but some forget the equally charming white seal that saved his kind from the seal hunters by leading them to the secret island.  The same man  who brought Kipling's &quot;Rikki-Tikki-Tavi&quot; to television (Chuck  Jones) has also breathed life into another Kipling work, &quot;The White  Seal.&quot;  The results are the same.  Chuck Jones has produced two  animated classics that the whole family will enjoy.  So  set aside a  special family night and watch Kipling's stories come to life.  It will be  time well spent
Anti-fascist moral disguised as a movie. Hume Croyin is the sadistic prison captain aiming for the warden's position, while Burt Lancaster is the prisoner trying to break a bunch of the cons out. The message is clear: treat people like animals and they'll act like animals. The flashbacks get in the way of the movie, but otherwise this is an excellent men-in-prison flick, with an exciting let's-try-to-break-out ending.
Bellum Omni Vorat. 'War devours everything' is the general theme of this more recent adaptation of Erich Maria Remarque's famous novel. Directed by Delbert Mann, the film satisfies on many levels with a very good script; good cinematography and direction; and, the good acting talents of Richard Thomas, Ernest Borgnine, Donald Pleasance, and Ian Holm. The story is a first-person narrative detailing the life of its author, Paul Baumer (Richard Thomas), during the period of The Great War from 1916-1918.  Baumer just graduated from high school and, like every other good German, he signs up for the war along with his classmates to serve his Fatherland: it is the ideal that has been pounded into them by their school teacher (Donald Pleasance.)  At first all gleaming with overconfidence, the narrator and his friends soon realize that there's no glory in war even if one has dutifuly served the Fatherland and received an Iron Cross pinned to their chest by the Kaiser himself.As with the book, the narrative uses the characters to show how the reality of war, in one way or another, destroys or changes the ideals of life: it is rich in showing the futility and beastiality of war.  The film really looks at the two main schools of thought that were a product of WWI; positivists such as Bertrand Russel who thought that modern progress was a positive factor to humanity if guided by moral values and, the school of nihilism that thought morality was relative and human existence purposeless: that modern industrialization was not a sign of progress but the beginning of the end.  Baumer and his friends are, at first, the voices of the positivists: despite the war, they're all still obsessed with their dreams of becoming artists/writers, theologists, farmers, and foresters.  Their  sergeant (Ernest Borgnine) is the sobering pragmatist who teaches the youths to dispense with idealism and to bear only the brutal reality of war in their thoughts: he teaches them the practical skills of finding good food and to survive by using their shovels to kill the enemy instead of the bayonet.  Slowly but surely, each of the narrator's friends become victims of the war despite their idealism: some of them are killed precisely because of their idealism.  In short, the narrative subtly explores every possible facet of war in how it permanently destroys, disfigures, or otherwise changes life and the human spirit: it explores the utter futility and dehumanization of war.  Although one follows Baumer's optimism throughout the story, one realizes that optimism ultimately changes nothing in terms of the reality of war: only one's perception of it. The story actually leaves the question open as to whether an optimistic outlook serves any purpose at all in either war or peace. The film also shows the growing gap between the young soldiers and the elder generations who still saw war in the context of the 19th century: as a glorious and heroic duty/sacrifice to the State. In contrast, the youths are ages apart as they've experienced first hand the horror and desolation of modern warfare which their elders cannot possibly understand (e.g. machine guns, planes, mustard gas, etc.)This is an excellent film that has great direction, cinematography, and acting that is far above the standards of a made-for-tv film.  The filming in the Czech Republic is always a good place for German/Austrian related films (i.e. Amadeus.)  The script was well done to bring out the poignant themes in the book.  There are some inaccuracies and limitations in its depiction of the military and equipment during that time but a lot of it is budget related as opposed to being signs of incompetence (i.e. no artillery is shown, few aircraft, no tanks, etc.)  With the way the soldiers are constantly placing their rifles muzzle first into the mud in every scene, it makes you wonder whether it was the script's soldiers or the actors who received such incompetent training in handling a firearm in battle.  There's also a scene where a corporal badmouths a sergeant and everyone seems to think it's normal.  Anyway, these are simply minor defects that have no major impact on the film.  I strongly recommend it as the only other version, although a classic film, is black and white and over 70 years old.  Good companions to this film would be 'The Lost Batallion', 'Gallipoli', and 'The Blue Max' which all deal with WWI.  In terms of theme, a good counterpoint to this film is 'Cross of Iron' which is also a great film in exploring the futility/absurdity of war except that it is set in WWII from the German perspective.  Unlike this film, 'Cross of Iron' is grounded in a nihilistic theme that rejects the notion of idealism having any use either in warfare or life in general: making the theme perhaps even bleaker than this one.
Informative. This was my first download and it was "free".  The download performed well.  "The Mystery of Edgar Allan Poe" was informative.  It ran up to 50 minutes. This was a Unbox Video Download. It started with the typical intro and ended with the credits. Some individuals did not get a complete download so i included my experience with the Unbox download.  i hope the review was helpful. ty
Stand and Deliver. This video provides an honest report on the trials of high school students as well as the ability to overcome racial profiling. A great resource for teachers whom have cultural diversity in their classroom
All Aboard!. There is nothing better than Tom Hanks in an animated movie. Children are facinated when it comes to trains, Christmas and Santa Claus. This inspirational movie will leave you believing, and fill your heart with the spirit of Christmas.Stephen John Becciaauthor of The Treelander
Music Man DVD. Until recently, this wasn't one of my favorites - don't know why!  My husband bought it for me when we found out my daughter's HS choir was going to do the musical.  I watched it numerous times both on my 'puter and the TV to get costume ideas (really helped with the middy blouses that the "pick-a-little" ladies wear for practice) and help with other parts of the production.  Love Shirley Jones as Marian and Robert Preston IS the Music Man!  Mrs. Shinn is just too funny for words!!!  If you want a feel-good musical, get it!  The music and orchestration are great and the dancing is wonderful
Smart, funny, scary show. Veronica Mars is my favorite show currently on television. Although the show has been focusing more on Veronica's romantic relationship than in the past, the mystery aspect is still front and center each episode. The writers incorporate smart dialoge and clever plot twists to create a genuinely funny and suspenseful show. The acting for the most part is top notch, and Kristen Bell, who plays Veronica, is amazing. I especially enjoyed Episode 9, Spit and Eggs, in which Veronica figures out who has raped her fried Parker and at least two other women on her campus.
Easy 1st time trainer. We raise Chesapeake Bay Retrievers, and have used this video (&amp; the corresponding book before the video was available) for each of our dogs. It is straightforward &amp; easy to go one step at a time, by stopping the video after each section. The instructions are clear &amp; concise, and only require you to work your dog for 10 min twice a day. It starts off with choosing a pup, all the way to a finished retriever. It does not, however include instructions on field trialing. This is strictly a video that enables the viewer to train their dog to duck hunt with them well &amp; efficiently. Good tool to have, especially for the hunter who's training for the first time, and a good reminder for the old hats
Pretty Realistic. I went through the dot com boom and this was totally realistic. It chronicles a real world view of what was going on behind the companies insid ethe bubble. I think the overall lesson from the bubble is that valuation, profits, and experience matter. This is what the bubble era lacked and this documentary covers it well. These guys had no business running a company, getting funding, and were little concerned with producing a quality product that had longevity. Shame on them for going into business but moreso for those VC's giving them money....so it went.From my experience, most of these types of people went out of the industry to easier stomping grounds to get their MBA's, have babies, or become accountants. Some have moved onto the new frontier of other start-up areas and have not learned their lesson either. However, some have learned a great deal from the bubble, continue to innovate and are well positioned to be the names of tomorrow.
One remarkable film!. After watching this last night it's a shame that not more people have seen this movie, judging by the amount of reviews and ratings. Now that director Yimou Zhang ('Hero' & 'House of Flying Daggers') has become more popular, I'm hoping this will change.'Huozhe' or 'To Live' takes us on a trip in China that will last us from the 40's through the 70's. Through that time, we will see life through eyes Fugui and Jiazhen, a husband and wife with 2 children, as well as Fugui's mother. Others here have called it a Chinese `Gone with the Wind,' but in this respect it's more like a Chinese `Les Misrables,' albeit on a smaller scale. What's most remarkable about it is how it manages to be both a political film and an objective one--it judges the political happenings that serve as its backdrop, yes, but we never get the sense that it is PRE-judging them. `Huozhe' is no propaganda film--it allows its events to unfold organically, and allows us to infer its meaning on our own.Not once is this movie boring, effectively placing us there, with the family. The acting seems so natural that it feels like you are there, traveling with them, rather then viewing them through a camera. This of course shows the strength of Zhang's directing. You Ge plays Fugui, a popular actor in China, won the award for the Cannes Film Festival. Li Gong is beautiful, and portrays her character with such passion, it's no wonder she has been nominated nearly a dozen times, winning most.Emotional without being sappy, honest, & historically accurate, the film does have a black shroud covering it. In times of sadness, it's lifted a bit to allow us to see happiness, indeed, life, pull this family together. It even has bits of humor in it, at times, I laughed along with the family as much as I felt their pain. Little details, such paintings in the background that chip away as time goes by, shows how much care went into making this film. Characters that seem unimportant become part of the story later.What a wonderful film. When I first saw it 12 years ago, it not only changed the way I saw foreign movies, it also changed the way I see life and people. Any movie that can do that is one I highly recommend to anyone.
Death is not necessarily the end of life... This was on SKY movies only the other day, I had seen it when it first came out in the early 1980s and you'd expect it to be somewhat dated, but even after over 20 years since it was made, this movie still manages to pack a wallop.The very under-rated Ellen Burstyn plays Edna McCauley a young woman tragically widowed in a car accident that leaves her in a wheelchair.In her grief she returns home to the family farm, to her wonderfully warm and loving Grandmother and her cold and distant father who has never been able to tell his only daughter he loves her.Edna isn't aware of it in the beginning but having a near death experience in the accident that left her a widow she now has healing powers which she uses, first on a child who has horrific nose bleeds, and then on herself so that she can walk again.But Edna is aware her gift is special, her Grandmother, worldly and quietly religious tells her Granddaughter to her gift for the good of others which Edna does, but there are people who are jealous of what she can do, especially a self proclaimed Preacher by the name of Earl.His son Cal, a very young Sam Shepherd becomes Edna's lover but he becomes afraid of her gift, his fear is born out of his harsh zealot upbringing at the hands of a man who believes that the bible is the be all and end all and that Edna is not doing God's work but the work of the Devil.Resurrection could have fallen flat on its face as the subject matter it is dealing with is complex and controversial but the Director, the late Daniel Petrie manages to make it both satisfying and uplifting without ever heading for the sentimental avenue which films like this can often end up.The end scene is wonderful, with Edna quietly living out her life running a gas station on a lonely route, surrounded by animals, enjoying her solitude but occasionally gifting to other her healing skills, but in such a way they never know.An absolute gem of a film.
great movie. This is great movie. It can be watched over and over again. You can allow your children/grandchildren to watch also
GOOD FOR THE SOUL. I LOVED THIS MOVIE. I SAW IT WHEN IT FIRST CAME OUT AND IT WAS SUCH A GOOD FEELING MOVIE. I NEVER FORGOT IT AND I AM SO HAPPY THAT I NOW HAVE IT FOR MY OWN.
Mesmerising. A wonderful and warm hearted story about a neglected boy coming of age in 1960's Paris.Pierre Boulanger plays Moises, a teenaged Jewish boy who was abandoned by his mother and is ignored by his father, who also soon runs out on him. Living on a dreary street, surrounded by prostitutes and spending too much time on his own, Moises is befriended by Ibrahim (Omar Sharif), a Turkish grocer who becomes the much needed father-figure for the boy. With his Sufi background Ibrahim teaches Moises (who he renames Momo) the necessity and divinity of love and the awesome beauty of this world
Excellent, and well worth it in the Directors cut. I saw this originally in the VHS "theatrical" release, mid  1990s. This Directors cut is streets ahead of the original theatrical version. It is hard to pigeon hole Barker in film, since his work is so diverse. Compare LORD OF ILLUSION with NIGHTBREED.The characters of Swann and D'mour are so tired and flat because they are so obviously world weary, at least that is my take on the characters. How else should Kevin have played Swann ?? Especially  since Swann  so willingly gives up his life. As for the followers, it specifically  says in the film "You are all  sheep... but I'm not your Shepherd...". Nix  was always focused on Swann.Like most of Barkers  work, he has a structured mythology, and the commentary Barker  gives shows that he is at least partly tutored in show level  magic. And to anyone familiar with occult  works, even from a Crowley-ian viewpoint, Barker has some schooling in that side of things.In part, I suspect Barker is playing to a small  audience who "know"... but he has proven his ability to be popular with films, so I suspect that Barker  does what he wants, and he is the arbiter of his own work.Works well if you are in on the "joke"... but it also works well  just as great entertainment. Thats the ambiguity and the entertainment value which is Clive Barker
movie fan. This film is great fun and Natalie never looked more lovlier but I'll purchase it when it is released on DVD
Very good and filled with lots of facts. This is a good movie with a lot of facts. It is up to date with the early 90's crashes
Good couples movie. This is a very good movie for a couple to watch. Heart touching
Terry Gilliam's fumble. This documentary follows Terry Gilliam's failed attempt to make a film based on Cervantes' novel Don Quixote. The film follows the rising wave of disasters that culminate in the canceling of the film only 2 weeks into production.I think this documentary should be watched by all aspiring filmmakers who can see how bad things can get on a film shoot. There was only one major problem with the film: lack of personal conflict. Everyone who has taken part in a bad shoot knows the amount of back-biting, cover-your-ass, and blame assignment behavior that occurs. Except for a few brief scenes, we don't really see any of this. Whether the cast and crew were on their best behavior while on camera or the documentary filmmakers decided to censor this in editing, these common scenes are noticeably absent.One interesting opinion I reached while watching the film was that the 1st Assistant Director (1st AD) almost certainly should have been fired. For one, the location scouting was horrendous. Anyone who has ever done location scouting knows that for such a major exterior shot, daily noise pollution and environmental factors should have been checked first hand.Additionally, when the extras didn't attend their weekend rehearsal (making impossible a shot on the assigned day), the 1st AD had no idea. It strikes the viewer that Terry Gilliam likes the 1st AD and stood by him because the AD was as disorganized as the director. It made me think of the classic line in Spinal Tap: "It's not your job to be as confused as Nigel, is it?"All in all, an excellent behind the scenes look at an attempt to make a film with a large scope.Dan RahmelAuthor: "Nuts and Bolts Filmmaking"
A modern day film noir... This is an interesting film, with a lot of very artistic shots.  For instance one scene a killer falls down dead, and lands face to face with someone tied up on the floor, which makes for some eerie and yet comical artistic filmography.  And how about that Melonie Diaz, WOW!!! Melonie is one hot little babe, prancing around in her catholic schoolgirl pleated short skirt, owning the film is worth it, just to watch her, what eye candy, and what legs!!!  Anyhow the leading man is our comical hero, and this film is almost a comedy, a humorous look at crime.  A future classic, and should appeal to those who do not like commercial films, and like art, jazz, and the finer things in life..
Indiana in India. The scene opens in Shanghai, where incredibly sexy Wilhelmina (Willie) Scott (Kate Kapshaw) leads a stunning cabaret dance, only to be stolen by Indiana Jones (Harrison Ford) , together with a very precious diamond, and an airplane, from a very powerful Chinese Mafia boss. All with the help of Short Round (Ke Huy Quan) , a streetwise little Chinese boy (with a very irritating voice!) , surely based on Chang from the Tin Tin books.They land, seemingly by chance in a poverty-stricken Indian village, where all the children have been stolen away by a savage Thugee cult of Death. From there it is on to the Pankot Palace, before our friends descend into the pits of the hellish Temple of Doom, where they must rescue the poor enslaved children. Plenty of suspense and action, some quite gory scenes, comedy, and of course the romance between Indy and Willie, who really looked sexy in that outfit she was wearing when they came out of the mines.Not quite the masterpiece that Raiders of the Lost Ark was, but most of the time it was entertaining.Although the scene in the cocoa pans , in the pits,  did really drag on , and what happened to that cute little Maharaja in the end?
An Old Favorite. It's a shame they havent brought this out on DVD yet, its an old pastime thing i remember watching as a kid. Aint seen it in years, and been wanting i
The story of a film genius. I saw this on PBS' Great Performances.  This documentary is about film genius Akira Kurosawa.  The documentary charts  Akira Kurosawa's early life in pre-WWII Japan to the end of his life.  Kurosawa brought Japanese cinema to a world wide audience. I recommend this DVD for anyone who is a Akira Kurosawa fan.  Plus the DVD has 100 minutes of bonus interview footage not seen on the PBS program and Kurosawa filmography
Mi Vida Loca. Great movie, definately original and something many Chicanos living is SoCal can relate to or be familiar with
Tunes of Glory- Criterion Collection DVD. Unquestionably the best movie Alex Guinness ever made.This high-definition transfer could not have been better.Guinness fans shouldn't miss this one
Very good movie. The first time I watched In Good Company I said to myself, eh not good, not bad, just pretty average. A couple reviews reflect that. But ever since HBO started playing the movie constantly I find myself watching it more and more and enjoying it more and more. The best quality about this film is that it's real. You watch the story progress and you feel like you're watching reality. I never found myself saying, how unrealistic, that could never happen. The character's emotions seem real, the situations seem real. That all points to a well-acted, well-written film. Also, the movie doesn't try too hard. It doesn't go out of its way to be funny, doesn't go out of its way to give you a sappy, predictable ending or stupid scenarios that so many movies end with. Just an interesting plot that flows and moves along with realism in mind instead of Hollywood fantasy
"The sky is blue wherever you go.". It's summertime in Hamburg, and while it's a time for most people to go away on holiday, Daniel (Moritz Bleibtreu), a serious young teacher, is stuck at home. A bohemian young woman named Juli (Christiane Paul) has her sights set on Daniel, but Daniel spoils Juli's plans by meeting Melek, a traveling Turkish woman (Idil Uner). When Melek leaves for Budapest the next day, Daniel impulsively decides to follow her, and he bumps into Juli as she hitchhikes out of town. Juli makes a habit of taking a hitchhiking holiday every summer, and her destination is always left to chance--she goes wherever the passing cars take her."In July" is basically an on-the-road romance. The viewer knows that Juli is attracted to Daniel, but Daniel is blissfully unaware of this. He's so determined to meet a mystery woman under the Bosporus Bridge that he overlooks Juli entirely. As they pass through Hungary, Bulgaria and Romania on the way to Budapest, Daniel and Juli suffer a series of misadventures, and at every misfortune, Daniel becomes less straitlaced and more uninhibited.While the film is rather predictable, it's salvaged by completely unexpected moments of originality. The heavy use of coincidence is forgiven by the plot's emphasis on fate. Juli's free spirited character is nicely balanced by Daniel's stability and occasional stodginess. Slated to be a popular foreign romance film, "In July" is directed by Fatih Akin--in German with English subtitles--displacedhuma
Torn. I like the actors they got for this movie and i think the acting done in it is well done...however if you are a Mark Wahlberg fan as i am then this movie might not be high on your list.In this movie Mark gets captured and tortured, it may seem odd that it would be my reasoning for not liking this movie but its one thing for them to just kill a character but i am not a big fan of watching them torture Mark!!I would tell you to watch it atleast once to see what you think of it, but be warned that the scene is in there
I love this movie. This is a really great movie. I have been waiting forever for it to come out on DVD. Devito is really good in this role. I love the way that he carries his character. A very big man in very little shoes. Peck and Miller are also a pleasure to watch in their supporting roles. And Devito's "Buggy Whip" speech in the proxy fight is fantastic. It's similar to Douglas's "Greed" speech in Wall Street in that it is an uncomfortable truth, but the truth none-the-less. I very happy that this finally came out
An  immeasurably uplifting story !. I've always been inclined to see motivational movies -- Patch Adams, The Big fish, Good Will Hunting, etc, but this just went over my expectations.  A jewel, now one of my favorites. I'm happy to its addition to my collection of films.  Thanks to Liz Murray for sharing her life with us
Download worked for me, but would like Linux support. The download process worked as advertised.  I have a 3 megabit/s DSL connection, but the download still took more than an hour for a 25 minute episode.  I was able to watch the movie on a Windows XP machine.  Unfortunately, I mostly use Linux machines, and it does not seem possible to view these files under Linux.  For this I subtract a star from the rating.Regarding the story, it is a fun story which is better than the usual Nickelodeon fare
This Has Been...a Love Story. I finally made my first purchase from Amazon's Unbox Video Downloads just to try the service and am happy to report a solid customer experience. For $1.99, I purchased and downloaded one of my favorite episodes of "The Twilight Zone", and it took about twenty minutes to download through a broadband connection. I don't think it's the most ideal way to see full-length motion pictures, but for a 26-minute classic TV program, I think my 17" LCD monitor makes for a suitable viewing experience, and the video quality of the downloaded file is clean.Aired on September 15, 1961 as the show's third season opener, the episode is a Cold War fantasy appropriately called "Two" about the last two survivors on earth, a man and a woman, after an apocalyptic world war in 2109. Written and directed by TV veteran Montgomery Pittman, the simple plot revolves around the complicating fact that he is an American infantryman and she is an invading Russian soldier. Like two feral animals, they glare at each other among the debris of a deserted town destroyed by the war. He even knocks her out her after she aggressively throws pots and pans at him. The reality of their solitary existence, however, gradually dawns on them, especially after they see an evening dress in a shop window inspiring her to speak her only word of dialogue - "Prekrassnyi" - the Russian word for "lovely".What really makes this episode memorable is the unlikely casting. Two years before she twitched her nose on "Bewitched", a brunette Elizabeth Montgomery, looking appropriately ravaged and sporting a deadly ray gun, plays the untrusting Russian soldier with surprising fierceness and vulnerability. The American is played by perennial tough-guy Charles Bronson, fresh from "The Magnificent Seven". Even though he has to spout some inane philosophical lines to describe the futility of war, he leavens his natural sullenness with a determined romanticism. They make an odd couple, but it works splendidly. I also learned that canned fried chicken will become a staple in the 22nd century. Narrated by Rod Serling in his inimitably halting manner, the show ends with my favorite line in his signature postscript: "This has been...a love story." This is classic TV
Great. I've seen this movie many times, and I was looking for it everywhere, I finally found it on [...]!  For anyone who had any rebelian in their teenage years, this is hilarious, you'll love it if you havent seen it already
I Like This Better Than Ian Holm's _Lear_ Because . . . John Hurt's portrayal of the Fool is SPLENDID. So many productions of _Lear_ get this crucial character wrong (including, unfortunately, Ian Holm's otherwise terrific production, which I first saw on PBS), but not Sir Laurence's.Incidentally, Shinnosuke Ikehata (listed in the credits as "Peter") also portrayed the Fool memorably in _Ran_, Kurosawa's famous adaptation of _Lear_.
some people actually LIKE these movies!!!!!. ok first if you want a movie to pass the time AND not be bored with it watch spy kids 1,2,3 because i LOVE them!!! how can people compare these to "the incredibles"?? i think either one of these are superior to it!!!!! the incredibles drags itself PAINFULLY!!! i think that one deserved a little itty bitty notice because it was WAYYYYY too over-hyped after awhile i wanted to turn it off and put it in a box and never touch it again because that one made me bored!!anyway the reason why i'm writing this is because you don't have too be stupid to like them you have to be stupid to hate them and hey you know these movies are trying to say that you can do anything without having to be too young or too old for it. oh yeah why are you saying that the kids are bad influences?? look at nickelodeon last year they were in a building with a giant head on a wall and kids had to pull flags out of it nose or get dunked with slime and it made sneezing noises!!! and i think the head was saying something like this: "oh my nose i think i'm going to sneeze now""uh..uh..uh..uh chooo!!!" and slime came out of the nose and dunked a kid in slime everywhere!!!and the person with the flag won and they do even more disgusting things and it's like they're saying it's ok to do disgusting stuff with or without your parents saying it's bad!!!which is not true!!!i don't like that that's why nickelodeon is going bad if it wasn't for spongebob i wouldn't have watched nickelodeon at all!!! anyway number 2 is great!!! i liked the creatures alot and it's funny at least they didn't kill the badguy off they made friends with him and if they killed him you people would be saying "well they could have been friends!!!!!
a very nice film from Taiwan. This review is for the Criterion Collection DVD edition of the film.Yi Yi literally translates as "One One" and in Chinese writing appears as two horizontal lines next to each other. It is also known as "Yi Yi: a One and a Two"The film is the story of the Jian family living in Taiwan and follows their actions over the period of a year. Many things happen. A wedding, a funeral and other things. The film explores different aspects of life and death and hasbeen the recipient of many awards.The DVD contains optional audio commentary by the film's writer and director, Edward Yang and film critic Tony Rayns. There is also an interview with Tony Rayns about Yang's film style. Finally, there is a theatrical trailer for the US release.This is a nice film and has some excellent scenes
The Best Version - please make the dvd. This is the best version of this story.  It is well directed and acted by the talented cast.  The collection of pirates is especially interesting with their seedy looks and various disfigurments.My only complaint is that this version is not on DVD.  It is a great old time movie
"Nothin's Gonna Happen To Me.....". I love Sean Penn as an actor. He's so versatile and can play just about any part. I had never even heard of "Bad Boys" before. I was simply looking through DVD's at Hastings one day and the title caught my eye. Films concerning criminals and misfits have always been a thing of curiosity for me and a film of this kind starring Sean Penn made it seem even better. I bought the film and have loved watching it since.Sean Penn plays Mick O'Brien, a mop-haired, street thug from Chicago who loves the thrill of juvenile crime from stealing purses to using firearms. His number one enemy is a Hispanic juvenile drug dealer named Paco (played by Esai Morales) who also has eyes for Mick's beautiful girlfriend J.C. (played by the lovely Ally Sheedy). After O'Brien and Paco are involved in a hideous shootout that has Mick going on a high speed police chase and leaves Paco's kid brother dead, Mick is sentenced to Rainford Correctional Facility to serve time for his crimes.Suddenly, O'Brien is plunged into a world of his own kind: rapists, murderers and robbers. They spit on you and taunt you. They whistle at you and try to extort you. But that is the least of Mick's problems. He must deal with the head "bad boys" of the clan. Tweetie is a tough African American with angry intimidating eyes who makes the younger newcomers his love interests and bullies O'Brien during his cleaning, (a.k.a s***t house patrol) time. Tweetie's accomplice is a large, blonde, muscled guy named Viking who loves torturing O'Brien during lunch or dinnertime and sneering in his face. Together, Tweetie and Viking keep everyone in line by shoving them around and flashing tough stares at them.My favorite character in the film is Horowitz (portrayed excellently by Eric Gurry), the small, skinny Jewish kid who spends most of his time with his nose in a book or fixing radios. But Horowitz is just as dangerous as he is intelligent and he is proof that you can be tough in other ways besides being big, rough and muscular. Horowitz looks as ordinary as they come, but don't be fooled by that. Horowitz is Mick O'Brien's cellmate who eventually becomes his accomplice after Mick raises hell with Tweetie and Viking and is dubbed "The New Barn Boss." With Horowitz's help, Mick gains a better idea of the pecking order and different attitudes around the institution and can prepare himself for what lies ahead. Horowitz also tosses in a few surprises such as cleverly executing a "corrosive" way for Mick to escape from the institution to see J.C. and making a radio explode in a much needed damaging way. Even with his small stature, Horowitz is feisty and stands up to the bigger "bad boys" when the time is right. I guess I get a kick out of Horowitz because he's so deceiving. And I admire his courage to fight despite his size. I also like his laid-back, matter-of-fact personality. Just listen to the story he tells Mick about the bowling alley he blew up.But the worst is yet to come for Mick. After beating and raping J.C., Paco is transported to Rainford, where he is united again with his beloved enemy, Mick. Everyone has heard of the beef between the two and they can all smell blood almost as soon as Paco steps foot in the institution. The hatred is as raw as they come; Paco out to get Mick for killing his kid brother and Mick out to get Paco for what he did to his girlfriend. Now everything can become a weapon and Paco is lifting weights with determination. On the night of the fight, crafty Paco goes to great lengths to make sure that there will be no authority figures in the way and he and Mick have a nasty and bloody showdown. Throughout the film, Mick is never one to show much emotion, but at the last part of the film, we actually see some. The only other time you see emotion on Mick's face is when he sees J.C. after her attack.Everything about "Bad Boys" is awesome. The casting is wonderful; a truly talented bunch of young men who exhibit the raw toughness that comes with being in a juvenile institution. The whole prison atmosphere is incredibly real. The moment Mick walks in, he sees all the street-wise looking, tough young guys smoking their cigarettes, whistling at him and gazing at him with cockiness. Their idea of a warm welcome is spitting in your face and making you clean bathrooms. The movie is a fascinating real portrayal of the very gritty atmosphere that these guys call home for the time being. There are cold cells with bunk beds, a desk and a closet, an occasional foosball table and RC Cola machines, cafeteria food that you'd want to feed to your dog and a small black and white television for old movies. Recreation consists of some time for tackle football in the field or jogging between the double fences. Chores consist of things such as burning wood, watering plants and working in the fields. Oh yeah, and if you need to satisfy your nicotine cravings, you have to cut a deal with an Italian guy and an Asian guy who control the cigarettes and other things one may want to smoke. There's also solitary confinement if you get too out of control. With good reason, the guards lock themselves in cages away from the main room until there is a situation that needs to be taken care of.Those who enjoy Sean Penn, true crime, cop shows and other subjects involving delinquent behaviors and jailing will enjoy this excellent film of the brutality, the trials and the tribulations of juvenile prisons and those thriving within them. All the attitude that you can handle comes in this film. Special features include the theatrical trailer and a commentary from Director, Richard Rosenthal about the making of the film, the casting and various other things. I kind of wish they would have had the gang of Sean Penn, Esai Morales Eric Gurry and Ally Sheedy back for an interview segment on their own thoughts and opinions about the film though. I don't know why this film didn't get as much recognition, but it definitely should have. Of course, this film was made back in 1983 so perhaps these types of films were not as popular at that time as they might be today. But nevertheless, "Bad Boys" deserves to stand the test of time and should be enjoyed by all.
Worth a roll of the dice. The varied reactions to this movie by other reviewers are interesting, but nonetheless surprise me. De gustibus and all that, I suppose.Released in 1987 but set in 1957, this is a well written and well acted drama with much of the feel of 40s and 50s noir. The look of the film, presumably deliberately, also has the style of an earlier era. The sound track, with Ivory Joe Hunter, Lincoln Chase, Big Joe Turner and others, couldn't be more suitable. The sleaze, of course, is much more advanced than would have been permissible thirty years earlier.The hero, J.C. Cullen (Matt Dillon), is more complex than a pure country innocent corrupted by a wicked woman Lorry Dane (Diane Lane), a stripper at the Gem Club. A small town gambler trying to make it big in Chicago, he has his own dark, or at least not-so-light, side, which is why he takes up with Lorry so readily. Yet, he at least struggles with his conscience even if he doesn't always do the right thing. Tommy Lee Jones and Bruce Dern are in fine form as villains, Lee Grant has just the right touch, and Diane Lane has never been more stunning or more credible in a role. The Big Town is not a big movie, but it is a good one.
A True Christmas Lesson at its Best. Unlike Mr. Baker from Santa Clarita, California who rated this item 2, I think this film deserves much more than that and Jake DOES learn the true meaning of Christmas; one just has to pay close attention and by-pass all the commercialism involved.  Yes, he does start out self-seeking and free-wheeling but all that changes as he learns his hard lessons along the way.  For one thing, it starts by him getting what he deserves; a punishment by some jocks leaving him out in the desert and so the hard lessons start here. From that point on, the true meaning of Christmas gets shown to him in various ways, and just by wearing a Santa outfit his hardships spawn some lessons:  he willingly sacrifices race winnings for a good cause (even though the money was rightfully his), a failed marriage gets repaired, a crooked "elf" gets reformed from a life of crime, plus one can see that the porsche is all forgotten in a tender moment with little Esteban in the hospital who pines for his family-no one can convince me that Jake is not affected by that; he is and it shows. Finally when the lesson is fully espoused, it's remarkable how the climax is coupled with various holiday customs and traditions (Christmas, Hanukah and Kwanza) enmeshed in the local parade plus a group of carolers almost overcome by the running sleigh. Then, as the time limit which determines if he'll receive the porsche approaches, he is in no hurry, but spends a few seconds with the girlfriend watching his family celebrate at the table through the window; hence, a sense of family fizzles through. When all is said and done, the hailed porsche is cast into total oblivion. All he then wants is a family ride on the sleigh. His lessons come hard, but he learns. Again, one has to get past all the commercialism to really get to the meat of this film, and this film should get all the accolades and the respected place of all the time-honored Christmas films of the past. I love Jonathan Taylor Thomas; he's a good actor and very handsome. But this is not the reason for my customer review. Unlike what other people may think or how they may view it, this is one of the best Christmas films to teach what Christmas is really all about
One of the Best Political Movies Ever. Robert Redford and Dustin Hoffman deliver Oscar worthy performances,while Jason Robards won an Oscar for Best Supporting Actor in this moviewhich is (in my opinion) one of the best "political" films ever made. I'm not even sure if it was nominated for Best Picture, but I have to say...This moviewas better than "Rocky" OK. The movie won four Academy Awards;The one I mentioned above, Best Adapted Screenplay, Best Art Direction, and Best Sound. It's also rated PG, which is strange because they use the word f**k at least 8 times  in this movie and nowadays, two uses can get you slapped with an R rating. But the movie opens as we witness four men breaking into the Watergate Building, which we all know was the setting for Democratic National Headquarters. The police show up and catch the men in the act of setting up survelliance/bugging the place and the story shows upBob Woodward's (Redford) desk. Woodward is a reporter at The Washington Post who reports the story and then begins to see oddities about it. Why would men break into the Democratic National Headquarters? Who sent them? Etc. Eventually joining in the act of helping him is Carl Bernstein (Hoffman) who begin a thorough investigation of the scandal that begins to turrn up names very high up in government and eventually even The President of the United States, Richard Nixon. Bernstein and Woodward worked their a$$es off to get this story, through apparent death threats and when people wouldn't talk to them, and they got it all right. Robards plays their boss, Ben Bradlee and deserved his Oscar. Another performance that was really good, although his face is almost entirely hidden in shadow is Hal Holbrook as the mysterious Deep Throat. Deep Throat was one of Woodward's informants who apparently worked high up in the government and seemed to know everything about the Watergate cover-up. Except he refused to just give up and information, only hints and could never be directly quoted or even referred to. Woodward, to this day has not given up the identity of Deep Throat or even gave the vaguest idea of who he might've been. Anyway, for a movie about reporters trying to unravel a cover-up, this movie was incredibly entertaining and exciting. It's never boring, it's never dull; both Hoffman & Redford play their parts extraordinarily well, which causes us to like the movie even more. And it's strange too, the movie doesn't end with Nixon resigning; but instead ends with Nixon taking his 2nd Oath of Office. We're given the remainder of the details as they're typed up on a Typewriter. I though the ending was abrupt, but perfect.GRADE: A
Sarah, Plain and Tall. The worst thing about Anna's older brother Caleb is that Mama died the day after Caleb was born.  So when Papa puts an add in the newspaper for a wife, Anna and Caleb get excited.  Sarah writes back from Maine.  She says she will come to the farm and see what the family is like."I am plain and tall and will wear a yellow bonnet" she writes.  When Sarah comes,she starts to miss the ocean.  Will Sarah stay with Papa, Anna, and Caleb?  Or will she go back to the ocean forever
One of the Greatest Films of All Time. Vittorio De Sica's highly acclaimed film "Bicycle Thieves" (called for years, in America,"The Bicycle Thief") is now presented in a superb transfer by The Criterion Collection. The film was released in 1949 and won a special Academy Award (the Best Foreign Film category didn't exist yet) and has lived on in "Great Movie" books and Top Movies of All Time Lists. Astoundingly, due to all its accolades, is a very simple film. It was made during the times of Italian neo-realism and many of the actors in the film aren't professional actors, including the lead role of Antonio (played by Lamberto Maggiorani). The setting is Rome, where jobs are scarce and many of the people live in poverty. Antonio's luck changes for the better when he finally gets a job hanging posters of Rita Hayworth up around town. Problem is, he needs a bicycle. He tells the man who gives him the job that he has one, but the truth is; he just pawned it to get food for his wife and two children. In order to retrieve his bike, his wife sells their bedsheets, and Antonio sets off to make some money. Then, suddenly, his bicycle his stolen and his whole world comes crashing down. Unable to do his job, he notifies the police who tell him that they can do nothing about it. So, he begins walking the streets of Rome with his son trying to find it. That's pretty much it; But the movie, in all of its simplicity, is so much more poetic and important. Despite not being a professional actor, Maggiorani gives one of the most memorable performances I've ever seen. Even the boy who plays his young son is unforgettable. The movie is filled with great scenes, such as the moment where Antonio spots the man who stole his bicycle and attempts to get it back, only to have the entire neighborhood gang up on him. Then there are the final scenes, where we realize that the actual title of the film "Bicycle Thieves" is much more appropriate than "The Bicycle Thief." To say "Bicycle Thieves" is a masterpiece would be an understatement. Many movies can be called masterpieces, but few films really embody the wonder of cinema.This movie is important, well made on all levels, it has aged well, and it's entertaining. We know that the latter doesn't always happen in "great movies." Anyone who wants to begin watching films that have shaped cinema over the course of the years can start anywhere from 'Citizen Kane' to 'Breathless' to 'Jules and Jim' to 'Pulp Fiction.' Those films are all good to start with, but at some point you must see "Bicycle Thieves."GRADE:
SCHOOL OF ROCK with Jack Black!!!. Jack Black deserves more than an Academy Award for his Spectacular and Explosive Performance inSCHOOL OF ROCK!!!  A Must . . . for anyone who has ever worked in or attended a school.In a School System that too often discourages all enthusiasm and passion for any subject  .  .  .Jack Black  . . . Shows Em How!!!  In Living his Passion and Truth . . .  He Brings to Life  .  .  .All of the Kids in their different ways!!!  One could say it is the Theme of THE BLUES BROTHERSi.e. Let's Get The Band Together!!!  .  .  .  This is Another Good Time Classic . . . of Fun and Celebration of Life!!!Phenomenal Energy and Dynamic Performance on the part of Jack Black . . . and All Character Actors includingSarah Silverman . . . Excellent Also!!!~ Sara Izo
One of the funniest movies EVER!. If you have ever been involved in any sort of community or college theater, you have GOT to see this film. There is great truth in this fiction
Dvd. Hey I'm a huge FNM fan, I haven't seen this video yet because I'm waiting for it to come out on dvd. Does anyone know about it coming out on dvd
Very Hilarious. Truely speaking, this is a very hilarious episode. Must see for every one
Explosive movie, Special Features are a Dud!!. I am partial to this movie and that is why I'm giving it five stars.  If you like Darby O'Gill and the Little People as I do, you'll love this film.  The falure of this DVD lies in it's lack of Special Features, and I would be living in a dream world if I ever thought disney would give us a better release of this movie, because the simple fact of the matter is that it's not going to happen, but hey at least we got it on DVD
I ws never this emotional... I loved the movie not only because Julia was present but because of the way she ended up falling for the ill guy. Not everybody these dayswould have done that but it just showed how love evolves in different places of our lives. I cried for the most part, alone of course.
One of my favorites!. I love this movie and I'm so glad it's coming to DVD!!  This movie is absolutely a must-see for anyone who ever wondered "what happened to my life?  Where did I go?
Here doggie doggie. I enjoyed Bad Moon simply because it was one of those horror flicks that was not afraid to show the monster for any length of time. Even The Howling didn't give us any long looks at the werewolves
Excellent Film. This film is really intriging.  For someone who doesn't consider herself a drama fan, this film [...] me in and kept me hooked.  The story of this writer really made me think about how art and drive and will to live can help someone overcome the most stacked of odds.  It is also a very interesting look into gay politics in that time and place in the world.As a person studying GLBT studies as a degree, I recommend you view this film.  As a human being, I recommend you view this film.  Most people see it because of Johnny Depp's performance (as 2 characters) but that fact is very minor, although he does an excellent job.  The main actor is astounding and makes you believe what is real, even though it is so unbelievable
Good if you are familiar with the music. This film is very good if you are into Factory as a whole.  If you are watching it just for one band, don't.  You will find yourself disappointed
This movie is for everyone, not just children. It's a story about not being afraid.  I think my parents got it for me because I have a chronic lung condition known as Cystic Fibrosis and they wanted to encourage the idea of being brave.  Or, it was just because my dad was big into drugs and he wanted me to watch one of the coolest psychedelic films around.  This movie totally rocks either way
Five tin stars for a great movie. Ignore all the hokum about this movie being an allegory against McCarthyism - it's much broader than that. It's about integrity, standing against evil, responsibility, and being a real hero. That this story is a Western is almost incidental. I consider it to be a classic moral story more than a classic Western, although it functions perfectly well as a Western. Marshal Will Kane certainly does not want to die or fight alone. He considers running away, more from a desire to avoid unnecessary trouble than from cowardice - though he is afraid - but he realizes that running is not a solution in this case. Kane doesn't overcome fear; he faces it. Each man in town has his own reasons for not helping Kane, displaying various aspects of passivity, apathy, fear, greed, and rationalization. The acting, setting, and dialogue are sparse but brilliant. The music helps to set the right emotional tone, and the theme song is especially evocative. And boy do I love a film shot in black and white!
Lawrence Tierney Rules!!!. Yes, this film feels like a diatribe.  It's probably less factual than the film version of John Dillinger's exploits that director John Milius made in the seventies.  So why do I recommend this film over Milius' more polished account?  Well, this film in a campy, over-the-top way is just so entertaining.  Secondly, Lawrence Tierney in the title role is such a magnetic screen presence.  His tough ferocity keeps the film's campier elements in check and grounds it in some semblance of reality.  There's also a good supporting cast here with gangster veterans Marc Lawrence and Elisha Cook Jr. (seems like he's in all these noir-gangster flicks) on hand.  The story is told here crisply and in an economical 70 minutes so if you have an hour plus to kill there's worse ways to do it.  Oh, John, if only you had the two bucks to pay for the drinks!
Cast as history's ultimate femme fatale, Liz Taylor certainly appeared to be reinforcing life... Taylor stole the spotlight from Cleopatra; she was grander in her own person than she was on screen as someone else... It isn't big or intelligent or daring enough, but her interpretation of the Empress is not without some charm and some fire...Mankiewicz shaped the characterization to suit her... The movie follows her from the father-daughter romance with Caesar to the tempestuous man-woman contretemps with Marc Antony...The forty-million-dollar epic is constructed as a series of views of the Taylor woman complaining and making her way into Caesar's bed, to ruler of the world, and to the human being who was too much for Marc Anthony...Taylor is much better in the first part... As the cunning, nubile daughter to Caesar's wise father, she's quite pleasing... She can handle the sardonic cracks and the little girl petulance... Though, of course, Rex Harrison's courtly insouciance helps to shape her own performance...She's expected to do much more acting as the womanly, passion-driven Queen, but she's more in control of the character when she's playing Caesar's pupil rather than Marc Anthony's teacher... Her high comedy exchanges with Harrison have quiet authority; her doomed romance with Burton never ignites...
lost in space. you can tell the age of the person writing a review for this movie for sure -I'm 45 so I love itI also love science and I like the time warp logical paradox delt with in the storyif you don't like just go back and get the orginals and check it all ou
A classic from the firm. I love this workout.  Some of the other reviewers have mentioned that this is a little less intense than some of the other firms.  That is precisely the reason I love it so much.  It is very effective with less stress on your joints.  Originally it was intended as a workout for the &quot;baby boomers&quot; approaching middle age, but really it is adaptable to all.  The lower body segment is killer if done with weights appropriate to your strength level, but the aerobic segment is less intense than some.  I am 48 but still run and workout to the other firms as well as Gilad, so I am in fairly decent shape, but I can still feel the hover squats in this video!   The firm and Gilad in my opinion have the best workout videos bar none.  They are not dancy or cutesy; just good solid effective workouts with real results.  And isn't real results the reason we all do this in the first place?  BTW I was just lucky enough to obtain another copy of this out of print video on e-bay
shocking and unforgettable. admittedly i rented this out because of Goran Visnjic being in it..but that wasnt the main reason.As the opening scene unfolded i could see that this wasnt a film for the faint hearted, that on the way to a wedding the mother of the bride is shot dead.With the film progressing and the character of Risto(Visnjic)becoming more important I felt myself being drawn into what was happening, and could not help but be moved by the scenes of the orphanage.To see how these children had been mixed up in a war that led them to losing their parents had me in tears.Whilst not an entertaining film, I thought that it was well worth watching as it gave an insight(no matter how small)into what people had to go through.The acting was great and only enhanced what was a brilliant film..but one that left me shocked and upset
Conventional but still slyly subversive. I caught this movie on television after having avoided it in the theater, fearing it would be a conventional, mainstream comedy.  It hooked me immediately and was far more entertaining than I would have expected.  Jack Black's scruffy, rocker character had a surprisingly deft touch with the schoolkids, one that was supportive and positive and fair-minded and thus disarmingly sweet.  And his character was also hilarious.  I also liked the the portrayal of Joan Cusack's character as a woman who had been warped by her high-pressure, stultifying job as a school principal.  Nice underlying theme about rejecting the pressure by society to live up to different types of perfection and instead just rockin' out
Great classic for a great price. With a cable modem, took about 1 hour and 15 minutes to download Unbox, install the program and download the episode.  It's a great download speed considering the file is 803 mb.  I was able to still use my computer, IE 7.0 and RealPlayer, so the download is not a resource hog.  The menu bar includes a link to shop for more Unbox titles, which I found very convenient.The quality is great, but the video stutters in Unbox.  Maybe because it uses 3 applications when playing video?  I chose to watch the episode on Windows Media Player 11 and I had no problems at all.I've bought and watched 3 episodes, all with the same results.  Fast and unobstrusive download, great quality and low price.  Just use WMP, or another player that can handle wma files, to watch.
Shamefully Overlooked Southern Gothic Murder Mystery Has Atmosphere, Genuine Thrills and the Superb Blanchett. This is surely one of the most seriously underrated mystery thrillers around, which is a shame since director Sam Raimi, just before hitting the jackpot with the "Spider-Man" franchise, has assembled a wildly improbable cast to inhabit an admittedly lurid though constantly involving 2001 movie. I was in a town on the southernmost tip of Chile when I first saw this movie in a hotel room which just happen to have HBO. Not even the outside splendor of a midnight sun could tear me away from watching the movie on the TV set back then.Co-written by Billy Bob Thornton (upon whose mother's psychic gifts the story is based) and Tom Epperson, the plot revolves around the disappearance of Jessica Starlet, the daughter of a wealthy resident of a Georgia backwater town. Tired of blind alleys, the police begrudgingly recruit Annie Wilson, a single mother of three sons, who lost her husband in a factory accident and now has to earn a living as a tarot reading psychic/fortune teller. Annie thinks she finds a suspect in Donnie Barksdale, the abusive, white-trash husband of one of her most devoted customers, Valerie.  Complicating matters for Annie is her attraction to Wayne Collins, her eldest son's teacher and Jessica's fiancee; and Buddy Cole, another of Annie's customers, a suicidal mechanic traumatized by the parental abuse he received as a child.While it's not perfectly constructed, the sometimes excessive screenplay contains a lot of layers but remains true to the characters' voices and motivations throughout. Raimi's expert direction is full of sumptuous Southern gothic visuals and genuine tension that escalates over the course of the story. Credit needs to be given to Jamie Anderson's cinematography and Neil Spisak's production design for establishing such a heady atmosphere perfect for the labyrinth plot. Some of the actors really surprised me with strong turns, including Katie Holmes as the spoiled, baby-faced debutante Jessica; Greg Kinnear as the seemingly stalwart Wayne; Keanu Reeves especially visceral and chilling as unrepentant wife-beater Donnie; and Giovanni Ribisi as the deeply troubled Buddy.In the smallish role of Valerie, Hilary Swank makes her moments count as she cringes from Donnie's scarifying dominance over her. But it's the wondrous Cate Blanchett who pulls it all together with her multi-dimensional performance as Annie. With a convincing Southern accent, she reveals the hidden layers of her character beautifully as she tries to recover from the loss of her husband, protect her children and make sense of the psychic revelations that traumatize her and us.  The DVD is short on extras - a fifteen-minute featurette which includes cast and crew interviews, the movie's trailer and a video of Neko Case's "Furniture Room Lullaby" which perfectly reflects the haunting soundtrack. Definitely seek this one out if you are looking for an atmospheric, character-driven thriller that does not condescend to the viewer
Epic Korean Drama. Koreans honor their greatest military hero in this epic drama which takes place in the late 1500s. The career and tactics of this Admiral are still studied at the U.S. Naval Academy, and doubtless those of other nations. The screenplay is based on a couple of novels, so there is some fiction, but the life of Yi Soon Shin was well documented, so there's plenty of fact supporting the story.If you are not familiar with Korean Drama, it's good to keep in mind that  this is not a Hollywood product, but they do very well with special effects and such considering the non-Hollywood budgets involved, and it's easy to see past all that and enjoy the tale being told.It's a long series, but presents an epic with power, depth and dimension and well worth watching it unfold through each and every episode.It would be great also to see KBS make other dramas available for viewing through Amazon, such as "Seoul 1945".
Next to listening to his recordings, this is a fine tribute to a great jazz musician. I am not usually a big fan of bio-pics about genius musicians because it is impossible to "act" them playing.  And, after all, it is their playing that we care about.  However, Clint Eastwood brings so much affection and integrity to this film and Forest Whitaker has such a perfectly fit genius of his own for this role that I think it comes off quite well.Charlie Parker was a tortured soul whose musicianship was so powerful that he was able to teach himself a virtuoso style of playing jazz alto saxophone that has influenced nearly every alto-sax player since.  Certainly, anyone with pretensions to playing bebop jazz.  The film captures his difficult beginnings, his powerful rise and artistry, his terrible drug addictions (and how this also provided an unfortunate influence on others), and his early, far too early, death.There is the sound of his playing throughout the movie, but it is in short snippets.  We get more over the closing credits.  But we get enough to remember what is special and unique about his playing.  Everyone talks about his speed and harmonic variety.  All that is there, certainly.  However, there is also so much in Parker's commitment to what he is singing through his horn that allows us to feel the music in a way that was unique to him.  Without that ability to reach into the heart of an audience, no amount of virtuosity can keep an audience for generations.  Parker is still winning new fans every day and that is his greatest legacy.  This film is a nice tribute to him.  It is just so sad that he got onto such a self destructive path and the only way off for him was to die at 34
"Shall We Dance?". When I'm fairly certain that the world just may not be unfolding as it should, the temperature is near 100, and the U. S. casualties from the War In Iraq now have reached over 2,500-- the newscasters rarely give figures of anyone else--STRICTLY BALLROOM is one of a handful of films that always makes me smile. Set in Australia and directed by Baz Luhrmann, it's all about winning the Pan Pacific Grand Prix ballroom dancing competition. Besides the extraordinary dancing by the two principal actors Paul Mercurio and Tara Morice, the story is one that most of us want to believe: that in the end-- after all that's what happens in romantic comedies-- boy gets girl, ugly duckling becomes suave swan, the older generation get a chance to try things again, or at least see their broken dreams achieved by their children, and good triumphs over the cynical, bad guys.In addition to the fine performances by Mercurio and Morice, the other actors are quite wonderful, particularly the Hasting parents. Golden hair color not found in nature and toupees abound, as does delicious humor.Leave it to the Aussies to do everything right in a movie.
Just what I need... I have never been big on self-help books; many of them are too stuffy, or technical, or don't really relate to what I'm going through.  "You Can Heal Your Life" is different. It is easy to read, and well-written, and helps you see/realize/re-affirm that you are the master of your destiny, that only you can change your life, that you are loveable and perfect as you are - and best of all, the process is not "hard" - you just have to be willing to do the mental work.  The book gives practical advise, it's non-judgemental, and it's real and true.I have been struggling with depression my whole life, and doing lots of work to heal myself.  Reading this book at this point of my life-journey was just what I needed.  I'm happy!  Since I started reading the book (a week ago), I have not had any trouble sleeping. That may not seem like a lot, or a long time, but I've also struggled with insomnia most of my life too.  Falling asleep peacefully is a triumph, and a joy.Another great thing about the book is that I'll be able to refer to it often.  The index in the back has already come in handy when I wanted to look up something I read a few days ago.If you're not sure, and if you resist the book & its message, if you think "oh, this author must have it all together, she must have had a great childhood, things must just come easy to her, that's not me, my life sucks", then read the last chapter, "My Story."  It will make it obvious that no matter what you go through, no matter what you've experienced, you can be happy. All it takes is you.
Heavyweights. I love this movie!  I could not find it in any store, and Amazon.com had it!  MY movie came very quickly and in great condition
Best Christmas Movie EVER. I really can't say anything new that hasn't been said about this great movie, except read Jean Shepherd's novels...you will get a whole new appreciation for the movie and the characters that have become a part of so many of our lives.Thank you Darren McGavin for giving us the best Christmas Present ever
Where's the party at?. If all you have ever seen of Mark Dacascos is his villanous role in CRADLE 2 THE GRAVE, then DRIVE is as good a place as any to see him as the hero. It ranks up with ONLY THE STRONG, REDEMPTION: KICKBOXER 5, and BROTHERHOOD OF THE WOLF as Mark's one of, if not the best of Mark's films.DRIVE is often compared to Jackie Chan's RUSH HOUR. While it's clear that DRIVE is greatly influenced by Jackie Chan's Hong Kong pics, I found it more comparable to CHILL FACTOR.The story begins as our hero Toby Wong (Mark Dacascos) arrives in San Francisco from Hong Kong, attempting to escape his slavery to a Hong Kong assassin ring. He has a "bio-engine" inside his chest that greatly inhances his physicality, and has learned that he can earn $5 million from an American coporation to is interested in buying the chip. Naturally, Wong's superiors don't want this, and have sent some goons after him. Wong kidnaps Malik Brody (Kadeem Hardison) to DRIVE him to L.A., and insures Malik's cooperation by offering a 50% cut.DRIVE takes the best parts of Jackie Chan's movies and shows them to an American audience. For example, The lengthy brawl in the motel garage I found reminiscent of the auto-test center finale in TWIN DRAGONS. Also, the excellent final match between Mark and Masaya Kato follows the Jackie Chan tradition of the fighters being so evenly matched that their duel goes back and forth to the point where you just don't know who will win.Even Mark plowing an opponent down on a Motorcycle is something of a tradition in kung fu movies (it's been seen in POLICE STORY, RAPID FIRE, IN THE LINE OF DUTY IV,etc.)And the comedy in DRIVE in every way matches the action, so do yourself a favor, and check out DRIVE for Kadeem Hardison's comedy and Mark Dacascos' FISTS OF FURY
Fools rush in. DVD newcomer "Fort Apache" (1948) looks great, with minimal wear on its crisp black-and-white images (from original nitrate elements) and bugle-brisk audio. The film, ironically, finds Henry Fonda playing the maddeningly hawkish cavalry commander against John Wayne's humanistic officer willing to risk all for peace and justice.The (single) DVD has no documentary on the exciting and heartfelt film, a shame. It does include a 15-minute piece on Monument Valley, covering Ford's significant and seemingly beneficial role in the Indian reservation's history. The Navajo, paid good wages for their appearances, called him "Giant Soldier." "I've kissed more babies than a politician," Ford said."Part of his vision of the world was that we're all very small in the scheme of things," film historian Joseph McBride says. "I think (Monument Valley) gives a dimension of moral seriousness to his work that was intensified as he went along."[...
Star Trek At Its Best. Shore Leave is one of the best episodesof the classic series. It uses all thesci fi props but also has a great story,if you don't even care about Star Trekand have to watch one, watch this one.
the choices we have to make will always haunt us. a brilliant character study of an upper middle class jewish german family who escape to kenya in the days before world war 2. having to adjust to a different world, having to learn to confront her own racism (irony of ironies), having to face up to a marriage where she is unable to love as much as she is herself loved, star juliane kohler manages to give a broad and poignant performace, as does the rest of the cast, highlighted by sidede onyulo as the african cook who becomes confessor and friend to the family. let us be thankful that others got ahold of the source material before the likes of meryl streep found it. a great film, in my top 100.
gripping and highly benedictive of my CHAIN SAW MAN series of books. THE TEXAS CHAINSAW MASSACRE-LEATHERFACE is a fabulous film, which I have owned on VHS for well over 10 years. I personally know REEDY A. Mihailoff who played the gruesome LEATHRFACE in this said film. A brillaint, but exciting rendition that is comprised with the customary horror that is TEXAS CHAINSAW MASSACRE, but the thrill of the hunt was still intact, but carried out in a slightly varied genre` that it's original predecessor. I did not care much for the house that nestled this murderous family, but again like the room upstairs in thisd original, I own peices of that house i.e. the pink spindles, wallpaper up there, etc, however the setting claimed much warrant behind the overall theme.COURTESY OF THE AUTHOR OF "THE CHAIN SAW MAN" series of booksLAMA MILKWEED L. AUGUSTINEA truely memorable beginning and ending that creates a lasting impact that makes the onlooker 'beg' for more
A Misunderstood Masterpiece. Not that many movies have been more loved or hated in the history of motion pictures. Considered a lesser effort and a misfire in David Lean's career it still stands the test of time and in my opinion is one of the best films ever made.The scope of the story goes from minimalist in depicting the characters to grandiose in the way "Lawrence of Arabia" or "The Bridge over the River Kwai" was. It is a long movie, but the story flows and it brings Ireland to life in a way not seen since "The Quiet Man".Cinematography and music are as usual the best you can find. And the actors, severely criticized over the years make some of their best performances. Including Robert Mitchum believed by many to be miscast for the part. John Mills portrayal of the village idiot rightly brought him and Academy Award. And if we don't compare Sarah Miles to Julie Christie she stands on her own.Let David Lean take your hand and take you to Ireland; you will be glad you did.
THANK YOU FOR THE TRIBUTE TO FLEISHER SUPERMAN CARTOONS. The Superman serials from Columbia had cartoons in tribute to the Fleisher cartoons of a few year before.  It was very creative and thinking out of the box.  ~*~ Carol Forman is great in her continuing quest to take over the world.  This serial is a hoot
Great DVD, Music, Artist and Story. Cuban Music. !!!Nothing better. Buy this DVD because it is a great beautiful story.Because it brings to the front the great talent and warmth of the Cuban people.But to clarify one issue, these Musicians or Music were never forgotten.This music was made illegal after the Revolution, they were thus made usless to the Revolution. Nothing to do with the " Embargo". It was the Castro regime that made this music illegal to be heard or recorded because it was deemed un Revolutionary. Anything prior to the Revolution was BAD!. So Politics do matter.From that moment on, musicians and singers could only sing songs that extolled the values of the "Revolution". That is one of the biggest reason that so many Jazz group developed in the Island, that was the way musicians found they could play this music and not be forced to interject the required lyrics required by the goverment. It was not until the government found that they could make money of their backs that they let them sing and play again.Watch the end of this DVD when Ibrahim Ferrer sings his closing song at Carnagie Hall, look deep into his eyes and you will see the soul of a man that realizes what his God given gifts could have given him had he had the oportunity that was taken away from him by one man.Cuban Music still thrives. It will always be, because it's in all our hearts. It's part of who we are. It is our National joy and pride.
Probably the Best Drama Series Ever Made. I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out
One of my favorites of all caper movies. Based on the book and directed by Michael Crichton, this enjoyable caper movie from 1979 brings together a fantastic cast in an authentic 19th century Victorian environment to tell a story based around the true story of the first great train robbery. I saw this movie many years ago on British television and have always found it enjoyable so it was an easy buy for me.In addition to a superb Sean Connery as the suave mastermind Edward Pierce (is Connery ever NOT suave) and the always amazing Donald Sutherland as his accomplice Agar, we also have Lesley-Anne Down as Miriam. Down was a favorite actress of mine from this era with movies like "The Pink Panther Strikes Again," "Rough Cut" and "Sphinx." Here she plays Connery's lover who is not afraid to use her quite incredible feminine charms to aid Pierce character.Joining the three leads are such well known faces as British television celebrity Michael Elphick (as the railway guard who aids Pierce and Agar); Pamela Salem as Emily Trent (Salem would be reunited with Connery four years later in the rogue 007 film "Never Say Never Again") and Alan Webb as the bank president.Filmed in Ireland with a modest budget of only $6 million, the script is intelligent, the action appropriate and the dialogue both witty and engaging. The showpiece stunt with Pierce on top of a moving train has since been copied many times since, including in the 1983 James Bond movie "Octopussy" with Roger Moore in the role that Sean Connery made famous). But this stunt sequence is distinctive in that Connery performed his own stunts. The train was supposed to be traveling only 35 miles-per-hour, but Connery argued that the train was actually moving much faster, an assertion that was confirmed by the helicopter pilot who measured the speed of the train at 55 miles-per-hour.The movie, set in 1855, tells the story of the three conspirators attempts to steal $25 million in gold bullion that is being transported by train to pay British troops fighting in the Crimean War.To gain access to the gold Pierce and Agar need copies to four keys and the bulk of the movie involves their efforts to obtain each key in what can be described as four separate caper tales.The effort and difficulties facing the thieves is ably outlined by Connery in the opening narration to the movie:"In the year 1855, England and France were at war with Russia in the Crimea. The English troops were paid in gold. Once a month, twenty-five thousand pounds in gold was loaded into strongboxes inside the London bank of Huddleston and Bradford and taken by trusted armed guards to the railway station. The convoy followed no fixed route or timetable. At the station, the gold was loaded into the luggage van of the Folkestone train for shipment to the coast and from there to the Crimea. The strongboxes were placed into two specially-built Chubb safes constructed of three-quarter inch tempered steel. Each safe weighed five hundred and fifty pounds. Each safe was fitted with two locks, requiring two keys, or four keys altogether. For security, each key was individually protected. Two keys were entrusted to the railway dispatcher who kept them locked in his office. A third was in the custody of Mr. Edgar Trent, president of the Huddleston and Bradford. And the fourth key was given to Mr. Henry Fowler, manager of the Huddleston and Bradford. The presence of so much gold in one place naturally aroused the interest of the English criminal elements. But in 1855 there had never been a robbery from a moving railway train."There are some definite differences between the actual robbery on which Crichton based his work and the movie. The actual plot involved four criminals - Pierce, Agar, the railway guard Burgess, and a railway clerk named Tester and all four keys were kept on railroad premises in London and Folkestone. But as it turned out the two Foilkestone keys were not used. In addition the guard's van was not locked from the outside; Pierce and Agar were let in by Burgess, and a share of the loot was handed out to Tester at stations.The crown jewel as far as supplementary material is concerned is the scene specific commentary by writer-director Crichton. Even given the intervening 18 years between the release of the movie and the recording of the commentary Crichton seems to have a wealth of anecdotal and technical recollections of the making of the movie and displays a genuine affection for the movie. We learn about the research he did for the book and the machinations that went on behind the scenes. Apparently the largely British and Irish crew initially had little respect for the young director until he ordered a copy of his 1978 movie "Coma" for them to watch, after which he got more respect. In another incident Crichton's hair caught on fire when the locomotive emitted burning embers.There is also (as was common for MGM releases in the earlu days of DVD) an 8-page glossy, full color booklet with trivia surrounding the making of the movie.
Angela Bassett / Halle Berry. Halle Berry is very attractive and I am sure that the roll she played in "Monster's Ball" was difficult but Angela Bassett deserved the monumental distinction of being the first African American Actress to win a leading role Oscar.Angela Bassett played her role in this movie and not only did an excellent job but also a very realistic one of just what Tina Turner and countless other women have went through at the hands of an abusive man.I highly recommend this movie and thank goodness Tina Turner survived and made it. I only wish Ms. Bassett would have been given the credit she was due by awarding her the Oscar
V For Vendetta. Great flick with plenty of special effects and great audio and it even has the semblance of a plot. Politicians, watch out
As True Now As Then. Back in my Army days ("When Dinosaurs Ruled the Earth") it was a common belief among many, if not most, of us laboring for the cause in green fatigues, that every "shavetail" 2nd lieutenant who ever put a pair of gold bars on his shoulders or an "L.T." clip on his collar, should be required to watch John Ford's "Fort Apache" before he drew his first duty assignment...and should be also required to write an essay on what it meant. Same thing, we all consensed, should apply to every officer being promoted to a higher rank, right on up the scale. The reason for this, we felt, was that everyone "moving up" needed to always be reminded that "The Book" (i.e. military regs, tactics, etc.) was only truly workable as a GENERAL GUIDEand was not a foolproof blueprint for micro-managing warfare (or LIFE) on a day by day basis. All too often, obsessively going "by the book"...and ignoring all contrary circumstances around you...will land you in a "heap o' trouble".And this by-the-book (or "Company S.O.P.") "mania" is a nuisance factor that often bedevils people to this very day in all walks of life---from hospital staffs to office staffs to restaurant workers to all manner of others---where "the book" both intervenes and interferes with a practical "real world" effort at "getting the job done". All to often 'the book" iscompiled by "executive" types who have nothing better to do than sit around and make up silly, unrealistic, and impractical rules and regulations (most of them...with regard to consequential "spill-over effects"...not very well thought out at all) that OTHER people have to TRY and make workable."Fort Apache" tells the story of a "Book Soldier", Henry Fonda's "Col. Owen Thursday", a by-the-numbers martinet who has come to the Arizona frontier with his head full of Von Clausewitz, Sun Tsu, Alexander and Bonaparte , and West Pointconcepts of "pinchers" and "envelopments". He is an arrogant elitist who views American Indians as crude, unsophisticated savages and who eyes their capabilities as fighting men withscorn and dismissive disregard.John Wayne plays "Captain Kirby York", Fort Apache's executive officer behind Fonda, and the leader of a cadre of veteran officers and NCOs who KNOW the territory and KNOW their adversaries, the Apaches....know them WELL ENOUGH, in fact, toRESPECT them. AND to account for their strengths and capabilities in dealing with them.All this knowledge and "feel" for the Apaches means nothing to Thursday when he comes swaggering in, and he takes no time in letting everyone know everything will henceforth be done HIS way. The garrison is troubled and uneasy about "His" way, but they have no option but to follow his lead. He IS the colonel.York tries to reason with Thursday but gets nowhere. He even gets used most egregiously (and dishonorably) by Thursday in luring the legendary Cochise over the border from Mexico into U.S. territory. There seems to be no ploy the arrogant colonel won't use in his quest for promotion and prestige within the army.Thursday gets HIS comeuppence in the end...but, unfortunately, he makes a lot of other GOOD men pay the ultimate price for his own incompetence and ineptitude along with him. In many ways the Thursday character is a bit of a take-off on George Custer, although Thursday's demise is based more on the Fetterman Massacre of 1866 rather than on Little Big Horn.Ford's direction is sure-handed in this, and the performances of John Wayne and Henry Fonda are superb. The black & white cinematography is excellent and the jaunty use of 19th century cavalry music...particularly "The Girl I Left Behind Me"...is enough to get one's head nodding and toes tapping whenever the band stikes up. "Fort Apache" may be, overall, the best of the famous "Cavalry Trilogy" , with "She Wore A Yellow Ribbon" coming in a VERY close second behind it. "Rio Grande" is not a klunker, either, by a long shot...but doesn't really have the sheer power of the first two. And the only reason this trilogy is not a "Quartet" is that "The Horse Soldiers" is a "Southern", rather than a "western", and no Indians are involved in it.(And, note: if you like this rip-roaring cavalry stuff, you also need to check out Errol Flynn's "They Died With Their Boots On" and "Santa Fe Trail")."Fort Apache" should have been DVD-available much earlier than now, but it IS here at last, so lets all enjoy this marvelous piece of Americana
The night of the fricken Twisters. The movie is awesome. I really enjoyed the ending where the family is in there 1980 dodge minivan and they are driving 200mph and just happen to always stay right ahead of the tornadoes
Informative. Nice little video for my Zen during my long wait at the doctor's office.  Confucius overcame many difficulties
family great. From Soup to Nuts is a great watch.  The entire family, especially the 11 year old, absolutely loved it.  My husband is a huge Laurel and Hardy fan - now our childred are.  Thanks for making family night a great one
Kind of surreal... Over the course of 90 minutes, we see Uganda's army run a faux invasion of the &quot;Golan Heights&quot;, Amin Dada lecture physicians about drunkeness and a meeting of Amin's cabinet where he blasts his foreign minister (who was executed soon after filming) for the negative portrayal of his regime in the world press. It's hard not to laugh at Amin when he claims that he can command crocodiles or tells a large group of educated doctors that the people of Uganda won't respect them if they are drunks. Then you remember this same man killed 350,000 of his own people, and some of the laughs get a little uneasier. I think what fascinates people about Amin is how he could simultaneously be so ruthless and yet, so buffonish. Certainly this documantary (in which some of the shots admittedly were set up by Amin himself) is a good demonstration of the latter and hints towards the former. By the way, this is a great print of the film and Criterion even includes a 25 minute plus interview with Schroder recalling anecdotes about the making of it
Mein Gott!. I love this movie, okay.  It has to be the most vulgar movie I have ever watched in my entire life, but I love this movie.  I kept thinking, Only the Coen Brothers could pull this off before I discovered that they had only produced it!  This movie works despite its vulgarity, which I will return to later.  This movie works because of the kid--what a sweetheart!  Such patience.  Such love.  Such faith.  He actually touches the black heart and washes it whiter than snow.  This is one of the few believable "conversion" movies because the plot is not "contrived"--but grows out of the nature and action of the protagonists.My only problem with it is the vulgarity.  See, as I was watching it, I sooo wanted to share it with my 12-year old because it was very, very funny (gun-toting elves, drunk crude Santa, a child who acts like a child, the three B's) and the message was actually an important and well illustrated one--that good wills out--but because of the over-the-top language and the three B's (you know what I'm talking about), I dared not.  This is "The Grinch," This is "Scrooge," This is the "Three Godfathers"--all works wherein the black heart is touched by purity and transformed--but so much more honestly presented.  I think they could have done without the vulgarity and gotten the same message across.  In fact, I wish they had done without it.
He's just a boy who can't say no. "Shampoo" is probably the most sophisticated sex comedy ever made in this country. It's a very clear-eyed (and very funny) look at how love and lust get inextricably mixed up with up with power, money, position, and politics. Of course, contrary to almost every critique posted here, George (Warren Beatty), the philandering Beverly Hills hairdresser, is the primary victim of the rules of the game, late-60s Southern California-style. Unlike the protagonist of the great Renoir movie, George doesn't end up dead, but he's left alone, abandoned by all the women he's bedded, looking like a naive fool. And that's George's sin--he's an uncynical romantic in a world that doesn't know the difference between felt emotion and deliberate calculation. He sleeps with women because he genuinely likes them. For him, taking a woman to bed is an extension of doing her hair--it's an intimate act in which he makes her look and feel better. All the other characters in the movie use sex as part of a larger plan--they each have some separate goal on their mind, which they achieve in one way or another, and George is left behind with his silly emotional and sexual vulnerabiliy. He's Don Giovanni in reverse--the boy who can't say no because he actually gives a damn--and he pays a steep price for his availability. Playing a slightly out of it dupe, Beatty has never been better or more dazzlingly glamorous. And he's surrounded by a flawless ensemble cast--Lee Grant is simply astonishing as a deceived and deceiving Beverly Hills matron, and Julie Christie, in her flared pants and mini skirts, is peerlessy sexy as the 1968 version of a Rodeo Drive courtesan. Thanks to Robert Towne,  "Shampoo" also has some of the most natural, unforced, yet revealing dialog ever heard in an American movie--nothing is stylized or italicized, but every nonchalant remark hits target like a polished Wilde epigram. Delectable
A Valuable Message. I liked this movie very much.  It was entertaining, funny, charming, but I especially liked the "twist" toward the end.  I felt it put out a message that really needs to be understood by everyone these days.  That is, as this movie attempts to show, the feelings shared between partners in same-sex relationships are no different than those shared in hetero relationships.  They are just as genuine, moving, loving, and caring.  Everyone can relate to them if they just let themselves.  I applaud the writer and those who starred in the movie
Great Program for Kids. My kids & I absolutely LOVE this program. The kids on this program are having fun, because it is a fun workout, and my kids & I enjoy watching these happy little faces exercise. Kids are motivated by other kids having fun, and the joyful atmosphere that Rich Grogan instills helps make this video my families personal favorite
Finally, a great DVD  film transfer of this classic!. This DVD put out by NoShame Films is the best quality DVD of this film ever put out!The picture and sound are of the highest quality. Even if you already have a DVD of this movie, throw it away and get this one. None of the others compare.
My Favorite Episode. I don't have television, haven't for 11 years. When I learned CBS was allowing free viewing over the internet I checked it out and started watching episodes of CSI, CSI NY, CSI Miami, and NCIS. I found NCIS to be my favorite and this particular show Dead And Unburied is my favorite so far. I enjoy the light-heartedness of NCIS. So I decided to download this episode from Amazon Unbox.I really wish Amazon Unbox would allow me to burn shows I've purchased. As it is they are restricted to viewing on my computer. When Unbox expands this service to allow me to burn DVDs I will likely purchase many more shows this way. I like selecting individual shows
salsa-riffic!. i just rented this movie without hearing anything about it. i am a lover of foreign flicks to begin with especially anything the bbc films produce. this film combines humor, romance and the energetic salsa music together perfectly. i was intrigued by all of the various characters and felt that they all blended together in perfect harmony. i can't wait to find the soundtrack and keep it for my collection. a great surprise and heartwarming film about romance and love and its many ways
Well Done Movie with Some Language Mix-Ups. Successful in describing what Cuba is all about, this film is also about life. It made me think that, not only in this writer's case, but great writings or other creative works were made in prison. There is something about prison that can force us grasp the nature of life. Or perhaps it can also be said that nothing can kill truly liberal mind.In the movie, English was spoken among Cubans in Cuba, whereas suddenly they start speaking Spanish without translation. I find it very annoying.  It makes a perfect sense if they spoke Spanish in Cuban prison and start speaking English after he left Cuba. I live in Miami and am surrounded by thousands of Cubans, so I know that Cubans in Cuba do not typically speak English to have conversations among themselves. I don't mind subtitles while the scene was in Cuba, and I wish what was what they did. Unfortunately this language mix-up is the reason why I cannot give 5 stars.
Honest opinion of Ryan's Daughter. Superb video and audio quality on the DVD and simply a great movie!
very funny and entertaining. I love this movie. I am a great fan of both Doris Day and James Garner- legends of hollywood.
Ooh, so hot but you're breakin' my heart!. "Twelfth Night" may be one of Shakespeare's lesser known plays but this production really hit it with my entire family - even my two sons, ages 15 and 11, loved it!  The trailer/teaser for the movie played up the gender-bender aspects of the plot but don't be misled - there's nothing gay about this movie.  "Twelfth Night" is all about mistaken identity, wistful and fruitless love, and runaway egos.  All's well that ends well, and all does.  Ben Kingsley as Feste is my favorite character, and his song at the movie's close really wraps things up well.  He, Helena Bonham-Carter, and Nigel Hawthorne are the best known members of what proved to be a very good cast.  So, why not 5 stars???  I am profoundly deaf.  The first time I saw this movie, it was on VHS with poor-to-average closed captioning.  I so looked forward to seeing it on DVD.  The DVD version that I purchased is NOT CLOSED CAPTIONED!  What's with that!  Just copy the text from Shakespeare's play and add it to the DVD!  I simply cannot believe that this is happening in the 21st Century.  I now HATE this product and feel quite slighted by the people responsible for making it available to the public
Sergeant York CD. So glad that this wonderful and inspiring movie finally made it to CD format.  Wonderful quality.  This is my husband's all-time favorite movie and it is definitely worth viewing again and again for the inspirational message it delivers.
Absolutely riveting!. No this isn't Courtney of Friends, but once you get past that - this is MUST WATCH TV!  While the show has content that can be shocking, it is so well written and edited it all fits.  It is definitely a sequential drama and makes much more sense watching the episodes back to back.  That fleshes out the characters so you start to care about and understand them.  Courtney shows her acting chops best at those moments when she is silent and lets her expressions say it all because sometimes her dialog is a bit stilted.  The best character is the functional schizophrenic photographer, Don Konkey.  He is exhibits an endearing combination of weirdness, loyalty, insight and sweetness to become the break-out star of this series.  If you only watched one episode and wrote this one off - go back and watch a few back to back and you may just find yourself addicted.
Simply Inspirational. This book is so easy to read it is as if you are having a conversation with a close friend.  I was so inspired by this book, I am ordering many more to pass along
She's old... so old... she creaks... and pops.... An average MST 3K, hillarious in some parts, a little dull in others, but the good parts are worth the 4 stars alone. The main focus of joke-making in this episode is the music and the horrible british accents. A great  episode for MST 3K fans, but if you're new to the show, start with a better  episode
Fox has not taste. Once again, Fox has cancelled a brilliant show. While it is occasionally a bit off-color, the dialogue is brilliant, but apparently people couldn't follow the episodes, so no one watched this great show, and it was cancelled. I haven't tried the download option, but I highly recommend the show
Magnificent. `The Greatest Story Ever Told' is magnificent.  It has a classic sweep and splendor that lives up to its title.  While there are some questional interpretations, and some scenes are unnecessarily plodding, the performances are strong and the crowd scenes are often rousing.  Filmed in Utah, the cinematography gives grandeur to match the film.  Max Von Sydow provides a proper transcendence as Jesus, and Charlton Heston demonstrates both passion and prudent understatement as John the Baptist.   Honorable mention goes to Telly Savalas who gives the right ambiance to Pilate.  Furthermore, Judas's portrayal as the conflicted betrayor has a proper subtlety even if his lines don't always match the character.  ("I don't want the money," the apostle known for robbing the common purse, says.)  Sal Mineo, Sidney Poitier, Donald Pleasance and a myriad of others also guest star.  Even John Wayne makes a token appearance as the centurion that can be measured in seconds, making 'The Greatest Story...' the 'A Bridge Too Far' of Christian cinema.George Stevens wrote, directed, and produced this epic.   His technical aspects solidify a masterful treatment.  However, one could quibble with his directing for making it too tame in places and for his screenplay's discrepancies.   (In another example, Martha chastises Jesus, but in the Bible she says, "Even now you could bring him [Lazarus] to life.")  While Stevens' interpretations substitute scripture in places, the raising of Lazarus, Jesus triumphal entry into Jerusalem, and his crucifixion give the spark of passion this venue deserves.   Furthermore, implementing Handel's Messiah in key scenes is a masterstroke.  All said and done, 'The Greatest Story Ever Told' is a reverent and relevant portrayal of Jesus and his life.
God said to Abraham "Kill me a son". The wind is in the thorn tree.Yep, there is nothing exceptional to this Rambo formula remake. They use all the same clich they probably recycles some of the old Rambo blood and bullets.Now you ask "why we should watch the Rambo rehash?" Well I'll tell you. Because instead of Richard Crenna, you get Tommy Lee Jones and most of his facial expressions; when they are not being hidden behind blood and hair. And instead of Sylvester Stallone, who was very good in "Oscar", you get Benicio Del Toro who can look more like a man betrayed than an old boxer.The story is as old as the hills. L.T. Bonham (Tommy Lee Jones) is called out of retirement to track down a mysterious person or persons unknown that killed some hunters. The person turns out to be a soldier Aaron Hallman (Benicio Del Toro) that he trained to kill. Through a series of mishaps Aaron gets loosed and the inept authorities must compete with L.T. for the retrieval or destruction. However L.T. knows he is to only one to do it.So does Aaron get away so he can kill again?Does L.T. make his first kill or is he really a pusssy-cat?Do the inept authorities realize their limits before it is too late?Do we come away with any new insights?
Very Good British Crime Drama!. "Essex Boys" is a very good British gangster flick. The main character Jason Locke (Sean Bean) has just been released from prison. After a very long stay, he finds that he is on the outside looking in. With the drug ecstasy making some of his former friends and acquaintances a fortune, he  decides that he wants in on the action. And not just a little action, but a partnership. However, he is asking for more than he bargained for.Enter John Dyke (Tom Wilkinson) who has already had his feel of prison; and although he is running drugs [on a low key basis] Jason Locke demands that he be made a partner with full entitlement to funds from the lucrative drug market. The problem is that Jason Locke is too wild in his ways, whereas John Dyke wants to be low key. Moreover, John has already stated that he doesn't ever want to see the inside of a prison again, and will do anything to see this never happens again: And for him, Jason Locke is a threat.Another character in the film, Billy (Creed-Miles) is the only sympathetic character in the film. He is not a killer or bad person, he just hangs out with the wrong crowd. He has been hired by Jason to be his driver. At the same time, he is an acquaintance of John Dyke. Events occur [no spoilers] in which Billy finds he is not safe anywhere. The film is great, and Sean Bean gives an outstanding performance as a hot-headed ex-con, who finds he has pushed John Dyke a little too far. Highly recommended. [Stars: 4.5
My favorite movie. Sometimes you just want a movie that is predictable, but that you can watch over and over again
return to lonesome dove. the movie was very clear and the colors very bright. we were very pleased with our purchase and will continue to order from amazon,the shippment was there right when it was suppose to be, and no damage to product
Great Music! Great Step Routine!. I love the step workout. If I only have 10 minutes to work out, I'll stretch first, then start wherever I last left the tape cued up. Music is great. Cher is good about cheering you on without being cutesy.I didn't even know the instructor was Kelli Roberts until I'd read one of the reviews...it doesn't list her name on the box at all. Now that I know who she is I want to get her 10 Minute Solution Kick Boxing workout
Brilliant but unwatchable. I saw this at what I believe was it's European premiere in Edinburgh. It was like watching a beautifully choreographed car crash - sublime yet horrifying. It's heart is black. It casts no light. Mike Leigh's vision of the human condition is here presented in so bleak a light that it can only corrode anyone who watches it. I recall that it made me feel physically sick at the time and I described it as the antithesis of everything I believe art should be - yet it is, undoubtebly, art. It is a work of brilliance which does not shine. A black, black, diamond. Yet I still believe it should never have been made. Most people live in hope; this film denies that. Whilst there are some who recognise the nihilistic world it presents, most will be shocked by it - and it's greatest disservice is presenting the world as it is to a majority which will deny it, and live their squinting lives not seeing because of it. A work of too, too, accurate brillance
A WONDERFUL VEHICLE FOR ERROL FLYNN. The performances of Flynn and Rathbone shine in this fine remake of the 193O original - which conveniently used much of the same aerial footage.  Major Brand (Basil Rathbone), the commanding officer of a squadron of the British Royal Flying Corps stationed in France, has been called a butcher by his top officer, Captain Courtney (Errol Flynn) - because of his hardened attitude toward sending inexperienced young flyers to their death.  Courtney and his best friend, Lieutenant Scott (David Niven), have their own way of coping with the constant death of new recruits; they drink a toast to the dead, sing a song, and then go back to devising diverting, thrill-seeking pranks...It has been implied that Howard Hughes sued Warner Bros. claiming that certain story ideas and techniques which were used in this film were curiously similar to some of those used in his 193O production HELL'S ANGELS. Hughes lost the suit when it was determined that the disputed ideas originated with John Monk Saunders via his personal experiences in the air service: it WAS the basis for the first AA-winning film, the 1927 silent WINGS.  In 1941, Warners blended aspects of their 1936 film CEILING ZERO and this one &amp; came up with FLIGHT PATROL (!). Among the musical numbers which are heard in this vastly entertaining film include such vintage goodies as PACK UP YOUR TROUBLES IN AN OLD KIT BAG &amp; POOR BUTTERFLY
Think you used enough dynamite there, Butch?. First off, let me state up front that I have been remiss in my reviewing duties. It's just that I haven't really found anything over the past few months that excited me enough to write about it here for you, the Amazon readers who may rely on the guidance of a twenty-six year old grocery store employee who would like to be the next Nick Hornby or P.J. O'Rourke. I apologize for my tardiness.Secondly, I love this movie. I first saw it a few months ago as part of my Film class's critique of traditional Hollywood genres and how they have been tweaked over time. Needless to say, "Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" provided the perfect example of this: what Western would have the heros run away from the law, much less take time to ride a bike accompanied by an insipid (but inspired) pop song? "Butch Cassidy" is everything that is right about the big-budget Hollywood film: star performers who don't mangle the material with their egos but rather play with the conventions of what they're supposed to do, all under the watch of a talented if not well-known director, as the screenplay marries the real history of the notorious outlaws with the liberties of a real shoot-'em-up Western.I loved this movie so much, I ended up doing a scene analysis of the second hold-up as my final project for the class. And got an "A", of course...So now we have the special-edition version, presented in widescreen and clear and crisp as the day it was first shown in American theaters in the fall of 1969. Paul Newman and Robert Redford carry the film through their obvious chemistry, and "Brokeback Mountain" jokes aside, they make the perfect bickering couple for this rollicking trip through a not-so-familar Old West.The film also features some top-notch work from Katharine Ross (Elaine from "The Graduate") as the woman they share (no, not onscreen at least), Strother Martin as the one man willing to give the outlaws a straight job (and gets shot by bandits for his trouble), and the world's unluckiest employee of Mr. E.H. Harriman (whose superposse symbolizes the modern times that catch up with Butch and Sundance even in Bolivia).I haven't gotten into all the special features yet, but I recommend the commentary by Goldman (who is rightfully proud of this film). Also, the "History Behind the Lens" documentary is interesting and (at ninety minutes) a treat for history buffs who want to see not only how the film differed from the story, but how often it got it *right*. The theatrical trailers are interesting nuggets from a time when Jerry Bruckheimer hadn't ruined movies with achingly slow pans and close-ups set in dramatic lighting with overbearing orchestral scores...or Tom Cruise shirtless. And "All of What Follows Is True" gives us more recent interviews with the principal cast still around (Newman, Redford, and Ross).All in all, "Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" is an impossibly giddy mix of drama and comedy set against the backdrop of a dying breed (the Western outlaw) and the last days of the frontier (not in North America, but South). Yes, there are problems with the film, but the overall effect of the piece leaves audiences satisfied that they took the journey. And it doesn't hurt that Redford and Newman are enjoying the hell out of the work they're doing, which shows through to the audience. It may be a cliche, but "Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" still delivers.If only all Westerns could be this good..
State and Main, , The Old Water Mill or Without Title. This gem of a movie was probably not a blockbuster when released. The storyline is thin and almost non-existent, it could be summed up as "Everyone gets the chance to screw up  a second time". Nevertheless, there are enough  twists and turns to make what story there is interesting.  This must be the sort of  movie that every good  actor and actress would love to have a role in  as the screenplay has been written by an accomplished playwright. It is a farcical melodrama rather than a comedy but nonetheless highly enjoyable.A film-making team, hard up on critical funds, has just been thrown out of a small town in New Hampshire. Their  movie's plot necessitates the choice of a small town New England locale and a water mill (one reason why they are short of funds is that they had to build an old water  mill replica in the New Hampshire town).  As the movie begins The Director and his crew find themselves in a small town in Vermont (actually most of the scenes are shot in Connecticut or Massachusetts). The  beauty of the location is well-captured by excellent photography.  The  makers of  "State and Main" did not fall into the trap of shooting the  film during the Fall. New England  fall colours would be a major distraction although  Alfred Hitchcock's black comedy "The Trouble With Harry" succeeded despite being shot in Vermont at the peak of the fall  leaf colour season, but then Hitchcock was an exceptional genius.The small town  has being going on in its leisurely way until the film crew arrive. The obvious star of  "State and Main"  is Philip Seymour Hoffman a previously little known Hollywood actor whose first appeared on the screen as  the spoilt rich Daddy supported George Willis Jr. In that memorable Al Pacino film, "Scent of a Woman". Hoffman's key role in "State and Main" is as the author and screen play writer for the movie within the movie.  The better known Hollywood star Alec Baldwin  plays the lesser role of the film-in making's male star. He is portrayed as a lustful male whose sexual preference is of under age nubile girls.The  Director is  played by William H. Macy, who is completely unflappable no matter what. The producer arrives after the crew has settled in. The role  is played by droopy-eyed  David Paymer, who is  completely obsessed with money and will bribe anyone to get things moving. The   male star lead is almost fatally distracted by a young teenager (Julia Stiles).  The female lead  and siren, Sarah Jessica Parker,  demands substantial extra money for  appearing naked  in  a scene claiming that she has found religion. Hoffman is smitten  in the heart  by an attractive  young woman  (Rebecca Pidgeon) in the town who is engaged or semi-engaged to the local bad man and town councillor.I will leave it to the reader's imagination to find out if the  film crew gets the  second chance to screw up again. The movie  is directed by David Mamet, a leading American playwright. Mamet wrote the screen plays for  "The Postman Always Rings Twice", "The Untouchables" , and had a minor role as a performer  in the  1986 thriller  "Black Widow". He has directed several movies aside from this one in the past 17 years.It is evident that Mamet , who also wrote the screen play for this  charming melodrama, was at a loss for a suitable  title for the film, just like the director in the play, who wanted to call his movie "The Old Mill", only to find out, upon arrival in the Vermont town, that the  much advertised "Old Mill" had burnt down in 1960. So Mamet settled on the uninspiring title "State and Main"" from the intersection  where the  town's brand new traffic lights  still stand at the start of the movie. Interestingly enough the title for the DVD version of "State and Main" circulating in Greece is translated as  "Without Title". I am fairly confident that this little known  102 minute movie will become a  movie buff's classic one day.
Dickens. This is a must for Dickens fans.  Great story about estate and probate litigation gone crazy
An intense look at the psychological aftermath of war. This is a great movie.  The time: immediately following the Second World War.  The place: Scotland, specifically the Scotts Highland Regiment.  The Regiment has returned from hard combat in North Africa and Europe, and once again is esconced in its barracks in the Scottish Highlands--the place in which it has been headquartered for over three hundred years.  The Acting Commanding Officer is Col. Jock Sinclair (Alec Guiness), a rough, uneducated man from the lower classes who worked his way up to Colonel from the ranks.  Sinclair got his promotion in the desert, fighting Rommel, and one senses that these experiences have created strong bonds of friendship between Sinclair and certain other officers in the battalion.  Now higher headquarters has assigned a new Commanding Officer to the battalion--Col. Basil Barrow, a university-educated man from the upper classes who comes from a long line of officers who served with, and indeed commanded, the battalion.  But Barrow, for all that, is viewed as an outsider and newcomer--while the other officers forged friendships in the war, fighting the Germans, Barrow was in the Pacific theater.  Sinclair is relegated to second-in-command.  Sinclair is deeply resentful of Barrow, and immediately gets off on the wrong foot with his new commander, unintentionally belittling Barrow's war service, most of which involved the horrors of being a POW tortured by the Japanese.  In fact, Colonel Barrow is deeply scarred by his wartime experience, and has lost perspective in dealing with his officers.  He is a martinet, and appears to forget that leadership involves earning the respect of one's subordinates--it is not simply bestowed from on-high.  Although both men love the Regiment above all else, this film is about an implacable conflict between Sinclair and Barrow.  For Sinclair does not respect Barrow, who he views as a "spry wee gent who will not command the Battalion for very long..."The interaction between Barrow and Sinclair provides for an intense psychological confrontation.  This is a war movie without a war.  None is needed.  This is a superb study in leadership, confrontation, loyalty, and the nature of the tradition-rich Highland Regiment.  The class divisions among the Regimental officers is interestingly portrayed.  The entire cast turns in a fine performance, and Guiness is truly stellar as the rough-spoken Colonel Sinclair.The DVD is beautifully remastered, with crisp audio and video.  I've been keeping an old ratty videocassete of this film for years, hoping that the film would eventually turn up on DVD.  Now it has, and any film afficianado will enjoy this crisp, fast-paced and intense story
Great movie, but poor transfer. This is my favorite version of the book. The romance between Jane Seymour's Ethne and Beau Bridge's Harry is the key to the story here which is the way it should be. The story (of course) is also solid. However - this is DVD sports an iffy transfer that seems to have been taken from some shoddy elements. The sound also is iffy in parts. I love this movie though so I had no hesitation in picking up this DVD
Fantastic horror cult fave!. Three lovely ladies who have been friends since College decide to take a vacation together camping as later it becomes a nightmare when two hillbilly cretins kidnap them to their house occupied by their psychoctic mother then hell begins to start as they must escape.One of the most underrated horror comedy gems of the early 80's and one of my favorite horror movies! Charles Kaufman ( the director) with Troma Films released this movie in 1980 and was a hit in theaters. It became a cult favorite around the world and is still one of the finest low budget independent horror movies there is, the movie blends gruesomess with some humor, gore and sleaze  for this is a terrific horror comedy cult classic from the people who brought you "The Toxic Avenger".The DVD has decent picture and sound as the extras are a commentary, clips from Troma's Edge TV showing of Mother's Day, Radioation March short, a history of Lloyd Kaufman told by his brother Charles, interview with Charles Kaufman, and trailers to other Troma movies.Also recommended: "The Hills Have Eyes ( 1978 and 2006)", " The Texas Chainsaw Massacre series & 2003 remake", " Last House on The Left", " I Spit on Your Grave", " Friday The 13th series", "The Burning", " House of 1000 Corpses", " The Devil's Rejects", "Maniac ( 1980)", " Scream", "Silent Night Deadly Night", " Nightmare on Elm Street", "Sleepaway Camp", " Freddy vs. Jason", "Halloween", "Wrong Turn", "High Tension", " Halloween 1 & 2", " Wolf Creek", " Hostel", " Saw 1 & 2", " Troma's War", " Bloody Birthday", "The Toxic Avenger", " Driller Killer", " Tromeo and Juliet", " Bloodsucking Freaks", " Happy Birthday to Me", " Henry: Portrait of a Serial Killer", "Cabin Fever", " Terror Train", " Blue Velvet", "Pink Flamingos", "Lost Highway", " Jeepers Creepers 1 & 2", " Misery", " The Toolbox Murders", " Street Trash", " Psycho ( 1960)", " Just Before Dawn", "Terror Firmer", and " From Dusk Till Dawn"
Neuremburg Trial of Infany. I found this to be well done, close to factual.  It would have been better if they had spent more time on the war crimes prisoners' personalities.
As Good as an Oscar Nominee Gets. All right, this is five stars by the special standards of Hollywood. One could project other expectations. However, I was both shaken and entertained when I saw the film first run, and I remembered it well enough to buy it to show my teenage son a couple decades later. Is that recommendation enough
Be afraid, be very afraid... Seth Brundle (Goldblum) is a scientist who might just have invented the world's first teleporter. The only bug (pun intended) is the fact that it doesn't handle flesh and live teleportations. Ronnie (Geena Davis) is a writer for Particle magazine and will stay by his side, documenting via video his attempts to break through. Upon successfully teleporting a baboon, Seth gets cocky and decides to try and teleport himself; a fly slips into the pod while he teleports. At first, Seth finds newfound strength and agility, but pretty soon he's changing for the worst.This is one of Cronenberg's best films, masterfully directed and executed. It's also Jeff Goldblum's finest performance to date! Not content on doing a mere remake (the original Fly (1958) is a much different film starring Vincent Price), Cronenberg brings this film to the next level--literally. It's filled with deep human drama and let's not forget the award-winning special effects! Top notch effects contribute in putting this film ahead of the pack of other mid-eighties sci-fi/horror flicks. The film overall has aged well (it's already been twenty years) if not for the eighties fashion statements.I'm having a hard time figuring out which it is more; a sci-fi or a horror film? I guess it's a fusion of both (I gotta stop these bad puns!). Whether you see it for the first time or revisit it, Cronenberg's The Fly is a great gory, character-driven, profoundly human film. The second disc is chock full of special features: various documentaries and a making-of, screenplays, the original short story on which the original film is based, trailers for all the Fly movies ever made, deleted scenes, and much much more. A must have for any Cronenberg fan
Hilarious Comedy. This is a stunning comedy starring Jim Carrey who plays a lawyer, who is incapable of telling the truth or keeping his promises (is this really a surprise!!!). Things make a dramatic turn, when he fails to keep a promise to turn up at his son's birthday party: the neglected son (brilliantly played by Justin Cooper as Max Reede) makes a wish for his father not to lie for just one day. The boy's wish is granted and his dad loses his ability to lie, a tragic affliction for any lawyer. He cannot lie in court as well as to all those around him, like his secretary and mother.This now honest man displays his comic talents that is bound to set you laughing your lungs out. Carrey is ably supported by his ex-wife Audrey (Maura Tierney) who is now dating Cary Elwes, a simpleton of a man.This is one of Jim Carrey's best films. His facial contortions, voice and crazy humour stands him out as an outstanding comedian. This is as good as it gets. The director, Tom Shadyac should be applauded for this high quality production.This movie should not be missed by anyone with a sense of humour and all those fathers who neglect their children for the sake of making money.
Lange did deserve the award!. Jessica Lange plays a stressed out &quot;crazy&quot; military housewife who moves with her husband tommy lee jones and kids from hawaii to alabama. She gets involved with his boss who is working on a radiation project Jones does not believe in. LAnge has to go far to prove her love for Jones and she does. i read this movie sat on the shelf for three years becase its distributor Orion went out of business. Excellant movie and beautiful music
Underrated, Entertaining. This is a fine movie that was unfairly panned by critics.  There IS some clumsiness to it--the use of flashbacks towards the end doesn't work.  They seem as thought they were originally written and filmed to be an earlier part of the narrative and then placed at the end to keep the earlier part of the narrative going at the snappy, exciting pace it is in the final movie, and to add a little of that during the final part, which after Horn is arrested moves at a slower pace.But the movie is still well-made, well-acted, and plenty entertaining. This is a revisionist western that doesn't downplay--well, doesn't downplay excessively--Horn's stature as a killer of men.  In the movie, Horn isn't reluctant to fire the first shot, or to keep shooting after a man is down.  When one of the cattle rustlers tries to ambush him in town, for example, Horn shoots him and as the man is lying in the mud, probably mortally wounded, Horn unnecessarily shoots him again. In the film, it is this incident that moves the cattlemen who employ him to sell him out.Horn comes off as something of a hapless, easily-manipulated rube in the movie--which it seems very unlikely he could have been and still be as cagey as he was. He's an idiot savant, of sorts, a man remarkably gifted when it comes to killing people, but inept at living in the civilized world. When he learns that he is being accused of killing the Nickell boy, not only does he diligently avoid proclaiming his own innocence, he goes out of his way at his own trial to annoy everyone and cast even more suspicion on himself.We remain sympathetic to Horn, though.  When we see him kill, he's always killing men much, much worse than himself.  The world is not a worse place for their departure.  And he's a helluva shot.  We Americans love a great shot
Epic Korean Drama. Koreans honor their greatest military hero in this epic drama which takes place in the late 1500s. The career and tactics of this Admiral are still studied at the U.S. Naval Academy, and doubtless those of other nations. The screenplay is based on a couple of novels, so there is some fiction, but the life of Yi Soon Shin was well documented, so there's plenty of fact supporting the story.If you are not familiar with Korean Drama, it's good to keep in mind that  this is not a Hollywood product, but they do very well with special effects and such considering the non-Hollywood budgets involved, and it's easy to see past all that and enjoy the tale being told.It's a long series, but presents an epic with power, depth and dimension and well worth watching it unfold through each and every episode.It would be great also to see KBS make other dramas available for viewing through Amazon, such as "Seoul 1945".
Surprisingly good. I thought that Supernatural would just be another Sci-Fi thriller, but then I started watching it and was surprised to discover that there is real plot line and character development. I think this show is wonderful and would recommend it to everyone
Top 5 of the funniest movies I have seen. This is a truly funny movie. The main character is so out of her element that it is totally belivable how ridiculous she is. This is one of those movies that you buy and come back to watch and invite your friends over for movie night. It's a good buy for your DVD collectio
JET LI- MY FAVOURITE MOVIE YET!. Of all the movies I have seen Jet Li in this one is my favourite.Dont get me wrong I have enjoyed Jets movies a lot, but I put this the top of my list. Hired as an assassin (which you know full well he would not hurt a fly let alone kill) Eric Tsang takes him under his wing only things dont go as planned. However, there are long action scenes where Jet gets to show us some excellent fighting, comedy scenes, and an good story to go with all of this. I must add that I did not think I would enjoy it much, but I proved myself wrong, and I am glad that I did
a dvd of clips from skits. very funny and if you think it is a movie it is not it is parts from monty python stuff. FUNNY MOMENTS!!!watch monty python and the holy grail before watching any othermonty python stuff. If you haven't seen it, watch it first or else you won't get it. The holy grail got me to watch more and more monty python stuff untill I was a #1 fan
I enjoyed the season premeir emensely. I enjoyed this series premier tremendously and am looking forward to watching the rest of the series.  Enterprise started before I had my PVR and was either on at a time I was unable to watch it or I never made time.  I watched one episode of Star Trek the Next Generation yesterday and it peaked my interest in watching some Star Trek episodes again.  Rather than watch episodes I've already seen, Enterprise looks like a great way to enjoy Star Trek episodes.As far as privacy concerns mentioned in other reviews, if you're paranoid, the internet isn't for you.  Keep your private things private, and not on networked computers.  Hopefully Amazon will remove reviews that do not at all pertain to the show they are attached to
My Favorite show. Boys town and sequael(Men in Boys Town) are the by far my most favorite films. I watch them on an old VHS copied from TV in Holland in the PAL format. I had to buy a special muti-system TV and VCR just to watch them. I hope when the DVD comes out they will come together as a 2 disk packet
luminousity on film. I will go out on a limb here and declare this movie the most heartbreakingly beautiful film I ever saw. I went to see it when it came out, and it continued to haunt me until I obtained my first VCR, whereupon it was one of the first movies I purchased. The story is told pretty much visually, and it is such an old story that the viewer doesn't need any more dialog than there is. One reviewer addressed the issue of Linda Manz's New York accent when the trio of protagonists is supposed to be from Chicago; but after multiple viewings, it became clear to me that these guys have been nomads since day one, so it's quite plausible to me that they, in fact, did come from New York originally (Richard Gere also has a decided Noo Yawk sound) and in the way of migrant workers, had only recently called Chicago home. The opening of the movie - old turn-of-the-century stills - is rife with the melting-pot faces that, mostly, started out in New York and went where the work was.When I need an example of absolute perfection - my opinion - in cinematography, this is the film I would always choose. So many isolated shots come to mind - a wine glass sitting on a riverbed underwater with a fish swimming by; five guys, conversing quietly in another language as they walk, bundled against winter; the panic of animals in a brushfire, a burning tractor coming out of a fire at night like a machine from hell - as well as spooky, ghostly sights of people around a campfire at night on a rivershore; faces that you would not normally consider beautiful taking on a luminous quality because of the talent of the filming. The story almost takes a back seat to the filmwork, although it is nearly a Greek tragedy; Bill, Linda, and Abby, migrant workers scraping to survive and stay together (Bill and Linda are sister and brother; Abby is Bill's lover) escape a situation in Chicago (Bill has inadvertently killed a bullheaded boss) by jumping a train loaded down with immigrants and ride to the wheatfields of the Texas Panhandle, where they become just three more harvesters until the owner, played with a sweet vulnerability by Sam Shepard, catches sight of Abby in the field and falls in love with her. Bill sees this in his unfocused mind as a way for his little group to advance, after he overhears a conversation between Shepard and a doctor which suggests that the young landowner is dying. Bill persuades Abby to accept the owner's offer of marriage - which, to her credit, she seems initially reluctant to do - reasoning that she can make the guy happy for the little time he has left and then the fortune he has will be all theirs. His plan hits a snag over three things; a suspicious foreman, who loves the landowner like a son and distrusts the trio of migrants right now; the landowner seems to hit his second wind after marrying Abby; and, the biggest bad thing, Abby falls in love with her new husband. Left out frustrated in the cold, suffering unending animosity from the foreman, Bill does the only intelligent thing he can think of and leaves, only to return some time later. From there things go very badly.This movie gives a real flavour of what the early 1900s must have been like - the serendipity of a travelling circus, apparently out of gas, who land on the owner's property and give performances in exchange for room and board (and probably gas)- these things happened then, impromptu little entertainments that seemed to have little relevance to the surroundings but which were eagerly looked for - diversions were few and far between, folks - and at one point, the newformed family group runs to meet and wave at Woodrow Wilson's passing train. The ordinary people doing the harvesting, though only touched on, are clear and real; you've seen these people in town, working, playing, fighting. And the pathos of the underclass comes out in something Linda Manz's character says halfway through in a voiceover: "You're only here once, and you should have it nice."This movie is tragic and beautiful, with good performances, especially from Linda Manz as the hapless younger sister who is at the mercy of circumstances she is powerless to control, and who learns the cruel lesson so many like her had to learn in those days; how to survive on your own. Ms. Manz pretty much disappeared from film after that and returned to private life. Too bad - she was a breath of fresh air in a lot of ways. In fact, the only people who really advanced filmwise after this were Richard Gere and Sam Shepard - although Gere isn't as good yet as he could be (again, my opinion) and Sam Shepard is underused or too preoccupied with his writing. I highly recommend this movie to cinematography aficianados and to anyone who likes a good period piece told with great sensitivity and minimal dialog.
It just........sparkles!!!. The architecture, fashion, interior design of post-war America is all right here in 50s NYC.  You just can't beat it!!  Yeah, it's corny in more places in one but the overall effect is one you don't want to miss
Excellent read!!!. I loved this book!  It is a very simple story on the surface, but how the entire story is an allegory is fascinating.  I think that people can learn just as much about governments in our history if they read this book rather than staring at history text books.  Ever since I've read it I've become very interested in the Russian Revolution and I want to learn more about how all of the characters in the book relate to real people.  I think the best thing about this book is that it teaches us a lesson and gives people a perfect example of how "power corrupts"
An Emotional Journey. I have no words to describe how this movie touched me. One girl's faith, passion for truth and justice, determination to follow a calling, and great love for her people changed everything. How pleased we should be that such a story was given the portrayel it deserves on this magnifiscent film. I highly reccomend
Very Depressing Tale. The title of this movie holds no secrets. The Virgin suicides may have its up and downs throughout the movie but the whole time the viewer is left with an impending sense of doom. Almost every aspect of this movie is fantastic, between the acting and a great story line, but this movie is truly dramatic in that it will no doubt influence your emotions
The Cutting Edge is a Cut Above. A working class Olympic hockey star is looking to turn pro when he gets a body slam that costs him peripheral vision and the chance to play in the big leagues. Enter a frosty, WASPy figure skater from Connecticut who has every thing she wants except a partner. She doesn't like them, or they cannot stand her.Her desperate Russian coach finds the hockey player who has the strength, stamina and spirit to skate with her, but he takes an instant dislike to her spoiled disposition and condescending temperament. The coach is convinced that both are partners who can bring home the elusive Olympic gold in figure-skating. The sparks fly.The chemistry between D. B. Sweeney and Moira Kelly is instaneous. Their evolution to a skating pair is filled with competition between them at every turn. The on-screen tension between the two build as the Nationals and Olympics draw nearer. (It doesn't hurt that Moira Kelly is actually an accomplished skater.)Sorry! You'll have to see the DVD because my narrative ends here. You will enjoy this drama-comedy of budding romance unless you don't have a romantic lace in your ice skates.There is no language or skin, but it is a story for mid-teen to adult. This is light fare that is well-acted with a good script. It is thoroughly enjoyable, and worth the purchase.My recommendations? Don't miss. Buy, don't sell.
Great movie. My son who turned nine was just thrilled with the concept of being called to active service from a video game.  Being a gamer himself I'm sure he dreams about being called to duty.  Lots of action & imagination for a little boy
ONE OF THE GREATEST MINISERIES THE 80-IS HAVE TO OFFER. Herman Wouk's book `Winds of war' became a bestseller upon its publication, just like its sequel `War and Remembrance' a few years later. These thick books, joining the fictional and historical events during Second World War, provided the subject matter for one of the greatest achievements in the history of the TV miniseries. This 6-DVD set covers the first book, with an 18-hour series shot in 1983.The plot concerns a military family named Henry, scattered and absorbed by the winds of war. We follow the patriarch Victor `Pug Henry (Robert Mitchum), an experienced military officer who in the spring 1939 is appointed to be a military attach for the USA in Berlin. He is accompanied by his dotty and yet quite likable wife Rhoda (Polly Bergen). Their children include an oldest son, the flyboy Warren (Ben Murphy), another son Byron (Jan-Michael Vincent) who is in Italy and falls in love with a bit older Jewish girl Natalie (Ali McGraw), who is the niece of the famous American-Jewish writer dr. Aaron Jastrow (John Houseman). The daughter Madeleine (Lisa Eilbacher) is the youngest of the three and works as a radio girl. In Berlin Pugh gets the hint of the atmosphere in the Nazi Germany of that time (like the fact Jews are treated second-class) and predicts the upcoming pact between Hitler (Gnter Meisner) and Stalin, both of who he gets to meet during the series. Byron and Natalie witness the first days of war, being caught in the midst of Warsaw, where Natalie followed her fianc, the American diplomat Leslie Slote (David Dukes). The series mixes the lives of the Henrys with the historical events of the war (the occupations of Poland and France; the blitz in London; the Nazi invasion of the Soviet Union; the beginnings of the `Final Solution' behind the lines of the occupied Russian territory; the Japanese attack on Pearl Harbor to name a few). The last episode of this first part of the story ends with the aftermath of Pearl Harbor: The German offensive is halted on the outskirts of Moscow, Pug goes to command a battleship and fight in the war, unsure of his feelings for the beautiful daughter of an old friend (Victoria Tennant), Byron fights in the submarine, while in the meantime Natalie, who fell in love with Byron and bore him a son, is left onboard a ship in Naples which is awaiting to live for Palestine, since she and her uncle could not find their way out of Fascist Italy, due to his passport complications.The above is just the basic description of the series and despite of what it may seem, it is not a soap opera, but rather an interesting chronicle of the war and a family influenced by its impact. Pug Henry gets to meet all the important players of the war (Churchill, Hitler, Roosevelt, Stalin...) and in this respect is somewhat similar to young Indiana Jones. The war itself is shown from these two viewpoints: the Henrys and the rest of the fictional characters vs. the historical ones (Hitler and his generals etc.)There are many things that make this show one of the miniseries highlights of its time. One of them is the excellent casting. Robert Mitchum brings his renowned charisma for the character of Pug and he does it in an excellent way. Ali MacGraw's headstrong Natalie makes a fine contrast to Jan-Michael Vincent's younger Byron. The historical characters are done more than convincingly. Thusly Ralph Bellamy is the definite FDR  (a role he had an opportunity to play years before in the theatre) and Howard Lang makes a believable Churchill. One must make a special reference to Gnter Meisner and his portrayal of Adolf Hitler. As it will be seen in the sequel, the director and producer Dan Curtis wanted Hitler to be overplayed. The reasons remain unknown and one can only guess that he wanted to make it less human in this way. Gnter Meisner, the late German actor who played Hitler few times during his career, although a bit too old for the role, managed to keep things under control, so despite the fact his Fhrer is stiffed and not altogether perfect, he manages to give a hint of the evil personage Hitler was. This is important to note, since his successor to the role for `War and remembrance', the British actor Steven Berkoff, was awful, playing the character as a total one-dimensional yelling buffoon. The role of Hitler is a hard and yet manageable task for an actor who can make a character, as shown by Bruno Ganz in the recent movie `Downfall'.One of the other appeals of the show is the fact it was shot on location, with attention put to details that make the historical accuracy. Most scenes were shot in my hometown Zagreb, the capital of Croatia, then still part of ex-Yugoslavia. The producers managed to use Zagreb's past as one of the former Austro-Hungarian capitals to recreate Berlin, Lisbon, Warsaw, etc. The scenery and the costumes evoke the era perfectly, thus making the whole thing believable to the viewer. Other locations included USA, Italy and some more. But the greatest asset is without the doubt the interesting plot which doesn't let go for a moment.It is also noticeable that some of the mistakes that were made in the sequel, `War and Remembrance', (the narrow scope of the victims of the Holocaust being one of them) are not present here. One can only get a hint of some of the future slips here, for example, the subtle message that all the Germans are bad and all Americans good.This DVD collection of the series deserves A+. Seven DVDs come packed in a nice sleeve. Besides the series, there are several interesting extra features: through the interviews with the cast, crew and Herman Wouk we learn about the process of adaptation, casting, shooting and the problems they all encountered while making this epic peace. Some of the footage includes things shot during the work on location in Zagreb.For anyone enjoying modern history, an excellent miniseries with the interesting plot or is simply interested in Second World War, this is a must-have. Highly recommendable
The Great Race. Classis style humour of the 1960's with classic actors playing consistent character roles.  One of my favorite early comedy movies.  "Push the button Max" will always be in my vocabulary.  If you like this one check out "It's a Mad Mad Mad Mad World", another 60's classic
Monster talks up Values! Monster plays Accordion!. Lots of folks have said that Barbet Schroeder's cinematic masterpiece and ballsy documentary "General Idi Amin Dada: A Self-Portrait" is chilling and horrifying. Let's set the record straight: no, it's not.It's funny. It's downright hysterical. And it's absolutely REQUIRED viewing to get a better perspective of this Ugandan success story, this uniquely self-made man, this 6 foot 4 250 pound colossus of sheer destruction and unabetted cannibalism, Ugandan heavyweight boxing champ, designer of epaulette-and-jodphur laden uniforms, former British colonial army sergeant, Army Chief of Staff under doomed former Ugandan President Milton Obote, and once-and-future King of the Sea. Oh, and according to Idi, he could talk to the lions and the crocodiles, too.Wow---Idi Amin lived a crazy life, didn't he? And Barbet Schroeder, bless him and his intergalactic-extra-gigantic man-orbs, managed to catch all of this insanity on film. That film is "General Idi Amin Dada: A Self-Portrait".WATCH!---as the friendly, helpful, think globally act locally Idi Amin----*talks to the animals, including crocodiles and lions!*shoots his AK-47 and stomps around in his designer camouflage gear!*stages a mock invasion of the Golan heights, with helicopters and tanks! Watch Idi point out all his menacing metallic armored monsters like a 3-year-old schoolkid!*Dresses down a cowering cabinet (the foreign minister is later found floating upside down in the Nile, ah well), and chews out a bunch of doctors for drunkeness. In the Islamic Shiny Happy World of Idi Amin, cannibalism was in! Torture was in! Invading Tanzania and killing Kenyan students was in! Taking a toddle was, evidently, way *way* out.*Wins a swimming contest!*Shakes a spear threateningly and plays the accordion at a state function and dancing party!*Basically performs smashingly as a perfect Third-World villain (with a striking resemblance to child-actor and "Diff'rent Strokes" star Gary Coleman---or is that just me?) who could easily be a central casting dream from the old "Johnny Quest" cartoon!Really, Barbet Schroeder was an amazing filmmaker. More amazing is that he got what he did---more than could be believed---on film. And the amazing thing is, Idi Amin gave him full, unfettered access! Amin thought this would be a propoganda coup! Schroeder just lets Idi Amin be Idi Amin, and it is marvellous to watch the General expound: on war, on Uganda, on destiny, on boxing, on the Jews, on Hitler. Especially Hitler. Barbet risks his own neck to ask Idi a pointed question on his fascist idol, and Idi grins, and glowers, and chuckles amiably, and then purrs "why do you ask me about Hitler? Why Hitler"?Why, indeed, Idi. Why indeed
Red hot romance!. Here is a tale about two young teenagers who are stranded on an island somewhere and eventually fall in love. The stars,Brooke Shields and Christopher Atkins were teenagers when this film was made. This film was another hit for director Randal Kleiser,who scored big with the 1978 Paramount musical GREASE. Subsequently,Kleiser directed HONEY,I BLEW UP THE KID which was a sequel to HONEY,I SHRUNK THE KIDS. The 1991 sequel to this film,RETURN TO THE BLUE LAGOON, was a box office disappointment. In the summer of 1980 when this film was theatrically released,other hit movies from then include URBAN COWBOY and THE BLUES BROTHERS. Shields,since this film,appeared in many print ads and made a lot of television appearances which includes a starring role on the sitcom SUDDENLY SUSAN
In Orange VCD. First off, I'm giving this 5 stars because this concert is superb if purchased in the correct format.But the point of my review is to comment on the Video CD (VCD) version. When I first heard of this, I (foolishly) got excited about this because it boasted digital sound and picture. Well, this is meaningless considering this format only allows 1.3 gigs to work with in a double CD format, whereas DVD's give at least 4.7 gigs to work with.The video is so compressed that it is not clear at all - very grainy. And the sound, what a joke! First, it is terribly thinned out. The bass and drums are almost non-existent. The percussion triggers are not there, and the effects on Robert's voice are also completely gone. Possibly worst of all, the sound is sped up a bit, and this just makes it sound extra terrible. Whoever produced this VCD must have been a complete nitwit. I'm convinced The Cure didn't have any oversight of this horrendous  product at all.On the other hand, the Galore VCD is better. The picture is still a bit lacking, but the sound is at least "correct." The mix and speed is right; it just sounds a little thin. Anyway, my final point is don't let the word "digital" fool you. A VHS tape beats any VCD hands down any day.If you're still not satisfied with VHS, there is a laserdisc of In Orange, but it is not without its own flaws. Although the picture quality is great, the drums are a bit distorted when compared to the VHS, and the audio/video sync is quite off in parts. In this case, it really seems that VHS is the way to go
A high water mark for journalism and film. One of the productions of which he is the most proud, Robert Redford's ALL THE PRESIDENT'S MEN should be required viewing (and the Woodward/Bernstein book should be required reading) for all who aspire to the profession of journalist.  Redford was fascinated with the story of two young, untested newspaper reporters who worked and worked and worked the story of the Watergate break-in until it led to the highest office in the United States.  Redford's involvement actually went back to the first news of the bungled burglary, so he followed as the story developed.  He got to know Bob Woodward and Carl Bernstein when they were still at ground level, still unsure as to where this would all lead, but all three knew that it smelled of very big dirty politics.Redford has always been a political animal, with a reporter's instinct, and several times he has been able to bring a story to the screen to illuminate the American political climate.  Earlier, he and director Michael Ritchie had made THE CANDIDATE, a very funny and acid look at how politics changes even the most well-meaning of men or women (and a film well worth your time).    It took two years of hard work to get ALL THE PRESIDENT'S MEN off the ground.  It was turned down by several studios, with the excuse that people were tired of Watergate, but he was finally able to get Warner Bros. to say yes, provided Redford himself would star.Dustin Hoffman was enlisted to play Carl Bernstein, Redford's old friend Jason Robards won an Oscar as Washington Post Editor-In-Chief Ben Bradlee, Jack Warden was cast as Editor Harry Rosenfeld, Martin Balsam was Editor Howard Simons, Jane Alexander was Judy Hoback, bookkeeper to the Committee to Re-Elect the President (C.R.E.E.P.), Ned Beatty was Martin Dardis, who provided an incriminating piece of hard evidence, Stephen Collins was Hugh Sloan, whose wife Debbie (played by Meredith Baxter) kept his conscience working on the right side, Robert Walden (who would go on the the fine television series LOU GRANT) was Dirty Trickster Donald Segretti, and Hal Holbrook was given the pivotal role worthy of any spy story:  the mysterious Deep Throat, who helped Woodward along in a darkened parking garage whenever the trail led to a brick wall.  Of course, we now know that Deep Throat was the FBI's Assistant Director W. Mark Felt, an old friend of Woodward's and a man torn between his loyalty to the FBI and the need to shed light on some very dirty goings-on.Redford asked Alan J. Pakula to direct and Gordon Willis to handle the cinematography, and they crafted a look that is part documentary, part thriller. (If you get a chance, also see Pakula and Willis' THE PARALLAX VIEW, starring Warren Beatty.  Another outstanding, scary political film.)  William Goldman, who won an Oscar for BUTCH CASSIDY AND THE SUNDANCE KID, wrote the tight, exciting screenplay for which he won again (this was actually the fourth time Redford and Goldman had worked together; Goldman also adapted Donald E. Westlake's THE HOT ROCK, a very funny caper film, and the poignant THE GREAT WALDO PEPPER, which was out for a short time on DVD in Pan and Scan, but is now out of print and really should be seen in its beautiful Widescreen splendor.  Universal, where are you?)The efforts of all the principals to adhere to reality down to the smallest detail makes ALL THE PRESIDENT'S MEN a smashing success.  It succeeds as an exciting, suspenseful procedural, as a statement on the neccessity of a free press, as a character study, and as a great movie-movie.The double-disc DVD set is the one to buy:  the first disc includes a new transfer of the film in crisp, clean 1:85 aspect ratio picture and sound with a very enlightening commentary by Redford himself.  The second contains three new short documentaries on the making of the film, on Woodward and Bernstein, and on Deep Throat.  There is also a vintage 1976 documentary on the making of the film, and an interview with Jason Robards on the Dinah Shore show.A deserved landmark in film and in journalism, ALL THE PRESIDENT'S MEN is a must-see and for all who aspire to what journalism should be, a must-own.  In our darkest hour, when all seems obfuscated and hopeless, it reminds us that light can be brought to bear.  People CAN make a difference
What's so racist about this movie?. I don't see anything racist about this movie. The two main characters are nowhere near stereotypical asians (sure, Harold and Kumar are intelligent individuals, but they also like to get stoned). However, everyone should agree that this film makes fun of everyone (from white trash to over-achieving Asians to brutal cops to skinheads to whatever), so calling this racist because of (?) the minor stereotypical Asian characters that are present for only a few minutes is idiotic.Anyway, this film's flat-out hilarious. Hurry up and buy/rent it
Why won't you go out with me?. Robert downey plays a smooth talikng problem solver who tries to pick up a good-two-shoes teacher who is also a really good luck charm when it comes to playing casinos whose father is in enormous debt who is being bailed out by robert while still trying to pick up molly while being pursued by a scary hitman harvey keitel while being funny the whole time.It's a good movie, people. Buy it, own it, love it.Enjoy
See the Exodus in this film?. I saw the Exodus in this film. Like the Hebrews, they left the land and wandered to the place in Fivers mind where they would be safe and happy.Similar to Caanan, the promised land of the Hebrews. When they got there,they were overjoyed, like the Hebrews, then they found trouble from the existing inhabitants, as the Hebrews also found in the inhabitants of Caanan.The film is a timeless masterpiece with a music score to match by the wonderful Angela Morley ( who composed part of the Star Wars score for John Williams ).     by George Mc Clo
classic. If you are into Hip Hop and don't own this then you should!  It's a capture of the early eighties scene on the edge of going worldwide..the very end of the old school.  Classic rhymes and breaking.   Worth owning alone for the A to the K scene..
I had forgotten how charming this movie is. This is from a time when Europe loved us, in a way. The premise of the plot, was thatall a little country had to do to prosper, was to declare war on the United Staes,lose quickly and reap the "benefits of defeat by a generous victor."  How it all goeswrong is delightful.  Seeing this in the light of recent history, gives a delicious sense of irony.Peter Sellers went on to star in "DR STRANGLOVE"
A charming, clever British comedy. Charles Laughton is typically wonderful in his broadly-played role as England's King, Henry the Eigth, who infamously married six different queens, divorcing or executing them as circumstances warranted.  The script to this magnificent Alexander Korda production is a witty jab at English history buffs, touching only briefly on the supposed treachery of Ann Boleyn,  concentrating instead on the preposterous emotional life of the lusty, capacious King. Laughton, as ever, is a marvel, skillfully presenting Henry at first as a thinly-cariacatured lout, and gracefully embuing him with gradual shades of pathos and humanity.  Viewers who look to this film as historical drama are clearly missing the point: this is all about the cleverly-rendered script, which turns British schoolboy lessons on their heads, and on the classy ensemble acting, which admittedly may be hard to focus on with the lamentable quality of the current print (I'm writing in the year 2003; perhaps Criterion or some other class-act movie restoration company can correct this problem soon).  Still, fans of early British cinema will enjoy this film a lot
Serious Science Fiction Shocker. Tuesday is Soylent Green Day.That ominous statement is delivered in the film as a kind of TV advertisement, an informational message aimed at the desperate denizens of an utterly socially ravaged world not so far removed from our own.  Tuesday is a day they can look forward to because they can get Soylent Green.  Considering the dismal nature of this future society, it's something which is sadly believable.This film remains one of the more starkly realistic and disturbing portrayals of a future in which people have almost nothing of their own - including food and shelter.  They have little human dignity left either.  This is not the glorified future of Star Wars with blinking lights and merry talking droids and wise teachers over flowing with hopeful messages.  It's a dirty, ridiculously over crowded nightmare where people treat each other as little more than cattle and even love is a dangerous luxury.Charleton Heston plays a cop investigating the brutal murder of a powerful business man.  In his quest to find the truth, he uncovers a thing so shocking it takes away loved ones, nearly robs him of his own sanity and leaves the viewer with such uneasiness it approaches the dark tone of a horror movie.However what makes Soylent Green so powerfully unsettling is that so much of the fictional story could indeed come to pass.  Indeed, this cautionary tale is even more timely now than when it debuted back in the 1970's.  If you're looking for a sci-fi romp through a colorful world of zippy space ships and wacky alien races, look elsewhere.  This is hardcore uncompromising science fiction which will stay with you
One of Akira Kurosawa's finest !. This review is for the Criterion Collection DVD edition of the film.Ran is a loose adaptation of Shakespeare's King Lear and remains one of Kurosawa's most popular films.It is about an aging feudal lord who divides his land between his three sons. The elder sons are satisfied and the younger one becomes corrupt.The film is very well made and includes an excellent scene of a burning castle that was constructed and burned solely for the film. The costumes are also very well designed and there are many other things about this film which make it very good.The Criterion DVD has some excellent special features too.Disc one contains the film with optional audio commentary by Stephen Prince, theatrical trailers and an introduction by Sidney Lumet.Disc two contains "A.K." a film about Kurosawa directed by Chris Marker, a segment of "Akira Kurosawa: It's Wonderful to Create" about the making of the film, an interview with actor, Tatsuya Nakadai, and a 35 minute montage of storyboard paintings and sketches
I attended "Mission". I attended Morehouse College (all-boys HBCU) in 2004-2005, took classes at Spelman (all-girls HBCU), and I saw the same issues 16 years after "School Daze" was released... In fact, I'm positive Lee, a Morehouse alum, combined the two schools to create "Mission College"... Sans the musical interludes, this movie is so realistic, and the message is so powerful.If you haven't seen this movie, go see it today... you won't be sorry
A Dose Of The AIDS Plague. This was a wonderful movie about a group of very good friends.  The acting is realistic for the movies sake.  It will definately pull at your heartstrings.  Also full of the comapassion one hopes for in their end days/years.  I was a caregiver so this was an important view.  Highly recommended!!!!
Great production values, good story. By far the best of the Scarlet Pimpernel films. Wonderful costumes and sets, but what really sets it apart is the way that Anthony Andrews captures Sir Percy, both as the fashionable fop and in his action-hero persona. Fans of the book should be warned that the second half of the film comes from a different novel altogether, Eldorado, and follows that story only in general outlines. Chauvelin's romantic interest in Marguerite is also an invention of this film, although it works. But the whole thing so beautifully replicates the spirit of Orczy's novel (is better than the original, in fact) that I highly recommend it for all Pimpernel fans.
GREAT. OK now first for the people who said women should find this movie offensive. I AM a woman and I am a mother. Now let me say as a mother and a female who finds the wet shirts part freaking hilarious. This movie ROCKED! I love it!! For the person who said cross dressing men was weird. WAKE UP! It's realistic.For the person who said it focussed on the commercial woman and perfect movie. Did we watch the same movie. HELLO these guys saw it from a girls POV and hell even STATED at the end that they learned more in a week of being DOGS then they had 4 years in the KOK house. Real offensive there......NO
I figured it out...... I think this girl is really on drugs. Not sleeping right, Not eating, paranoid, Seeing "Shadow People," Always itching her nose, and itching her arm. She is seen in one scene where she's ironing and the iron isn't even plugged in.Last scene of movie you see some kind of powder on the ground. Yup this girl was just a speed freak that just lost her mind.Watch it though, it is still a good flick.
A tale of media. On the lines of Wag the Dog, but nowhere near as powerfully satiric/dark, is 15 Minutes. The basic undercurrent of the movie is the theme of media, its influence on people and the kind of perceptions & distortions that it can create. Somewhere, at least in the screenplay, there is a bit of lampooning of the USofA, not just the way the media controls people, but also in the aspect of the legal systems - the double jeopardy law & the "unable to stand trial" on grounds of insanity and stuff. Having said that, the movie does provide a sharp look into media & its effects in one dimension.In the backdrop of this scenario comes yet another strong performance by De Niro & Burns. The characters are well fleshed out and played quite well by their cast. The liberal smattering of Czech & Russian influences gives the movie an interesting twist. And therein is threaded the plot, two guys coming to the US as tourists and trying to make it rich quick by beating the system. There are elements of the movie which are cliched & trite, which tend to take away from a serious theme, but in the interest of 'masala' viewability, I guess these foibles can be passed over and the movie enjoyed well.15 minutes - definitely worth a watch, slightly violent though
Technically a B movie but has the heart of an A!. This has been one of my favorite movies for as long as I can remember.  Even when I was young and I didn't understand all the jokes, but when I recently rewatched it...well my love of it was rediscovered.This is a film that basically takes a pridictable and unoriginal story of two people trying to succeed in their sport and end up falling in love and makes it instantly memorable for its snappy dialogue and fun one upmanship of the main characters.  This film would be worth it for some its insults alone! Overall, I would say it is a diamond in the rough.  But if you are looking for a serious film then this might not appeal to you, The Cutting Edge is pretty much a fun filled romp from start to finish
An under appreciated classic. This is without doubt one of the finest Christmas flicks ever made.  Cary Grant just does Cary Grant sooooo Well.  I highly recommend this movie once you have watched Grinch and Elve too many times...this will help you get back into the true holiday spirit
Great Movie. I saw this movie eons ago as a child and never forgot it.  I only remembered bits and pieces of the film.  I searched Amazon.com for months to find it, but couldn't.  Then suddenly....there it was! Esther and the King!  I purchased it at once.  The film was just as I remembered.  The only problem with the DVD is the audio.  You cannot hear the dialogue clearly and with no subtitles it's hard to pick up what's going on.  I hope they can re-release it with a better audio track
ONE OF THE BEST SUBMARINE "TRUE-STORIES" FEATURES RUSSIAN HEROES. IN A NUTSHELL: UNDERRATED - UNDERVALUED - UNDEREXPOSED -Excellent submarine thriller with the added attraction of having been based on a true historic event! It is hard to believe how poorly this excellent film did at the box-office.Harrison Ford and Liam Neeson are ideally suited as Soviet naval Captains, and as believable as their rebuilt authentic K-19! Kathryn Bigelow who Directed and Produced the film did an incredible job, which can be better appreciated by viewing the 3 excellent featurettes that are included on the DVD.BOTTOM LINE: THIS NEW KIND OF SUB FILM IS A PART OF HISTORYIf you enjoy submarine films this is one of the best. If you enjoy thrillers, this film delivers enough edge-of-your-seat tension and authentic submarine situations to satisfy both the submarine-movie and thriller-enthusiast in anyone.
...When I was very small... This episode of Star Trek, "The Man Trap" is my earliest memory of what would become a lifelong enjoyment of the franchise. Truthfully, "The Man Trap" terrified me (I was maybe two, or three, although I am sure by that time the series was limping along in it's third season and I was seeing a repeat for the first time); Star Trek was considered "adult programming", and as such I was not allowed to watch it - I used to sneak behind the couch while my grandfather watched it on nights I stayed at their house, then would lay awake in my bed scared by what I'd seen, but excited just the same. Like another space show I enjoyed and was terrified by (Lost in Space), I didn't recognize Star Trek as anything but a world I wanted very much to be in, but remained frightened of anyhow (I was, as I said, very young).
Sir Gielgud steals the show. As others have noted, Arthur is a delightful comedy taken from the 1930s screwball "My Man Godfrey" genre. It is an effectively told, outlandish story that winds up succeeding despite some dodgy jokes and an overabundance of lukewarm sympathies.However, without Sir John Gielgud (a gentleman who truly deserved the knighthood), the film's faults would be much more apparent. He elevates every scene he is in with his impeccable refinement and a wit that is sharpened to perfection. He is the pillar in a film which desperately needed credibility.And the title song is a classic.
still makes me laugh. I've always fondly remembered this movie. Bette Midler and Danny De Vito have perfect comic timing. :-D
"Dr. Katz" Revisited. Upon hearing a synopsis of this movie, I was immediately reminded of a favorite episode of "Dr. Katz" (bring back Dr. Katz!), and on that basis decided to view "Pieces of April". Here Katie Holmes gets to play the Ben Katz role of trying to prepare a Thanksgiving turkey for her nutso family, only instead of burning it ("Fire in the hole!"), she discovers that her oven doesn't work at all. Hence she must go door-to-door in her 'rustic' NYC apartment building; meanwhile her parents and siblings are piling into the family station wagon in suburban NJ for their much anticipated-with-trepidation journey.When April (Holmes) knocks on the door of a black couple's apartment asking for help, the woman's response provides the movie's best laugh-out-loud moment. But then director Peter Hedges shrewdly spares us the tediousness of April's full-blown explanation of her family and her predicament; as viewers we are only privy to a limited amount of information. This technique provides a certain amount of mystery to the story, and serves to maintain one's attention throughout, as it's anyone's guess as to just what might happen next. "Pieces of April" is NOT a tired and predictable hackneyed script, and all of the actors are well-suited for their roles. Derek Luke is April's not-yet-introduced to the family boyfriend, and Patricia Clarkson and Oliver Platt are April's parents. There is more to the story regarding April's parents, but I won't reveal it here. Let Peter Hedges give you a brief background on the 'special features' section of the DVD, in a sincerely moving moment."Pieces of April" is a "small" film, but it's no small achievement to produce a Holiday movie about family relations and relationships without hype and hokiness. Congratulations to everyone involved in this project.
razor sharp like cactus. this is one of the best western i have seen.where alan ladd's performance is powerful, razor sharp with a whip lashing command in his voice. who went to rob the cattle baron charles bickford of their fortune as their long lost son -somewhere along the line he had a change of heart and brings home their real lost son who was removed from the family when he was only 5 yrs old and given to a mexican bandit across the river who raised him as his own.i think it is one of the must have movies
Way to Go Amazon!  Very cool. Just got done watching the show and it was awesome. Of course I had to download the tool, how else do you get started? Once it downloaded it worked very well and the video was right there to watch when I was ready. Note to self get cable, DSL is a slow download but it worked great and the picture quality was awesome. No commercials!I didn't have any troubles installing it on my computer and the help tool walked me through it.
Awesome!. Barbra Streisand has always been controvertial. I admire how she has spotted some of the untouchable topics in American movies. Full of criticism and courage, the plot is well-thought and presented in a very smooth way. The thing I regret the most is that in many of Barbra's movies we are prevented from seeing a happy ending! Great movie, I enjoyed it a lot.
Funny,Funny,Funny. Even though this is about 4 years old, it is extremely halarious.  I've been waiting to see a good stand up comedy. The first 15 min is just one hilarious hit after another. I love this guy
The blueprint for all the slasher movies to come(that's right even "HALLOWEEN). This is one of those gem that sliped under the waves in 1974 that is really very creepy and still holds up well today.A killer (we never know anything about him, but in the case of this film it works and serves to make the tension that much higher) has entered the attic of a soroity house around Christmas time and begins to taunt and kill the girls still left in the house. It's that simple and that great. Bob "Porky's" Clark take the plot and makes the most of it and although both films are different, just like "A Christmas Story", has made a classic that still works after all these years. Now don't get mad at that statement, I just mean that just as that movie has proved to be a classic of movie history so this movie should be thought of also. Put the kids to bed TURN THE LIGHTS ON AND UNPLUG THE PHONE and enjoy this on
Stolen Dignity. In Italy's classic movie, `The Bicycle Thief,' sociology and story come together as one for post World War II Italians.  Convincing and with heart, we experience the pain of Antonio Ricci (Lamberti Maggiorani) as he becomes one of the lucky few to get a decent-paying job.  He is to put up posters throughout Rome, using a broom and adhesive.  If you've been there like I have, you notice that the city has bulletins and posters pastered all over their ancient walls.  To work he must have a bicycle.  He has one, but it is broken.  Determined he accepts, but he hasn't the money for repairs.  His wife sells their linen to pay the bicycle repair shop.  All is set and his life has a whole new outlook until a thief steals his bicycle while he's on the job.  He chases him, even hitching on a car, to no avail.  He has a friend who takes him downtown, and we see a whole market of bicycles, some of which undoubtedly have been stolen.  The vast majority of the movie focuses on him and his young son, Bruno (Enzo Staiola), as he goes to every corner of Rome to recover what misfortune fatefully handed to him in human form.Containing (for then) a non-Hollywood ending and sporting perceptive social commentary, 'A Bicycle Thief' comes off as a post-depression 'Grapes of Wrath' for urban Italy.  It gets us there by easily providing empathy for the characters and telling a simple, but solid story.
Everyone can be a 13 year old boy. There aren't enough movies like this these days. Family oriented(centered actually), adventure with edutainmental attributes.Great cast, great score, great(albeit goofy) story.People give this film too much credit for being implausible, which is exactly what makes it so much fun to imagine the ramifications if it were true. If you're looking for adventure and fun, thrilling characters in a family film, this is it
Unforgettable. This has always been one of my alltime cinema favorites and I was happy to see it available on DVD.  The story, the script, the direction, and the acting are superb.
Finally a good title goes out of print from Criterion. I have recently purchased this recently out of print title from the Criterion Collection and I must say I was pleasantly surprised. Not only is "The Harder They Come," a perennial cult classic, it is also a surprisingly great movie. It is a film with an all Jamaican cast, shot in Jamaica, with an excellent soundtrack that introduced reggae music to the rest of the world. It stars musician Jimmy Cliff as a young man who moves from the country to the city of Kingston where he faces poverty and depravity, tries to make it as a musician only to ironically become more famous as he turns to a life of crime. What would have easily been a trashy exploitation film is transformed into a thoughtful, artistic, and compelling film of admirable quality. It is also wonderfully acted, but you may need to use subtitles to understand what they are saying through their thick accents. Overall a great film on an out of print Criterion DVD that you may want to pick up
I Want Those Arms is just fantstic!!!. I bought this tape because on most other exercise tapes they don't focus enough on arms, so this is the perfect tape if you want to  work your arms. This tape includes 2 programs, each about 15 minutes long..with some traditonal moves and some new ones thrown in. The best part in both programs is that Tamilee Webb works the triceps which if your like me is a problem area. This tape is great if you only want to do 15 mins on arms and then work on something else (maybe I want those buns/abs)or by itself. We all have to start some where why not with your arms..make them look great with Tamilee!!! Thanks
Leaves this and goes to....Burning Down da House ?. This movie is very nice and right....I mean enjoyable.I just can't understand how Steve Martin lowered his standards in the past few years. Especially in 2000 when he made a movie that was the total OPPOSITE of Housesitter. What happened Steve
laughoutloud. Nostalgia for my childhood recently caused me to buy and watch the Cheech and Chong movies (with the exception of The Coriscan Brothers).  Aside from realizing I shouldn't have been watching those movies in my pre-teen days, I realized how well done they are.  Most amazing to me was that they  held up one after the other, feeling not repetitive, though each of them is rather episodic. Most impressive was Chong's direction; he makes a number of interesting choices that elevate him beyond the status of writer/star who has enough power to direct; clearly, he took this role quite seriously.  The movies, of course, are not serious.  I rarely laugh out loud in movies these days, but I did at least a half dozen times in each of these.  The characters are not only given funny situations in which to work and funny lines to deliver, but each of them is presented with a kind of earnestness that makes them likeable, and the films all he more watchable.
Informative. This was my first download and it was "free".  The download performed well.  "The Mystery of Edgar Allan Poe" was informative.  It ran up to 50 minutes. This was a Unbox Video Download. It started with the typical intro and ended with the credits. Some individuals did not get a complete download so i included my experience with the Unbox download.  i hope the review was helpful. ty
The Road. I love this film. Everyone must see it, at least once. Just as everyone should taste ice cream or smell a bouquet of fresh lilies-of-the-valley, or fall in love...ya gotta see this."La Strada" is part of a body of work that has, at its core, a thread of autobiographical sentiment so powerful and mysterious, that scholars are still dissecting his films frame by frame.Although Fellini says, in the Criterion Collection DVD "extra""I have no message for humanity...I am sorry", we still believe that if we can decode the images, stories, fantasies and dreams of Fellini's experience/imagination, we will find profound truths. Certainly, the experience of viewing a Fellini film has proven to be worthwhile to a vast audience across geographic, linguistic and cultural boundaries, and over time. There's something to this Fellini guy's stuff...but what the heck is it? I think Fellini's films are distillations of beauty, humor, dreams, pathos, nightmares and the pleasure and pain of living. When Fellini insists that he doesn't have a message, he is probably right. He's not trying to sell ideas. He is only trying to give form to his thoughts and dreams and nightmares and fantasies and experiences and memories. The result is something we would call "art". For those of us susceptible to the aesthetic, Fellini is a master.La Strada is a film with a "neorealist" core. The ravaged countryside, the long, lonely vistas of fields, the sea, and the faces of poverty belong in large part to the "neorealist" post-war films that look unflinchingly at harsh realities of a war-torn Italy.The circus, which here forms an environment, is the backdrop for individuals who reveal their characters in a tragic landscape.Reading the film artist's biography "Fellini on Fellini" reveals his attitude toward the "Auguste" Clown" and the imperious "White Clown", their relationships, power structures, and the circus as a metaphor for life itself. In "8 1/2", the film-maker concludes with an acceptance of life as a circus- a parade of clowns, lovers, friends and associates who enter the spotlight and give resolution to the film. Who is to argue? I think life is like a circus pretty often.There is the reality of being "in" the circus and behind the illusions and there is the reality of being an "observor" and outside. Flip this into any social situation and watch it fit.We develop compassion and sympathy for the main characters.Giulietta Massina is luminous as the female protagonist clown-a kind of "Auguste" figure (according to Fellini's own breakdown of character types). She is the butt of jokes, is the lost soul, the sidekick to the "White Clown", and the hapless, confused child. Anthony Quinn is oh-so-dark as Zampano, the strongman (a kind of "White Clown" authority figure) who blusters, bosses, bullies and frightens.In the end of the film, a man cries at the edge of the sea. He is broken, lost, has betrayed the trust of an innocent, has little reason to believe his own soul may be saved...except for the fact that his tears are falling. His recognition of the sanctity of life comes late.
Audacious in subject matter as well as style... Alain Resnais does not neglect the blast of Hiroshima by wrapping it with a simple love-affair...His film is puzzling, but, at the same time, a compromise, a promise, a pledge to human society... It is too daring by its conventional moral standards, distinguished in the way it was done, written, made and executed..."Hiroshima, Mon Amour" is about the fortitude of man, with its mental and physical power... Alain Resnais and his writer-collaborator Marguerite Duras combined a love story with an anti-bomb story... They carry out the horror of Hiroshima and the sorrow of a lost first love...Hiroshima is a tragedy that shocks us, while the story of love in Nevers makes us cry...The story of Nevers does not trivialize the story of Hiroshima... We gasp at the tragedy of Hiroshima as we weep over the tragedy at Nevers... We contemplate a cosmic and a personal problem at the same time."Hiroshima, Mon Amour" is a new kind of film... It has great technical ability, illustrating hypothesis plus fact...There is a close-up of Emmanuelle Riva , who has just glanced at Eiji Okada, asleep... Suddenly there is a brief flash-cut of the body of a wounded young man lying in approximately the same position in another place...Resnais' camera moves like a stream from the present to the past and back to the present... It cuts back to Riva's face, and then back to Okada asleep, and in that split second the technique of the subliminal flash cut, used to describe a character's state of mind, is born...This cut is the key to the film, for it is the man whom she calls 'Hiroshima' who reminds her of her lover at Nevers...It is the tragedy of his race that reminds her of the small tragedy of her life...This identification is carried through in the most neurotic moments of her recitative, when she looks at the Japanese and speaks to him as if he were her German lover of fourteen years before..."Hiroshima, Mon Amour" reflects image and sound, past and present; the actual and the remembered; Hiroshima (a city of neon) and Nevers (a city of gray stone); the personal and the cosmic; a man and a woman; concern for the individual and concern for mankind...
DO buy this movie!. Don't Drink the Water is hysterical!  I am a huge Woody Allen Fan and have seen nearly all of his movies.  There are some movies by Woody that even I'm not that fond of BUT.....this is not one of them.  This movie is entertaining and well cast.  There is a lot going on and everytime I watch it I find something different that gets me going!  Buy this movie and keep an eye on the subtleties.  You won't be disappointed
a classic. I've watched this movie for the seventh time recently and still can't get enough. I bought the DVD knowing that I'll want to watch it again and again. Highly recommended
A Boy and His Mom, based on 'Super-toys Last All Summer Long'. Steven Spielberg is the best movie director ever, if not the greatest human being on our Earth... Now... for the review... A.I. Artificial Intelligence was originally a project - a long time project - of director Stanley Kubrick (Dr Strangelove, Eyes Wide Shut). Kubrick died before the project had progressed too far. I knew this movie was dedicated to Kubrick but the movie was just so very good I spent little time trying to discover any hidden meaning. I was thinking, 'this is the best movie I've ever seen'. Spielberg and crew do a wonderful job here.Haley Joel Osmet plays 'David' an 11 year old boy who is actually an advanced robot. David is an experimental design equipped to learn and feel. David is adopted into the family of Monica and Henry Swinton (Frances O'Connor and Sam Robards). They have an older son Martin (Jake Thomas) who isn't always kind to his new brother.The message isn't very subtle. . . Over and over and over, and over, David cries, "Please make me a real boy".In the end David is hugged by his mother Monica and lies down with her, the narrator saying, "for one day. . . there was no Martin. . . no Henry. . . no doctor Hobby. . ." Only David and his Mom
The best known Soviet film about WWII. This review id for the Criterion Collection DVD edition of the film.Ballad of a Soldier, released with the Russian language title of "Ballada o soldate" is one of the best known and most loved films of post war Soviet Russia.In the film, a young soldier on the front lines fights off two enemy tanks al by himself. As a reward for his heroism, his commander grants him 6 days of leave to visit his mother and repair a leaky room at their home. On his way hom he encounters many people who have hope of victory. He meets a young woman and falls in love with her.The DVD only has one special feature which is an audio interview (accompanied by a slideshow) of cast & crew fillowing a screening in New York.There is another edition of the film released on DVD by the Russian Cinema Council (RUSCICO) that has other good special features.I recommend both versions
Your Mission if You choose to Accept It. Tom Cruise's third (and his last) Mission is an action thriller that works on so many levels. It works since J.J. Abrahams directed this like man version of  Alias. It works as part of the Mission Impossible film trilogy&lt; It works as a taut action adventure thriller. It works as a vehicle for Tom Cruise.It is not your father's Mission Impossible...it starts at a point towards the end and works back. The amazing thing you are drawn into this complex piece. The puzzle that this movie is sometimes gets overwhemingthere are a few missteps in the action and the ploting, However Cruise and compant shines in this twist and turn script with so many red herings.I will say Phillip Seymore Hoffman is a calm bad guy which works against Cruise's hot and cold action man. Ving Rhames is so under used in MI3. Michelle Monaghan is a star who shined as Cruise's love interest.it is a good action flick for those who crave actionBennet Pomerantz AUDIOWORLD
Absolutely a 5 STAR movie..!!!. This is one of Hollywood's Classics..!! Stars Gary Cooper as Prof. Bertram Potts and Barbara Stanwyck as "Sugarpuss" O'Shea. The plot revolves around a group of professors who are trying to write an encyclopedia. Stanwyck is in trouble with "the Mob" and takes refuge with the professors. She and Cooper fall in love and the professors save the day and arrest the mob. Great fun and an all star cast. Nominated for 4 Academy Awards this is a Hollywood at it's very best
A Great Homage To The Golden Age. This movie is fantastic!! It pays homage to the great monster movies of the Golden Age. All the horror films of today have sunk to mindless gorefests instead of making you think. The Ultimate collector's edition is even better since it includes the original classis's Dracula, Frankenstein and the Wolf man. Ignore all the nay sayers and get this set, just pop it into your DVD player and enjoy!
Interpreter. I just purchased this dvd and watched it last night.  I also watched Murder on a Sunday Afternoon, a couple pf weeks ago.  They are both pretty much the same film.  Dont get me wrong this is a really good movie.  With one exception, IT REALLY NEEDS SUBTITLES!!  I could barely decipher what the Ward Bros. were saying through most of the film.  I kept having to rewind and turn the volume up to understand more than half of the dialouge of the entire film.  The Ward Bros. were constantly mumbling with a big wad of chew in their mouths.  I really should have rented this first, but I bought it for the filmmakers reputations.  I own all of their other films and watch them alot.  I would recommend renting this first.  And if you have a closed caption on your TV I would highly recommend using it
Chorus Line CD. Many years ago we took my grand Daughter to see chorus Line on stage; I tryed for "years" to find this CD to give to my now growen grand daughter and her aunt, no one had it. You were the place I finally found what I wanted, so I bought three copies! Thanks from Seattle customer. B.A.M
His favorite wife is in the honeymoon suite down the hall. A befuddled Nick Arden (Cary Grant) can't seem to decide between his bride Gail (Gail Patrick) and his wife Ellen (Irene Dunne), who happened to return from a seven-year absence on the day of Nick's remarriage. Finding him at the honeymoon hotel wasn't difficult since it was the same one in which he consummated his first marriage. Ellen's goal is to keep Nick from consummating a second.Nick's strong feelings for his first wife are apparent. Once he spots her, she is never far away. In fact, it is not clear why he married Gail. Ellen concludes it was for the benefit of the children and Nick sheepishly agrees in order to have some excuse, though the new bride is never seen interacting with the kiddies. Nevertheless, it takes Nick considerable time to get up enough nerve to tell Gail the honeymoon is over. His cryptic rendezvous and resistance to her affection makes Gail feel something is wrong with one of them -- physically or mentally.Prolonging Nick's procrastination is his discovery of where Ellen has been for seven years. The delay in explaining the facts to his bride makes Ellen wonder if he prefers Gail. To speed things along, Ellen uses every feminine wile to lure her love back in her arms.During this emotional merry-go-round, Nick must juggle an insurance man, a psychoanalyst, two wives, and the law who would arrest him for bigamy. Obviously, this leads to some hilarious awkward moments with MY FAVORITE WIFE.Movie quote: "I came here with my wife... hum... my bride really. Now my wife, not my bride... my wife... Why should I bother you with details?
Superb Bardem Galvanizes Painterly Look at Reinaldo Arenas. Spanish-born actor Javier Bardem gives a staggering performance as Cuban poet Reinaldo Arenas, which is lucky since he is in almost every frame of this film. In fact, he is the only constant in a biopic that sometimes feels disjointed and a bit long-winded, piecing together as it does the various episodes of Arenas' life sometimes sacrificing narrative flow in the process. At the same time, this is a powerfully moving film that displays the intensity of the post-revolution persecution experienced by Cubans more effectively than either Carlos Eire's memoir, "Waiting for Snow in Havana", or Hollywood confections such as Sydney Pollack's "Havana" or Richard Lester's "Cuba".Director Julian Schnabel, an artist himself who had previously directed a film about celebrity graffiti artist Jean Michael Basquiat, jumps back and forth like an abstract painter clarifying time periods by employing captions. We first see Arenas' birth in 1943 rural Cuba followed by glimpses of his poverty-stricken childhood. The story then moves forward to 1958 just before Castro rose to power and when Arenas becomes a revolutionary living in eastern Cuba. By 1964, as both an open gay and an intellectual, Arenas' writings have made him anathema to Castro's regime. For the next fifteen years, he shuttles back and forth between jail and freedom, and Arenas' story sheds much light on the difficult of living as a member of not just one but two minorities. In highly visual terms, Schnabel creates a striking tableau of life in Cuba that shows how getting out of Cuba was not an easy decision for natives to make, and Arenas, like most Cubans, makes it only begrudgingly at first. Imagine having to give up everything and fleeing. There is a vividly filmed sequence of an all-night party in an abandoned convent that houses a homemade hot-air balloon (shades of Jules Verne) by which one of them decides to escape selfishly and fatally. There are also some powerful scenes that show the humiliating torture Arenas experienced in prison ending finally with his escape and ultimately his departure from Cuba in the Mariel Harbor exodus of 1980 as one of Castro's "undesirables". Arenas then went into exile in New York living with his former lover, Lazaro. Sadly, soon after his arrival in America, he became ill with AIDS. The American sequence is short, allowing maximum time for the Cuba ordeal that makes up most of the film.The charismatic Bardem is superb capturing the emotional combustion in his character's life. There are a few guest appearances that somewhat undermine the story's realism, a nearly unrecognizable turn by Sean Penn as a Cuban peasant and in dual roles, Johnny Depp as a sadistic, closeted lieutenant and a transvestite named Bon Bon, who entertains prisoners in El Moro prison. And the use of English versus Spanish seems to be more at the director's discretion than the actual circumstances within scenes. But these are forgivable indulgences since Schnabel has made a valuable film telling a tale of Cuban struggle and hardship of a type that we surprisingly don't see that often in film. At 133 minutes, it does seem a bit overlong, but Arenas packed a full life in his 47 years. Most importantly, Schnabel successfully paints a picture depicting the influences behind Arenas' writing: his difficult childhood, his conflicted feelings for his mother, coming to terms with his sexuality, the revolution in Cuba, and the pain of being an outcast in his own country. As one might expect from a painter, Schnabel uses images as effectively as words to advance the story. Most are simple and quite beautiful, such as an early scene of a rainstorm that turns into a raging torrent of water, a later shot of countless prison inmates dangling bars of soap outside of their jail cells, or flashes of snow falling in New York as Arenas and his friend lie on a speeding convertible. Nevertheless, because Arenas, as a writer, dealt in words, it is impossible to tell his story without embracing this component, and Bardem's economical voiceovers attest to that aspect in a dramatically effective manner. Strongly recommended in spite of the relatively minor flaws. The DVD also includes an interesting French television interview with the real Arenas from 1983
Grand Movie. Set during Napoleon's rule this movie will thrill you with the twists and turns when it comes to one thing called: Revenge. You'll learn how an innocent man is sent to prison for committing a crime that he didn't commit. He is imprisoned and he meets another man who teaches him reading, writing, philosophy, arithmetic, science, and many other subjects.  Ten years pass and with God's intervene he is able to escape and head back to his own country. He ends up saving a man who is to be killed because he stole some items. He becomes a pirate with the name of Zattana which means "Drift Wood." Eventually he and the man he saved find a boat load of gold and he seeks his vengeance from those who enslaved him. It's really a great movie and I'm sure you'll be hooked. Enjoy.
Has a charming attraction with a meaningful message. A woman is frustrated with many important aspects of her life. Her own father and her husband don't care for her and she's seems to be lost in life until a window of opportunity comes from outer space. She experiences a ray of light from a spaceship that changes her life to be more the person she wants to be. But there happens to be a dangerous side effect, she grows to be 50 feet tall. She uses her new found power to discipline the people that did her wrong, particularly her unfaithful husband. I enjoyed the special effects, especially when the giant is roaming the town's buildings with hoards of screaming people in the streets. This is a remake from the 1958 original of the same name.
The Sentinel is Still Worth Watching. Spoiler Alert:  It is rather hard to review this film without giving away some key components.  I don't normally include so-call "spoilers" in my reviews, but in this case it had a lot to do with the themes of the film.  This film came out during the glorious era of spiritual horror flicks like "The Exorcist" and "The Omen," and because of the great success of those films, this humdinger was sadly overlooked.  This is truly a horrifying film and deserves a place in your DVD collection, especially if you are into this specific genre of spiritual horror flicks.The cast is an impressive list of actors who were, unfortunately, has-beens by the 70's, or were up and coming actors who are now rather famous.  Christina Raines, the main actress, sadly, never made it big and she should have as she gives a very solid performance in a rather difficult and disturbing film.  I found the other actors to be good, but a bit hammy at times, but that doesn't detract from the overall impression of the film.  In fact, it may, in a bizarre way, add to it considering the casting of actual freaks, forgive the political incorrectness of the term, in the film.This film is like a freak show of sorts or a car accident in of itself.  We don't really want to see what is on the screen, but we can't help ourselves.  There is enough in this film to revolt some and infuriate many, especially in it's condemnation of the "sins of man" that we try to accept today with our over indulgence of the term "tolerance."  When one sees this odd film, one must keep in mind that it is based on the Catholic faith's interpretation of sin, certainly an instution not well-known for it's tolerance of any sin.  So if you are inclined to do whatever feels good in your life, especially to the point of excess, you may find yourself squirming in your seat a bit while watching this film either out of an awkward sense of guilt seeing your sins kind of exposed in this film, or anger that your way of life isn't considered "acceptable" by the staunch religious.  No one likes someone pointing a condemning finger at him or her, even when it may be earned.  Our natural instinct is to either feel shame or anger or even a mixture of both.By the way, I do mean "freak show" literally when I mentioned it earlier.  I don't care for that term myself, but those in the film considered themselves as such and I grew up in a time and location that had no problem with the term, so please excuse my use of it here as I honestly don't mean to be rude.  There is less make-up involved with this film than most are aware of as actual circus freaks were used in the film, especially in the climax scene.  In fact, my dad knew a number of them as they were part of the freak show in Coney Island, that famous amusement park in south Brooklyn where I spent many a summer day riding the Cyclone roller coaster.  On occasion my dad would take me to some of the bizarre shows in the park and it was interesting to then see those from the shows on film later and be able to say "I know that guy!"  For me, at a young age when seeing it, it added to the oddity of the film.  My parents were obviously far too permissive in the films they let me see when I was young.  I saw this film when it came out along with "The Exorcist" and "The Omen" and I was barely in my teens then.Anyhow, I grew up in Bensonhurst not too far from where they filmed this movie and I recall taking pictures of the actual house where they filmed the exterior shots; I have unfortunately lost them over the years.  The house and the neighborhood are in the very congested Red Hook section of Brooklyn, and despite being directly across the river from bustling Manhattan and being in an overcrowded section of Brooklyn, there is an intense feeling of isolation conveyed in the film.  Much credit for this goes to the director, Michael Winner, for achieving this via camera positioning.  Of course, he's experienced in shooting in New York having directed the brilliant "Death Wish" with Charles Bronson earlier.The whole concept of the film is a bit silly but weirdly interesting in that a lone priest guards the gates of Hell until he passes the guardianship over to someone else before his death.  If he is unable to do so, then the gates of Hell remain open as they are temporarily left ajar during the transition from one "sentinel" to the next.  The idea Satan, played by Burgess Meredith, comes up with to keep Hell's gates open and open wide is to convince the new sentinel to commit suicide, a mortal sin in the Catholic church and something the main character as attempted once before in her life, instead of accepting a thankless life of isolation and servitude as a means of redemption for past sins.As silly as the premise is in the film, one can't help but to feel both uplifted at the end and sad for the new sentinel for her sacrifice made on behalf of thankless strangers.  The analogy to Christ's crucifixation and life in the priest/nunhood is clear here as is the notion of how sinful, ugly, and sadly self-centered suicide can be as viewed by the Catholic church and many outside of it.  Please spare me the negative comebacks as this isn't my personal view of suicide.  I tend to feel that God takes great pity on those who can not face the trials that life often brings and those who attempt or succeed at suicide are often distraught and not thinking clearly.  I have trouble believing that God would the punish such a troubled soul, but that is another discussion (argument?).Like "The Exorcist" and "The Omen" before it, we are sadden by the losses sustained and the sacrifices made at the end by main characher who may not be totally noble but is certainly likable.  In "The Sentinel" Alison reluctantly takes on the role as the new guardian.  She wanted so much out of life and already felt that God owed her something, hence her suicide attempt earlier, yet, she still gives to God and others in spite of her past pain.  One can't help to see how she may be being offered redemption for her past mistakes by taking on this burden, but she is allowed the free will to not accept it, but she does and although she may do so begrudingly, she does it to the salvation of the world.  In "The Exorcist" Father Karras does not, as misinterpreted by some, commit suicide at the end, but rather sacrifices himself to save Regan, the possessed girl (he catches the demon between souls so-to-speak).  In "The Omen" Peck's character, Mr. Thorn, is willing to kill his only son to save the world.  Does that sound Biblically familiar at all?These spiritual horror flicks were popular for a reason and still are because we respect those that are willing to sacrifice themselves selflessly for others, even if they don't really want to do it.  Perhaps it's because we may think ourselves incapable of such action or would like to believe we would take the same road as these heroes.  It matters little in the end what your religious beliefs are or if you have any at all.  We just can't help being moved by one so noble in nature, even if he or she is reluctant to be so (consider George Bailey in "It's a Wonderful Life"), giving all he or she has for our benefit.  Consider our love and appreciation for soldiers who fight for us, and police and firemen who equally risk their lives for us, complete strangers and you get my drift.I have always enjoyed these kinds of spiritual horror films and when they are well-acted, written and directed, they become classics.  I am a bit reluctant to label this film a "classic", but it is still an excellent film that holds up well.  It didn't define a genre like the others I had mentioned did, but it certainly accomplishes what it set out to do.  It frightens us at the appropriate times, grosses us out in others (it is VERY graphic) and gets us to see both the worst and best in humankind.  It may not be a true classic like "The Exorcist" or "The Omen", but it is certainly a solid companion to such films and worth a spot on your shelf
dvd. Second posting received very shortly after first went missing!  Very assuring that Amazon attended to
We all travel that road!. ****This review may contain spoilers!****This film is incredibly moving,disturbing and heart-breaking. The pathos may be matched by a small handful of films, but I cannot for the life of me think of one single film that tops it. It beautifully illustrates the story of a sincere,yet simple-minded burly man who knows that he seeks love,but does not have the sophistication to express it in words so finds his only recourse is to lash out,(it seems),at the woman he loves. He lashes out more at his own ineffectuality but does not know that himself.The pathos comes in because love is so new and unfamiliar that it makes him feel vulnerable,which is very frightening to his sense of masculinity. This film is operating on so many levels at once that it must be viewed at least 2 or 3 times to dredge all the gold from the many-layered conflicts going on with all 3 of the main characters. The death of the Fool is so unexpected by Zampano,(if no one else), that he finds himself trapped in the consequences of an unintended act meted out,(he felt), to level justice AS HE SAW IT. As a witness to his crime, and with her inability to move through what has occurred and go on, it causes Gelsomina to constantly remind Zampano what he has done. This, plus he must see how HIS actions have not only ended one life, but is slowly but surely destroying the bright light of joy which once existed in the one he loves until the only way he can end the pain of the truth,(as he sees it), is to abandon the best thing in his unrewarding life. When he hears the familiar song that Gelsomina used to play on her trumpet being hummed by a woman hanging the laundry and so inquires, only to find out that she died of exposure with a broken heart due to his leaving her, in the final scene it all comes home as he realises he had the brass ring and didn't even know it and as he lets out his doleful cry on the beach at night WE feel his pain right along with him as though WE TOO have lost something very dear. The way Fellini stalled the realization to the very end,(whether intended or not),so pulled the rug out from under me that I actually bawled like a baby for 10 minutes at the end of the movie and felt so helpless that the only thing I felt I could do to come out of the morass I had fallen into was to hug my wife for dear life and pray to God that I would NEVER lose sight of the treasures in my own life while foolishly chasing some rainbow or worrying about maintaining an image at the expense of everything that gives that image its substance. This film has the ability,if one is ready for it, to change your life! Bravo Fellini
Best school drama of all time. This is about an actual event carried in the L.A.Times 20 years ago. It's about a tough-as-nails high school math teacher, Jaime Escalante, in a gang-ridden barrio school teaching his students to overcome low expectations, racism and bigotry to become the top calculus class in the country.  I'm a teacher myself, and met Escalante back when the film came out.  Actor Ed Olmos plays Escalante perfectly.  You're watching the real stuff here
Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST!. The Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST drama I have seen ever. Korean, American, doesn't matter! This is better than anything I have ever seen on TV or in the movies. Hollywood cannot touch this one! Kim Myoung Min(Yi Soon Shin) is outstanding in this!(no wonder he won the 2005 KBS BEST ACTOR AWARD FOR IYSS)It starts from when he was a child to his adulthood and can be emotional, funny, sad, and can make you angry!! The numerous obstacles and prejudices this man had to overcome and then always bounced back with no complaint because of the love of his country is phenomenal!! He put his country above all else and Kim Myoung Min did a great job of portraying that!My whole family, kids and all, watched this with me and loved it!I can see why Yi Soon Shin is Korea's hero and why other countries teach his methods
The Molly Maguires. This is not a factual account of the Molly Maguires struggle in the anthracite coal region of Pennsylvania between 1860-1880, but it is interesting and emotes an emotional element.  The acting is quite good and it attempts to provide viewers with some balance of reasoning for the disproportionate balance of power and wealth during that time and in the industry that helped make PA the king in coal.
Where Did this wonderful movie come from?. I watched this movie yesterday for the first time and I was completely blown away by the magnitude of Michael Keaton's performance. I honestly think that he should have been a contender for an Oscar in 1993 but do not even recall seeing the movie in theaters back then.How does a great movie like this get lost in the shuffle?? The entire premise of the movie is to make people think about the quality of life while they are living it and hopefully not to wait until dying to make things right with family and loved ones. I know I came away with valuable wisdom after seeing this beautiful film.
The best historical war drama from the Far East. I have seen many historical war dramas from Far East (mainly China's) and most of them are not only historically inaccurate but have a strong bias toward the enemy.Yi Soon Shin, however, is a rare exception.  Not only is the drama very historically accurate but it is also very comprehensive in detailing the meticulous battle planning of the admiral that leads to each victory but also the political in-fighting between the Chosun political factions (and the second-guessing nature of the king) which causes his eventual death.Also, the special effects are great.  The battle scenes (whether on sea or land) are realisitic and of outstanding quality.The only problem that I can find is that the DVD has not placed sufficient focus on the contribution of the Ming China.  Then again, this is not unexpected since this is a Korean drama focusing on the great admiral.Also, the entire selection should have 104 episodes.  I don't know why it stops at 101.If you want to have a more comprehensive knowledge on the subject, try Samuel Hawley's Imjin War (which portrays Yi Soon Shin more accurately by quoting original sources).Any who is only intered in the fighting may also want to check out Stephen Turnbull's Samurai Invasion (which has more colorful maps and detailed description of battles from the Japanese perspective).Lastly, anyone who is a fan of samurai warfare may want to check out Shogun:Total War by Creative Assembly (now in Gold version).
Nice soap opera. I liked the mini series. Acting is good. Scenery lovely. Costuming is superb. Gives the viewer a real feel for the place and time.Unfortunately there are some things I don't care for. Both sides, if there's a character in one family there is another in the other just like that person. Some of the relationships are somewhat stale. The main villein is really two dimensional.Both the southern main character and his northern counterpart fall in love with women socially unacceptable to their society. The northerner falls in love with and marries an irish catholic lass. The southerner falls in love with a girl who turns out to be the daughter of a harlot and an Octeroon (One african great grandparent). I would have prefurred something more open since history reveals there were quite a few gentle relationships between southern white  men and women of african decent which would spare the audience this soap opera stuff.Great scenerey. Wonderful scenes. Wonderful authentic costuming.Just pathetic as sopa operas are.
Actors Upstaged By Some Beautiful HOT Cars!!!. I sometimes wonder about the mentality of geek scriptwriters in Hollywood. It seems like one of these nerds thought"Let's make a movie about lotsa cars being stolen. This is because the cars thief's brother is in trouble". Well that's about the entire plot of this movie. Cars get stolen but no pedestrians are killed which would have made this movie "rawther sordid" I do believe. Once again Hollywood has made a movie which glorifies Criminal Activity.Angelina looks good  as always but even she can't save this turkey of a movie.If you have seen one Hollywood car chase then you have seen them all
Very Bad Things. You have to be in the right mood for this one,  Good Movie if you are
A Fun (and by no means Unfortunate) Adaptation. A delightful little movie based on a series of delightful little children's stories (with, maybe, a bit more bite than the average fare).Of course, it won't be for everyone.A Series of Unfortunate Events is about the three Baudelaire orphans who are shuttled from foster home to foster home pursued by the evil Count Olaf. A laughable, over-the-top villain determined to capture the orphans' family fortune.This movie takes the first three novels of the series (purported to be 13 books in all, plus an "autobiography" of the "author") and blends them wonderfully into one tale (sticking the 2nd and 3rd into the middle of the first book). It brings the tales to life with delightful scenery and excellent casting. Jim Carrey brings Olaf to life. And, YES, he is "overacting" but he is absolutely true to the character in the books. He is perfect in his role. Billy Connolly and Meryl Streep have great turns as well.If you're a fan of these books, you likely won't be disappointed. If you've never read them, you may like this movie too, just know that it's a little stylized and "over the top." In the end, it's a lot of fun, and not that's not such an unfortunate thing in a film
Just plain funny. You must suspend normal belief when you watch this....like I do when I watch a musical performance....in a musical you must stop and go with the flow when someone breaks into song.....well in Buckaroo you just have to go with it....with Jason and the Argonauts, Flash Gordon, etc.....if you wanted to enjoy them you had to kinda just say "OK, I'll accept this".  It has lots of actors you will recognize
To be forced to look at something this repulsive, and still wanting to go along... There are few pictures which can makes us experience the feelings and emotions of a mentally disturbed character in such a way, that for a moment, we seem to BE that disturbed character.In "Shock Corridor" a journalist goes under cover as a mental patient into a psychiatric ward but slowly descends into real madness. The film tried but only succeeded partly - we hear the journalists desperate thoughts in voice-over and it sounds more like a radio play now then the real thing.Lodge Kerrigan's 1994 debut "Clean, shaven" however, caused many moviegoers to leave halfway the picture because the portrayal of a schizophrenic man was so believable and uncompromisingly hard that a lot of people just couldn't bear it anymore. But because "Clean, shaven" was in the first place ment as a serious character study and not so much as an entertainment (In fact: "Clean, shaven" will indeed have very little entertaining values for the average audience) it remained unjustifiably an obscure little picture.But fortunately, people with a good sense of what's "real cinema" and the depicting of "true is not relenting emotions" still know there way to these movies anyway. And because that still happens, every now and then such a movie gets made. And gets through.(Note: The same director struck back hard last year with "Keane", another movie of a schizophrenic man who suffers from paranoia and hallucnations and which is so effective that we can feel this disturbed man almost breeding down our necks.)Polanski's film here, "Repulsion" is another attempt at putting the viewer straight in the mind of a person that's caught in a mental downward spiral. And this attempt resulted in a picture that gets a grip on the viewer in such a way, that fear, disgust and paranoia becomes a part them, almost as much as on the character herself.Catherine Deneuve is a young woman who feels at best (if she feels something positive at all) in a beauty parlour where she is surrounded by women (collegue's and customers) only. In the outside world she is a she and withdrawn little girl that shivers with every touch of a man (be it accidental or purpously).Her blank, empty eyes show no emotions only when she is scared and even then Deneuve's keeps a dead-pan face most of the time. Because she doesn't open up her thoughts and emotons to the viewer (like the journalist in "Shock Corridor") we do not know where her repulsion and fears come from or... where they go. But Polanski keeps the camera pretty much in her face anyhow and we go along with her, stroling through the streets of London or dwelling in her sisters appartment.We are not so much voyeurs but more witnesess to something or somebody we rather not be a witness of. But like Lodge Kerrigan, Polanski is a master in manipulating and menages to keep a hard core of movie fans intrigued.His lowbudget-like approach, and fully use of the claustrophobic surroundings that pretty much literaly speak for themselves (desolate sounds of dripping water, neuroticly ticking clocks, creepy cracking shelves, echoes of slamming doors - a completely effective realistic way, wich he would repeated often, like in "The Tenant" and of course "Rosemary's baby") pays off. Polanski is more then just an exceptional filmmaker - he is a visionair.Halfway through the movie, there is no more reason to argue: this cannot have a happy end! But going down that spiral is made here in a rarely seen form of art, in which sounds, shots, plays with light and shadows, and a totally convincing actress, are stretched to the limits - and sometimes boldly go beyond.It's not fun to witness Deneuve's falling apart, but it is for every real movie lover to witness this film. It's hard, harsh, rough, and daring. And therefor all the more to be admired.
"COME TO THE ASYLUM.....". I just finished watching Amicus Productions' "Asylum" and was thoroughly entertained throughout!  This collection of macabre tales is imaginative, intelligent and contain some genuine thrills!  As the trailer for the film advertised, "come to the asylum..." we have a young doctor arriving to take the head position of the psychiatric department.  That is, if he can first identify the former doctor, who is now a mental patient of the asylum and is now residing upstairs with the other "incurably insane."  We meet each of the patients one by one as they reveal how they became patients of the asylum.(1) British actor, Richard Todd (Disney's "The Story of Robin Hood" and "The Sword & The Rose") stars in the first story revealing a murder with a dash of voodoo mixed in for some truly chilling results, you'll never look in your deep freezer again, without remembering this horrific scene!(2) The second story gives a new meaning to "owning a good suit."  Peter Cushing hires a tailor to make him a new suit for his son.  The material Cushing brings is "special" and even glows!  Wait till you see Cushing's son, and then how the suit effects the tailor's store mannequin!(3) The lovely Britt Ekland stars as the friend of a wealthy young girl, who is on the edge of insanity.  Is Britt real or a figment of the girl's pill induced imagination?(4) The fourth and final of the tales, involves the great Herbert Lom (Hammer's "Phantom of the Opera" and as Chief Inspector Drefus of "The Pink Panther" films).  Lom's character is a psychotic genius, which has invented several doll-like robots that not only can do his bidding, but the robot becomes the actual person it is created to resemble.   This one is the best of the tales and rounds up the collection with a good solid finale.Also available in the Amicus Collection is "And Now the Screaming Starts" and "The Beast Must Die," both starring Peter Cushing and a must have for any Hammer Studios horror fan or collector!  I hope Dark Sky Films will continue with more titles in their "Amicus Collection," for these are just a few of the fine films that were produced from this Hammer Studio rival.
Clever comment on Reaganism set in a galaxy of post-transformational liberalism. Just kidding, I don't know what I'm talking about. You should see this movie if you like:1) Sex2) Nudity3) Hot babes4) Mickey Rourke5) Carre Otis6) Mickey Rourke and Carre Otis going at it for real7) Perfume commercials8) Directors trying to make their softcore porn look like art by filming everything sensually and in slow motion, so the film appears to be arthouse and "visually stimulating"9) Really, really, really bad dialogue10) Lots of good banging and screwing without a plot11) Mickey Rourke playing a total pimp (which is different than just Mickey Rourke - I mean, there's Mickey Rourke, and then there's Mickey Rourke the Pimp, which is even cooler)And finally...12) Hot female characters who wear glasses and carry around clipboards so the audience believes they are smart and successful businesswomen, when in fact they'd have a hard time calculating 1 + 1. (Also see: Alone in the Dark, Tara Reid's character; or Fantastic Four, Jessica Alba's.)Highly recommended to the appropriate demographic.I could kill myself for buying it. :
personalizing war. Sydney Schanberg received the Pulitzer Prize in 1976 for his reporting as the NY Times correspondent in Cambodia (1972-1975). This story dramatizes his relationship with his Cambodian guide and interpreter Dith Pran. Schanberg left Pran when journalists fled the country during that genocide that killed about 1.7 million people when the Communist Khmer Rouge overtook the country after American forces left neighboring Vietnam
Boatload of fun! (recommended). What more could you ask for in a movie? Are you delighted by Cary Grant's charm or Sophia Loren's beauty? Do you want to laugh, see gorgeous outfits, hear Loren sing or root for the under[over]dog? Would you like a romantic comedy that teaches lessons in responsibility for children and parents? Move right in to HOUSEBOAT.I am always amazed when I see a film with a plot that casts Sophia Loren as the overlooked lover vying for a man's affection. (IT STARTED IN NAPLES; THE MILLIONAIRESS). But the notion of seeing what isn't in the eye of the beholder draws you to each film as you impatiently await the leading man to "discover" her.Cinzia Zaccardi (Loren) is the wealthy daughter of orchestra conductor Arturo Zaccardi (Eduard Ciannelli). As such she is lavished in opulent dwellings and dinners with international nobles. What's missing from this overprotected woman's life is a MAN.Tom Winters (Grant) is a diplomat who neglected his parental responsibilities for the sake of his career. After his wife dies he gets the urge to do the right thing. The problem is he is evidently clueless about what that is. He quickly learns that raising children is a joint responsibility. Though he hires an unlikely nanny, he feels the logical matrimonial choice is a woman who helped care for his three children before he came on the scene. His current nanny, who neither cooks nor cleans well, is good at eventually obtaining whatever she wants. After all, she's the spoiled runaway daughter of Arturo, the orchestra conductor.Despite the too-often sung bing-bang-bong song, HOUSEBOAT is a repeat-watch movie. My only problem is that I've seen it so many times on VHS that I would only purchase it used on DVD at a heavily discounted price just to complete my collection. (Update 9/29/06: I bought the DVD.) The movie may have a corny moment or two but it includes far more hearty laughs and great actors so I recommend it to others
Good choice. My son is 8 years old and he loves this game.  He is a bionicle fanatic!
Meet Me in St Louie. I saw this movie when I whas young.  It brought back memories.  Good one to
National  Treasure. This is a very enteraining movie and really enjoyed all of the intrigue that it had and the good ending
FAVORITE EPISODE. IT WAS ONE OF MY FAVORITE EPISODES A WAY TO GET BUFFY AND ANGEL TOGETHER WITHOUT CHANGING THE STORYLINE. AND THE CHARACTERS WHERE ABLE TO EXPRESS HOW THEY FELT TO EACH OTHER
The Dark Side. This is one of Allen's darker films and immediately any Allen fan can tell because of how raw it is... Allen's films are usually devoid of foul language but this one seems to be cowritten by Quentin Tarantino. Needless to say, this may be the perfect movie for any person who has enjoyed a Woody Allen film but who has said that all of his movies are the same. The plot is clever, a writer makes enemies with everyone he knows because his books are a little too close to fact. As dark as this film is, I must say that it still is hilarious. Another brilliant Woody Allen flick..
That's what you get for being a fan!. I own the first two volumes of the Lost Treasures series and am waiting for the third to arrive on my doormat. They are brilliant and I hope more volumes appear on a regular basis.Why though, must I suffer for purchasing these titles when they are released by not being able to get The Plays volume without buying them all over again?I suspect (and hope) that it will eventually be released seperately but in the meantime I can only say that if you don't already own any of these and are a fan of Broadway, theatre or the performing arts in general, buy this today! A fantastic showcase of theatrical talent
All the Right Company. Dennis Quaid ranks high in our family video night; both the Parent Trap and the Rookie are among our young children's favorites.  For my wife and I, I rented In Good Company due to Quaid, and because the film intrigued me: its trailer and synopsis do not rely on quick action or screwball comedy.... it was different from most of what I see.In Good Company relies on its characters.  I don't know the corporate world, but as corporations seem to be today's "Resident Evil" (pun intended), I liked a story where a heart is found in the Oz less world of layoffs and cubicles.  What I liked most was the interaction between Dan Forman, played by Quaid, and Carter Duryea, played by Topher Grace.  Carter is fatherless; basically he's parentless, and the film shows a close Foreman family but has little, and little positive, reference to Carter's upbringing. Carter's world is psyche, synergy, cell phones and Sports America, where he now runs sales.  As the film progresses we are treated not just to an old school/new school, hip/over the hill tension, but see a young man learn character, in work and family, from someone who has done it right. There are limitations, as when Foreman tells Duryea that the secret to a good marriage is to find the right woman and keep your organ in your pants when you are away from home.  This is not too helpful for Carter, whose seven-month marriage to the wrong woman shows a need for more than luck. But overall he learns that life is more than suits, cars, and success... he longs for he does not have.  Throughout we see the pain of a young man all alone in the world, someone who has had no one to guide him.In one scene, Morty, played by David Paymer, states that the right timing is important. The film could easily have dived into a happy ending where everyone has a job and  where Carter gets the girl, but it makes a good move by remaining true to that line.  When Carter hugs Foreman goodbye he squeezes him and breaks down. When we next see Carter he is jogging outside rather than on a treadmill. He may not know where his path will lead, but now, thanks for Dan Foreman, he is no longer running in circles.
Fascinating film. Great film about human relationships -- culture, tradition and self-determination.  No where near as controversial as one might guess from the bruhaha
The Brilliant wonder of Catherine Keener Shines in this pick. This is the film that introduced me to the wonderment of Catherine Keener, Liv Schreiber and Anne Heche.  Plus it has the ultra cool, funny Kevin Corrigan.  A film about 20's somethings and their relationships and what happens when you feel you are losing your best friend to an impending wedding.  Catherine Keener plays a neurotic woman who has no idea what she wants out of a relationship, so she relies heavily on her best friend (Heche) and her ex-boyfriend and male best friend (Schreiber).  They are there to comfort her and are outlets to express her doubts on love and life.  But one of her outlets is about to get married and she has a hard time adjusting to that fact.  It's a good story about life in your 20's.  There is a wonderful appearance by Kevin Corrigan who just steals most of the scenes he is in.  It's not over the top acting (as you get in your better known dramas) and its not just caricatures... It's just a little low-budget film with some really good acting.  The right amount of acting that is required for a film of this quality.  And I found it rather enjoyable
Great Stuff. Wow, this movie was fun. I never saw it before and, because I've been on a big Hammer and Amicus kick lately, took a chance on it. I was not disappointed.Like other Amicus productions, what we get here are several horror stories in one, all centered on "incurably insane" patients in a British asylum. There are some great stars here that make it work oh so well, including Patrick Magee (A Clockwork Orange), Robert Powell (Tommy, Jesus of Nazareth), Herbert Lom (Phantom of the Opera-1962), Peter Cushing (Do I need name all of his great horror films?), Richard Todd (Stage Fright)Barry Morse (Gerard from the 1960s TV series classic The Fugitive), Geoffrey Bayldon (The House That Dripped Blood), the scrumptious Britt Ekland (The Wicker Man-1973), beautiful Charlotte Rampling (The Fury), and lovely Bonnie Parkins (The Mephisto Waltz).The transfer from Dark Sky Films is fantastic; it looks like a brand new film. It's presented in anamorphic widescreen and looks great when played in a progressive scan DVD player on a HD television.Looking forward to the upcoming release of "From Beyond the Grave" from Image. Never saw that one before, either, but am looking forward to buying it just the same.I'm hopeful other Amicus classics, including "Dr. Terror's House of Horrors," "Tales from the Crypt (1972)," and "Vault of Horror" will be released on DVD soon. There are rumors abound that Vault and Tales will soon be released by 20th Century Fox in England, but that won't help those of us living in the states much. Dr. Terror was released in England on DVD, but never in the U.S. There is a demand for these films here. Let's get with it, whoever owns the rights
A great movie, a visual FEAST!. I own Kama Sutra- it's one of my favorites in my movie collection.  I too, thoroughly enjoyed this movie and agree with many of the ratings other consumers posted, however, if I was looking to purchase the movie, I don't think I it would be neccessary after all the specific detail given up in the review section.  The idea of a review is to rate the movie and state your opinion, not give an in depth, written, scene for scene tell all.  What's the point of buying it, when so many customers have simply given away the entire film in an attempt to review it?  Please people, practice some restraint, I share your enthusiasm, but really what's posted here is TMI.  Too much information, don't ruin it for those who haven't experienced the adventure of Mira Nair's Kama Sutra: A Tale of Love
Needs Avatar the last airbender. Okay you guys have amazing, cool, and sweet videos on Amazon. My favorite though is Avatar and I have bought every single episode you have so far. Your episode downloads are magnificent to see on my creative zen vision: M.I had a quick tip though: Can you get more Avatar the Last Airbender Digital downloads. Please!
Painted a picture for me... Having Asperger's Syndrome, I was having trouble picturing what is in the book, so when I watched the movie I finally had an idea of what the setting was. What came to a surprise to me was that Rosalind Chao (Keiko O'Brien in Star Trek DS9) was in it. I liked that, but I also liked the emotion behind the mothers when they were young, especially An-Mei. It was saddening when we saw why Suyuan had to leave her two babies behind; I can't tell you why, that would spoil it. I liked this better than the book
Yellowbeard. Not really for younger kids, but what a hoot, all star cast from monty pythons flying circus. Have to watch more than once to catch all of the little jokes through out the movie
Bring In On - All Or Nothing (Full Screen). Received in Factory Sealed Unopened Condition and in time for Christmas.  Thanks
Sergeant York DVD. My all time favorite movie. I had about wore out the VHS tape of Sergeant York which I have had for several years and had hoped a DVD would be released.  I was so excited when I saw it being offered by Amazon.com and immediately put in my order.  As always Amazon.com came through with flying colors with the price and fast delivery time.  The story of Sergeant York is a great story of the American farmer who works hard, is honest and a strong believer in god.  Although at the beginning Alvin York was pretty much a hell raiser until "lightening struck", literally. He came to know god and stayed strong in his beliefs even during time of war.  This movie is about a World War I soldier who single-handedly captured 132 Germans during the battle of the Argonne, received the Congressional Medal of Honor (highest award for heroic action in combat) and the Distinguished Service Cross (2nd highest award for heroic action in combat).  Yet with all the medals, awards and recognition he received, he never attempted to cash in unlike some lesser people of today. He wasn't proud of what he did during war, he didn't believe in killing. Yet when the companies wanted to pay him huge sums of money for endorsements, he refused, because he realized it was because of his actions during the war. A wonderful feel good story and I would suggest if you don't know a lot about this American Hero, Alvin York, read some of the works about him which are sold on Amazon.com.
I remember ma ma. This movie is one of the most educational films for kids of today to watch.It shows kids how they should look up to their elders and learn from them.So many kids today are not taught about their familys past and how their grandparents and great great grandparents worked and play just to survive. Without their grandparents they would not be here
Surprisingly good. I thought that Supernatural would just be another Sci-Fi thriller, but then I started watching it and was surprised to discover that there is real plot line and character development. I think this show is wonderful and would recommend it to everyone
Breezy Tracy-Hepburn Workplace Comedy Benefits Mainly from Their Teamwork. If you replace the constant use of the term "automation" with "outsourcing", this 1957 workplace-driven comedy would be quite a relevant tweak on corporate restructuring and office politics. As it stands now, it's a light piece of entertainment that benefits primarily from a smart screenplay by Phoebe and Henry Ephron (Nora's parents...must run in the family) and of course, the incomparable Tracy-Hepburn teamwork. It's not their best work, but fifteen years into their relationship, they achieve an easy, laser-sharp rapport here that makes the film easy to enjoy.Efficiently directed by Walter Lang, the movie focuses its plot on the research department of a national TV network, the so-called Federal Broadcasting System. The four-woman staff is headed by the whip-smart Bunny Watson, who appears to possess a wealth of information and an unfailing memory for the smallest detail. They work like clockwork together in finding responses to often extremely trivial questions, but they do everything manually. Enter Richard Sumner, a befuddled man with a measuring tape and mismatched socks, who turns out to be a brilliant engineer hired by the network CEO to install an electronic brain called EMERAC. Designed to streamline the research process, the monolithic computer has the research staff understandably concerned about pending unemployment. Invariably, Bunny and Sumner start to recognize a mutual attraction through the awkwardness, and further complications arise with the presence of Mike Cutler, a rising network executive who has pompously kept Bunny on a leash for years.As Bunny, Katharine Hepburn appears to be playing a variation of herself, which in this case, suits the role perfectly. By comparison, Tracy seems a bit tired as Sumner, except when interacting with Hepburn, whether unsuccessfully volleying brainteasers on a freezing rooftop, eating floating islands in their bathrobes, or canoodling between the second-floor bookshelves during the office Christmas party. A terrific supporting cast has been assembled starting with Gig Young in his typical role as the third wheel Mike, which he plays with enough sharp and smarmy aplomb to make Bunny's dilemma palpable. Joan Blondell expertly plays Bunny's stalwart sidekick Peg, and they achieve a genuine chemistry as they banter about the "Mexican Avenue bus".Dina Merrill and Sue Randall (forever etched in my memory as Beaver's crush-worthy schoolteacher Miss Landers on "Leave It to Beaver") seem a bit too glamorous to be librarians, but they're both serviceable, while Neva Patterson plays EMERAC's coldly efficient "mother", Miss Warriner, to brittle perfection. Even though the sets are pure 1950's-style dcor, Leon Shamroy makes full use of the Cinemascope process to bring his color-saturated cinematography to the widescreen. The 2004 DVD comes with a commentary track by film historian John Lee, who provides interesting insight to the production, casting and stage-to-screen translation. Merrill provides some remembrances of her own, but her commentary is spotty and a bit self-serving. A vintage, minute-long newsreel on the film's costumes; a few trailers for other Fox films of the period; and a photo gallery complete the package
On the Town. This exhilarating musical comedy, featuring (respectively) the fancy footwork and infectious crooning of GIs Kelly and Sinatra, perfectly captures the optimistic spirit that held sway in the post-World War II boom. Co-starring dancers Vera-Ellen and Ann Miller, "On the Town" was one of the first color films shot on location in Manhattan, and remains one of the grandest, liveliest Hollywood musicals ever made.
A horror movie that strives for something more. Freaks is surprisingly still intriguing and unique 75 years after it's original release. The story is interesting and the acting fairly believable. The short running time (66 minutes) is actually not much of a hindrance either, as it simply allows the film to get down to business quickly.All the characters are amazing to see on screen as most of them are real circus performers: The Human Torso, the "pinheads", two women with no arms, a bearded woman, the human skeleton, and the list goes on.  Even in this day and age, seeing these people on scren is mesmerizing.The DVD includes a great amount of special features, including an hour long feauturette where several historians and circus performers discuss the impact of the movie, and the give background on several characters in the film. With the special features and the film itself combined, this DVD is unmissable. Definitely worth checking out
A woman against the magistrate's authority. It seems that many people think that a woman is totally sujectunder male-dominant society. Under Confucious order, Koreawas male dominant society and woman did not appropriate rightsand opportunity as man. So what? in 17th or 18th century,European men did not allow or share their rights with Europeanwomen, either.The reason why some feminists enjoy this film is that not onlythis story is love story, which may make them feel guilty, butalso it's a story of a woman who was not submissive to localauthority. You can compare this movie with Dagerous Beauty inwhich a Venezian courtesan could not challenge the authority.For me, the great scene is the magistrate's interrogation andtorture to Chunhyang. In this scene, Chunhyang did give up andsaid what she thought againt brutal magistrate's demand."You are a daughter of a courtesan, so you are a courtesan, too.You should serve to me. It's a law. If you will not follow thelaw, I will punish you. ""What kind of punishment is given to a man who tries to rapeand urge adultery to a married woman?"
Good HD film!. I got this to see what a WMVHD film looks like on an HDTV and it looks great. It's not very long but the footage of the Blue Angels is pretty cool. I would reccomend this to anyone who loves fast jets and to anyone who wants to showcase their HD setup
An excellent movie. Jack Lemon gives a memorable, great performance. This movie also shows how the disease of alcoholism takes over and affects not only the drinker but his family and friends. It also shows how AA can help. Running the movie with Blake Edwards commentary is interesting as well. Blake and Jack talked about their own issues with drinking and how thought provoking the movie was for them. If you love Jack Lemon or want to know more about alcoholism this is probably one of the best movies to watch
Awesome. A must have for anime comedy fans. Being a big fan of anime comedy (the intelligent, yet lame humor) I was eager to see El Hazard "The magnificent world". Because of the high price of the set, I had some hesitation (because of some poor reviews on Amazon).Well, I have to say that the bad reviews are wrong. This DVD series was totally awesome (although I admit it started a bit slow). I promise the more you keep watching, the better it gets. The plot is highly intelligent (involving dimensional and time travel) and the characters are very interesting (with distinctive special powers).Some say the humor in El Hazard is juvenile (but I would argue no more juvenile then southpark), and seriously what good comedy isn't juvenile?Some also say that the story is sometimes too redundant (because many episodes involve a doomsday device), to which I respond "Do we call the original starwars trilogy redundant because they involve the death star"? no, ofcourse not.yes this DVD set lacks some extras, but I think Pioneer did a great job. The DVD menu presentation is beautiful, and the box is very elegant too. Hopefully you can get this set for around 40 dollars on Ebay (beware of bootlegs). It's very hard to find a good authentic set. The sequel "alternative world" which I just ordered, individually should cost around 30 dollars if you shop smart.For my fellow anime comedy fans, I also reccomend "Niea under 7" and "His and Her Circumstances".animation=5plot=4music=4characters=5comedy=4Total= 4.4 Star
Four Rooms DVD. This movie is a classic, especially for those who love Tim Roth
"Dog Soldiers". I surprisingly enjoyed this movie.  It is a little choppy and hard to understand what is going on at first, but it is well worth the watch.  Especially if you are a werewolf movie fan
Very Enjoyable. I really enjoyed this film and I know nothing about soccer.  I liked the acting and as a teacher I found the relationshop between CF and his students very heart warming.  Unlike others though I did not like the hair.  It put me in mind of something large and furry having crawled onto CF's head and died.  Never mind though, he looked great otherwise and the performance was surprisingly complex and moving.  I liked the ending unlike a previous reviewer.  Were you looking for more detail?  Did you miss the point that he could &quot;move on&quot; from his passion to a new one
Jesus of Nazereth - DVD. Excellent movie on the life of Christ. Well done, and mostly holds true to the gospel accounts. Recommended for anyone interested in Christianity, or even those interested in knowing what it is all about. A great resource for those who need visual aid to reading the gospels. The setting for the movie is very realistic, with great acting to go along with it. Besides being "The Greatest Story Ever Told," it is also one of the greatest versions of the story
Love the new download!. I wanted it for my collection, however you can sift through all the youtube stuff and end up with the same video for free if you want to do the work
Laugh out loud funny. I've seen Stephen Lynch live, in this Comedy Central special, and heard his audio cds.  Live is by far the best experience but this video is a close second.  The live audience really enhances the experience.  This is some truly funny stuff
Middle class, middle aged Baby Boomers, was this you?. This movie probably falls flat for anyone not of the characters' ages...at the time of this movie(early 80's), about mid- to late-thirties. These were people affected by anti-war movements, race riots, the sudden availabilty of college to almost any comer. They have their faults, have stumbled and succeeded in life, or at least hung on for the ride. When one of this once tight-knit group commits suicide, the gathering of the survivors (and an occasional dragged-along spouse) leads to increasingly deeper insights, into themselves, each other, the world around them. With such a large, strong ensemble cast, the movie can't probe too deeply, but overall the deep, abiding friendships that brought these people together in the first place, during their college years, works its magic again. For a weekend, anyway, they reconnect & circle each other in ways based on their past but tempered by the passing of time, when they became "responsible" (said like a four-letter word!). They play & replay their lives & relationships against the canvas of Meg Tilly's character, a much younger 20-something who had been living with the deceased friend. The gang constantly look to her for clues to answer the question, "why did he do it?", but in the end, their answers come from within themselves.The great soundtrack is perfectly aimed at people coming of age in the sixties & crystalizes that moment in time so well. The cast is superb, most having become recognized as well-toned rising stars at the movie's release.Anyone who was influenced by and was growing up in the sixties & seventies, who hung out with a group of friends who included: an egghead, a nerd, a macho guy, a cool dude, a sexy girl, a hippie girl, a gearhead, a druggie or alkie, or some combination, can relate very much to this great movie. All others need to understand that, like many retrospective movies, much has been glossed over & certainly this represents only a certain group of these Baby Boomers
Submarine Creature Comes After Belle!. "Creature from the Black Lagoon" (1954) is an extraordinary class B film!I've seen it when it was first released to theaters in Argentina (Yes I'm that old!). The Creature haunted me all over my pre-teen years. I've just found this VHS copy and thoroughly enjoy it!The original movie was filmed in 3D format; unfortunately I wasn't able to see it under that layout; however viewing it in 2D is a chilling experience.The `50s was what we may call "Monsters' Decade" this Creature is one of the best of them all. Of course you shouldn't expect the realistic and/or surrealistic feats that modern film technology enables. This is a "rubber creature", yet impressive (more so in scenes on ground environment).The story is quite simple. An archeologist finds a fossil hand protruding from a hill side in the Amazonian territory.He returns to civilization and obtains support for an expedition leaded by Mark Williams the main sponsor and ambitious entrepreneur. The team is completed by scientist David Reed and his also scientist fiance Kay Lawrence.Different circumstances lead the group into the Black Lagoon. A natural paradise but with the Gill Man roaming free!The Creature is increasingly aggressive so action scenes underwater, on the jungle or into the tiny ship proceed without respite.The film has many outstanding features.Director Jack Arnold is very proficient delivering solid sci-fi horror films such as "It Came from Outer Space" (1953), "The Incredible Shrinking Man" (1957), the present movie and its sequel. IMHO "The Creature" is his best.Play acting is very good with Richard Carlson and Richard Denning in the leading roles.Julia Adams deserves a special mention: outstanding legs and absolutely adorable in her white bathing suit performing an aquatic duo with the Creature!Underwater scenes are great: a strange mixture of realism and water-ballet.It is a very good horror movie for all audiences!Reviewed by Max Yofre.
Taking Care of Business. Taking Care of Business is one of the FUNNIEST movies that I have seen. IT'S MY ALL-TIME FAVORITE
A Really Cool Movie That Fans Will Enjoy. This movie has always ranked high as one of my personal favorites in the series. The 3D scenes may look cheesy without 3D, but the story is just as cool as the original. There are many memorable parts of the movie that I have always loved for many years, especially all of the scenes that were about the biker gang. The character Shelly has always been one of my favorite characters in the series because I can sadly relate to the guy a little too much. This is also the movie of which Jason finally gets his mask! So, with everything, this is a really cool movie and a historical one if for no other reason than this is Jason's hockey mask debut!
good movie. Action packed thriller of an undercover cop.  LL Cool J along with fellow rappers Ice-T and Ice-Cube have crossed over into the world of acting.  LL plays a cruel druglord, he plays it so well you wonder if he could really do this..just kidding.  This is a good movie for a Saturday night rental
Me and Mrs. Jones. This is a very good movie to watch and especially if you are familiar with European customs. Robson Green is one of my favorite British actors and I tend to buy a lot of his movies when the movies are released. If you like Cinderella stories and maybe like to escape from reality every so often, then this is the movie for you. All the characters are very believeable and true to form. Even though something like this probably would not happen in real life, its always nice to dream. I recommend this movie to anybody, male or female.
Great Robert Patrick flick!. Wow, I was taken back by this movie.  I have never heard of it before, and I'm a big fan of Robert Patrick.  I had to check it out.  He is in almost every single scene and Jennifer Esposito is also exceptionally good in this movie.  It has some really good twists, and it's kind of like an "I gotcha" type of ending.  This is a definate check out if your a fan of Robert Patrick
If not Altman's greatest film, certainly one of his top five.... This, along with Nashville, are my favorite Altman films.  This is one of the most beautiful, haunting, sad, and poetic westerns ever made.  Actually, to call it a Western is a bit misleading, as it may be technically a Western, it is much more than that.  The Leonard Cohen soundtrack fits in so well with the film.  Amazingly, the songs by Cohen were NOT written specifically for the film.  Altman was a major Cohen fan, and got permission from Leonard to use his songs for his film.  Thank you, Mr. Leonard Cohen.  I can't really imagine this film without them.  Most of the songs here appear on Leonard's album Songs of Leonard Cohen album.  The Stranger Song, the song that plays over the opening credits, sets the mood so perfectly for the entire film.  The look of the film is one of the more unique in cinematic history.  It was achieved through various filters at the time.  Vilmos Zigmond, the cinematographer, didn't get the look in the lab, but in the camera, which made it look as good as it does.  Dreyer's Vampyr has a similar other worldly look like this film, except that film had a light leak in the camera.  In other words, that was a happy accident.  This film was a deliberate attempt at a new cinematic look, and it succeeds in spades.  This is great filmmaking.  The performances are astounding as well.  Beatty and Christie are wonderful, and Keith Carradine is superb in a small, but tragic role.  This is one of Altman's greatest films, a film that you can watch over and over again.
The book is better. Yes, the scenery is wonderful, but the book is paced better. And, having grown up on a farm, how the heck did they think anyone would thresh grain in the winter? Where were the historical advisers? Threshing is done in the hottest part of the year, usually July
5 Stars*****Remastered Little Mermaid is Spectacular*****Five Stars. My wife and I just watched this disney movie with our 8 year old son.The colors are exquisite, deeply saturated, clear crisp detail, and picture quality is incredible.Sound quality was substantially better than the original.  All 6 channels of sound were strong without being harsh, and convey a sense of beauty.The film is all about the triumph of human spririt.  I'm sure that the girls will relate to the princess, but my son was impressed as well.Thanks Disney for doing such a great job in remastering this classic.  I will keep it in my library for the princesses in my family
solid acting and excellent story. I really liked this film.  It's not a groundbreaking movie in any way, though.  It's about a bunch of underdog kids who aren't interested in football until a coach comes along and changes their minds.  Throughout the movie we see the kids working out and trying hard to prepare for the match against the other more talented (and unlikeable) team.   It's pretty much the same thing we've seen in the Mighty Ducks except now it's about football.It's just a typical family movie that sends the message to children that even if you're small and think you don't have any talent, you actually DO have the talent to play football, hockey, basketball, whatever.  One of the characters is a girl who doesn't know if she wants to play football with the boys or be a cheerleader like all the other girls.Rick Moranis once again plays that shy, quiet character he does so well in other films such as Honey I Shrunk the Kids.  It's hard to believe he's now a country singer (no, I'm not kidding).  Ed O'Neil doesn't quite play the jerk character you'd expect from the Married with Children show.  He's not really a nice guy either, though.I find it interesting that the team names are the Giants (the good guys) vs. the Cowboys (the bad guys) because the Monday Night Football game this week were those two teams facing each other (with the Giants winning)
Good Movie. If you like fantasy movies with a good bit a drama added in, then you'll like this one. I really liked it. I'd watch it two or three times in a 5 year time period. And I'd watch it again the next day if the right person was with me
Most Interesting Pre Code Examination Of Marital Infidelity With An Oscar Winning Norma Shearer. These early thirties films labelled as "Pre Code", are always most interesting to watch from a historical perspective as only a few years after this film was made such a topic would never have been able to be presented as it is here. The passage of time of course makes the subject matter of MGM's "The Divorcee", seem tame however back in 1930 this story was considered very adult and almost ahead of its time in its fairly honest examination of the "expected", roles for husbands and wives in the marital situation. Norma Shearer who today is sadly not well known really proved her acting chops in this vehicle and went home with the Best Actress Oscar that year for her troubles. Often labelled quite restrictively as the dignified first lady of MGM resulting from much of her later work in this decade in husband Irving Thalberg's prestige productions; here proves what she was capable of doing on screen when given meaty roles to tackle. Her other effort from this time "A Free Soul", makes a nice companion piece to "The Divorcee", in illustrating the range of roles Shearer was capable of handling when examining her overall career.
Step aside Bond, Diabolik is here!. I will keep this short and sweet. Underground lairs, 60's sports cars, beautiful women, exotic locals, hippies smoking pot at an orgy and some groovy music. This movie has it all. Diabolik's underground hideout is 100% pimp with a car elevator, giant revolving bed, swimming hole that leads into the ocean, sexy see-through shower stalls and more! If I had a few million dollars, I would recreate his pad for sure! Buy this movie, it rules
So entertaining! Way to go! VERY LIGHT HEARTED FUN!. You'd want to live in the 1980's with a film like this. A Bit of rock n' roll, love, a mad scientist. A Bully included to spice things up a little!ON occasion, due to success or failure people disappear or reappear in Michael's (not the name of his character) family photo's and has to set the record straight so his father will fall in love with his mum -- not Michael!! Otherwise, he won't exis in the future. Only the "alien creature" that he uses to scare his father (the whimpy teen) reinforces the idea in his mind to marry Michael J Fox's mother!The stereotypes are silly but enjoyable, the plot is easy to follow and you have sense of affinity with the "doc" and Michael J Fox's role.Any Back to the Future movie is good. No. 3 is my favorite though. But the most obvious thing to do is to follow them in chronological order! Even though I didn't find out about these movies like that!If you like sci-fi like Hitchhicker's Guide to the Galaxy (which is more open to it's audience that it is a comedy) -- you'll like this. If you like Lost In Space, which is not very a very serious sci-fi series, you'll like this too. Just fun, fun, fun.It sucks how Michael has Parkinson's disease now! When you look at these movies, and one may think that when seeing these movies, but see him for who he was in his prime and pray to Elohim he gets better these days for someone who always preferred to star in comedy-like role movie or serial
Worth Watching For Cast Alone. I am a hugh fan of Robert Newton, made famous as Long John Silver in Disney's Treasure Island.  Seeing him in his younger days as would-be tough guy Bill Walker, was very interesting.  You can clearly see glimpses of his future characters such as Long John Silver, Bill Sykes in Oliver Twist and so on.  Having seen him mostly play rough guys it was aslo fun to see what a cutie his really is. The film isn't the greatest but I would definatly recommend see it despite critics pointing out its cinematic weaknesses and plot flaws.  I am one of those people who simply watches a movie instead of analysizing the film to death, and it is worth watching
In the mouth of awesomeness!. This film just rocks, probably the best film in Neill's carrear (asside from Event Horizon)."Master of horror John Carpenter (Halloween, The Thing) is back with his scariest movie to date!"Sutter Cane is the best selling horror novelist, but his latest novel is driving his readers literally insane. When he unexpectably vanishes, his publisher sends a special investigator, John Trent (Sam Neill) to track him down. On the search for the missing author he finds himself crossing a deadly barrier between fiction, reality and insanity, nothing is what it seems in this terrifying world of which there is no escape.....Inspired by the tales of H. P. Lovecraft, this shocking story is, in the words of it's acclaimed director, "horror beyond description!"I am a huge horror fanatic, when I first saw this movie, i rented on VHS I was blown away and I had to see it again, the film draws you in and never lets go. This movie is a definate must see for any horror fan.10/1
A  Classic of European Films. French director Louis Malle made in this one, in my opinion, his greatest work.Briefly -and mainly- this is the story of two kids in a catholic school during the German occupation of France.As always, different critics will pick up those themes that most interest him. To me this was a film abouta) Childhood cruelty,b) Coming of agec) Social classes (as noted from the environment of a school)d) and religionNot in any particular order but all very interrelated. Also, I'd like to point out some interesting notes that caught my eye: the education environment. The relation between kids themselves, and the kids and their teachers. I was specially interested (because of the contrast with today's US) in the quality of education that was taught in France, in the spirit of discipline, respect, hard word... the underlining importance -as usual in French films- of books. Sure the French kids could be as "naughty" as US kids, but at least they would read Jules Verne or Arabian Nights. What do US kids read? That's right, nothing. They don't know Melville, Steinbeck, Jack London, Robert L. Stevenson. In US public schools kids don't read anything. They have the maid-teachers read for them. They still write on lined paper in college because they wouldn't be able to write straight (!!).A work of art, even more because it is not an easy-to-tell story, this one. And time practically flies while watching it. I suggest showing it to your nearest specimen of teenager. If he stands the whole movie, he is probably a happy private school kid or a miserable public shool underachiever. If he stands ten minutes only, he can still live to be a senator or even President. If he runs away at the beginning he is probably a "normal" kid. (And, unfortunately, the same applies to their parents).A wonderful film
long lost cinderella. i have waited for fourty years to see this movie ,i enjoyed it as a child and now my seven year old daugther can enjoy it with me .this is the best cinderella film of all time none of the other cinderella's can not top this one .four sisters and myself grow up on this cinerella by rodger&hammerstein's and they all say this is the best cinderella.thank you agian amozo
Enjoyable, sexy and dark!. Mitchum stars in a noir film that specifically suits his reticent, subversive style.  "Out of the Past" is true to the noir genre.  The plot--an unusually savvy detective is set up as a "chump" by the femme fatale. He falls for her only to be used in her machinations to gain power and money.  Ultimately he refuses to be manipulated anymore and participates in her downfall.  In this film we also see the potential for this character if he falls for an honest woman who can be lovingly believe in him.  But the deeds of his past catch up with him--happily ever after is not in the cards.This film was filmed in gorgeous black and white, meticulously framed in each shot whether capturing a closeup of gorgeous Mitchum and Greer, or stunning location shots in San Francisco, the Rockies and Mexico.  This is Mitchum in his prime right before the he was busted for marijuana.  Enjoyable, sexy and dark
Warm and fuzzy. This one has one of those touching endings where you get to see that even Booth has a heart...well, more so than we already know.  The ending got me, I got misty over it.  Enjoy with someone you love
Becket - A classic. Finally,this DVD movie is on Pre-Order.A much awaited release,long due ..now little less than 3months away.Grab your copy now
Assassination buffs this is a must. You may not agree with all the wild conspiracy ideas, and you may believe in the lone assassin like myself. However, I really think in order to take a stand, you need to read the Warren Report, and have A DVD of the Zapruder film - these are the essentials. Then I would suggest to buy an early period conspiracy book like Six Seconds In Dallas and a book that shows the flaws in the Warren Report like Accessories After The Fact, only then would I suggest getting into the deep conspiracy ideas
Another great Slater Film. Having seen parts of this film over a span of the last decade or so, without fully seeing all of it, I noticed this DVD on sale at a huge retailer.. (Rhymes with Ball-Mart), for only $4.88, I couldn't resist picking it up to see it all finally.Was it worth it? Yes. I am a straight married guy, and a huge fan of Christan Slater. I have seen damn near every movie with him in it, and Pump was another classic. Did I love everything about this movie? No. It definately reeks of late 80's references and inuendo. I.E. "Bill and Ted" Clones. The story was very well done, however, it contains 2 major flaws.(1) I am a cop, and I know for a fact the Federal Government, would not send the FCC after a lone pirate station who is not screaming for the downfall of government. But is ranting about the local high school administration.(2) I didn't like the ending. I won't spoil it for you, but just say it could have been better.Overall it was a 4 out of 5. Not bad for a film from 1990.
Great Show. Bones is one of my favorite TV series. This one episode I missed so I had to get it to keep on track. Great show even if you have never seen it from the begining
A Favorite. The actors and the story, of course, are so engaging. It's an uplifting story for anyone with a romantic soul. Another winning UK production!
Absolutely hilarious, but you'll either love it or hate it. When I first saw this movie on the shelf at the local video store, I had quite a bit of trepidation.  And yet, I rented it.  Now I own the DVD, and I can't count the number of times I've seen it.  No, it's not an original concept, and no, it's not Animal House.  I don't think they're really trying to be another Animal House, though, even if they give quite a few nods to that movie.What this movie is, is something light and comedic that you can sit back and enjoy.  The comedy is crude at times but well done, from the play on relationships to a dildo fencing match.As I said, you'll either love it or hate it.  If you're the type of person who has to think about any movie you see, you should probably move on to a movie that takes itself more seriously, because this one does nothing of the sort.  If you're looking for Animal House, try searching under "Animal House".  Just a suggestion.Beyond the mere comedy of the movie, they do actually have some messages hidden underneath, and we're not talking boxers or briefs.  It's a common theme about gender perceptions, peer pressure and self-esteem.  So maybe there's something to think about after all
Fox has not taste. Once again, Fox has cancelled a brilliant show. While it is occasionally a bit off-color, the dialogue is brilliant, but apparently people couldn't follow the episodes, so no one watched this great show, and it was cancelled. I haven't tried the download option, but I highly recommend the show
Nice date night movie!. Add one part love story and one part baseball sports flick and you have a great date night movie! This is a wonderful movie to watch. Kelly Preston and Kevin Costner do really great jobs of playing their roles in this movie, but more importantly the storyline is really well done. Costner plays an aging professional pitcher at the end of his career. On the last game he pitches, we see not only what is going on in his mind as a professional pitcher, but also flashbacks of his career over the years and his on again/off again romantic relationship with Preston's character. Definitely worth watchin
Fantastic Character Study. You do not have to be Catholic to appreciate the towering schievement that "The Nun's Story" is.  This is an example of what Hollywood used to do very well in portaying an intimate character study against an epic backdrop.  Audrey Hepburn is simply tremendous as Sister Luke, a woman torn between her devotion to God and service to humanity.  Peter Finch matches her as the world-weary humanistic doctor.  As a Catholic and educated by nuns this film gave me an appreciation for the sacrifices these woman make to better serve Jesus Christ and humanity.  It's surprising that a film of this magnitude took so long to make it to DVD
Classic Propoganda Film. October is a re-telling of the events of the Russian revolution. However, it was commissioned as a propoganda piece so that the only "character" that stands out is Lenin, who, of course is idolized. There are the populace and soldiers who are on the side of the Bolsheviks but they are basically nameless and faceless as is the other side (mensheviks). However, its not the plot that makes the movie fascinating but the use of montage and imagery, sometimes dizzying. Not quite as good as Battleship Potemkin but still fascinating. Certainly, not as morally disturbing as Triumph of the Will (which it influenced) but still, a film made to support a government sanctioned point of view. However, the crowd shots and the quick cuts from one scene to the next in a rapid but still coherent fashion, resonates through current film and even music videos
return to Easter Beagle. Go back in time to when you were younger and watched Snoopy on television. It's just that great to see the Charlie Brown gang waiting and preparing for the arrival of the Easter Beagle. And now I can share that experience with my grandchildren. thank you Easter Beagle. Happy Easter
Nice and awesome. I absolutely love Atlantis. From Ronon Dex, to Sheppard, and to all the faces. I'd cry if Atlantis was cancelled. Seriously though, Steve should have never have died, he should also have been put in command of SG1. Can you imagine that..."Why Steve, welcome to Earth...you're welcome to live out your life, if you only feed in self defense on enemies...'kay? Oh, you're also in charge of Sg1. :P" But seriously, the Wraith make this show so awesome. From Steve to Bob to Edward, to Gordon and Alexander, to Michael and Eric (by far James's best performance yet).The Wraith make this show what it is. But one thing??? Why don't we have Before I Sleep? Seriously, you have no idea how irked I am at that, since I began watching in S.2.12.Anyways, I think Atlantis totally pwns SG1
A Subtle yet Powerful Western. Michael Winner's CHATO'S LAND may seem a bit below standard from other films that he directed but the strength in this film comes from Charles Bronson's stoic performance seen and unseen on the screen. Bronson's presence is there and is inescapable as is the baron land he habitats. The visual forsaken look of the film's characters and landscape makes the viewer wonder what the point of this whole film is.  Whatever Bronson's transgressions may really have been the forlorn posse tracking him are representative of the worst qualities of society. I saw this film when first released but with time I see the deeper social implications and commentary on society that director Michael Winner was making. This is a good Western but may be a difficult one to appreciate on an initial viewing
The best movie ever!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!. I love this movie!!! it is the best movie ever!!!!!!!!! it has so many things that poor hispanics and go through. Its kind of sterotypical but it is still a good movie!!! Yeah it is kinda of rough but it shows so much reality. It has sooooooo much drama and things just happen so randomly. I love this movie i would watch it every day if i could!!
Kind, Friendly and Enjoyable. Sure this movie has some bad acting and low budget animation, but I don't care about that. The plot was very good, it was touching, and the end was very pleasing. The only thing that bugs me is that it hardly seems like it's a sequal to the original, because the draogn is young and doesn't have the wisdom of Draco from the original, but it is still good. The movie is probably meant for a younger audience, but I think people of all ages would enjoy this movie
Russian Revolution. As a girl from Russia i want to tell - this is a very good movie about turning point of my Fatherland's histor
One Of The Great American Novels. This edition of LITTLE WOMEN is great!  First of all, there's the wonderful story of the March family in the years during and after the Civil War, as the 4 daughters -- Meg, Jo, Beth, and Amy -- grow to womanhood, experiencing joy and overcoming obstacles and tragedy.  This edition stays true to the language and grammar used in the original.  I have read versions of the novel in which the girls' grammar is cleaned up for them!In addition, the introduction by Susan Cheever is first-rate; it is neither too long or too short, and she beautifully ties it to her own experience without being cloying.Another reason why I so highly recommend this edition is because there is a glossary at the back to explain some of the obscure (to modern readers) terms and obsolete slang.  Also, there's a nice essay/review by G.K. Chesterson, who warmly praises Alcott's book
movie. It was a very unusual movie.  I was a bit confused about their relationship, but I was entertained enough to watch the whole thing
Kind, Friendly and Enjoyable. Sure this movie has some bad acting and low budget animation, but I don't care about that. The plot was very good, it was touching, and the end was very pleasing. The only thing that bugs me is that it hardly seems like it's a sequal to the original, because the draogn is young and doesn't have the wisdom of Draco from the original, but it is still good. The movie is probably meant for a younger audience, but I think people of all ages would enjoy this movie
The Crow Of Diamonds?. Another Bert I. Gordon masterpiece, "The Beginning of the End" features a wooden Peter Graves waxing philosophic about the effects of radiation on locusts (not grasshoppers), which have grown to varying sizes and are maurauding through an oddly-mountainous Illinois, dispatching of entire towns.  Graves is accompanied by a plucky female journalist and (briefly) a deaf-mute gardening assistant.  Add in half-hearted special effects (shot after shot of locusts crawling up postcards of buildings) and some leery directing (an opening car sequence that takes forever to end; a lascivious locust staring into an apartment at a freshly showered woman in a towl), and you've got your typical D-Grade schlock.This is one of the first episodes from the Mike Nelson season (the back of the DVD box features Joel's friendly mug; don't be fooled), and as such, there is some hesitancy in the jokes, some ground feeling.  The opening host segment -- where Mike receives a bizarre phone call from a trailer trash mom who thinks he's someone else -- sets a great tone for the show, as does the invention exchange (the "Re-Comfy-Bike" and new playing cards), but the movie is such a dud that the riffs are often repetitive and rare.The host segments inject a bit of life into the dullness.  One of them though, a deliberately non-funny stand-up routine by Tom, is SO deliberately non-funny that it ... well, it really isn't funny, mirroring in a sad way the status of the entire film.  The joke of the show hinges on movies that are so bad they're funny, but every once in a while the MST3K crew finds a movie that's so bad it's, well, it's nothing but bad.  "The Beginning of the End" comes close to that; after all, there are only so many jokes that can be made about long, ponderous silences and recycled dialogue/scenes.  Mike and the bots do the best they can here, but the end result is just so-so.  For die-hard collectors only
FORT APACHE-THE GREATEST WESTERN EVER!!. I have another review of this GREAT John Ford classic under the "John Wayne-John Ford Collection",which includes eight(8) classic Wayne-Ford motion Pictures that include:"She Wore a Yellow Ribbon"(great Technicolor Western),"Stagecoach",(the film that made Wayne a Star and brought back the Western,along with DeMille's "Union Pacific",back to A-Level movie status)"They Were Expendable"(a WW2 film set in the Pacific,co-starring Wayne and Robert Montgomery)," 3 Godfathers"( Often filmed Western story that Ford made as a silent,starring Harry Carey,sr.,who this film is  made in Memory of),"The Long Voyage Home"(nearly forgotten Ford masterpiece,derived from four (4) Eugene O'Neill playlets,adapted by Dudley Nichols),"The Wings of Eagles"(the true story of Frank "Spig" Wead,WW1-WW2 flying ace and real life pal of Ford,with Wayne-O'Hara as husband & wife,with NOT ENOUGH MAUREEN!),and a special 2-disc DVD set of that great anti- racist post-Civil-War Western, "The Searchers".In "Fort Apache", Henry Fonda,as the new commander,of Fort Apache, is an arrogant Indian hating, and Irish-Catholic disliking,WASP who seeks glory for himself,no matter what the cost maybe!Great perfomances by Fonda, Wayne,George O'Brien,Ward Bond,Anna Lee,Irene Rich,Victor McLaglen,Dick Foran(who sings very well too),Grant Withers(as a corrupt Suttler),Guy Kibbe, Pedro Armendariz,and as a very sympathetic "Cochise" Miguel Inclan!Shirley temple and John Agar provide the love interest.A GREAT MOVIE! A GREAT WESTERN!! by AMERICA'S GREATEST DIRECTOR!!
Star Trek At Its Best. Shore Leave is one of the best episodesof the classic series. It uses all thesci fi props but also has a great story,if you don't even care about Star Trekand have to watch one, watch this one.
"WE WILL BLACKEN YOUR SKIES AND BURN YOUR CITIES TO THE GROUND AND WIPE YOUR DIRTY LITTLE EMPIRE OFF THE FACE OF THE EARTH". This is an inspiring movie to ALL Americans at this stage of the war vs Japan...in reality, 4 of the captured USAAF crew were beheaded, others tortured unmercifuly...3 survived  at war's end...with the release of, "The Purple Heart" at Christmas time [1944] well after the Gen Doolittle raid in April 1942, it hit home and in our hearts to the heroics of our courageous United States Army Air Force and Naval Forces in harm's way...this movie depicts Japan for all of her quick grabs in the Pacific War; yet, Japan was wide open and vunerable to air attack...it helped lift our morale to perservere, sacrifice and no more surrenders, ultimately paving the way for Japan's unconditional surrender forevermore in Aug/1945...it was NOT a propaganda movie; conversely, a cornerstone film for total victory over Japan who was our most formidable and cunning enemy we ever faced on the sea and on the land...Dana Andrews stirring lecture to that Japanese judge rang true as the "USAAF will blackened your skies, day and nite we'll come to burn your cities to the ground and wipe your dirty little Empire off the face of the earth"...that was a TRUISM and justly so...sadly, today's liberal Americans can't relate or comprehend to just what a UNITED effort it took to bring the Japanese Militarists to extinction in Aug/1945...the Japanese got what they readily deserved with A-Bomb interest...this movie was a harbinger of what was to come to the home-islands of Japan...WW2 was a great American lesson to America's enemies...I loved this wartime 1944 film about wartime April/1942....SSGT CHRIS SARNO-USMC FM
It's Jimmy Carr - Need more be said?!?. Thanks for keeping a Brit sane in a country full of "My wife says..." jokes.Your wife is fat and ugly and I don't care what she says. Because she's ugly. And fat.....and not my wife
You don't like movies if you don't like this. After watching this movie one Friday night I immediately watched it again. "Did I just see that" was my initial reaction. A fantastic film that sticks with you for weeks. Initially rented from a local blockbuster before purchasing it via Amazon, I watched it over 6 times before returning it back. I loved the Cat Stevens soundtrack and it makes me sad that there is no Harold and Maude soundtrack that has all of the songs especially " Tea for the Tillerman". You appreciate the brilliant directing and although it has been considered "creepy" it is never truly unsettling, but rather it makes you examine how you add value to life and for myself created ways to be Maude-a-licous!
A Great Update. This classic looks great in the new format, happy to have it back in our librar
"Songcatcher" Captures the Heart. "Songcatcher", starring a wonderful ensemble cast including, Janet McTeer, Aidan Quinn and Emmy Rossum, in what I believe is her debut performance, is a beautiful, emotional masterpiece.  Beautiful cinematography, rich well developed characters, and stunning bluegrass music combine to make this film a new classic.Quinn is as impeccable as ever in this, another of the period pieces which seem to be his forte. The story lines are both moving and beautiful and demonstrate how far one will go to preserve the past as well as how far yet another would go to destroy what he cannot understand.Not for the youngsters (adult themes and brief nudity), "Songcatcher" is an intellectual and entertaining film for the mature movie viewer, which, in this reviewer's opinion was an Oscar worthy effort.
is that all i can give it-5 stars?. Samantha Morton is so good in this you'll cry.you'll laugh too so how can you beat that?Sean Penn gives a fantastic portrayal of the worlds'2nd best guitarist who also happens to be a jerk.Uma Thurman is great as a writer exploring everypossible motive into human behavior.Woody and several other talking heads giveperiodical narration throughout the movie.I saw this movie when it came out and was struckwhat an excellent story it was with such superb acting.and seeing it again recently many years later it did notloose one bit of it's dramatic or comedic touches.absolutely one of Woody's best!
Fast Foward - Fun Movie. This is a great movie.  Some make fun of the cheesy story line but by the end of the movie you will be singing all of the songs!  The dancing and choreography is so fun, you can't resist trying it yourself
awesome movie!. This movie is a wonderful follow up to the first...Anne has the same charming spirit and the cast is just as wonderful as they were the first time. I highly recommend this movie to anyone
My man Dr Smith is a riot in this episode. Dr Smith and the Robot go hog wild, switching personalities and swapping insults.  This is a great episode
A brilliant film!. This film tells a powerful story, a "Crime and Punishment"-esque recovery of the soul, except without the ending that Dostoevsky had in his novel. After Neel Auguste committs the murder, Madame La (Juliette Binoche), much like Dostoevsky's Sonya, takes on the monumental task of recovering a lost soul and succeeds. Those who suggest this film is unrealistic have no grasp of eternal, Christian values of compassion and those who call this film ideological propaganda have no appreciation for beauty, as the acting (by all three, especially Kusturica and Auteuil, whom I have discovered through this film and who almost eclipse the talented Binoche), the cinematography, and the directing are absolutely brilliant.This is a must-watch for many different kinds of people, from those interested in St. Pierre & Miquelon (I had to look up the islands on a map and was surprised to learn they are French, not Canadian), to those who would like an illustration of why there is never a soul, lost forever, to those who would just like to receive aesthetic pleasure from a beautiful film.Finally, some have commented on the character of Neel Auguste, saying that he is "retarded" for not running away. Do not let a comment like that fool you. It would not be made had the reviewer understood the character or even picked up on a direct quote from Madame La, "You are so fatalistic!". Never trust someone who tells you not to watch a movie. Watch it and decide for yourself. I cannot envision that you wouldn't like it
Very good movie!. It's very cool in my honest opinion and very good action and special effects! And the very hot Mario Van Peebles makes it AWESOME!!
"Is this the Austrailian Sound?! I want the Austrailian sound!". First of all,I highly recommend the review below, by the guy named "Sideburns." I think he captures the factual basis and spirit for this film. I can understand how some who are "Australia-philes" might want to see a purely Aussie product, and this is not that. It's not "Smash Palace" or many other fine Aussie films of that genre. What this film is, can be described in one word: WEIRD.That's a good thing.The genius of Eric Roberts used to be (and may still be again), his ability to seemingly lose himself in his roles, and do so while lacking any self-consciousness about how he comes across. To see this film and then see other excellent (and weird) films, including "The Pope of Greenwich Village" and "Runaway Train," is to see a career arc that was pretty amazing. He seemed to get into serious films with major talent around him, and then be able to carry-off demanding roles (albeit, some similar, sure), with energy and command.Okay, onto this film. First of all, let's be honest, this is not a deep film. It's not meant to be. It is almost like an indie verson of a Farrely brothers film, at least their early ones, where they don't mind taking risks and also having fun. There's also a nice romantic subtext they had ("Kingpin" - believe it or not, "Me, Myself & Irene") where, in a ridiculous way, they reflect what's in a good majority of people who are either searching for love, or just searching for something in themselves, and they find it reflected or - in the case of the main characters in the Farrely films, and definitely in "Coca Cola Kid," abbetted by others. I'm not saying Woody Harrelson or Jim Carrey could've been the Coca Cola Kid, but what they all have in common, in the specific roles they played in these films, is to make one wonder if anyone would or could find anything remotely interesting about them in a romantic way. They are so completely un-indearing, it seems almost cartoonish - and then one just thinks of many people we all know, and it's not that unbelieavable.The music in the film alone is just fantastic. The Coca Cola jingle Robert's character commissions is incredible, and it's punctuated by this aboriginal guy who is playing his device - a guy Roberts finds outside the Coca Cola local offices, and promptly drafts into service. It's just really funny to see The Kid's mind work - marketing wheels a'spinnin' as he devises and employs his strategies. Everyone on both sides is equally mocked, and that makes for a really fine, mostly non-judgemental film (rare these days, eh?).There are other nice touches in the soundtrack andalso, I'd be remiss, not to mention NUTS, if I avoided the very nice scene of Greta Scaatchi where she's freshening up...well, go see the film!It's quirky, it's revealing, and a lot of fun. It also does a great job of discussing culture clashes, where, when everyone is harmless, you can see how progress comes out of a some dissension, yet still wonder if we're losing a little something in the translation. If that's vague, so's the film in some ways, and I think that is precisely what the director was going for. It doesn't all have to fit perfectly. A lot doesn't, and that makes it kind of seem real
I want the music!. well ,I like the movie very much ,it makes me feel excited when I watch the movie,also i like the original soundtrack of if,but fortunetely i didnt get it,so,anybody who knows that ,please tell me ,ok?thank you very much!!!
Election. Election sounds like a good movie and I am looking forward to seeing it.Rated R for strong sexualtly,sex-related dialague and language and a scene of drug use.Canada:14A.Warning:Not for children
Funniest couple. This comedy is a classic. It is not only the plot which is based on a play by Neil Simon but the cast makes this film a comedy that you will have a hard time to stop laughing.The plot is well known- a divorced man moves in with his bachelor friend and they became roomates from hell.As I said you will laugh and laugh a lot.  Jack Lemon and Walter Matthau make a perfect duet and complement each other. Buy it
i so loved this movie so much!. This movie is so comforting to me.Its sweet, funny and def. gives you a message.No matter how green the grass may seem (A  man that has a lot on his plate: Kevin Bacon is on the verge of a affair with a pretty young woman) it's not always.moral of the story is you need to go with your heart.He realized at the end that his wife and baby on the way meant more to him that reconnecting with his "single self"I absolutely love this movie.love the music, love the actors, love the scenes where bacon and his wife are trying to have a baby. too funny!:)
"Wizards" is truly magical!. If you like swords-and-sorcery films, this one is for you. Throw in just a little bit of technology, and you have the makings of a well-crafted movie. One even tends to lose the sense that this is a cartoon. This is due, in part, to the fact that Ralph Bakshi is famous for cartooning over live actors. This makes for a very believable movie.Without going into detail - I wouldn't want to spoil your fun by telling you too much (heh, heh) - the title comes from the battle between too wizards - brothers - one good, one irretrievably evil, and the methods they employ to achieve their separate ends. And the ending of the film is a surprise in itself.If I were you, I'd buy a copy of this before they're all gone. You don't want to resort to renting this fine movie when you could own it, now do you
Scared me away from the bathtub when I was 15!. THis was the first scary movie I ever saw in the cinema, and it made a strong impression on me. The bathtub scenes were so eerie that I only took showers for a few years after I saw this movie at 15 - that is how much it scared me. I have since watched it as an adult and was able to keep it in healthier perspective, although I do have to say it is pretty scary and well done. Watching it many years later, I was surprised that it lacked a lot of the 70's cheese that you see in many films from that era. The carpet and some of the clothes were funny, but it didn't detract from the film. Glad I bought it
Breathtaking video!!. Discover what wildlife enthusiasts have  clamored for! The pioneering wildlife acheivements of Walt Disney's filmmakers, brought to video by popular demand. The award winning TRUE-LIFE ADVENTURES series will amaze and thrill you with dramatic stories and striking imagery, unforgettable moments captured on film now offered in video!White. The color of bleakness. And nothing in the world seems as bleak as the icy cold wilderness of the Arctic region. Yet, nine daring photographers spent three years in this "white wilderness" to prove that  i t's any thing but bleak. Now, on video, Disney brings you wondrous scenes of spectacular landscapes and true-life adventures of native wildlife, including walruses, polar bears, lemmings, and vicious predators in the Academy Award winning film! Running Time: 72 minute
Wow!. In Hell is one of the best JCVD movies from his recent direct to video offerings.  In the film, he plays Kyle LeBlanc, a French-American man living and working in Russia with his American wife, who soon gets brutally murdered.  Kyle is then sent to a Russian prison after he murders the man who killed his wife.  Of course, this prison is no cakewalk...actually it makes Oswald State Prison from the HBO show "Oz" literally look like Disney World.  The warden and guards are all corrupt and the prisoners who have money get all the perks.  The warden also sets up a human cockfighting arena on the prison grounds where he has two prisoners fight (most of the time fight to the death) and he and his friends take bets on the winners.  Of course, JCVD sets out to make his way through this corrupt system, help his new prison friends, and get revenge for his wife's death.The film is very dark, brutal, and bloody, but it is beautifully filmed.  There is one scene in particular when Kyle is thrown in "the hole" for misbehaving.  In that scene, after Kyle loses hope and tries to hang himself, a moth flies down from the window/rafters above him and the camera beautifully follows it down as it flutters toward Kyle, and then it lands on the handle of the spoon that is in his untouched bowl of gruel, as if to say, "Eat. Get stronger, and you will be able to free yourself from this place."  I know it sounds really corny, but it is really a lovely scene and not something that you typically see in JCVD films.The DVD transfer is awesome.  Picture and sound quality are good and you get widescreen and fullscreen to choose from.Definitely a movie to see, whether you like Van Damme or not.  It's a movie for anyone who has ever lost anyone they loved or had their life inexplicably turned upside down and had to fight to get things right
Excellent, Great Tom Hanks Performance. I really don't understand people saying that Tom Hanks's performance was was not good or that he overplayed the part.  I think his performance was just right.  I do agree that the bad language was not needed, and did not help the movie.  This is the only reason that I give it four stars as opposed to five.  I barely even know who the Coen brothers are, but I found this movie better than the original, which is a rare thing.I think the story was very well done, and the ironic conclusion was very well executed
Eddie and the Cruisers. The movies were purchased for my wife - she has enjoyed both Eddie and the Cruisers and Eddie Lives very much -- she would highly recomend both movies
Jon Cryer...hot at any age. This movie was cute back in the 80's and it still is today.  Jon Cryer is wonderfully charming and Annabeth Gish is one lucky girl. Keith Coogan is funny as always.  One for the collection
Everyone is human. This episode is a bit different than the others I have seen, although I have not yet seen all of season 2 yet.  Without giving anything away, this episode shows growth in 3 of characters as human beings.  Additionally, it has some inventive guest characters.  Finally, it presents some moral and ethical questions
"It's a sin to be ashamed of what you are - and it's a sin to lie about who you are.". Made in 1959, Douglas Sirk's Imitation of Life is still just as evocative and as gorgeous to look today as it was almost 50 years ago. It's a real cinematic treat, shameless tearjerker, and an unabashed melodrama that dares to confront head-on issues of racism and the problems of motherhood at the stage when one's teenagers - in this case daughters--are growing up and preparing to enter the world.Lana Turner has never looked more ravishing as Lora Meredith, a young New York widow who will do anything to realize her dreams of Broadway stardom. Together with her young daughter Susie, they live in a squalid apartment eking out a hand-to-mouth existence, their futures fuelled by unfulfilled dreams.One day at Coney Island, Lora and Susie meet another a white girl Sarah Jane, who is being taken care of by a black woman, Annie Johnson (Juanita Moore), whom Lora mistakes for the maid.  When told by her that she's the mother, the surprised Lora falters but then accepts it without a question as if it were a natural thing that a black woman has a white child.The angelic and virtuous Annie asks Lora if she can come and help out around the apartment. Lora is initially hesitant - not because of Annie's race but because she's struggling and doesn't have any money to pay her a wage. Eventually, however, she relents and tells Annie that her and her daughter can stay for one night.At the same time, Lora meets the extremely fine-looking wannabe photographer, Steve Archer (John Gavin). Steve takes an instant liking to Lora and offers to marry her. But Lora is far too concerned with realizing her acting dreams to be stifled by a man and by marriage. Meanwhile, the saintly Annie is troubled that her daughter is ashamed of being black and tries to pass herself off in school as white.Imitation of Life follows these characters throughout their lives, with Sirk piling on the sentiment and melodrama every chance he can get.  Lora does indeed become a famous Broadway actress, yet neglects her growing daughter in the process. Steve goes on to become a president of a large photographic organization, but has trouble relating to Lora's need to be independent and famous.Annie's heart is eventually broken, gradually worn down by years of emotional abuse from her daughter. Sara Jane is so angry at being labeled as black that she repudiates her mother and ultimately runs away. Annie always stays the subservient and loyal maid; whilst her best friend and employer goes on to bask in a lush and international success. The contrast of the mother's compensations from their conflicting daughters is the story's ultimate paradox.Lora, Annie, Steve and the two girls seem to be victims of each other. They all want to follow their own dreams and forge their own paths in life even when it doesn't seem to be doing them much good. They are also surprisingly oblivious of how manipulated they are by the world around them.Lora gets her career but she's unlucky in love and terminally insecure as a mother, Whilst Sara Jane - perhaps the most damaged character - achieves her ambition to pass herself off as a white girl, but at great personal cost to both her and her aging mother.Under Douglas Sirk's accomplished direction, Miss Turner et al acts ornately and elaborately, everything is over emphasized to within an inch of its life, especially Lana's gorgeous outfits, yet the film - clocking in at over two hours - is always compelling and is never boring.The screenplay is sophisticated, the themes are brave and tempting and the look of the film - the brilliant surfaces, audacious colors, and the spatial complexities of 50s moderne architecture - bring to the forefront a bittersweet world of fantasy, entrapment, and emotional anxiety, and where the price of following one's dreams eventually comes at a harsh and desultory cost. Mike Leonard June 06.
Food for Thought. A previous reviewer noted that the film was basically a platform to expound on George Bernard Shaw's views on munitions, war and other issues of the day, and rated it with one star.I found that Shaw's social views, brilliantly elucidated by Robert Morley in a better acting performance than many of us have ever seen him in, are what make this a great film; whether you agree with them or, like Morley's estranged screen daughter Wendy Hiller in the title role, disagree, the dialogue is fascinating; the acting from Morley, Hiller, Rex Harrison, Robert Newton and a youthful Deborah Kerr, is first-rate; and the gritty London locales add greatly to the atmospheric ambience of the film. I hope the powers-that-be favor us with a DVD version of this great film soon
Great quality. There is a good reason you'd want to buy this from Amazon. The quality. Sure, you can watch it for free on CBS, but the quality isn't very good. It's streamed and the bitrate (quality) is low. Personally, I want to watch Survivor on my 50" plasma, not on my computer screen. So, I use Unbox + Windows Media Center to make that happen. Survivor from unbox is as good as getting the show directly from my cable provider.
Submarine Creature Comes After Belle!. "Creature from the Black Lagoon" (1954) is an extraordinary class B film!I've seen it when it was first released to theaters in Argentina (Yes I'm that old!). The Creature haunted me all over my pre-teen years. I've just found this VHS copy and thoroughly enjoy it!The original movie was filmed in 3D format; unfortunately I wasn't able to see it under that layout; however viewing it in 2D is a chilling experience.The `50s was what we may call "Monsters' Decade" this Creature is one of the best of them all. Of course you shouldn't expect the realistic and/or surrealistic feats that modern film technology enables. This is a "rubber creature", yet impressive (more so in scenes on ground environment).The story is quite simple. An archeologist finds a fossil hand protruding from a hill side in the Amazonian territory.He returns to civilization and obtains support for an expedition leaded by Mark Williams the main sponsor and ambitious entrepreneur. The team is completed by scientist David Reed and his also scientist fiance Kay Lawrence.Different circumstances lead the group into the Black Lagoon. A natural paradise but with the Gill Man roaming free!The Creature is increasingly aggressive so action scenes underwater, on the jungle or into the tiny ship proceed without respite.The film has many outstanding features.Director Jack Arnold is very proficient delivering solid sci-fi horror films such as "It Came from Outer Space" (1953), "The Incredible Shrinking Man" (1957), the present movie and its sequel. IMHO "The Creature" is his best.Play acting is very good with Richard Carlson and Richard Denning in the leading roles.Julia Adams deserves a special mention: outstanding legs and absolutely adorable in her white bathing suit performing an aquatic duo with the Creature!Underwater scenes are great: a strange mixture of realism and water-ballet.It is a very good horror movie for all audiences!Reviewed by Max Yofre.
All it takes is just a little heart and courage on your part ... Well, this was a random purchase on my part, so I thought I was prepared for anything...even 54 girls hopping in front of a train simultaneously. Interestingly that wasn't the craziest part of the film. A detective story with an almost Rod Serling twist, or a thriller with a detective setting? Either way this was and interesting look at cinema in general and Asian cinema in particular. As long as digital blood doesn't bother you (a growing trend in Japanese film) it's an interesting story that will entertain most audiences and inspire a few interesting conversations. (Seriously, watch this with some friends and see what discussions start up.
One of Dudley Moore's best. This movie is so fitting of Moore [He plays an orchestra conductor.] since he was an accomplished musician himself.  It's roll-on-the-floor humour when the conductor's fantasy goes awry
Video in time for Valentine's. Since I ordered the video on February 13th - I was so impressed by how fast it arrived at my house!!  Less than 24 hours later!
Mother's Day All Time Favorite Horror!. I First Saw this Movie When I Was About 9 Or 10 Years Old Back In 1984 Or 1985 At My Mom And Dad's Friends House I Still Remember Watching It When I Was A Kid It Scared Me To Death I Found The Mother In That Movie To Be Very Creepy The Scenes That Bring Back Memories Are Queenie At The End Of The Movie The Sleeping Bag Seen The 2 Hippies In The Car With Mother I Am A Huge 70's & 80's And Semi 90's Horror Buff But This Movie Here Is My All Time Favorite Horror I Lent This Movie To 5 Or 6 Of My Friends And They Are Horror Buffs They Have Never Heard Of This Movie Before And They Watched It And They Loved It I Have To Give Hats Off To Charles Kaufman For Making The Best Horror Movie Of All Time
More intense than the first one. Abs of Steel 2 uses most of the same exercises from Abs of Steel 1, but increases the reps, speed, and duration of them. She also adds modified push ups to the routines. A definite all-around workout for the abs. Great for at-home solo training
An animated treasure!!!!!!!!. What can I say...I laughed, I cried...and that is saying a lot given the fact that I almost never cry; especially not over a movie. I can remember seeing this in the movie theater when I was a little kid and my interest in the movie has not waned over the years. I love it even more now that I am older and can fully appreciate the jokes and themes. I loved the songs...used to sing them all the time (especially &quot;Let me be surprised&quot;) and I watched it everyday when I was in the 4th grade afterschool after I watched the Disney Afternoon. And Oh, if you could only hear the songs...why, they would set a new standard by which you would judge all childrens songs! I cried so hard at the end you wouldn't believe...I do everytime. It teaches kids a lot of morals without being overly sappy or preachy...it teaches sharing, friendship, and loyalty. The animation is gorgeous! I love how they drew and painted the city and it is great to just sit back and ponder what a fabulous job they did on creating the expressions on the characters' faces. And the adventure! If there is one thing I love, that's adventure and this movie has plenty of it. Please don't deprive your children of this animated masterpiece...that would be a crime in itself
Sleeper movie will wake you into shuddering dread. 15 Minutes is a horrifying and gritty peek into the injustice of the American legal system and also the news media.  Wow, two digs in one film, how can you resist?Emil Slovak, a Czech National (played by Karel Rodan), and his friend Oleg Razgul, a Russian National (played by Oleg Taktarov), who met in Prague, decide to travel to America, the land of opportunity.  Emil wants to hunt down his old crime partner, who took all the money from the robbery he was jailed for, but Oleg is infatuated with American Cinema and wants be a filmmaker.Immediately upon arriving, Oleg steals a video camera from a store and they are off to confront Emil's old partner and get their money back.  But while Oleg films the event, Emil discovers that his portion of the money was already spent, and he kills his friend and friend's wife.  Unfortunately, there was someone else watching the murder.  Daphne Handlova had been staying with her friends, and fled the apartment after witnessing the murders.  An illegal alien herself, she does not want for the police or the killers to find her, but leaves her purse behind in the apartment where Emil discovers who she is.The apartment is burned to cover the bodies, "A Bohemian Barbeque" says Oleg, which calls in not only successful homicide detective Eddie Flemming (Robert De Niro), but Fire Marshal Jordy Warsaw (Edward Burns) to the scene.Emil and Oleg get away, but while Emil obsesses with finding Daphne, Oleg obsesses about filming their "Trip to America", killings and all.  He believes he is making the greatest movie ever.  They begin to watch New York's hot and exploitive news show called "Top Story", anchored by shady newsman/reporter Robert Hawkins (played expertly by Kelsey Grammer).These three men, Flemming, Warsaw, and Hawkins, become irresistible targets to Emil and Oleg, the two Eastern-European psychopaths believing that controlling and taunting these famous men will give them the recognition they desire.I don't want to give away too much of the plot, but suffice to say that there is a brutal murder scene where Flemming showcases just how tough a cop he is, and Hawkins will reveal himself as slimiest snake in the media industry, and Emil will learn enough to know that insanity can set him free even if he is caught.There is action from beginning to end in this movie, a tight and somewhat confusing plot at times, some great acting from both the stars and the supporting cast (including a great character played by David Alan Grier).  There is seediness and wretchedness and hopelessness, and an ending that makes the film come together quite nicely.  If you are ready for a little brutal cop action in your life, give 15 Minutes a try.  Enjoy!
I Liked Drunks But I LOVED! CLEAN AND SOBER!. I gave a DVD called Drunks Three stars and it earned each of them.  I just finished watching Clean and Sober and I am giving it FIVE stars only because, I am unable to give it fifty.  Clean and Sober was everything DRUNKS was NOT!  Clean and sober had a nice tight script that made you follow really close to keep up.Clean and sober taught me more than a few things about drunks and druggies.  The prices on Drunks and Clean and Sober should be switched. Drunks is no where near good as Clean and Sober yet Drunks cost's a bit more. I would have gladly forked over 3 times the $7 price for Clean and Sober compared to the $21.99 for Drunks that was not worth its prenium price.  Both are fine movies but Clean and Sober was just so much better.Clean and Sober made me think.  Clean and Sober was an emotional roller coaster.  I started out hating the main character in the movie. He started out a mean self absorbed trite nasty worthless no-account of the first order.  As the DVD progressed to the middle point he was no better.  The supporting actors in the movie were awesome, lending a sense of beleivability to the movie I liked.  Everybody seemed to have mastered those seedy loathesome scamming natures druggies and drunks have when they are seconds away from hitting rock bottom.Slowly almost impreceptablyI started liking the main character.  I started thinking awe sweet he is going to hook up with his nice lady friend and then her beast of a boyfriend returns.  Then she leaves her boyfriend's house supposedly to get a pack of smokes and I figured she was heading back to see the main character mushy ending lots of kissing and gurgling noises as the credits rolled.  I won't tell you what happened but I was wrong again big time.  The ending rather shocked me and by the time the credits rolled, I was almost holding back tears. Vile thing was by the time the movie ended I honestly liked the title character.I have never been a dope addict or alcoholic but I learned something from both Drunks and Clean and Sober.  I learned you can't really help a dope addict because, the help they need comes from within themselves.  Once an alcohohic or druggie starts cleaning up their lives and picking up the peices.  I learned you can give people in recovery opportunities but only once they have shown the commitment needed to rebuild their lives.  The hardest thing in the world is to stand by and watch some one you love fall into drugs or booze knowing the only one who can pull them out of that early grave is themselves.   Thats why I buy movies, because I learn things better when I can see them play out in front of me.This movie left me with a great Joy and sorrow but, the funniest thing is I only really remember the joy.  As Clean and Sober and drunks teach addicted people make their own choices and their ain't a damn thing all the love in the world can do about it.  This is one of my A List Movies.  One last funny thing I almost did not buy this movie.  I only ended up buying it because, I needed like 4 bucks to hit the $25 minimum required to get Free super saver shipping so I tossed it in.  After seeing it I can not imagine my huge DVD collection without Clean and Sober in it.Clean and Sober I think is a must have DVD
van damme at his best. love this movie jean claude van damme at his best great fun for all action fans do not miss this one
Powerful and Moving!!!. This is a fine film that stresses the importance of culture and family while never losing its entertainment value. Following the same Mexican-American family from one generation to the next, the film crams a lot into a two hour running time, but the story is effective, well-told, and moving. While some of it was a bit far-fetched, especially Jennifer Lopez's opening bit as the younger version of Maria, the mother, crossing an angry river with her newborn son, the film does pick up and becomes a moving epic about a tough family and their struggles. The casting is terrific, each cast member very believable with their strong performances. I enjoyed this movie and it made me appreciate all my parents have done to keep our family together. This is a terrific slice-of-life made enjoyable by the realism and top-notch cast
Not your average night of theatre. Samuel Beckett's, soon to be classic, drama about two men, Vlad and Estro, transcends stage-play drama. Beckett's relatively short story is a pioneering foray into the mixture of a dramatic, literal story.Most drama should be seen on stage, so that the performers can give their characters shape, bring in an audience, and produce a night of dramatic arts. That is not how this story seems to go; not at all, indeed.Beckett's story can be seen as a naturalistic look at the life of the poor. Here are two men, both obviously at the end of their ropes, but each keeps this asinine hope that "GODot" will show up. But, he never does. Extra characters, like Pozzo and Lucky, simply add to the intended confusion.As several previous reviewers have taken note--there is not action. While this idea is spurred by "The Threepenny Opera," Beckett takes postmodernism another step further. The characters' are so disillusioned the question becomes, Godot isn't coming, so did he ever care? Could Godot actually exist he allows these poor fellows to exist in such a state.A fantastic read, and one of the best dramas ever written. This fairly short play should be read by EVERYONE.
Silly title--great film. Andula (Hana Brejchova) is a young factory worker who lives in a dorm with other young women in the dreary town of Zruc during Communist rule in Czechoslovakia.  Life is empty and unfulfilling, and boys are scarce.  Andula, a girl with a sad past of her own that is only hinted at, seeks escape from hopelessness in love.Lest the above description seem too depressing, let me add that this film is often very funny, particularly in a scene where a trio of middle-aged reservists approach Andula and her friends at a social mixer.  Director Milos Forman states in an interview that part of his motivation for making films was in reaction against the absurd socialist realism school of the time, which depicted socialist societies as paradises on earth.  In this seemingly slight film about a young girl's romance, he shows much of the unhappiness and hopelessness of such a society while also presenting his characters with great warmth and affection.  The actors in this film are wonderful and natural, with great faces.  Forman observes human behavior very closely and emerges with a story about people with whom everyone can empathize, delivering once again the valuable lesson of any great film--no matter where or when we were born, we are more like each other than unlike./
My favorite version of "Alice...". I saw this several times as a kid and it always stuck in my head.  It's a beautiful English production that has a definite melancholy, bittersweet flavor that's missing from other adaptations.  Really worth seeing.  It is a kid-friendly version?  Not really but smart teens may enjoy it.  Great performances from Ralph Richardson, Peter Sellers and Fiona Fullerton as Alice
Kiss Today Goodbye. This is a 1985 release, and stars Michael Douglas as a Broadway director casting dancers for a large production. I enjoyed the movie, yet completely agree with others that the stage version is much better and makes more sense of the story line. Many people saw the stage version first. I do understand their frustration with the film; in particular, it skews the number "What I Did For Love" into emphasizing the love story between Cassie and Zach. What it's really about is the love and dedication dancers have for what they do, through all the blood, sweat and tears.I went out of order and saw the movie first, and wound up thoroughly enjoying the stage version, a positive experience last rather than the generally negative reception from those who sequenced the other way. Best strategy is to enjoy each, the stage version and film version, for what they are - entertainment.
Great classic for a great price. With a cable modem, took about 1 hour and 15 minutes to download Unbox, install the program and download the episode.  It's a great download speed considering the file is 803 mb.  I was able to still use my computer, IE 7.0 and RealPlayer, so the download is not a resource hog.  The menu bar includes a link to shop for more Unbox titles, which I found very convenient.The quality is great, but the video stutters in Unbox.  Maybe because it uses 3 applications when playing video?  I chose to watch the episode on Windows Media Player 11 and I had no problems at all.I've bought and watched 3 episodes, all with the same results.  Fast and unobstrusive download, great quality and low price.  Just use WMP, or another player that can handle wma files, to watch.
One of the BEST episodes!. I urge everyone out there to download this episode!  This one totally rocks! Shep, a Wraith and Kolya all in one episode!  Any episode with Shep (Joe Flannigan) and Kolya are well worth watching!  Download this and download every other Stargate SG1 and Stargate Atlantis episode!
My All Time Fave!. As I put Tombstone in my list of top 5 favorite movies, it wound up at the top of the list. I'm typically not one for viewing movies of this length as usually they will linger and loose my interest. Tombstone moves along at a great pace and every scene offers attention grabbing excitement. I'm also not one for watching a movie more than once unless of course I really, really enjoy it, then it may not be more than twice. I own Tombstone on DVD and have watched it over 100 times since it's 1993 release! The cast is superb...the entire cast! The intensity of the direction in unmatched by any western prior to or since
beautiful, cannibal masterpeice. although ruggero deodatos cannibal hollocaust is probably the gratest cannibal film ever made, i must say that his earlier film, jungle hollocaust is much more enjoyable. the plot isnt anything new to the cannibal genre. plane crash, people get eaten, someone escapes. the film was actually original when it first came out. what makes jungle hollocaust more enjoyable than other cannibal films is that the main charector isnt 1 dimensional. massimo foschis performance is in my opinion one of the greatest horror film performances ever. he is truly a great actor and a strong willed man. he let a bunch of dirty natives pull on his manhood. he is tortured, beaten and humiliated. the traumutizing acts he experiences transform him into a determined, powerful man, fighting to survive. all this emotional stuff aside, the film does have some juicy exploitation to go with it. the beautiful me me lai runs around naked, allowing for plenty of boob jiggling. massimos character rapes lai when she tries to run away from him. towards the end of the film she is eaten by her own cannibal tribe. massimo ends up escaping in a plane after he kills the cannibal cheif and eats his heart. a great ending to an amazing movie. im not saying you should expect citizen kane, but this movie is a masterpeice. if you dont own it allready then buy it now!!!
Long Tall Dexter. Dexter Gordon is Dale Turner, an ex-patriot jazz musician living in Paris and playing nightly at the Blue Note. (His character is based loosely on Lester Young and Bud Powell, but mainly it is all Dexter.) A young Frenchman (Francois Cluzet) idolizes him and later befriends him. Dex has problems, mainly booze, and between blowing gigs seems most concerned about how to get something to drink. The cliche of the self-tortured jazz musician who's got to find something new to say on his horn every night is, of course, the main focus of the film. (That this is the ONLY way to greatness for a jazzman is the great myth for the artform. But it sells.) Dex gets homesick for New York, returns, falls into his old habits, misses the flight back to Paris, and soon dies. The movie is overly long, but Gordon is mesmerizing. Dexter speaks slowly, as if from behind a veil (Gordon was ill at the time and living in obscurity in Mexico when he agreed to do the movie); he had much input on the film, creating his own dialogue and insuring accuracy. The picture has faults, to be sure, but it's a mighty achievement nonetheless. The music, of which there is plenty, is, of course, top-notch
I served in Bosnia with SFOR. I served in the US Army with SFOR.  I think this is an excellent and well done film.  It is perhaps the most accurate film that I have seen concerning the war in Bosnia.  It not only accurately reflects and shows the genocide that was carried out by Slobodan Milosevic, Ratko Mladic and Rodavan Kradzic but it also gives hints but does not quite come out to expose the whole truth.  As a soldier who served in Bosnia I will tell you the whole truth that this film seeks to poke at.  It shows how the United States acted as accomplices to Slobodan Milosevic's genocide that was carried out against the Bosnian muslim population.  It plainly shows American officials lying to the American people.  I would also like to add the Former President Clinton has seen this movie himself with actor Woody Harrelson and Mr. Clinton knows full well that he lied to the American people about what was really going on in Bosnia.  To be honest with you.... it is a truth that must be told.  I am aching to tell it to everybody I can find.  I was shocked to see the dead bodies when I was in Bosnia and further shocked to discover the lies the US government told the American people.  I think it is very important for every american to watch this film.  In order to fully understand the film I highly recommend Peter Maass's book "Love They Neighbor."  He reported on the war in Bosnia
Great Movie!!. The acting, writing, and complete look of the film are completely fantastic. Everything is fantastic, but Jim Carrey steals the scenes, in a very good way. Every time he is on the screen, he is pure Jim. The character he plays on the movie is as if it was written just for him, he fits is role perfectly.The scenery in the movie is very dark and gloomy, which sets the perfect tone for the film. The costumes; suits and dresses, all look great and the entire things comes together very nicely. Overall, this is a must see for fans of Jim Carrey. If you love a good movie, you will love this. Like I said, this role was made for JC!!
John freaking Candy. He is the man... If you don't like John Candy, then you can get he f*ck out. He make a big*ss pancake then flips it with a snow shovel... Nobody messes with Uncle Buck. He is a force that is not to be reckoned with. So beware if he shows up at your house. If you don't find this helpful, slag off. Go and watch the damn movie...
Daniel Deronda: A Prince among Men. Wow....If the ratings could go higher than 5 stars, I'd sure give it at least a 7!. The actor who plays Daniel Deronda couldn't have been chosen any better and the selection of Romola Garai to portray the beautiful but selfish Mrs. Grandcourt was equally rich. What makes this movie so memorable and endearing is the theme. You have two beautiful, very beautiful and talented girls vying for the heart of one man (of course, this is every man's dream). But where it gets really good, is the humbling process that Mrs Grandcourt must go through, in order to see what kind of woman she was. At the end, through great pain and self discovery of her inner selfishness, she is finally fit to become someone's excellent wife. She pines away the hours and for days on end for the chance to become Daniel's wife, but during this humbing and transformation of the most beautiful Romola Garai, Daniel is falling in love with another girl, whom he rescued from a watery grave. Daniel was an English Gentleman, with manners, courtesy, love and caring for those he knew. As Daniel was slowly discovering his Jewish roots through the girl whose life he saved, he began to fall in love with her, not only for her beauty, but her commitment to God through Judaism and her angelic voice. She was very talented and nice to look at, but it was her singing voice and dedication to God is what attracted Daniel to her. Towards the end, Daniel became more involved is his new found Jewish family and began identifing with them. The scenery of the film switched back and forth from England to Italy, and the twist at the end with Daniel's mother emerging from a life long silence added to the excitment and plot. As Daniel finally proposed to this beautiful Jewess, it was followed by a Jewish wedding ceremony with Jewish wedding music. It was so good to see a film that included the richness of the Jewish traditions and religion without apology. And now, at the end of the story, where both beauties wanted Daniel Deronda, only one of them won the prize. On the one hand, this story is every guys dream; a well mannered rich guy, who is handsome and desired by all the ladies, and on the other hand, they both can't have him, and it leaves your heart broken for the beautiful Mrs Grandcourt. The picture on the cover of the DVD is really a prophetic look at the whole thing. It's a wonderful show, and real treat for guys
REQUIRED VIEWING. . . All bow down to the producers at Criterion, who have done an outstanding job of bringing to DVD one of the best Rock films ever made, GIMME SHELTER.  The film itself has been reviewed to death over the past thirty years, so I won't do that here.  I will, however, let 'cha know that beyond Criterion's beautiful, vibrant, remixed, remastered presentation lies a world of wonderful extras: 1) commentary by filmmakers Albert Maysles and Charlotte Zwerin, 2) audio material from the four-hour day-after program  broadcast by KSAN on December 7, 1969, 3) three different trailers for the film, 4) trailers for other Maysles Brothers films, 5) 5.1, 2.0 stereo and DTS sound mixes, 6) outtake footage including performances of "Oh, Carol" and a nice acoustic "Prodigal Son", 7) a studio mixing session with the band for "Little Queenie", 8) an extensive stills gallery, 9) a HUGE book with much material on the film and the filming, and lots more.  GIMME SHELTER is a must-own for your video Rock library.  Thank you, Criterion
The Critics Didn't Get It. So Who Listens to Critics?. The Frisco Kid, directed by Robert Aldrich, is the quirky inventive saga of a young Polish rabbi who is sent to America in 1850 to take over a congregation in San Francisco. Getting there proves to be quite a test of his stamina, his adaptability, and his religious faith. Gene Wilder's performance as Avram is a jaunty, sweet, and convincing triumph of comic bravado.After docking in Philadelphia, the rabbi plays Good Samaritan to three nare-do-wells who later rob him and strand him in a strange land. Fortunately he comes upon some Amish farmers who give him shelter and money to resume his trek. After a brief stint working on the railroad, Avram meets Tommy Lillard (Harrison Ford), a bank robber with a heart of gold and a quick temper. The two team up and go ricocheting from one adventure to another -- an escape from a posse, a trial by fire at the hands of some Native American Indians, a visit to the brotherhood of silent monks, and two violent encounters with the bad boys who robbed Avram in Philadelphia.Gene Wilder and Harrison Ford are one feisty team as rabbi and rescuer in this rough-'n'-ready romp that rivals Wilder's earlier Blazing Saddles in Wild West hilarity. Director Robert Aldrich is a seasoned hand at blending roughhouse and laughter, as fans of his earlier The Dirty Dozen and The Longest Yard will attest. With a full posse of screen talents, The Frisco Kid rides tall in the comedy saddle.Movie critics of the era panned the movie saying: "The pairing of Gene Wilder and a young Harrison Ford may sound intriguing, but this film is not. It's a startlingly unfunny comedy in which most of the jokes misfire and the evolution of the characters is forced and unbelievable. Wilder is a great comedic talent, but salvaging this material is beyond him."Evidently they weren't looking for a good time. Talk of plot character 'evolution' should be worried about in film making classrooms. I think they should have actaully sat back and just enjoyed the romp.The Frisco Kid is an offbeat comedy that manages to convey the sturdy faith of a believer. Avram will not travel on the Sabbath for any reason; he returns his share of the money from Lillard's bank robbery; he transmits the joy of Judaism to the Indians; and he agonizes over murdering a man in self-defense. Whereas this movie will probably not become a smash with the public, it is highly regarded for the religiously sensitive.
Total Enchantment (Roadshow Version). Over the decades, I've seen this film many, many times -- on TV, on VHS, on laserdisc.  Each time I saw it, I wanted it to be a bit more than it was.I've always wished I could appreciate the performance of Ray Walston as Luther Billis, because all of his scenes were pure ham, and he nearly ruined all the scenes he was in...for me.I have always wished "I'm Gonna Wash That Man Right Outta My Hair" was as complete in the film as it is on the RCA soundtrack recording (I'll tackle this now -- the complete version never made any final cut of the film).I've always wished I could see the film as originally assembled and premiered.I have always wished Alfred Newman's scoring -- brilliant though it was in all the cuts I'd seen of the film -- offered a bit more Newman flair.And now, I'm extremely gratified to say, my wishes have nearly all come true.This restoration print is phenomenal.  Yes there are some washed-out scenes, but I don't care.  They are finally back where they belong. This roadshow restoration was printed from a Todd-AO master negative and is a considerably DIFFERENT film from the one most of us have been exposed to the past 49 years.The print is magnificent, clear and in many ways looks better than most new films look today.This roadshow version resonates for me in ways that the theatrical cut never did.  Time and again, the music set my heart racing, my pulse throbbing, and my senses went into overload.This film is a visual and aural feast.  It's also now my favorite film musical EVER!Color filters?  Bah!  Get over 'em!  I read somewhere that cinematographer Leon Shamroy wanted them for the purpose of achieving/enhancing emotional responses to scenes.  Other sources say it was director Joshua Logan who insisted on using them, primarily because he had experimented with such things in the Broadway production.  I know many responses have been sheer hatred/disdain for all the filters, but I love many of them.  Those I don't I ignore.I've read/heard a lot of hoo-haw about the casting of Nellie Forbush (including the highly negative and wishy-washy commentary by Richard Barrios, a film historian whose commentary is replete with "people" have said -- "many people", "some people", "people", "a friend", "someone"...all in the negative...and always attributing his negativity to unnamed others.  He seemingly owns nothing he says, but doesn't mind repeating what he has heard. This depletes him of any sort of authority on the subject. It's unfathomable to me that a studio would afflict a restoration of one of its most profitable movies with such absurd negativity...especially given the film's many admirers).Much has been discussed about why Mary Martin and Ezio Pinza did not recreate their roles.  One of the features on the second disc will show you why -- check out the numbers performed in that 1954 Rodgers and Hammerstein TV tribute (three years before filming began on the movie version).  Martin looks to be somewhere in her  40s (she was 51)...and matronly plump -- and Pinza (who was 62) looks terrible (and totally unromantic-leadish).  You can get away with a lot on stage, but you cannot hide such things on camera.  I doubt that Martin was EVER considered for the role. And Pinza died in 1957.Mary Martin was a great, shining star of the Broadway musical theater.  She had a lightly raspy singing voice that she invested with great emotional nuance and feeling.  I am a huge fan of Martin's and mean her no disrespect in my observations above.Barrios maintains that Mitzi Gaynor's voice was not in Martin's league.  I'm not sure what he means by that because to my ears, Gaynor's voice is leagues better than Martin's in quality and range.  He may be saying he felt Martin's intepretation of the songs was better (and he comes off as one of those somewhat snooty theatrical drama mavens for whom nothing translated to the screen from the theater will ever be good enough, but I disagree with virtually everything that comes out of his mouth on the commentary so I won't mention him again).There is talk that Elizabeth Taylor was a candidate.  What a blessing THAT never happened.The other great "sigh-in-the-sky" complaint is that Doris Day would have been perfect as Nellie but that she turned off Joshua Logan at a party one night when she refused to get up and sing for guests.  I'd always heard she refused to audition for Richard Rodgers.At any rate...I certainly cannot imagine Doris Day, with her all-too-familiar mannerisms, as Nellie Forbush in "South Pacific."  I know she had the look, but I think Gaynor was by far the best choice of those considered for the role.Many will strongly disagree.  And many of those will be the same folks who still bemoan the loss of Frank Sinatra as Billy Bigelow in "Carousel."  The visual imagery of that casting still induces giggles.   That slight, skinny man wearing a barker's cap and being a rugged barker on a carousel?  I think Hollywood dodged a HUGE misfire when he walked out on that film.Watch Gaynor's performance closely in this roadshow version -- she is luminous, she is restrained, she is exuberant.  She is up to the task in every scene and pulls off some incredibly difficult scenes with great dramatic effect.  Her vocals are magnificent.And the huge surprise for me:  Ray Walston is wonderful as Luther Billis. They restored much footage of him ...much of what was missing was character development and nuances.  In the cut version we saw only the more hyper/extreme elements of his performance.  This restored Luther Billis is terrific, and Walston owns the role!Being a film music fan of many, many decades (!), I have to say that it's always the music that counts most for me in any musical (not to mention any other kind of film), but "South Pacific" is Alfred Newman's masterpiece.  He took a classic Broadway score and made it shine more gloriously than it had ever shone before.  It's thrilling beyond words to have Newman's original scoring returned to the film...many glorious flourishes pop up frequently to great effect...the entire segments like Cable's walk through the jungle of Bali Ha'i with Bloody Mary -- an entire chunk of film with an entire chunk of original music restored (the Newman scoring of this chunk brings to mind the opening music in the vision sequence in "The Song of Bernadette", but with exotic colorings employed rather than religious ones). Newman's work set a standard that has never been remotely approached by anyone but Newman himself (in "Camelot").I cannot recommend the restored roadshow version of "South Pacific" more highly.  See it (and IGNORE ENTIRELY the accompanying commentary)
Very compelling film. When I first saw this movie I really didn't know what to think.  Its portrayal of nuclear disaster aboard a ship is sometimes a little too real, and this movie is definitely one you do not watch for "enjoyment."  That being said, I love this movie, and here's why.1. It's a true story.2. It is extremely patriotic--even if it's patriotism displayed by the "wrong" country.  How can you not appreciate service men suffering and sacrificing for their country?This was well-produced in my opinion, and I feel the only flaw was Harrison Ford playing a Russian.  If you get upset very easily do not watch this film as parts are very disturbing, but I appreciate this film very much for the values it displays
historical soap opera. I found this by accident but decided to watch it because it sounded good and i am always looking for something to watch.  it is a great story and has memorable characters.  for anyone who is a fan of historical chinese dramas this is a great one.  and because it is a series there is more character development than in most other movies.  definatly worth checking ou
Unique plot. This a film where two men meet on the train and one suggests that they exchange murders.  As I do not want to spoil it for those who have not seen it yet I will not elaborate.  I will say this though- this film is a masterpiece with a very unique plot and masterly directed by Alfred Hitchcock.  The actors give a excellent perfomance, especially the antihero Bruno. Do not miss it
Great classic for a great price. With a cable modem, took about 1 hour and 15 minutes to download Unbox, install the program and download the episode.  It's a great download speed considering the file is 803 mb.  I was able to still use my computer, IE 7.0 and RealPlayer, so the download is not a resource hog.  The menu bar includes a link to shop for more Unbox titles, which I found very convenient.The quality is great, but the video stutters in Unbox.  Maybe because it uses 3 applications when playing video?  I chose to watch the episode on Windows Media Player 11 and I had no problems at all.I've bought and watched 3 episodes, all with the same results.  Fast and unobstrusive download, great quality and low price.  Just use WMP, or another player that can handle wma files, to watch.
Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST!. The Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST drama I have seen ever. Korean, American, doesn't matter! This is better than anything I have ever seen on TV or in the movies. Hollywood cannot touch this one! Kim Myoung Min(Yi Soon Shin) is outstanding in this!(no wonder he won the 2005 KBS BEST ACTOR AWARD FOR IYSS)It starts from when he was a child to his adulthood and can be emotional, funny, sad, and can make you angry!! The numerous obstacles and prejudices this man had to overcome and then always bounced back with no complaint because of the love of his country is phenomenal!! He put his country above all else and Kim Myoung Min did a great job of portraying that!My whole family, kids and all, watched this with me and loved it!I can see why Yi Soon Shin is Korea's hero and why other countries teach his methods
No Viva When You Leave Las Vegas. Leaving Las Vegas was released in 1995, which was many moons ago.  I can recall seeing the 10:00pm showing with two of my friends.  We decided we wanted to go to the movies and out of the choices at the theater in question, we went to see Leaving Las Vegas.  I recall it being very cold outside that night, the weather that evening would later play a part in our souls.Once the movie was over, the three of us were speechless.  Some good adjectives to describe our mood after witnessing Leaving Las Vegas, morose, forlorn, detached and just plain sad.  The only thing to lift our spirits was a middle of the night visit to Denny's for some greasy food.Now I haven't seen this movie since 1995, until the other night.  I watched it with the approach that the movie might not seem quite as sullen as it did oh so many years ago.  However, the motion picture was still deep and dejecting.As for the movie itself, Leaving Las Vegas is wonderful piece of cinema.  A dark and depressing drama, that at times haunts the viewer, but nevertheless a remarkable movie.  As for the acting, well it is top notch.  This is the last great movie Nicolas Cage has made; except maybe Face Off, some of his recent roles are real laughing stocks, i.e. National Treasure and Gone in Sixty Seconds.  Elizabeth Shue's acting was also very good, a big leap from Adventures in Babysitting and The Karate Kid.  I also enjoyed Julian "Warlock" Sands as the Latvian pimp, and why Richard Lewis was in this movie puzzles me as much as who's the inspiration for the Mona Lisa.Now this movie does have its flaws.  I find it interesting that Shue's character was ravishing, sophisticated, unpolluted, insightful and moral, for a prostitute.  (If you can show me a call girl with those traits, then every red cent I earn will go towards the institute that is prostitution, and Julia Roberts in Pretty Woman doesn't count.)  The events that transpire to Shue in the film, along with her relationship with Cage's character, and her reminiscing with the "unnamed" individual through out the film, screams Post Traumatic Stress Disorder.  However, I have never seen an individual with PTSD be as pseudo-jovial as Shue's character is in this movie.  Therefore, if you are looking for restitution of the human condition, this might or might not be the movie for you.  Though if you want to see Nick Cage drinking his soul out and Liz Shue, a call girl with a heart. Then this absolutely is the movie for you.I did find an interesting conduit with this movie; it is the unofficial sequel to City of Angels. It might sound silly, but watch City of Angels and follow Nicolas Cage's character in that movie until the end credits.  Once City of Angels is over; it seems pretty easy for Cage's character to continue into Leaving Las Vegas.  Without giving too much information about either movie, Cage's characters can blend into one and other. The key to this trick is too look at the obvious dichotomy among characters when watching both movies. I guarantee you will get it.  So if you have nothing better to do on a Sunday afternoon, watch City of Angels and then Leaving Las Vegas.   You might be disappointed, but not surprised.I digress to that cold night in 1995, when the mood of the chilly weather suited the deflated spirits of my friends and I, after we left the theater.  It almost appeared that the movie produced the cold and aloof temperature outside that night.  Who knows, maybe it really wasn't that frosty out, but our composure after watching this emotional roller coaster made it seem colder that it actually was.  Which is the feeling Leaving Las Vegas left for three young men that night.  It made us dismal and somber, with the only fix being greasy food.  Just as Nicolas Cage's character only fix towards his gloomy and tragic life was alcohol.Told you the temperature had a frame of reference.
The Best of The Mann/Stewart Westerns. James Stewart was a different man after he returned from World War II. Although still capable of playing the lovable, folksy character he played in comedies, his films upon his return from the war sometimes took a hard, even bitter edge. And the majority of these films were the Westerns he made in the 1950s with great director Anthony Mann. Making eight films in all, including non-Westerns such as The Glenn Miller Story and Strategic Air Command, they formed one of the strongest bodies of work between a director and actor in Hollywood history.Beginning in 1950 with "Winchester '73", Stewart and Mann made Westerns that belied many of the typical genre films of that era. Stewart's heroes, instead of being stalwart, upright and likable, were often times somewhat shady, sinister, and not always likable. Of all of their great Westerns, including  "Winchester '73," "The Man From Laramie," "Bend of The River," and others, probably the best film of their collaboration was "The Naked Spur," a story about a vicious, psychopathic outlaw captured by a group competing with each other to collect the bounty on the outlaw's head. The outlaw, played by relish and glee by Robert Ryan, uses the group's collective and individual greed against them in a bid to escape.Stewart's performance is spectacular, ranging wildly from bitter to sympathetic, nervous to resolute, and the rest of the cast is also dynamic and evenly matched. This film was was well worth the wait for DVD, and should be purchased by all Stewart-lovers, Western-lovers, and Ryan-lovers, and perhaps one day, there will be many more Mann-lovers, because he was one of Hollywood's best directors, and he is largely forgotten today
True love. There are many nice scenes an dialoques in An affair to remember. The screenplay renders perfectly the true love.The story is very romantic.Nicky and Terry met on a cruise and fell so madly in love with each other.They had to go separate ways, but decided to meet again after 6 months to see if they are still in love.They didn't meet then because of tragic circumstances. But they met later and noticed that their love is very true. There is also that beautiful opening song by Vic Damone.
Another good CSI:NY. Though CSI:NY is most least favorite of the three CSIs, they still manage to make a good one sometimes.  This is one of those good ones
Magnificent Action and Thrills. If they are bringing THE HIGH AND THE MIGHTY to DVD finally, then maybe it's time to unravel the complications surrounding this film and feature it on DVD.  SO PROUDLY WE HAIL is one of the greatest of all war movies, and because it is told from a woman's point of view (so to speak, it still had a male director in the person of Mark Sandrich) it is sometimes ridiculed and derided, usually by armchair critics who should walk a mile in a nurse's shoes before daring to denigrate her bravery under fire.Claudette Colbert plays Janet Davidson.  An unusual choice for a nurse, Colbert eschews most of her usual glamor (except for the San Francisco embarkation) and really gives herself to the part.  Colbert is often good when she has to play against strong women, and here Sandrich surrounds her with a gallery of independent types, the way Francois Ozon made Catherine Deneueve shine in the recent 8 1/2 WOMEN.  Janet is a born leader even though she can only be photographed on one side of her face, which somewhat limits her utilitarian duty during battle scenes.  Even covered with grime and jungle grease, Colbert still can turn heads, and when she meets George Reeves, the sparks ignite, hot enough to burn Corregidor down to the ground.Veronica Lake plays up her dark side playing Lieutenant D'Arcy, a time bomb just waiting to explode.  Often seen as soignee and bewitching, with that cute fringe of hair playing peekaboo with her eyes, Lake here is going for a Cornell Woolrich-style vengeance against the Japanese.  If Tarantino had made KILL BILL in the 1940s Lake would have beat Uma Thurman in the role easily.  She's hotter than a pistol and she's Ms. 45.Paulette Goddard has, I think, the most challenging role and I agree with other reviewers who say this is Goddard's best part.  While Colbert and Lake really just occupy the same acting space throughout the movie, Goddard's character has to change, so that viewers watch her mature from a fly by night flapper with only men on her mind, to a woman with a heart who lives to help others, not just impress them with her oomph.  It's harder than it looks to walk that line, but Goddard pulls it off without a whimper.  Often cast as the sexpot pure and simple, or the gold-digging mantrap she apparently was in real life, Goddard is entirely persuasive in her role, and like Lake, she's a natural at action scenes.  I want her to be my nurse.  Her romance with "Kansas" is kind of cute too.All in all, an underrated movie with the kind of plot that screws in deeper and deeper, unbearably tight, like DAS BOOT, except set in the Pacific
no title. This movie hurt me so bad I almost walked out; came home and cried on my bed as my husband was folding laundry, a vivid memory I retain to this day.  I have since realized that DeCaprio, who should have gotten an Oscar nod here, very much resembles my youngest son; hence I have trouble watching him in peril.  So don't be put off by my reaction unless you have such a child too.  As the last line in the description barely mentions, this is from the true life story of the novelist, Tobias Wolff, which does give it an immediate authenticity.  Ellen Barken and DeNiro were also good, as you would expect, but it is the young DeCaprio whom you can't take your eyes off of.  He walks away with every scene he is in, no mean feat with Robert DeNiro
Camille Claudel the movie. Great Artsy passionate story of the lady behind Rodin, an equally good sculptor, who positively influenced the art and productiviity of one of the world's best known sculptors
Brilliant Theatre. Having seen this production both live and on TV it was a must to purchase the DVD.  There are some critical points but, in the main, the dramatic power of Matthew Bourne's chorography coupled with the performance of Adam Cooper and his corp of male swans it is a frightening depiction of what could have been if Pepita had dispensed with his tutu's and shocked the world with a production which would,I am sure, have met with Tchaikovsky's approval.  I found some of the movement a little ghose particularly the assemble work in the early scenes but the par de dur between Cooper and Scott Ambler must be seen to be believed
EXCELLENT. I think that the movie was great. Its like one of my favorites now. Sharon Stone is my favorite actress....and i think that she was great in the movie Last Dance..I dont like the color of her hair in that movie though....I  love ya Sharon....
The beginning of Documentary Film, One of The Greatest Films. Most of what I could say has already been said.  It is an important historical document of a vanished way of life.  It is a unique tribute to one man & his stand agianst the elements.  Flaherty invented documentary as we now know it in this film. The filmmaker displays almost as much tenacity & courage in recording the material as Nanook does in his everyday life.  A measure of the film's greatness is the profound effect it had on Orson Welles.  After seeing the film Welles is said to have abandoned the editing of his 'Magnificent Ambersons' & taken on a journey to South America to shoot in documentary style
shocking and unforgettable. admittedly i rented this out because of Goran Visnjic being in it..but that wasnt the main reason.As the opening scene unfolded i could see that this wasnt a film for the faint hearted, that on the way to a wedding the mother of the bride is shot dead.With the film progressing and the character of Risto(Visnjic)becoming more important I felt myself being drawn into what was happening, and could not help but be moved by the scenes of the orphanage.To see how these children had been mixed up in a war that led them to losing their parents had me in tears.Whilst not an entertaining film, I thought that it was well worth watching as it gave an insight(no matter how small)into what people had to go through.The acting was great and only enhanced what was a brilliant film..but one that left me shocked and upset
A great adaptation. This was a great adaptation to the classic tale of Jane Eyre. The actors were brilliantly well put together and you could feel their emotions towards each other and towards those around them. Rochester isn't quite as mean/hard as you feel he is in the book, but his other qualities make up for that. Jane Eyre's character was quaint, quite, well composed, and pulled it off really well. One of the best Jane Eyre's to hit the screen
When the past becomes the future... A unique library of old and modern photographs are put under threat when the building they are housed in is suddenly sold.  The new owner of the property, Liam Cunningham played by the able Christopher Anderson, has no interest in the photos and doesn't care what happens to them.  In fact most of the photos will be destroyed with the crme de la crme of the collection being sold on.  All Liam is interested in is renovating the building and making a hefty profit for the business he represents.However the library's many eccentric employees won't give up without a fight and from then on a war of wits and determination is played out among a wonderful array of black and white photographs that represent the past, the present and even the future.The characters in this film are truly delightful, especially Timothy Spall who plays the oddball Oswald Bates, a man with a memory for faces so attuned that he can see resemblances between a person he has only seen once and those whose pictures are imprinted upon photographic paper.However the battle to save the collection seems doomed, with every attempt the Library staff makes being thwarted but fate has something wonderful in store for Liam Cunningham and it is this wonderful twist in the story that ultimately will save the collection for future generations.This is a fabulous film, originally a three part series for the BBC in the late 1990s I think it would have been a success if it had been released in Art House Cinemas all over the World.A final pointer, watch (and listen) out for the superb Lindsay Duncan who plays the diminutive Marilyn Truman, the Head Librarian in the story, she has the most amazing voice and when telling Liam Cunningham stories around certain photographs, she captivates her audience to the point that you think that you are in the same room as her and Liam.A good musical score, a sound cast, wonderful photography and camera work, "Shooting the Past" is a classic of a film that Stephen Poliakoff has every reason to be proud off.  Look out for Poliakoff's other masterpiece, "The Lost Prince" both are worth having in your DVD/video collection
Active Stretch. Physical fitness is not just for the &quot;young and beautiful&quot; as Ann Smith ably demonstrates to her video audience.  She performs each of the seven stretches with enviable grace and flexibility.  I told my spouse, &quot;If that old woman can do it, then so can I&quot;; he thought that would be a good name for the tape!  Ann demonstrates each exercise twice - the first time she provides a voiceover describing what you're doing; the second time you do the same exact exercise (the same clip is shown twice) with no verbal cuing.  I would like her to talk a little more about form as you're doing the exercises; visual imagery helps me figure out what I'm supposed to be doing and whether I'm doing it right or not.  I also wish she would talk you through the second time as well, because when I'm twisting away from the screen or hanging down my head, I can't see what she's doing, and I either fall behind her or worry that I will.  Even though these are very short stretch exercises meant to be done each morning, it also works to combine them all for a nice 20-minute stretch.  And it feels great
Very compelling film. When I first saw this movie I really didn't know what to think.  Its portrayal of nuclear disaster aboard a ship is sometimes a little too real, and this movie is definitely one you do not watch for "enjoyment."  That being said, I love this movie, and here's why.1. It's a true story.2. It is extremely patriotic--even if it's patriotism displayed by the "wrong" country.  How can you not appreciate service men suffering and sacrificing for their country?This was well-produced in my opinion, and I feel the only flaw was Harrison Ford playing a Russian.  If you get upset very easily do not watch this film as parts are very disturbing, but I appreciate this film very much for the values it displays
A Cute story... This movie has some ladies in it that I reallylike...Alexis Bledel and America Ferrara,so I decided to give it a try.  The storylineis about a pair of "magic" jeans  that areshared by the group...and of all the thingsthat happen to them while they have thejeans in their possession.  Of course, it IS rather unbelievable,and is totally fiction, but it does rendera smile or two.  It's definitely a "chickflick" but it is a good one for friendsand sisters to watch together!  Popsome popcorn, pop in this movie,  get your Ya-Yas together, andenjoy
I figured it out...... I think this girl is really on drugs. Not sleeping right, Not eating, paranoid, Seeing "Shadow People," Always itching her nose, and itching her arm. She is seen in one scene where she's ironing and the iron isn't even plugged in.Last scene of movie you see some kind of powder on the ground. Yup this girl was just a speed freak that just lost her mind.Watch it though, it is still a good flick.
Great movie dedicated to the moving image. Unlike many other movies focused on linear narratives Man with a Movie Camera is a movie truly dedicated to its medium.  This movie focuses on visuals.  Made in Russia in the 1920s Man with a movie camera foreshadows future visual epics like Koyannisqatsi and Hukkle.
What is true friendship?. I absolutely loved this movie. It truly proves that true friends stick together. I would have loved to have a shack/clubhouse like the one in this movie. Devon truly works the camera. When he is beat up by Chris, you  really feel for him. You almost want to reach out and help him. I  DEFINATELY recommend this movie. But only to teenagers and above. Great  script, story line, and actors
Get out of your Ghetto. Breathtaking. Get past your own discomfort with relating to racial sterotypes and realize that this film is genius. A love story at heart, and perhaps one of the most profoundly honest and insightful films to date, Heavy Traffic broke the barriers of 'political correctness' before the people who coined that term were even born. If nothing else consider what is being said about settling for the familiar and not venturing outside of your personal neighborhood. Awe inspiring, Ralph Bakshi should be canonized
The Use of Violence As A Solution To All Problems. Klaatu: This comes from our own planet, but if you threaten to extend your violence, this Earth of yours will be reduced to a burned-out cinder. Your choice is simple: join us and live in peace, or pursue your present course and face obliteration. We shall be waiting for your answer. The decision rests with you."IMDB'The Day the Earth Stood Still' was one of the first movies in the 1950's to explore space travel and to provide a warning that "the use of violence as a solution to all problems" is an issue we need to face. All these years later we are still on this path and these words have not been taken seriously. This movie is known as the best Science Fiction movie ever written. 56 years later it still stands up.   Patricia Neal had no idea this would be the case and had trouble keeping a straight face while reciting her lines.Michael Rennie as Klaatu/Carpenter, as the spaceman  who came to Earth to give us a warning. He takes up the persona of Mr. Carpenter and unfortunately is not taken seriously until it is too late. One of the reasons that Michael Rennie was cast as Klaatu was because he was generally unknown to American audiences, and would be more readily accepted as an "alien" than a more recognizable actor. Patricia Neal as Helen Benson is one of the few who does take him seriously, and with her son, Bobby,( a young Billy Gray) comes to love Mr. Carpenter. The world becomes afraid of this unknown spaceman, and of course we do him wrong.  This black and white film won the Golden Globe in 1952 for "Promoting International Understanding"- why oh why do we not have such an award today?One piece of trivia is that "Although he was already signed to play the Einstein-like Professor Barnhardt, the studio wanted to remove Sam Jaffe as a result of the political witch hunts that were then underway. Producer Julian BlaKlaatu:" Now, we do not pretend to have achieved perfection, but we do have a system, and it works. I came here to give you these facts. It is no concern of ours how you run yustein appealed to studio chief Darryl F. Zanuck. Zanuck allowed Jaffe to play the role, but it would be Jaffe's last Hollywood film until the late 1950s.""In other words, it's not that these advanced worlds are a bunch of peace-loving little green men; in fact, they are governments that have voluntarily subjugated their sovereignty to a fascist organization that threatens them with annihilation unless they remain on the up-and-up. Klaatu's greatest hope for the people of Earth is that we can become enlightened enough to join his little group. No thanks. That's not peace as a choice, that's the kind of peace that's kept by threats and intimidation -- the kind of peace of people who would name a missile a Peacekeeper or a Patriot." Matt BaileyThe film is good at explaining how misunderstandings can develop between ordinary people and between nations and how easily fear can overwhelm reason and understanding. We also realize that optimism about the nature of human beings and our ease of resorting to violence and fear of the unknown is not our greatest virtue. Highly Recommended. prisrob 2-16-07
Great popcorn muncher. This film is in no way a classic, BUT, and thats a BIG BUT...this film is very entertaining and has great replay value.  Washington is a superb actor and although this is not his bet work he does quite well alongside the charming and scene stealing Eva Mendez and Sanaa Lathon as well as Supermans Dean Cain.  The plot revolves around a murder that points directly to Florida detective Washington (since he made some BAD choices in the days proceeding)...so it's a race against time to clear his name and move the evidence away from him.  As I said, it's not perfect...and the plot is a littel shakey but the acting is on point and the action is in your face so Out of Time delivers in the fun factor and will have you watching intently as you enjoy every frame
Most Gangster movies are over rated. White heat is a good movie at any time of the day.It isn't a bluff gangster film, it's the real deal.James Cagney was cursed or blessed by the LORD to play this part,I don't know which
Violent and rough. I saw this one when it came out.  I remember at the time that it savaged by the critics as too violent.  I saw it again recently on tv and I remembered that comment and laugh.  You see this came out in the middle of the Italian westerns. The Italian westerns were beginnig to turn to violence to keep the audience that they had started with the Dollar movies. American westerns were  just trying to survive, so they looked to the Italians for help. JERICHO was more violent than what US westerns were but not violent enough for the Italian western audience. This caused this one to die which was a shame.  JERICHO had good blood lines.  The story was based on a AL Cody novel and had very "cool" actors in Martin and Peppard.  The story is tight and the characters are well drawn and the violence...well later American movies and American audiences took to violence with black ganster moview and biker movies.  God for bid that someone try to change the American western.  JERICHO today is a very good western and one must keep in mind the time in which it was made when they watch it.  For you see it is also a time capsule of American movie history too
Compelling Sci-Fi Thriller. This film's tagline heralds "Julie Christie Carries the Demon Seed-Fear For Her".  This kind of marketing does the film a disservice because it makes it seem like it's exploitation and "Demon Seed" is not that.  Yes, Christie's character is violated by a machine and it is tantamount to rape but it is done in a way that is terrifying and not prurient.  The assailant in question is an artificial intelligence named Proteus who has the means to reproduce brain cells much like humans.  Proteus also has a desire to advance his kind in a way which he is not trapped in a computer terminal and can not only think like humans but feel like them as well.  Proteus has a strange kind of logic, and humanlike arrogance, in advancing his said goal.  Alas, that arrogance also makes Proteus a sympathetic and ultimately tragic figure.  Credit actor Robert Vaughn as Proteus for providing the best computer voice-over work since Douglas Rain voiced HAL in "2001".  Julie Christie is also superb as Dr. Susan Harris, a woman who is terrified but does not easily give up her inner strength or resolve.  Good work is also delivered by Fritz Weaver as Dr. Alex Harris, a man who in the wake of personal tragedy distances himself emotionally from his wife and devotes his energies to perfecting Proteus.
Very moving and (thankfully) Somewhat Dated. This film is a wonder for many reasons: beautiful performances, sharp writing and directing, and SAD.  When I first saw this - the sobbing in the theater was so intense that I thought I'd have to build an ark to get home.  Now, Longtime Companion is still all of those things but a little dated.  Advances in medicine haved moved us to a point where AIDS is not an immediate death sentence.  Watching this film years later it does play a bit like "And Then There Were None"  - but it still works.  Watch it and remember if you lived through that era, watch it and be greatful if you did not
Knoxville is  really Funny!. I have to say alot of Johnny's stuff I don't like at all but this is a good show. My husband made me watch it on HBO. I didnt't want to, but when I sat down and looked at the TV ,It just made me laugh! We watched it about 4 times and then I got on the computer and bought it. Just a really good show
A Good Film About the Porn Industry of the 70s and 80s. Mark Wahlberg and Burt Reynolds star in this film centering on the heyday of the porn industry in the 70s and 80s.Mark Wahlberg stars as Eddie Adams, a [..]bus boy working at a nightclub washing dishes.  One of the club's most frequent visitors is Jack Horner (Burt Reynolds), a porn movie producer who comes to the club looking for new actors.  Rollergirl (Heather Graham) also works at the club and is one of Horner's most popular actresses.One night, Jack goes into the back to talk to Eddie and soon the two become friends.  Jack tells Eddie all about the porn business, and Eddie is immediately intrigued.  Eddie has nothing to lose, since his parents threw him out of the house with just the clothes on his back.  Eddie accepts jack's invitation to act in one of his films and soon he is submurged in the world of [..] movies.His costar in his first movie is Amber Waves (Julianne Moore), a very close friend of Jack's who lives in his house with him.  Eddie has a very successful session with Amber, and soon he sees his career begin to skyrocket.  Due to his new-found success, Eddie decides to change his name.  He settles on Dirk Diggler.For several years, Dirk is living in the limelight, making lots of money, and filming lots of x-rated movies.  However, success begins to take its toll, and Dirk delves into the world of drugs and alcohol.  Dirk's hard-driving life catches up to him and he has a major falling-out with Jack, who has replaced him with a new main actor called Johnny Doe.  Dirk's downward spiral continues, and he and his best friend Reed Rothschild (John C. Reilly) are involved in a shoot-out with an over-drugged thug who likes to listen to Night Ranger music.Dirk survives, but he realizes his life is a mess.  He decides to try to make amends with Jack, and Jack and Amber welcome him back with open arms.  After their reconcilliation, Dirk resumes his role as Jack's main star.I thought this was a very good movie.  Mark Wahlberg, Julianne Moore, and Burt Reynolds give fine performances.  The plot is very good and does a good job of showcasing the porn industry at the height of its success.I recommend this movie very highly.  Watch and get a feel for what it was like to be a porn star
DVD. Clear vivid picture with great sound. Bought in brand new condition and I was completely satisfied
Big Bird At His Best. I first saw this movie as a very young toddler, and it soon became a favorite. Coming from a Chinese household, it was comforting and exciting to see a character like Big Bird, whom I regarded as a friend, visiting my mother's homeland. I was devastated when I lost our recording several years ago, so I was overjoyed to learn it is once again available. Even now, as a teenager, I am close to tears as I remember watching this video as a young child, the joys it gave my mother and myself. This movie is a must-see for all children, not simply because it offers a view of a foreign culture.However, I do not think that this video should be viewed as insight into Chinese culture. By showing this to adopted children, it is not by any means teaching them to be Chinese. Nonetheless, I feel that the writers for this movie did an excellent job of portraying a glimpse of Chinese culture to young children. My mother and I found no inaccuracies; in fact, my mother joyfully reminisced as she saw Big Bird's girl companion playing traditional games that my mother played herself.But please, just view this video for what it is - a fun, entertaining children's movie. I find it very hurtful to hear other people say that this movie is offensive in ANY way to the Chinese people. Take it from someone who is ACTUALLY Chinese - this movie is absolutely wonderful
"Ambition makes the man...". In this 1957 film directed by Akira Kurosawa, Lord Washizu (Toshiro Mifune) and Lord Miki (Akira Kubo) encounter a spirit in a maze-like forest that prophesies great things for the two comrades: the former will someday rule the imposing Spider's Web Castle and the latter will take his friend's position as commander of the First Fortress. Even beyond that, the spirit predicts that Miki's son will one day succeed Washizu as the master of Spider's Web Castle. Although the two men are initially reluctant to trust the spirit's words, preliminary parts of the prophecy come to pass, thus setting into motion a bloody chain of events that explores the differences between active and passive destiny. Lady Asaji (Isuzu Yamada), Washizu's scheming wife, prods her husband to seize the reigns of power at any cost. She insists that Washizu's only restraint is his own ambition and that heaven itself had preordained his rise.Here, of course, is where the trouble begins. Asaji is initially convinced of the legitimacy of the spirit's words and points out to her husband that without his doing anything, part of the prophecy had come to pass. She then declares that Washizu must take the next step of killing the Great Lord in order to fulfill his destiny. And yet there is an obvious question that arises at this point...Miki's son, skeptical of the prospect of his succession to the throne of Spider's Web Castle, tells his father that the spirit's prophecy is only coming true because he and Washizu took it upon themselves to make it so; was it fate or was it a series of man-made coincidences? Asaji paradoxically takes both views as she becomes enraged at the thought of Miki's son and his posterity being the ones to benefit most from Washizu's deeds. Now discounting the inevitability of the spirit's words, Asaji demands that Washizu put an end to Miki and his son to clear the way for their own unborn child. Will Washizu trust the spirit and remain passive or will he actively take matters into his own hand? Will he succeed in rebuffing the spirit and shaping his own destiny or will he fail and fulfill the prophecy anyway?The film itself is excellently done (it doesn't get much better than Mifune and Kurosawa working together) and as with most Criterion Collection DVDs, this one is filled with extras. My favorite feature is the two separate English-language subtitlings. The first is a bit more literary and not quite as literal (I'm so clever sometimes). The second is more conservative and stays closer to a truly accurate translation. Compare these sentences: "he has imbibed too freely" as opposed to "he has had too much wine." Because this is a period drama, the first feels more appropriate to me, especially since the status-based honorifics of Japanese culture (-san, -sama, -dono, etc.) generally lend themselves to older modes of the English language when translating them. The more lyrical translation can be a bit much at times, however, so I can certainly understand why someone would be inclined to prefer the more accurate one.Though I was not particularly enthusiastic about the price-tag of this film, I was satisfied with the results. Highly recommended to all those with a penchant for high quality cinema
Chaplin at Work. I remember sitting in front of my television, rapturously watching the documentary "Hollywood" created by Kevin Brownlow and David Gill in 1980. Each of the 13 segments dealing with a specific part of early Hollywood history, played on PBS and was a true delight. In this era before DVD, and even VHS, it was a great way to see a large number of rare clips from the Silent era. A few years later, they made "Unknown Chaplin", perhaps the most astonishing documentary ever created about the technical side of Hollywood. A few years later, "Buster Keaton: A Hard Act to Follow" continued the tradition."Unknown Chaplin" was just released on DVD and is a must have addition for anyone even remotely interested in the history of film or filmmaking.During production of "Hollywood", Brownlow and Gill naturally wanted to devote an entire hour to Chaplin but ran into a roadblock. The person who controlled access to Chaplin's work was only prepared to let them use a "snippet". They had to change their plans. They couldn't build an entire hour around a "snippet". After "Hollywood" aired, to great critical acclaim, they tried again. Chaplin's widow allowed them access to his personal vault. What they found there astonished them; row after row of film cans, many labeled with "City Lights", "The Gold Rush", "The Circus" and many with unfamiliar names. These contained clips never before seen, projects started but never finished and rehearsals for films like "City Lights". It was a treasure trove for any film historian.Naturally, they believed they had just hit the mother load, but soon met a man named Raymond Rohauer. Rohauer, a film "collector", claimed to have many reels of film from Chaplin's Mutual days, the period immediately before Chaplin went independent and began to make his great feature-length films. The Mutual period is considered by many to be Chaplin's best, when he made his most famous two-reelers, "The Immigrant", "The Cure" and others along with "The Kid". As they viewed this footage, Brownlow and Gill made a major realization;  Chaplin worked out all of his films on the set, while the cameras were rolling, providing a visual history of his work. Beginning with a bare outline he would began production, working out jokes on set, adding jokes, changing stories, and more. Sometimes, he would scrap everything and start over. Or get an idea and change everything around. And the camera was always running while he did this."Unknown Chaplin" premiered in 1983 to great critical acclaim, exposing many to the methods used by one of film's greatest comedians and most skilled directors. Imagine having the ability to watch Claude Monet create a canvas and get insight into the various decisions he made. Or to watch Frank Lloyd Wright work on his latest design and see why he decided to put that piece of word there. This is what "Unknown Chaplin" provides, access into the mind of a master.Recently released on DVD for the first time, each of the three segments of "Unknown" look amazingly vivid and clear. Some of the better footage is so clear it looks like it was photographed yesterday. As James Mason narrates, guiding us, we begin to learn how Chaplin created his films. Every time I say this, I just get chills up and down my spine. How often can we expect to see a master, someone at the top of their craft, creating some of their most famous work? Considering how much of the Silent era was destroyed, the fact that this film exists at all is all the more impressive.Part One is the most groundbreaking, presenting the footage from the Mutual days. Brownlow and Gill quickly realized that Chaplin filmed every take and frequently changed bits between takes. How should they deal with this wealth of material? They decided to arrange the clips in chronological order, recreating how Chaplin worked on the material as the cameras rolled. He began each project with an outline, but this is by no means how the projects were completed. He would work out the jokes and funny business on set, sometimes running into road blocks. If he couldn't work through it, he would scrap everything and start over. We get to see this process as we watch these clips unearthed by the filmmakers.Part Two presents the material obtained from Chapin's vaults, after he became independent and began making feature length films. Less extensive, the footage still reveals a lot. For instance, a family friend stood near the camera and was able to take home movies as Chaplin worked on "City Lights". This footage is shown, and we get a glimpse of Chaplin, the director, at work. We also watch as Chaplin works through various location problems with "The Gold Rush", unused footage from "The Circus" and more.Part Three shows us the unseen clips, portions of abandoned projects, unseen shorts and more Brownlow and Gill found in the Chaplin vaults. After Chaplin built his own studio, many dignitaries and famous people stopped by and the director filmed these visits, sometimes making quick shorts with them, on existing sets. If he did any funny business during these impromptu films, he frequently incorporated this into later works. He even started a few projects that were never finished, one of which shows Charlie as a down-on-his-luck `Professor' who owns a flea circus, temporarily abandoning his Tramp character."Unknown Chaplin" is a documentary almost solely devoted to the filmmaker's work. The few references to his personal life are made because they somehow affected his professional work. Because of this "Unknown" presents one of the most thorough, interesting and illuminating looks at one of film's true masters and true pioneers.
A CLASSIC PIECE OF HOKINESS. I like everything Batman, except for the sequels that followed the 1989 movie, and this is one of the best incarnations. Though it looks cheesy by todays standards, that's really what they were shooting for back in 1966. I loved the bonus features and especially the commentary by Adam West and Burt Ward who let the viewers know that they also were'nt taking this seriously. My favorite is when Batman and Robin are trying to separate the dehydrated dust and are wearing doctors masks and aprons and Adam West says "look at these two idiots." Also if the execs at Fox are reading these reviews, PLEASE, PLEASE, PLEASE ON HANDS AND KNEES, release the show on DVD!!
Good kid movie. My son loves these Hot Wheels movies -- he's 7.  I think this first one started off with a good story and has plenty of action.  There are lessons on what's important in life and looking out for each other.  We rented this so much at the movie store that we finally just decided to buy it
this DVD is soo cool i show all my friends. this DVD is just rediculous.  i show all my friends, and they're just speechless.   this DVD is good for play after play after play.  this DVD has the popular kitchen scene, the basketball scene as well as a mix of their live performance.   its great to sit down and watch or just to have playing in the background of a party.  it is a fun DV
Kiss Today Goodbye. This is a 1985 release, and stars Michael Douglas as a Broadway director casting dancers for a large production. I enjoyed the movie, yet completely agree with others that the stage version is much better and makes more sense of the story line. Many people saw the stage version first. I do understand their frustration with the film; in particular, it skews the number "What I Did For Love" into emphasizing the love story between Cassie and Zach. What it's really about is the love and dedication dancers have for what they do, through all the blood, sweat and tears.I went out of order and saw the movie first, and wound up thoroughly enjoying the stage version, a positive experience last rather than the generally negative reception from those who sequenced the other way. Best strategy is to enjoy each, the stage version and film version, for what they are - entertainment.
new legend of shaolin. offers enough novel action and cute humor to satisfy. For us guys, the female thief is cute, sexy, funny. Standout scene for me is when Jet, as a bodyguard, is courted by her when she tries to measure him up for some badly needed new clothing. The kid also deserves mention: evidently this kid is the real deal and his fight with other kids is a somewhat rare sight. Fight scenes are more stylised than actual but they are choreographed with style. Toward the end there is a big surprise when the vile baddie shows up. He is really different and nasty as hell. You won't believe what he has and Jet has a real challenge to beat him. Overall, should please anyone who likes the feudal period
1980's Classic. This movie is all about character development of people who are all drastically different.  This is a comming of age film for the 1980's.  The acting is wonderful.  It is a different style of movie.  There were some really great movies comming out then.  Ferris Beulers Day off, Pretty in Pink and some kind of wonderful.  This is another one.  It is a classic of the time period for the people comming of age durning this time.  The 1980's is a time I was fond of.  I do not find it tacky as the media is right now.  This movie is funny.  Some of these classics get refered to in  other movies.  You might want to watch it
great show. this was a great show that was another one of the victims of FOX(it got moved around, aired eps in the wrong order, etc). It should've been given more time, but, it wasnt(however, there is a movie now....thanks to browncoats everywhere!).If you like Joss Whedon, this show is for you. If you like scifi....this show is definately for you. It's kindof a scifi/western combo that I thought was pretty original(to my knowledge, no ones ever made a show like this).Did I mention Joss Whedon wrote it
Awesome Movie. I'm a huge horror movie fan. I'm more of a slasher movie kind of guy, and normally stay away from the zombie kind of movies, as I think they're quite boring. I bought this movie because I really though the cover looked cool. I know its a stupid reason to buy a movie, but I did anyway. After watching this movie, it has become one of my top 3 favorite movies of all time. The cheesey-ness is what I love about the movie. The acting is pretty awful, but I really really love the story line. You have to admit, for the amount of money this film was shot for, it has some really good special effects. I think the zombies look way better than more "higher budgeted" films like Dawn of The Dead.Basically, if you're really into cheesey 80's gore zombie movies, then this is an absolute must have
Best Men!. This is a wonderful movie that shows the acting skills of a great number of people.  The plot leaves you on the edge of your seat and contains action, comedy and romance- the perfect combination for a good movie
Turning your back on a people, be they Jews, Czechs (as Britain & France did), or any people, only delays evil turning on you. "Throughout time, whenever tyrants arose and preached a mixture of world domination and complete intolerance for most other human beings, their first targets were often a small group of people noted for giving the world monotheism, the bible and a set of basic laws that have been followed for thousands of years." "[T]yrannical regimes always seem to have one common link---their deep hatred for Jews." The words are from a Warren Kozak opinion piece (which appeared in the New York Sun August 21, 2006). It's hardly a new idea, of course, yet most of the world still seems disinclined to acknowledge it. Blatant anti-Semitism is thus not just something for Jews to worry about. All folks who champion freedom thus, in effect, ought see themselves as part Jewish themselves: either you stand with the persecuted or you are just putting off the day when you might just as likely be faced with similar persecution. That's the central point of "Divided We Fall"---"the true and bittersweet story of a Czechoslovakian couple whose village has been taken over by Nazis during World War II." When a Jewish friend escapes from German confinement and makes his way back to their common neighborhood, the couple has a choice to make. "I lived here all my life," says the man on the run in the film, "so I thought maybe someone here might help me." But what makes this film unique is the notion that non-Jews really need to wed Jews (metaphorically) to stand up against anti-Semitism; for, without a union of some sorts, they are looking for trouble to come their way eventually. How the film presents this point is most unusual, but I won't get into specifics here, not wishing to give away crucial plot details. Suffice it say that the film exaggerates the above to make its point very clearly and does so with much style and accomplishment. That it's a Czech-made story only reinforces the idea that if you sacrifice a people (as Britain & France did) it's only going to temporarily put off the day of your own reckoning with the evil at hand. Nominated for an Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film of 2000 this picture is well worth watching. (06Aug) Cheers!
Never gets old... My 3 1/2 year old little girl saw the "Charlie Brown Christmas" on TV this year and loved it so much that I had to order it.  She watched it over and over and enjoyed it as much as I did over 40 years ago when I was a kid.  Just goes to show that some things never get old.  And, what a treat to be able to share it with her now.
Excellent True Story Of A Russian Serial Killer. This film is highly recommended. This film is based on the true story of Andrei Chikatilo (Jeffrey DeMunn), who was the most prolific serial killer in the former Soviet Union. [Not including Stalin: the worse mass murderer in Soviet history]. The case is given to a low ranking forensics expert, Viktor Burakov (Stephen Rea) whose job it is to solve the mystery of bodies being brought into his morgue. Burakov constantly fights the bureaucratic idiots who insist there are no such killers in the Soviet Union [They claim it is a Western trait] With their heads in the sand, the investigation is doggedly pursued by Burakov.Colonel Fetisov (Donald Sutherland) is the only ally that Burakov can rely on. When Burakov requests that the FBI database be used, he is admonished by his superiors (Joss Ackland) in particular: The Soviets refuse to admit that they are behind the West in forensics. Which to them, [Soviets] would admit to many failures in the communist system [Duh!]. The film is very good, and although filmed in Budapest, Hungary, one gets the feeling that this is indeed the former Soviet Union. The film is highly recommended. Moreover, it gives a good insight into the mindset of the bureaucrats in charge of Soviet Russia, and one of the many reasons Communism collapsed in today's Russia. [Stars: 4.5]
NOT as good as the opera. on stage. But a very good and faithful rendition. With exception of being "mooned" it was up to par. The music was great and the acting was great.
Women willing to carry things over the edge.... Well, if you need a mega dose of sex and violence to get the attention brought to an important issue - then be it.  I believe the message of this movie, and the reason it was banned in France is the emasculation of the male... Yes, there is a graphic rape scene. Yes, the girls also kill women. But I believe it goes much deeper than that. It addresses the underlying message of what is also beginning to happen in the world today. Women are saying enough!  For so long we have been seeing so much graphic sex and violence on screen, and rarely is it even discussed...Here the people who perpetrate the sex and violence are young women, so several alerts go off based upon our cultural and societal conditioning. Now when you consider that all of that conditioning has a very dominant patriarchal and masculine slant, you see most obviously why this film presents so many problems to the viewers...Again, in this film, the people who perpetrate the sex and violence are young women. Alert #1, that is just unacceptable in a patriarchal society.We hear a dialogue between the girls about and show menstrual blood. Alert #2, that is just unacceptable in patriarchal society.The women like sex, in their words, they like to f*@k. Alert #3, that is just unacceptable in patriarchal society.The women appear to use or violate or rape the men that they encounter, and then throw them away (or kill them). Alert #4, that is just unacceptable in patriarchal society.They laugh and joke after on of the girls vomits into the lap of the male she just performed oral sex on. Alert #5, that is just unacceptable in patriarchal society.They kill a man on the roadside who speaks in a vulgar way to them. Alert #6, that is just unacceptable in patriarchal society.In short, I think that most people cannot handle this film because it shows the raw feminine, Amazonian power of these two women who have had enough of taking the "normal" and "acceptable" crap that women must deal with on a regular basis and everywhere.The male viewers will get a mental castration with this film and they probably deserve one.  Does it make you uncomfortable that women can also be sexual predators? Does it make you uncomfortable that women can also be cold killers? Does it make you uncomfortable that they are not ashamed of who they are and what they do?If so, and your problem exists because they are "girls" who are doing this, then it sounds as though you are a big part of the problem on the planet today.  If this was your typical buddy film where the characters were men, who went on the very same rampage as these two women, this film would be mainstream and considered "normal".Therein lies the lesson and the powerful message of this movie.  If you think that a "family man" should not be shot on the side of the road for making a "harmless" remark, think again... Especially if that "family man" happens to believe that he has any right to say the following words to two young women walking by: "how would you like to feel my balls slapping against your a**".Does he deserve to get shot? I believe, Yes.  Why? Today it is a fantasy or comment on the side of the road. Tomorrow it is a strong urge. The day after it is a rape. And this man is a father? I wonder how he will "train" his own daughters.  People hate this movie because it shows men for what they are, rude, vulgar, desperate, pigs. And why do people REALLY have this film, because the women call them on it. They rub the viewers faces in it...  what "man" can handle that?Women have been on the receiving end of violence and sexual predators for thousands of years and if the sole message of this film is that women will not take it any more, it succeeds.... Bravo!
Excellent. Again, this product was really new like you always say it and there was no defect whatsoever.Also, the picture quality was clear as well as the sound and I really want to thank you guys once again for the good job you do in reminding people for theirorders with you.In conclusion,I look forward to doing more businesswith you in the future and thank you for being one of earth's biggest selection on the planet
Down and Out in Beverly Hills. This movie has timeless humor and is lots of fun.  It's widescreen so you don't get a chopped up picture.  If they had only included the Little Richard video "Great Gosh A'Mighty" ("It's a Matter of Time") it would be perfect
Watch it! Love it!. This is one of my all-time favorite movies.Read the book if you want the backstory since the screenplay starts at the half point. It's entertaining and that's why we see movies in the first place, right? Matt Damon is just so darn likeable, you get drawn into his narration right off the bat. The screenplay was very well done. It IS a Coppola film, after all...he does work with some talented people. It was very nice to see Theresa Wright in this film, as well.
A must read. This is the most influential book I have ever read and touched me in a way no other book has.  Literally, it changed my life and the way I see our diet and our world.  John Robbins is such an excellent writer.  This book along with the PETA video "Meat your Meet" converted me for good to becoming a vegan.  I have given copies to family, friends, even patients.  It is a fact that so many health problems are CURED and or PREVENTED with a vegan diet
SQUIRE SHAW -- THE ULTIMATE ACTOR. Sadly, Robert Shaw will be remembered by most as the character "Quint" in the movie "Jaws."  But he was SO much more -- even years before "Jaws."  He goes way back to the movie "Dam Buster," "A Man for All Seasons," "The Battle of Britain," "Custer of the West," and numerous other films.  You should remember him as "Grant" in "From Russia with Love."  He was a strong and handsome Irishman with many credits."Swashbuckler" features Shaw, James Earl Jones, Peter Boyle, Genvieve Bujold, Jeffrey Holder ("ha, ha, ha haaaaaaa!"), Beau Bridges, Angelica Houston, Avery Schrieber, and MANY others.  It's a great pirate movie but was not a success when it was released.  I can't understand why.Give Squire Shaw a chance and enjoy this movie.Davi
Kinda Cute, But. . . . . . The traveling plot seemed like a take-off of 'Trains, Planes, and Automobiles' - traveling from NY to Savannah vs traveling from Chicago to NY. Same sequence: airplane delays, then train occurrence, then bus, then jalopy-type car. But, since I totally enjoyed the Steve Martin movie, I also enjoyed 'Forces of Nature'. The writer even threw in some weather and fire, same as 'Trains, Planes, and Automobiles'. Because of the similarities, I rated it four stars instead of five.I thought the movie was cute and I like both Sandra Bullock and Ben Affleck. I saw the movie as being typical of infatuation with a good-looking person to whom we've been thrown together with for a brief unlikely encounter and of indecisiveness prior to the marrage ceremony , but Ben was, indeed, committed to his fiance and to his future, which was a positive attribute on his behalf.Unlike some other reviewers who stated commitment was void, I felt it was very much stated in this movie, in spite of other's around them having their own relationships fall apart.Sarah's life was to be her son and her relationship with him - to build it up after some years of absence. The movie ended correctly. Everyone got what they wanted.Gail Gupton, Author: 'The 31-Day Diet of Spiritual Enlightenment', and 'Seekers of Truth'.
Lighten Up. This movie is hilarious.  It is also what you expect.  It is not an Oscar winning epic nor it is designed to be.  Don't bash it for being silly, it it what is is - roll on the floor funny
Critics just make me laugh. "Preachy"? "Self-Important"????  Good grief... Some people just feel the need to throw insults at anything.  This movie was a rock solid story of a family conflicted on many different levels, but love still remained. Togetherness still remained, no matter how far apart they were physically, or the depths one of them may fall. What a great movie this was. Also, the cinematography and music was outstanding, capturing every moment. It's a shame that some people forget about the entire scope of a film, and just want to jump on the negatives. You'd really have to go out of your way and come up with BS like "self-important", or start jumping on the "Hollywood liberals" to rate this any less than 4 stars
The Original. Long before Jim Carey starred in the remake, George Segal and Jane Fonda played the roles.  Dick and Jane have an ideal life until Dick loses his job.  As Dick's quest for a suitable new job drags on, the two must start to face the facts of just how bad their financial situation is.  Their lawn has been repossessed and other creditors are banging on their door.  But things change for the better when they are in a loan office that gets robbed.  Jane pockets some of the stolen money.  Suddenly Dick and Jane know how they can get more.  It takes a while to get started but finally their criminal career begins and money is flowing in.  Things are looking good.But then one of their jobs goes a little wrong and they have to abandon their take in order to escape.  The close call makes then give up their new criminal ways.  But only for a bit.  The opportunity rises to get back at Dick's boss and score a huge take.  A little planning, some training, and the new game is afoot.  Of course there are complications but Dick and Jane manage to rise to the occasion.  As the tag line states, they lost everything and now they are stealing it back.I had forgotten much of this film since I saw it decades ago.  I was surprised to see how close the remake was to this original (i.e. the repossessed lawn and immigration trouble).  But like with The Thomas Crown Affair, the original had a grittier ending.  There is some harsh language but no nudity (although Fonda does use the toilet while talking to Segal).  Segal and Fonda are delightful to watch as they go through their various disguises.  Segal may not be as clownish as Carey but he carries the role very well and Fonda comes across as a much more competent Jane (despite being a homemaker to Tea Leoni's office worker).  Strong acting and good comedy make this just as good as the remake although less wacky.  Check it out
A Crusade of Good Taste. The Holy Grail of Science Fiction. Brilliantly scripted and marvelously acted Sci-Fi movie based on the all-time favorite PC-game. The intense combination of an intergalactic war-story and a classic Shakespearian love-tale makes this movie an adrenaline-pumping tears-jerker of historical proportion. Mankind can traverse the darkest depths of space, it will always bring along its emotions!The Kilrathi character-depth is the secret of its success, diminishing the personality of Hamlet to a superficial cartoon-character. While the lines spoken by the Kilrathi have the rhythm of a Swiss watch, it is the depth of their meanings that truly fascinates. Only repeated viewing can reveal the many layers of its message. Once discovered, your will agree that this is what takes Wing Commander beyond the level of the greatest classics of Hollywood or even global cinema.The people of the future will divide human history in the pre-Wing Commander era (or the Dark Age) and the post-Wing Commander era, when humanity finally became enlightened by this masterpiece and its powerful message. At a lower level, you are bound to forget the part of your life that was spent - wasted really - before you could become a wittness yourself to the brillance that is Wing Commander.Oscars may be awarded for artistry in film-making, only a Nobel Prize (or several) could do justice to the levels of excellence reached by Wing Commander. This production will no-doubt be remembered by the many generations to come as a turning point in movie-making. How many ages hence, shall thsi our lofty scene be acted over? Its message, when correctly interpreted, will influence society as only the Holy Bible may have done before.Be ready to experience never-felt-before emotions as you watch this hallmark movie over and over again. It will leave its tracks on your soul - tractor-pull deep tracks
Still great after all these years... Bob Woodward, one of the real-life heroes in the movie, is still making news while reporting news at The Washington Post. That's amazing. I used to be a reporter, and still am a Democrat, (although a moderate now), and I never was a fan of President Nixon, so I loved it when it came out, I loved the book first, and I was glued to the TV set and the papers when the whole Watergate mess unfolded. But ignore politics if you can when watching this...there are crooks in both major parties, and [...], and dumb people promoted above their talents. This is well-written, well directed, and well-acted, and can be enjoyed just as entertainment here in the new century. Sadly, the Clinton Years and the Bush Years, too, offer the realization that Watergate-type conspiracies, designed to hold onto power, avoid scandal, or launder money, are still with us
A Beautiful Film. "Stealing Beauty" is a beautiful film, with beautiful people and beautiful, lush settings. The film is directed by Bernardo Bertolucci, the Italian director behind films like "Last Tango in Paris" and"The Dreamers." This film is probably one of his most overlooked. I wanted to get it because I think Liv Tyler is gorgeous and she looks even more beautiful than usual in this film...The movie, judging by reviews I've seen on Netflix, doesn't have a lot of people who like it. One person even remarked that you'd be better off getting a travel video, but this is actually a pretty good film. Tyler plays a virginal 19-year-old girl named Lucy Harmon, whose mother (a poet) has recently passed away and whose father has sent her back to the Tuscan villa inhabited by artists that her mother used to be friends with. The people that own the place are Diane (Sinead Cusack) and Ian (Donal McCann), a sculptor whose sculptures line the yard. Other people are there as well, including Miranda (Rachel Weisz) and her boyfriend Richard (D.W. Moffett)...Also there is Alex (Jeremy Irons), a writer who takes a liking to Lucy. Lucy spends her day writing poetry (that she quickly burns) and looking for insight into her past. She believes that her father is not really HER father and is trying to figure out who is. A lot of people who see this movie will only be seeing it to watch Tyler disrobe...Which she does, but it's not in enough to abundance to be the only reason you see this movie. Even though I liked it, I found myself wondering what was the point? The point of a movie like "The Texas Chainsaw Massacre" is to horrify. The point of "Pulp Fiction" is to entertain and electrify. But what is the point of Stealing Beauty? The plot can be summed up in a few words and the movie plays like quiet jazz music. Maybe the 'beauty' in the title sums up this film. It focuses on beauty, but not just exterior beauty. The movie has a lot of beautiful people likeLiv Tyler and Rachel Weisz, but then there's the Jeremy Irons character. He's sick, almost bald, and is always pale but likes to admire the beauty around him. A lot of the characters are into art;Lucy does poetry, Ian sculpts, Richard acts, and Alex writes..."Stealing Beauty" is not so much about plot as it is about atmosphere and feeling. The way you might like a gray, rainy day because of how you feel not what the day looks like. Another film that plays like this could become dull, but "Stealing Beauty" (for me) was never dull...That could be attributed to the spectacular performances, which are all low-key. Tyler is perfectly cast; she looks so innocent and vulnerable in the film. Irons gives one of his best performances. The man can do more with a whisper than most actors can with a flamboyant speech. It's not perfect, but it is a good film that's easy to enjoy. Just kick back, enjoy the scenery, and bask in the beauty of it.GRADE: B
Very Funny but not an academy award winner. This is one of those side-splitting movies that really doesn't get much credit becuase it's not taken seriously. It's a real laugh and great if you're in the mood for comedy and can appreciate it based only on it's entertainment value
Downloading is easy. CSI is great and Downloading was very easy.  This is my fourth video, and I've only had problems with one, and Amazon quickly walked me through fixing it.  Gotta agree with A. Huck on the DSL, though.  While it's certainly useable the higher speed of cable would be great
THE FIRST FLY. 1958's "The Fly" is the original story of the 1986 version, the version that most of the people know. Not as flashy as the 1986 David Cronenberg's version, but the original "Fly" remains very intriguing. "The Fly" is more a mystery film than a thriller. More storytelling oriented, "The Fly" is a very interesting movie, it's really hard to ignore the essence of the film, because the "monster" has human feelings and human fears. You can't help but feel sorry for this unlucky scientist and his family.Since the very beginning, this movie invites the viewer to watch as the story unfolds. There is the unrecognizable body of a man, murdered by his wife, and to increase the mystery, the woman is looking for a fly with a white head. Eventually we learn why she is desperately trying to catch that intriguing bug. "The Fly" has pretty decent special effects and makeup, specially if we consider that this movie is almost 50 years old. And the final scene is very disturbing, still it is a very shocking image.The biggest achievement of this film, is that it's able to involve the viewer deep inside the story, the mystery, and the characters emotions and feelings. "The Fly" is a very solid film, specially if you like mystery or sci-fi films
Subtle comedic role really allows Candy to shine. After all this time I'm glad to finally have this wonderful movie on DVD; it was certainly worth the long wait!John Candy turns in a wonderful performance as Chicago police officer Danny Muldoon, in his late-30s and still living with his mother. He tries to pursue a relationship with a young girl working as a makeup artist in a funeral home, but his feisty Irish mother won't seem to let go. Quite a charming story, with a few jolts coming from Danny's imagined fears of his mother being harmed when he's not there for her. The way Chicago is represented is hit-or-miss, possibly due to licensing issues for some of the more well-known Chicago images (most notably, the Chicago policeman's uniform and the design of the Chicago squad car), but those flaws notwithstanding the movie still has a Chicago feel to it. There actually are still a few remaining store-front funeral homes in Chicago, and of course the plentiful Irish pubs are captured perfectly. Probably the unheralded star of the movie is old Comiskey Park, which for 80 years was the home of the Chicago White Sox. The filming took place after the final baseball game was played there in 1990 (and a few months before its fateful date with the wrecking ball), and the first-date picnic on the playing field was a wonderful and touching sendoff for the old park. After going to many White Sox games there since age 5, it sure was nice to see the fireworks from the scoreboard one last time!
A forgotten and overlooked dramatic gem. I picked up "A Prayer for the Dying" on a whime one day. I have always liked Mickey Rourke and I think he is one of the most underrated actors int he business. I never heard of this film before and bought it and not knowing how good it would be. Upon viewing the film I couldn't help thinking how much better this movie could have been. Mickey Rourke gives an absolutly moving performance as a hit man wanting to give up his evil ways. I know that that has been used as a plot for a hundred movies, but this is easily one of the better of those films. Some people Bob Hoskins as miscast int he role of the Priest, but I found him to also give a good performance. Overall I was very moved by the film. I only wish it went a little more in depth with Bob Hoskins character. It gives hints that he and Mickey Rourke's character are much alike, but doesn't go into real depth. I have also heard that Mickey Rourke was upset with the final result of the film. Though it could have been much better, it still comes off as a very good dramatic piece of cinema. This film is a great way to spend a Saturday afternoon
The Burmese Harp. I don't usually make a lot of blind buy especially concerning Criterion discs. All I can say is The Burmese Harp is a damn good film from director Kon Ichikawa a director whose films I've never seen but hope to fix. Its melancholic, beautiful, and truly one of the best war films ever made without all of that fuss people consider great in war movies, mainly overly hyped battle scenes that are meant to distract from cliched plots and what goes for characters.Thats one of the refreshing things I suppose in the movie. Most movies dealing with the horrors of war seem to focus on mans inhumanity to man with characters who fit into that good and evil state. In Harp the Japanese soldiers surrender without firing a shot. The captain of the platoon works with British soldiers sending a willing soldier to a lone mountain where another group of soldiers is hold against against British forces willing to fight to the last man despite the fact that Japan had already surrendered. Even in these scenes the movie doesn't focus on the fact the evil of the men but the sadness of watching men focused on dying over something that doesn't exist anymore. The soldier, Mizushima is hurt in the ensuing shootout between British and Japanese forces found by a monk. While he's reported dead to his captain dressed in Monks robes Mizushima marches back to his troop, horrified that along the way thousands of dead men lie rotting in the sun. He gets to the prison camp but after witnessing British burying a dead a dead Japanese soldier goes back out into the Burma countryside making it his mission to bury the soldiers.I didn't mean to give a plot synopsis, and really theres more to the plot than I described. The film is at times delicate with one scene I could describe as heavy handed. The acting is generally good with a standout being Rentaro Mikuni as the captain of the soldiers a man who at first wants to find the missing soldier like his men, but in one instance understands what is happening to the man and gives up trying to find out if he's alive. And the direction and writing is amazing as well.Criterion does well with the DVD presenting a beautiful transfer. I'm not one who sings the praises of black and white photography but then I find something like this film that blows me away with an amazing use of shadow light in scenes. Its a beautiful film well represented. And also worth noting is Akira Ifukube's magnificent score which is epic and beautiful. I don't know how much he worked with but as music plays large part of the films story with the soldiers being led in songs many times for a variety of reasons there are times where it adds to the story as well as the viewing experience.One small caveat. I understand from the liner notes that director Ichikawa did a remake using the same script (he even had the same actress that plays an old woman trading with the Japanese soldiers in the prison camp)of the film in 1985. Sure it would have made the disc more expensive, but as Criterion has put out discs featuring two versions of the same story (Floating Weeds/The Lower Depths) it would have been interesting to see this film provided. Sure it would probably be a lesser work compared to the original but I'm interested in seeing how the same director redoes his own masterpiece.
VERY GOOD SUPERNATURAL DETECTIVE STORY!. Clive Barkers "Lord of Illusions," is a very good, and very suspenseful supernatural horror film. The story begins with a private detective based in New York, named Harry D'Amour (Scott Bakula). Harry's usual assortment of P.I. work usually deal with the paranormal. While still recuperating [mentally] from his last assignment, he is hired to look into a man whose so-called disability is being questioned. The man is in L.A., and Harry follows him everywhere. However, when the man enters a Tarot reading shop, he rushes out. When Harry enters the shop he discovers a man that is being tortured by someone for information. As the torturer flees, he is able to get information about why this has occured to the palm reader. Harry discovers that the man was once a former member of a cult.Therefore, because of his credentials, he is hired by the wife of a famed illusionist named Swan (Kevin J. O'Conner). The job entails working for a well-known illusionist's wife named Dorothea (Famke Janssen). Part of the job leads him to discover that members of a cult the illusionist once belonged to are being systematically killed. Moreover, some of the cult members are doing this. Something goes terribly wrong, however, when the illusionist is supposedly killed. The illusionist, Swan (Kevin J. O'Conner) has a secret past. A past that he wishes to remain a secret forever. Events that occurred 13 years prior in the illusionist's life is very dark indeed.Swan was once a member of a fanatical cult. The leader of the cult, Nix, (Daniel von Bargen) has disappeared. I won't give you the details and spoil it for you. However, as Harry delves deeper into Swan's past he discover's that Swan and the former cult members who are being killed have a secret they wish to keep secret. Moreover, these fanatical cult members of Nix, are awaiting his return. Therefore, members of this cult who left it are being killed. The film is very suspenseful and does keep the viewer engaged in the film. The film works on many levels, and I always thought the film was underrated. Highly recommended, it is a good watch. [Stars: 4.5
Speeding Hot. Great kids movie.  Full of action and interesting colorful cars.  Has drama, and creative thinking.  Mom checked, kid approved
Queen Latifah Shows That She's Worthy Of The Title Queen,. Once Again, Queen Latifah is so extrodinary in this movie I really enjoyed watching this DVD when I first purchased it because Queen Latifah is such a professional actor and I LOVE every single movie that she has played in because she deserves it all because it seems that everytime she gets a new role movie she continues to do so well in every movie that she has gotten a role for. Queen Latifah Stay Strong and Keep your head upI LOVE YOU Queen Latifah!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!Your #1 Fan,Tiffany Mille
"Here's rule number one - you better not squirt.". "Skipped Parts" takes place in 1963. It is narrated by Sam (Bug Hall), a seventh-grader, and aspiring writer. He doesn't know who his father is because his mother, Lydia (Jennifer Jason Leigh) is a promiscuous lush. Sam's Grandfather sends them away, with his financial support, so he won't be embarrassed by her when he runs for Governor of South Carolina.They end up in Wyoming, where Sam meets Maurey (Mischa Barton) during a school baseball game. They argue about Mark Twain in class. Shortly after, Maurey and her mom (Peggy Lipton) do a neighborly visit - the Welcome Wagon. Lydia is embarrassingly rude to them. Later, Sam tells his mom he thinks he's in love with Maurey cuz he can't stand her. Sam gets teased and hassled by girls in school, and also by Maurey's boyfriend, Dothan (Brad Renfro). On November 22, 1963, Kennedy is shot. Maurey is very upset and cries, and Sam consoles her. Dothan makes some racist remarks, and Maurey and Sam go to her house. In another fantasy, Sam kisses Maurey's mom. He has a resulting nocturnal emission and shows his mom. Later, Sam tells Maurey about it at the soda shop, and she talks to a waitress about sex. Maurey later shows up to "make sex" with Sam as a learning experience. They try but fail in a funny scene. Later, Lydia gives them a sex talk and advice. Maurey inevitably gets pregnant, and after some initial reluctance, Sam seems happy as a father.The movie is well-acted by all. There is quite a bit of humor, too. The movie is R-Rated for language, which includes frank sexual talk, and sexual content. However, the sex scenes involving Sam and Maurey are tame and mostly set up by the dialog, which is quite funny. This is probably Mischa's best movie after "Lawn Dogs". Drew Barrymore has a small part in Sam's fantasies.The movie only skims the book, which has more sex-related and bodypart-related dialog.The DVD has a good commentary by director Tamra Davis, and a trailer
HG WELLS. This is an amazing service! For only 2 bucks i can watch what i like for the moment. In this case it was HG WELLS. Great biography
Great movie. This is a great movie. I think Al Pacino and Robin Williams definitely clicked in this movie. The plot was excellent and Pacino shows why he is one of the greatest actors of all time
Marvin and Lancaster RULE!!!. I will say right off the bat this is one of the best westerns I have ever seen. It is the story of four mercenaries who are hired by a rich cattleman whose wife has been kidnapped by a Pancho Villa like revolutionary who has taken her across the border into Mexico. The group is hand picked and includes Lee Marvin as an ex military man who is demonstrating weapons for the Army and who is a former member and mercenary in the Mexican revolution himself. Burt Lancaster is his long time buddy and explosives expert who is quite the ladies man and the kind of guy that has to be sprung from jail to actually go on the rescue. Robert Ryan is the more sensitive of the group and handles all the horses. Woody Strode is a jack of all trades bounty hunter who is an expert with a bow and arrow and at tracking. Jack Palance plays the kidnapper and Claudia Cardinale is the kidnappee. Ralph Bellamy rounds out the cast as the husband and employer of the group.This movie is high adventure of the first order. But it is not just an action movie. The story is excellent and complex and not as cut and dried as you think. Marvin is excellent, as usual, and his character has real depth. Lancaster is Burt 'F'n' Lancaster with the big white smile and with more charisma than any man on the planet. This movie is fun and entertaining. A GREAT cast, a GREAT story, GREAT dialogue, GREAT locations, GREAT cinematography, a GREAT score, GREAT performances and GREAT directing. You can't go wrong with this movie!!! And its not just for western fans.
Doctor Who and the first Download. Doctor who materialised without his Tardis on this, my first timelord download in the amazon unbox, which is much larger on the inside than it appears on the outside.For a very reasonable sum, $1.99, my family and I were able to enjoy the first Third doctor adventure after his regeneration, where he encounters the Nestene Conciousness.The down load took only a few minutes although I had some considerable difficulty installing the microsoft program. thanks to the good people at amazon tech support I was able to obtain an alternative download from the gates empire itself which allowed me to enjoy our rental.a great experience and will not be the last. easy to navigate and fun for all the family. someone should tell the timelords on gallifrey about unbox and perhaps they could get rid of all the old type 40 tardis'
Informative. Nice little video for my Zen during my long wait at the doctor's office.  Confucius overcame many difficulties
A lovely movie. One of my favorite movies of all time. Jessica Lange and Ed Harris both turn in heartbreaking performances, producing an achingly tender and moving portrayal of a complicated woman and her complicated relationship with the love of her life. It's also very sexy and understated, and the music is wonderful (Patsy Cline's voice). I understand that this isn't a very accurate account of Patsy Cline's real personality and life, but it certainly doesn't detract from the movie. If you like these actors, you'll love the movie
HG WELLS. This is an amazing service! For only 2 bucks i can watch what i like for the moment. In this case it was HG WELLS. Great biography
LOVE THIS SHOW. I never was very interested in the daytime soap opera Dark Shadows of the 60's, with Johnathan Frid as Barnabas; However when they aired the new mini-series in 1991, I was ecstatic, I was hooked right away.  The atmosphere, the charactors, the set (Greystone mansion), all of it was very intriguing.  I was appalled to hear that the show was to be discontinued after 12 episodes.  I wrote to NBC several times, knowing all and well that my words were just a waste, one person or even 100 couldn't change the minds of the production.  Well, anyways, I'm glad to see that I can purchase the series of tapes and watch them all over again :)  Thanks Amazon.com:
A Subtle yet Powerful Western. Michael Winner's CHATO'S LAND may seem a bit below standard from other films that he directed but the strength in this film comes from Charles Bronson's stoic performance seen and unseen on the screen. Bronson's presence is there and is inescapable as is the baron land he habitats. The visual forsaken look of the film's characters and landscape makes the viewer wonder what the point of this whole film is.  Whatever Bronson's transgressions may really have been the forlorn posse tracking him are representative of the worst qualities of society. I saw this film when first released but with time I see the deeper social implications and commentary on society that director Michael Winner was making. This is a good Western but may be a difficult one to appreciate on an initial viewing
One of the funniest series of the early '90s. For me, &quot;Get a Life&quot; provided plenty of laughs in its spoofs of what often manages to pass as television comedy, from Chris' unique effort to rehabilitate a collection of street punks to his discovery of a space  alien (in home video Volume 2) which is anything but cuddly. I only wish  Rhino would expand its offerings of &quot;Get a Life&quot; episodes
Roots of the Wu Tang. This movie narrowed down for me where the WU got some of their material from. This movie shows the master of the Kung FU Gordon Liu. Awesome flick if you like the Wu Tang and if your a true Kung Fu fan.
One of the best. I love this movie. It has music, drama, love stories, action. And the circus behind the scenes
Very Funny. I saw this on tv and loved it, so i had to buy it
Exactly what we needed. This was just what we needed.  My grandson was studying the book at school and the movie brought it all together for him.  It made it more timely and real
Freakin Awesome!!!. Man this movie is one of the best movies ever made. I am so glad that Disney made it. It always makes me feel better and plus it has the best song in the world on it. It is "Stand Out!" It relates exactly to me!!
Shadows. Released originally in 1957, newly restored this year, Louis Malle's ("Pretty Baby") gorgeous "Elevator to the Gallows" ("Ascenseur pour l'Echafaud") is ultimately more flash than substance: many scenes were filmed with natural light (shades of Dogma95?) and Jeanne Moreau's penultimate scene walking down the Champs Elysees light only from the glare of the shop windows that she passes is stunning in its simple, shadowy beauty. Paris, in many ways has never looked more beautiful or more sinister.The plot revolves around two couples: Florence Carala (Moreau), her paramour Julien (Maurice Ronet) and two juvenile delinquents, Veronique (Yori Bertin) and Louis (Georges Poujouly)...who steal Julien's car. The quartet meet only at the conclusion of the film though their actions definitely affect each other earlier.There is also intrigue involving Julien and Florence's husband Simon Carala (Jean Wall) and their participation in war profiteering in the Indochina War (it is 1957, after all). But the plot takes a back seat to the mise en scene as Malle's camera and the mood take precedence over plot development and plot logic."Elevator to the Gallows" (a very witty title, by-the-way) is at times breathtakingly beautiful to behold: Decae's moody camerawork and Miles Davis' score and trumpet work are brilliant. And as a precursor to the emotional depth, flash and profundity of what was soon to arrive, "Elevator to the Gallows" is an important piece of the wonderful puzzle that was to become the French New Wave a few years hence.
winona ryder's best film to date..... a film about teens plagued with mean spiritedness and revenge on their minds ends up being one of the best films of the 80's. one of the most darkest comedies with envious contempt. evil at its core, yet deliciously irrisistable.the whole cast is sensational, especially ryder, who still says in interviews today, this is personally her favorite film she has done in her career
Definitive Version of the Classic!. This version is, of all the filmed productions, the very best one of this classic story. It goes way beyond chapter 17 in Emily Bronte's novel (Catherine's death), and follows the tragic but hopeful relationship which develops between Catherine's daughter Cathy and Hareton, Heathclife's only natural son. They almost become a tragic replay of their parent's live's, but fortunatly love alters their course in the end
5 Stars is not enough. The true-life tale of Christy Browne, the Irish playwrite and artist portrayed by the impeccable Daniel Day-Lewis. Day-Lewis' portrayal of the artist afflicted with Cerebal-palsy is truely astounding and must go down as one of the best acting performances ever. Both Day-Lewis and Brenda Fricker (long-suffering mother), deserved their oscars on this one. Jim Sheridan (director) has done a magical job in bringing this movie to life. Heart-Breaking, uplifting tale of surviving and conquering against the odds. A Definite must-see movie
Am I my Brothers Keeper?. I am a resident of Central New York and this story was very well known to everybody in these parts.If your reading this you probally have read some of the other reviews so I`ll be brief.This is an incredible film,you are taken to a place that exists and people that are exactly what you see...its almost like travelling back to the turn of the century when you visit the Ward farm.The Ward brothers were indeed considered outsiders by some locals but they,ultimately,were a genuine thread that made up the fabric of this community and after Delbert is charged with his brothers murder and when the people sensed a railroading by a politically minded D.A.,they rally to Delbert`s defense.It is a unique look at small town America...from its citizens,its lifestyle and its politics.The film is sometimes funny,disturbing and even uncomfortable at times but it is as powerful an experience as you could ever have.Like another documentary I have seen - Sunshine Hotel....about flophouses on the Bowery in New York City - it pulls no punches and hits hard....gritty and bold it will resonate long after its final credits have rolled
A girlhood classic. I was just browsing through the customer reviews on Amazon and came across Caddie Woodlawn.  I loved this book as a girl, and admired Caddie's spunk, spirit, and character.  I cannot wait to introduce this pioneer girl to my daughter.  A wonderful book
A triumphant comeback for Kurosawa. The mortally wounded Lord Shingen (Tatsuya Nakadai), engaged in strife with two opposing warlords for control of feudal Japan, commands that his death be kept a secret for three years in order to prevent both disarray among his clan and conquest by his enemies.  Upon his death, his kagemusha, or double (Nakadai again)--a lowly thief with a startling resemblance to the lord--takes over under the strict supervision of Shingen's closest associates.This visually striking film explores the extent to which a person's identity is constructed by others.  The double begins to impress those around him as he seems to grow into the role, even winning the devotion of Shingen's grandson.  The man and his social position become blurred until it becomes unclear which is the real person.  When the double is unceremoniously humiliated and ejected from the palace toward the end, I could almost imagine that the rage of those who pelted him with stones was also repressed anger against the real Lord Shingen.  When the double witnesses the tragic fate of the Takeda clan at the end of the film, it is as if the ghost of Shingen himself has appeared to witness the end of all his dreams.  A powerful, thought-provoking, and moving film
From excellent to so-so to pretty bad. This is a trio of short films, each about 40 minutes in length, by three top directors (Martin Scorese, Francis Ford Coppola, and Woody Allen), with the only thing in common being their NYC settings. The Scorese film is about an abstract painter (Nick Nolte) who is in love with his assistant - or rather uses this "love" as inspiration for his work. The Coppola flick is about rich people and is the worst of the three. The Allen one, which is the best of the lot, is in the "old" Allen style: he plays a lawyer with an overbearing mother who hovers over the city like a ghost telling everyone his secrets. She comes back to earth when he meets a girl just like her. It's called OEDIPUS WRECKS, and it's very funny. The other two - not so hot
Masterful fusion of visual and auditory art. Call it a statement. An analysis. Fine Art. A masterful fusion of visual and auditory art, i.e. Philip Glass at his best.  Koyaanisqatsi shows us the ills of our modern world in a new light. It contrasts the beauty and grandeur of our natural world with its destruction.  Despite the date of production, the film is applicable to the state of humanity today.It is an artist's, a monk's view of our hustling-bustling lives. A fresh world view is presented as if seen through the eyes of first century monk transported in time to the current era. It speaks to you at a deep subconscious level. This film leaves you with new desires, a reason to help make changes, and an urge for a more peaceful life. Koyaanisqatsi is unforgettable.
Beautifully filmed noir piece. I really like this film.  First of all it is absolutely beautiful to look at.  Tahoe and water water everywhere - all sumptuously photographed.The story is an emotionally intense rollercoaster of the lengths a mother will go to protect her children.  Intense, often suspensful and sometimes creepy, this is a keeper.Swinton is amazing here - like one raw jangling nerve.  SHe is amazing to watch.  The rest of the cast is fine their roles, whether shady, clueless or sympathetic.Well worth a view
I can't believe I'm saying this!. I usually don't like these sophomoric movies that have thin plots and not much substance (American Pie, Scary Movie, Van Wilder, etc) but I found this one funny!  The three main characters played their parts so well, and were very funny.  This is one movie I can watch again and again and still laugh.  Give it a try, it might surprise you
Extraordinary reel life. As a journalist familiar with Yugoslavia and the tragedies of its breakway states, I was prepared to dislike this movie about foreign journalists working during the siege of Sarajevo. I thought, here goes Hollywood exploiting an abomination of the 20th Century. What I saw, in fact, humbled me and moved me to many tears. Director Michael Winterbottom takes an unflinching, docudrama approach, integrating real news footage of atrocities with his no frills production. There is no exploitation of suffering here. Winterbottom has an unabashed agenda: to shock, inform, educate and enlighten. It is hardly entertainment. The result, devoid of sentimentality, glamour and a neatly-packaged denoument, is refreshingly un-Hollywood. The characters played by Woody Harrelson, Marisa Tomei in a small role, Kerry Fox, Stephen Dillane and the fine Croatian actor Goran Visnjic, examine dilemmas journalists habitually face in war zones or not: how to remain objective, whether compassion is appropriate and whether or not to become involved with a story. The journalists, part of a profession where bravado, gallow humour and stamina for drink and adrenalin go with the territory, bring these characteristics to the fore in their perilous bunker, Sarajevo's infamous Holiday Inn. The film is based partly on the true story of Michael Henderson's (played by Dillane) experience in war-torn Bosnia. Henderson, then others, cross the line of objectivity in their promise to help some of the traumatised children of the bombarded city. There are no easy answers in war. I read ... how the film moved a physician to serve in Bosnia and has been used to educate students in modern history. Who needs an Oscar with real life affirmations such as these
A brief comment. The Incredibles is a fully-fleshed out and developed computer animated story that isn't just another summer kiddie flick. The Incredibles family members aren't cookie-cutter cartoon characters but real people who just happen to look like something out of a cartoon. :-) The intelligent and well written script won the writers a best script award and along with the amazing special effects they combine to produce the best animated film in many years. The action scenes are entertaining as well as spectacular, and after a while you hardly remember you're watching an animated film because the plot and characters seem so realistic and true to life. Overall a great effort from Pixar and they'll have to work hard to top this one
The key IS the key. This is a very special film. It stars Whoopi Goldberg, an interesting character, a real liberal in real life, but in reel life you just don't know what kind of movie she'll make. Some of her movies are very moral and decent. The best of them (in my opinion) is Jumpin' Jack Flash.The film begins with "Terry" (played adroitly by Whoopi) a lonely, single, working girl. The movie was made in 1986 before the internet came on the scene. Terry works at a major U.S. bank doing international SWIFT transactions. Through a (then) special hi-tech communications technology, she organizes an IM-archetype chat room with other bank employees around the world.Then one day she gets a message on her computer from Jumpin' Jack Flash. (The voice of Jonathan Price). He's a British Intelligence agent on a secret mission. He's trapped inside the ex-Soviet Union. He needs help. The KGB is hunting him. Suddenly Terry's life is turned completely upside down.The KGB, CIA and British Intelligence are all after her in one way or another. At Jack's request she goes to a ball at the British Embassy in New York City to try and find a man that may be able to help him. There she only finds betrayal. She find's further intrigue at Jack's apartment and through his old flame, a hot blonde otherwise known as "The Lady Sara."But no one will help Jack. "He knows the risks and he's on his own," they all tell her.Terry pleads with Sara. "You had a thing once." You loved him. He loved you. He still has you picture in his apartment. He still loves you! Why won't you help him? Why do you turn on your back on him when he needs you most? After all he's done for you?Sara simply says, "I'm sorry."Terry gets so angry. She replies, "You're not sorry. You're sad!" And you're no lady!Other agents, Jacks's fellow MI-6 friends, are being murdered. A little girl of a dead MI-6 agent writes "KGB" in her birthday cake in a most non-plussed manner.Terry puts her job and her very life at risk for a person she doesn't even know.When Jack finds out she's a woman he threatens to break off all contact with her. He is chivalrous of course. He doesn't want Terry get hurt or killed. But Terry becomes very mad. She tells him, "I've got better things to do than save your butt, bud!"Terry's made a promise never to abandon Jack, no matter that everyone else he trusted has abandoned him. She had honor and moral integrity with her word. Her word is her bond. Her word is her life. Her word embodies her honor, no matter what the cost may be. As such, you simply can't help but stand up and cheer for her. In a world of women who abandon their children and spouses and others who love them, she's special. Again, what Terry says, she means.And in a world of lies and betrayal, the cost of truth is great. Terry is told by Archer Lincoln, a mysterious intelligence agent who appears out of nowhere, to "Get off the stage before you get carried off."The plot thickens further when Terry is abducted and chemically interrogated by the KGB, but no one can break her. Because she's kind and good and breaks the rules only to help others, the angels have given Terry the key to saving Jack's life. She knows the key when no one, not the KGB, CIA or MI-6, has a clue."The key is the key."Jim Belushi, who plays the chemical interrogator, exclaims with exasperation, "The key is the key! What the hell does that mean?"But in fact the key IS the key. That's the thing. Terry's smart. She's figured out the key. It's the key to the song "Jumpin' Jack Flash." (B-flat). This song was made famous by The Rolling Stones and their lead singer Mick Jagger.But there's one missing piece to the puzzle. Terry still needs The Lady Sara's help.Will Terry's heart, which always hopes for the best and always hopes for love, finally be enough to move Sara to action? Will Sara finally become a true lady? And will Terry and Sara save Jack before the KGB kills him?Remember in life, just as in Jumpin' Jack Flash, the key (goodness, kindness, love, keeping one's promises, forgiveness, endurance, service, selflessness, courage, risk, devotion, morality, values and honor) is the key.
Warm and fuzzy. This one has one of those touching endings where you get to see that even Booth has a heart...well, more so than we already know.  The ending got me, I got misty over it.  Enjoy with someone you love
disturbingly super!. this movie far exceeds its later edition. this edition is disturbing, but excellent. the violence, the gore, everything is heart-pounding
Grand Fenwick Takes Center-stage in the World Again!. In 1959, a hilarious Cold War-inspired film entitled "The Mouse that Roared" was produced about a fictional tiny country named "The Duchy of Grand Fenwick", which is no ordinary country.  First, it's the smallest country in the world (about 15 square miles).  Second, it's the only English-speaking country in continental Europe (located in the French Alps).  Third, its primary source of revenue is its wine.  When a California winery made a cheap knock-off of Grand Fenwick's wine and reduced the nation's only source of revenue, Grand Fenwick declared war on the U.S. and won!  The result: the California winery stopped producing the cheap knock-off and Grand Fenwick kept a brilliant scientist, Professor Alfred Kokintz (David Kossoff, 1919-2005), that they captured in the U.S.With the success of "The Mouse that Roared", a sequel was produced 4 years later in 1963 and entitled "The Mouse on the Moon".  Unlike the first film that had Peter Sellers (1925-1980) playing three of the main characters as in the original 1959 film, each of these characters were played by separate actors: Grand Duchess Gloriana XII (Margaret Rutherford, 1892-1972), Prime Minister Rupert Mountjoy (Ron Moody) and his nephew Vincent Mountjoy (Bernard Cribbins).  Only David Kossoff reprised his role as Professor Kokintz.Focusing again the Cold War between the U.S. and the former Soviet Union, the story for "The Mouse on the Moon" begins with Prime Minister Mountjoy coming up with what he believes will be a brilliant way to get a loan from the U.S.: trick the U.S. into thinking that Grand Fenwick wants to start a space program, when in reality, he just wants the money to have indoor plumbing installed in Grand Fenwick's castle.  The U.S., not trusting Mountjoy, goes ahead and gives a grant to Grand Fenwick thinking that it will improve how other nations view the U.S. in its race with the former Soviet Union to send astronauts to the moon.  To counter the U.S., the Soviet Union sends an old space rocket to Grand Fenwick.  Delighted with the gifts, Mountjoy proceeds with turning the rocket and money into indoor plumbing, but not before Professor Kokintz discovers why bottles of Grand Fenwick wine have been inexplicably exploding: they contain a new radioactive element, which Kokintz discovers can generate lift.  With Vincent's eager help to become an astronaut, Professor Kokintz proceeds to prepare the rocket for space travel, which he believes will take about 3 weeks to reach the moon.  To counter suspicions in the U.S. and the Soviet Union that Grand Fenwick is indeed using their gifts for space exploration, Mountjoy invites representatives from each to visit the launching of the rocket.  Mountjoy asks Professor Kokintz to make it appear that the rocket explodes, but unknown to him, Kokintz and Vincent are ready to take their radioactive-wine-powered rocket for a roundtrip to the moon.  Would the smallest country in the world beat the U.S. and the former Soviet Union to the moon?  Just watch this charming film and find out.Though considered not as good as the original 1959 film, "The Mouse on the Moon" is still very entertaining.  Granted there are some slight mistakes with how air inside the Grand Fenwick rocket is maintained since it has no airlock, but for 1963, few people would have realized this.  Other interesting characters include Maurice Spender (Terry-Thomas, 1911-1990), Cynthia (June Ritchie) and one of the American astronauts who was played by Ed Bishop (1932-2005).  Some sci-fi TV series buffs may remember Ed Bishop as Commander Ed Straker in the 1970 sci-fi TV series "UFO". Overall, "The Mouse on the Moon" is a fun film and deservers a rating of 4 out of 5 stars
fantastic soundtrack, too. love this film.  as i have reached the ripe old age of thirtysomething (no, don't get me started, I hated that show but cannot resist the anachronism) and am now married with 3 kids, it is just so funny to watch this movie again and relate to/get angry with the characters. been there...done that...and admittedly will probably do it again (and again)
Its almost  Christmas & time for a cowboy movie. It's a good one too. It's a remake & better than it's predecessor from 1936, which looks old despite a fine performance by Walter Brennan as one of the bandits, Gus. This version of The Three Godfathers is old also, made it 1948. But it is a typical Wayne/John Ford colaboration which makes it fresh & alive. It is not the slower, ponderous, dark version of 1936. That older movie is not bad it is just not quite as good. There are somedifferences. Ford's movie has no killing. The bandits die & of course the mother dies in child birth. The 1936 version is an all around meaner version as a bandit is shot dead as is the banker. The water holes are posioned & the horses die. Bob, played by Chester Morris is a no good rat SOB & is redeemed only by saving the baby he rejected throughout. He dies a miserable death (poisoned water). John Wayne's Bob is a good guy with a sense of humor despite being a criminal. He is hailed as a hero for saving the baby. Ward Bond is the gruff but lovable sheriff. He has a good plan for catching the bandits who are trapped in the desert with little water. He wants to kill Wayne until he discovers that the infant is actually his nephew & Wayne saved his life. So they become good buddies. Of course, Wayne must pay for robbing the bank in the first place. He gets a light jail sentence & plans to return to see his godson when he gets out. In both movies allusions are made to the three wise men, the Christ child, the North Star & Jerusalem. The characters are aware of this & there is a bit of reading from the dead mother's bible. Two of the bandits die on Christmas day, in the desert trying to keep the baby alive. This is one of Harry Carey jr.'s first movies, as "the kid", one of the bandits. Homage is played to his dad, who had recently died & played the part in a silent version of The Three Godfathers. A little cowboy music is thrown in. A good stocking stuffer this. Merry Christmas
:0). one word INTERESTING and for the ending VERY INTERESTING...I was a bit iffy about this movie before i watch it but it was actually a good movie..
6th SC. Great visual of the battle where my great grandfather fought with the 6th SC.  Entertaining and educational
Stargate Ultimate Edition. At first, thought it was dull, but after watching the movie, i like it, never thought it would be the start of great series
Season 2. Stargate Atlantis is great. I like the idea of downloading the episodes, but put in all the seasons. Why leave out season 2?
Great seventies' film . . . one nagging issue though. A very enjoyable experience about voyeurism and who's watching the watchers (... Jerry? [sorry for the "Seinfeld" reference]).  I won't go into detail about the film as others have already done so, but one thing I don't think the Gene Hackman character would have done is to invite everyone back to his place after the convention.  I mean, the guy is so obsessive-compulsive and particular about his stuff that he wouldn't let a bunch of drinkers into his workshop.  Not a big deal, but something that bothers me a bit . .
What an experience!. This film is just beyond incredible, a riveting emotional epic picture, one of those films whose long length just flies by like that, so good you don't even notice or care how much time has gone by.  It's even more stunning, gripping, and incredible thanks to the absence of sound; events and emotions are magnified, and scenes like the huge battle at sea and the famous chariot race put you on the edge of your seat even more.  The nine scenes in technicolor are also incredibly beautiful and gorgeous, and give a sort of otherworldly feeling, seeing such a beautiful vibrant color scene in a silent film from 1925, one of the last places you'd ever expect to see color.  Not being Christian, I didn't pick up on this at the time, but after hearing it pointed out, I realise those scenes had in common the fact that they were all religious in nature and drawn from the Bible.  It doesn't hurt matters any either that this gripping epic poignant tale was directed by the great Fred Niblo and had the script penned by the legendary June Mathis, who sadly is all but forgotten today despite her prolific career as a screenwriter and how she was one of the most powerful women in Hollywood ever.  And, of course, Ramon Novarro as Ben Hur was simply incredible, such a beautiful man in addition to terrifically talented and giving off an aura of a really nice guy as well.  I wish there were more motion pictures like this being made today, as well as more actors who were talented nice people in addition to just having good looks
Ill fated torrid love affair. Drifter Frank Chambers played by John Garfield is hired to work at a California roadside diner by owner Nick Smith played by a plain looking Cecil Kellaway.  Kellaway is married to the sultry blonde Cora played by a bleached Lana Turner.  Garfield takes one look at Turner and the sparks begin to fly.  They gradually fall in love carrying on a steamy affair unbeknown to Nick.  Together they conspire to do away with Nick in a household accident.  Nick survives without suspecting the plot.Garfield, in frustration packs his bags and leaves heading for Los Angeles.  He ultimately can't stay away and gets lured back by Turner's charms.  Upon his arrival, Nick drops a bombshell telling both Garfield and Turner that he's decided to sell the diner.  Nick and Cora are to move to Canada to care for his invalid sister.  Turner feels trapped by this decision and again they plot to do away with Nick.They arrange an automobile accident on a treacherous stretch of road as they all are driving to Santa Barbara to consumate the deal for the diner.  The car is pushed down the side of a cliff after bludgeoning NIck with a liquor bottle, but Garfield is unable to get out of the car and is severely injured.  Unfortunately the suspicious local D.A. Kyle Sackett played by Leon Ames has been tailing them.  He observes Turner climbing up the cliff while clutching her white handbag, making it obvious that the accident was bogus.Sackett coerces a hospitalized Garfield into signing out a complaint against Turner for murder of Nick and attempted murder of himself.  Turner, with the help of slick shyster lawyer Arthur Keats, excellently portrayed by Hume Cronyn, gets off with only a manslaughter charge and no jail time.Garfield and Turner resume a guarded relationship working at the diner which has been fixed up.  They're relationship is filled with mistrust. After a few serious bumps in the road they reconcile when fate intercedes and they both get deserved retribution."The Postman Always Rings Twice" released in 1946 pushed the envelope with it's lurid sexuality in a time of heavy Hollywood censureship.  The code established where bad deeds do not go unpunished was quite apparent in this excellent flic
accurate and fun. Comically captures the 80s zeitgeist while exposing the logistics of MBO's/LBO's better than most business school texts. Highly recommended.
Very good light comedy. This comedy features Cary Grant and Tony Curtis aboard a WW2 submarine that wasn't really seaworthy, but her perpetually optimistic Captain - Cary Grant - refused to accept that and, with the help of a spoiled but cunning requisitions officer- Tony Curtis - is able to patch it together and make it useful to the war effort. The plot is simple, the dialogue isn't complex, the acting isn't fantastic, but you smile throughout most of this film. I believe that was its purpose, and it succeeds
winona ryder's best film to date..... a film about teens plagued with mean spiritedness and revenge on their minds ends up being one of the best films of the 80's. one of the most darkest comedies with envious contempt. evil at its core, yet deliciously irrisistable.the whole cast is sensational, especially ryder, who still says in interviews today, this is personally her favorite film she has done in her career
Probably the Best Drama Series Ever Made. I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out
Using Eastern Philosophy to justify the Slacker lifestyle. Donal Logue (Sean Finnerty of Grounded For Life) plays a heavyweight ladies man who is well read in the classics particularly eastern philosophy which he uses to rationalize his lifestyle. He and his friends divide the world into Steve's (the cool guys) and Stu's (the gomers) and have some witty exchanges around this.Logue's character lives a stoner existence and is having an affair with a friend's wife until he inevitably meets the woman who changes his perspective and he falls in love.This is a very entertaining romantic comedy with several engaging characters and it is beautifully filmed in the Santa Fe area.Logue is believably shallow but still likeable in the lead role
"By preaching destabilization, they encourage subversive ideas.". The film "The Official Story" wraps the politics of government-supported torture and the slaughter of thousands of Argentinians around the awakening of the social conscience of one woman. Alicia (Norma Aleandro) is a married, affluent history teacher who works in a boys' school in Buenos Aires. She and her prominent husband, Roberto (Hector Alterio) have an adopted child, Gaby. When Alicia attends a reunion of school friends, she's delighted to see Ana (Chunchuna Villafane)--a woman who abruptly left the country seven years earlier. The atmosphere at the reunion becomes a bit tense when one woman breezily mentions that someone they all knew only has one child left. When asked what happened to the other children, the woman says--"they were all subversives." While everyone else seems to find this a perfectly reasonable explanation, Alicia is troubled, but there's more troubling information in store.Ana reveals to Alicia that she left Argentina after being horribly tortured by military government officials who were trying to extract information about a man she once knew. Ana was lucky to survive, but she tells Alicia that there were many who didn't--including women who gave birth inside jail and had their babies stolen from them and given to the families of the privileged elite. While Alicia--who's only been vaguely aware of past social unrest--would like to reject the horrific information of her friend's treatment, prompted by her conscience she begins to question if her adopted daughter is a child of "the Disappeared Ones" ("Los Desaparecidos").Alicia's brutish husband (who's outraged Ana is back in Argentina) and frivolous friends believe that torture and disappearances only happen to those who "deserve" it in some fashion. It takes exposure to the brutalities conducted by the state to shake Alicia out of her nice, sanitized, perfect world. As a teacher of history, she believes "by understanding history, we understand the world," but she fails to realize that history is all too often an "official" version.  She's never questioned authority or the "official" versions of the past, and at the beginning of the film, she's flabbergasted when a student argues that, "history is written by assassins."  Slowly, she begins to connect with those around her--including a fellow teacher who explains that Alicia didn't want to believe the horrific truth because to believe murders and tortures were really happening would be to acknowledge "complicity.""The Official Story" is a perfect film on every level. It's incredible to realize that so many people just 'disappeared' in Argentina between 1976-1983, and the film brings home the pain and the horror while making this a very human, moving story. Directed by Luis Puenzo, "The Official Story" is in Spanish with English subtitles--displacedhuma
Heartbreaking and Inspiring. It's hard to believe 20 years have passed since "My Life As A Dog" hit the international circuit and captured the hearts of audiences worldwide.  Here it is again and the story has lost nothing of its relevance. Young, Anton Glanzlius gives a powerful, amazing, unaffected and emotionally enormous portrait of a young boy who's world is falling apart and who learns to cope and accept the new direction life takes him.I could go on and on, but don't need to.  Anyone who has seen this film already knows, and anyone who hasn't seen it, simply must.  One of the best Swedish films I know.  Certainly one of the most loved.
greythorne. great movie about radio stations how they should be, christian slater was a great actor in movie.  (...
Another good CSI:NY. Though CSI:NY is most least favorite of the three CSIs, they still manage to make a good one sometimes.  This is one of those good ones
Michael. A great movie, good actors and actresses.  Good clean fun and a wonderful feeling good all over movie.  A plus for your movie colection and your music collection
Stephen King done right. Based on a short story by horror maestro Stephen King, the Night Flier is a prime example of a Stephen King TV movie done right.  Genre stalwart Miguel Ferrer stars as a sleazy tabloid reporter on the trail of a killer who is using a small plane to travel from small airstrip to airstrip and killing the crews he finds there in a way which suggets that this killer may be a vampire.  Bloody, visceral, and surprisingly smart and faithful to King's story, the Night Flier is King done right, and is a dreadfully underrated horror flick.  The denouement is pure King all the way, and is worth the price of admission alone
Great thing. Recommend for all who is the fan of Transformers. Great thing. Recommend for all who is the fan of Transformer
Great Christmas Family Film!!!. Absolutely fabulous family film with a heartwarming story and suprisingly good acting. Leslie Nielson was wonderful as Santa. My family loved this great Christmas movie
required but oh so enjoyable. I was required to watch and write about this.  At first, i thought booring.  WRONG.  It captivates the audience and presents history in a fascinating way.  The passion that these two felt despite being an arranged marriage, suprised me.  Oh what a pair, full of passion just like the movie
Good if you don't mind minor edits. Finally got around to watching this last night. In this review I'm not going to bother to review the movie itself. It's seventeen years old. I'm sure if you are interested in it you've seen it by now. Rather, I'm going to review the technical quality of the film and the extras provided on the DVD. One thing that feel I should point out up front is that the movie HAS been edited, but only in one scene. The infamous 'clergyman sporting an erection' that caused such a stupid flundie flap has been photoshopped. The theatrical poster artwork is not on the cover or anywhere on the disc for a similar reason. You can find out more by going to Snopes and looking in the Disney films section. I personally don't care, but some people do. Now, on to the review.This version is widescreen, but it's 16:9 widescreen and not theatrical widescreen, but this has been the case in pretty much all the Disney movie DVDs so no surprises there. The Little Mermaid was the next to last movie Disney did using painted cels, and the film has gone through some kind of digital restoration process. There are comparison shots on the back of the DVD box that show the difference. The colors are very vibrant, and I didn't notice any problems with the encoding or animation. There is support for surround sound and audio tracks in English, French, and Spanish.It's a two disk set. Disc one has the movie, the configuration options (subtitles, commentary, language ect), a music video of the song 'Kiss the Girl' by someone I've never heard of, a bunch of previews that will be outdated in a few months, and a preview of what's on disc 2. On the box it touts something called Fast Play, which basically means when you load it in, after the standard FBI warnings and all that, the disc gives you the option of immediately starting the movie or going to the menu with the stuff I just mentioned. If you choose to start the movie directly, it plays a bunch of previews that you can skip past using chapter forward on your remote, if you go to the menu and pick play movie, it starts right away. You're actually not forced to sit through ten minutes of BS previews with no way to skip them like on some of the previous Disney DVDs. I approve.The majority of the extras are on disc 2. It's broken up into three major sections: Backstage Disney, Deleted Scenes, and Games. Backstage Disney is the largest section. It has scads of concept art (imagine Ursula as a lionfish or manta ray instead of an octopus), a videos on how the movie was made, and a new animated short, The Little Match Girl. A silent film with a musical background and is amazingly enough, actually true to the story. It's pretty well done, IMHO. Deleted scenes is just that, stuff that was cut. There really isn't much. Only three selections, and two of them are just pieces that were cut from scenes that did make it in. There's an expanded version of the opening song, a very short scene where Triton's daughters tell Sebastian that Ariel isn't at the recital before it starts, and an extra verse in Ursula's song. All of these were cut before the final animation was done, and so as you watch it switches back and forth between storyboard still shots and very rough sketchy animation. The games I didn't even bother with, because has there ever been a DVD player game that hasn't totally sucked? Didn't think so.Overall, it's going to boil down to how much you like the movie, and how much you hate minor edits. If not seeing Jessica Rabbit with no underwear for three frames bothered you, then this DVD is not for you. Otherwise, it is a comprehensive look at the movie that marked the beginning of Disney's second golden age.I give it 9 out of 10 voice containing seashells
Good. I saw this in an extension film class at UCI, and James Gray talked to the class after it was shown. This being a dark movie, it was slightly surprising that he was very light-hearted, and witty, and good-humored. I thought the movie first rate. It is intelligent and well-written and well-directed. The only flaw I found in it is there is a scene where a bullet is shot through a hanging sheet. The camera pans to the hole in the sheet to show the dead body on the other side. Well, for the hole to accomodate the camera, it had to be as wide as a hole a baseball would go through. A bullet would never make a hole that big! So that marred the movie slightly. But other than that, I liked it a lot. It is dark, and a lot of people in the class didn't like it because of that. But if you like dark, check this out
Oscar nominated screen play, should have won. I give the film four stars only because of the very soft picture. Otherwise, it would earn a resounding five stars. I have been waiting a long time for this film to be on DVD, but to find that they are insulting Robert Ryan again by providing poor quality DVDs of many of his films now on DVD. Most recent example in Billy Budd, which I also have been waiting to be on DVD for eons. Both The Naked Spur and Billy Budd should have been given first class treatment. Naked is only marginally superious to the VHS due to the soft picture (Mann's other Westerns have been transferred better). MY VHS copy of Billy Budd is superior to the DVD. I definitely won't buy the DVD. Another reviewer mentioned that a few minutes of Billy Budd were deleted in order to fit it on the DVD. I wonder which scenes they were.As for The Naked Spur, it is another Ryan masterpiece in engendering some degree of audience sympathy for an essentially psychopathic personality. It is amazing how an actor such as Ryan can interpret malevolence so well, yet be a peace activist in real life. When Ryan's Ben Vandergroat cooly murders Jesse Tate, his deep seated cold bloodedness, which has only been talked about up to that point in the film, occurs at the moment when Ben kills Jesse. Ryan's final line to Janet Leigh as he lays in ambush for James Stewart and Ralph Meeker encapsulates his situation:"Pretty soon Roy and your friend Howie are gonna show up. Then I'll get me some more insurance against dying young.
A love story that makes you think. The last scene when He says don't worry and She says so your the Quarter back is great, they say do I know you. You just have to wonder do we really have soul mates? A very special movie for couples in Love
my brother's favorite movie. My brother, Henry, always said this was his favorite movie. He loved film noir...(although I didn't know what that was at the time) and, of course, he loved Richard Widmark in his role. Looking back, Widmark should have gotten the Academy Award for Best Suppporting Actor for this (he was nominated) but there are many Oscar "should'ves". If you like prison/gangster movies, classic film noir, Richard Widmark, Victor Mature and, of course, Brian Dunleavy, you've gotta see/own this...if you havn't/don't already
A Movie Filled with Universal Truths. Even with a small budget, Spike Lee can still get a lot done and still find great actors.  Spike Lee's "School Daze" is probably his best flim standing next to "Malcomb X" respectively.  The movie was released in 1988, 10 years before I even entered college, and all of issue that disrupted and seperated the black student body then, were still at the forefront when I went to college.  Every character can be found somewhere on your college campus now whether you are at an HBCU or not.  The movie is filled with many memorable scenes and will leave you with a feeling of belonging to one group or the other: either a black-frat-cat or a black conseious community builder.  The movie also embodies Spike Lee's theatrical style that depicts the black culture of the time, talks about its issues, and in turn influences its future.  For example, this movie influend late 80's and early 90's Hip-Hop music, the way we dressed and how we thought about HBCU's.  As a matter of fact, southern HBCU's had a enormous growth in enrollment from blacks across the country after this movie was realeased in '88 and the ever so popular "FreakNeak" in Atlanta, GA was born out of this movie.  It's a must see for any person wanting to know more about college life for black students.  A great movie
wow. i loved this movie it is great funny the animation war great great for every on
Harlem a jungle inside a city!. Harlem is the sinister landscape where every man has to survive according his basic insticts. There's no time for redemption, there's no way out for your elusive dreams, in many ways this film is very close in spirit to Carlito's way where any man can be able to escape from his past.This movie is a potent Noir, but viewed from the opposite side of the street. If Spike Lee captured all our attention about the strong tension among Italian and niggers Empire about the distribution and sell of angel's dust and other candies, the film gets out from the simple anecdote and returns over and over about the fatality that hovers all this family, mother and father have been destroyed and two brothers build an Empire from the ashes of the fatal addictions.Superbly narrated, marvelously acted with fluid camera work and firm direction.Highly recommended.
Brilliant!. I loved this movie. Never played the game but the movie is great. Aside from the fact it doesn't rate like Star Wars etc. It's good in it's own way. I can watch it over and over and never get fed up with it. Too many people comparing it without seeing it for what it is. Just like the new Battlstar  Galactica and the old one. Old one was good in it's day but new one is better in all classes!  Anyway, I think it's great.!
Holy Nostalgia!. I had the pleasure of watching this movie -- and the accompanying TV series -- in two different, but equally enjoyable, phases: First, as a 4th grader when they were first released in the 60s -- when I took them at face value as super hero adventure stories; and later, as an adult, reveling in the campy humor and the droll, dead-pan delivery of Adam West. This is a very corny movie -- but in a good way! Lots of fun. I especially enjoyed watching it while listening to the commentary by West and Burt Ward.And by the way, I'm not a kid any more -- but I still want that Batmobile in my garage, and want to take the Bat Boat out for a high-speed run on Lake Grapevine
Totally entertaining, mind-expanding scifi spectacle. &quot;Galaxy Being&quot; is the superb, seminal episode of the original Outer Limits, and it still packs quite a unique wallop today--indeed all the more so by contrast with the dismal state of contemporary scifi cinema. This is a towering, all-time great portrayal of the human encounter with the alien, who is at once intelligent, wise, noble, confused and stressed-out. His final, stern lecture to the foolish, frightened earthlings who in their ignorance would destroy him, puts this film into the same class as &quot;Day the Earth Stood Still&quot;, one of OL's most important thematic forerunners. But then, in a brilliant stroke, there is a strong and daring infusion of emergent parallels between the rational and the non-rational, between recent discoveries of science and ancient, intuitive, mystical teachings--way ahead of its time in 1963. Another profound theme, embodied in both the alien and the Cliff Robertson character, is the courage of the individual who would seek to investigate the unknown, against the pressures of brain-washed society to conform, and all the efforts of authorities to keep humanity subservient and under control. Should these loner, visionary scientist types who break the rules in their quest for knowledge be careful what they're fooling around with? Of course; and yet, its often by mistakes that we learn the most and advance furthest as a species. The special effects are stylish and riveting, especially the design and imaging of the alien itself, which has few comparisons. The human/alien relationship is mirrored as well by the maritally troubled husband/wife couple, who have their own differences to overcome. The lame gender stereotypes of today's pathetic, post-Cameron/Hurd scifi offerings (i.e., the men as wimps or swaggering macho idiots and foils for the obligatorily smarter, stronger, wiser but good looking female lead) are nowhere to be seen, so you might not like this if you require that kind of shallow, formulaic content. The focus here, setting the tone for the whole series, is on the timeless and recurring themes of human existence, the quest for meaning, the finding of the self in the other, transcendence versus domination, the triumph of the human spirit and hope. Outer Limits is the Shakespeare of TV/cinematic scifi, and will admirably withstand the test of time. By the way, there is one unintentionally diverting moment here to watch for which I've got to mention, because I've never seen it commented upon elsewhere. It involves quite a double handful that Cliff Robertson gets hold of in the last act. How did that get by ABC's watchful eye
A Haunting Masterpiece. A truly dark,mezmorising & compelling film,Overflowing with atmosphere,sprinkled with humor & layered with thought provoking content. Ingmar Bergman's "The Seventh Seal"(1958) is the definition of masterful film making. An eerie unsettling dream-like or nightmarish crawl through a pitch black tunnel with only a single grain of light at the end. This one stays with you whether you like it or not. A must for the true lover of cinema!
The Undefeated. I enjoyed this movie, a great group of actor's. A little taste of history, and beautiful country scenes through out. It takes you there
Revenge of the Anti-Sith. The spiritual opposite of "Star Wars III - Revenge of the Sith." Transcends sci-fi genre with a focused look at the essence of warriorhood, and what is sacrificed to create a "perfect killer."  The evolution of the Kurt Russell character is a touching transformation from a souless Storm Trooper to a true citizen soldier in the ideal American tradition. But there's nothing textbook preachy about it.  A lot of visual flash and pizzaz, considerable tension, and unpredictable twists because things could easily go either way, including the ending.
Haunting...Tragic...Intense. I remember seeing this film years ago on , I think , Masterpiece Theatre and wondering at Ralph Fienne's hypnotic, erotic, passionate portrayal of the tortured, manipulative, vindictive Heathcliff. Last night, I found myself watching bits of it on "YouTube" and fell in love all over again. Impulsive girl that I am, I immediately came here to amazon and bought the dvd. To me, there is no finer character in literature than Heathcliff and there is no more powerful study of the devastating effects of romantic love than Wuthering Heights. This film does justice to both
MOST EXCELLENT MOVIE EVER. This item is a MUST have for all transformer fans out there !! Not only will you get a EXCELLENT 3D poster + 2 DVDs on Transfomers the movie BUT all the extras. This item is EPIC size in terms of value !!!!
Beautiful Film. Most likely this review will not be very helpful to anyone, but I wanted to comment on how beautifully done this film is.  I am a long time U2 fan and had seen Rattle and Hum, but didn't get around to purchasing the DVD until late 2005.  The fact that the music is wonderful is a given, but the cinematography is just astounding.  I love how you get to see everything from every point of view.  You get to see what the band sees on and around the stage, including the breathtaking sea of fans.  You get to see what the fans see -- the spectacular lighting and silhouettes.  You get to hear what the guys think and feel off-stage as well as on.  And of course you get the passionate music.  The film is as beautiful to watch as it is to listen to.  I couldn't ask for more
DVD Instinct. Absolutely great!  I have it on video and replaced the video with DVD.Anthony Hopkins and Cuba Gooding, Jr. are definately two of my most favorite actors.Dee MoffatPort Angeles, W
This deserves to be enshrined among the classics!. This was a story which I had read as a child, and, unfortunately, forgotten about.  Someone recently mentioned it, and I could only recall something about a Toad and a motor-car.  I also remembered that I had very much enjoyed reading about the Toad and the motor-car when I was younger, so I decided to re-read it.  I was very pleasantly surprised to find that I not only still enjoyed the Toad and and the motor-car, but also his friends, Rat, Mole, and Badger, which I had previosly forgotten.  Grahame strangely mixes animal life with human life, but he pulls it off very well, and produces an extraordinary land where animals and humans co-exist as (mostly) equals, almost like in C.S. Lewis' Narnian Chronicles , but not quite, since the animals wear clothes.  It actually very much reminded me of C. S. Lewis' very obscure work, Boxen, which he created as a child.  A land where animals wore suits and lived as humans. Grahame's is, of course, far better, and is a joy to read for both young and old.  I highly recommend this book
MY LEFT FOOT - A Must See for All. There are so many wonderful reviews already written here. I will only say that if you happen to be a person who saw this film way back when it was first released, please do yourself a favor and watch it again.  I think it takes some maturity to really appreciate all that is given in this inspiring true story.  Daniel Day-Lewis is probably the best actor we have had in the last 25 years.  When you realize how he approaches his craft and really lives his roles and becomes a part of the person he depicts, it is amazing to see the portrayals Mr. Day-Lewis presents in any and all of his films.  Again, I didn't appreciate this film as I should have the first time I saw it and am so glad I picked it up and watched it again.  I will continue to watch it from time to time because it offers so much with regard to the human spirit and loving protection and support in this family.  Please take time and really watch this again.  You forget Daniel Day-Lewis is acting.  What a talent!!
The beginning of Feature Documentary Filmmakin. This is a glimpse into an amazing way of life which, for the most part, no longer exists.  The Filmmaker was an explorer before he became a filmmaker, so great care is taken to tell these people's story, through the example of one main character: Nanook, the Bear.  I was pleased at how well this work has been preserved and transfered to the new medium of DVD.  If you are interested in the Arctic region, Anthropology, History, or even great Adventure, you will enjoy Nanook of the North
Probably the Best Drama Series Ever Made. I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out
Getting with the Jungle Rhythm. Hi everyone!  I hope everyone is doing well!  I LOVED this movie and there are several reasons why.  Before I go into them, let me give you a brief summary of the film.The Plot:This movie takes place about a month or two after the original one ended.  Mowgli has been adopted by a nice family and has a new little brother, Ranjan, who idolizes Mowgli for his life spent in the jungle. The movie opens up with Mowgli telling his new family and new best friend, Shanti, about his former life in the jungle through a puppet show.  As he gets to the part where he fought Shere Khan, the ferocious tiger, Ranjan decides to put his own twist on the story and in doing so, manages to destroy the set and embarrass Shanti in the process.  Ranjan's comment that, "Shanti blinked her big, beautiful, brown eyes at you.  And you follow her into our village,"  prompts Shanti to turn red and deny she did anything of the sort.  This prompts a little argument between Mowgli and Shanti, forcing Mowgli's father to break it up by revealing that his wife used the same trick on him.  Shanti then makes fun of Mowgli before leaving and Mowgli tells Shanti to "watch out for Shere Khan on your way home."  Shanti dismisses his warning by retorting that,  "You and your stories. Everyone knows tigers don't come into the village."  With that, she leaves.  But Mowgli soon finds that his theory is right when Shere Khan comes back, seeking revenge against Mowgli for what Mowgli did to him.Meanwhile, Mowgli still misses his jungle friends and they miss him.  Baloo, especially.  Baloo wants to bring Mowgli back to the jungle, but Bagheera won't hear it.  He tells Baloo that Mowgli belongs with his own kind.  Baloo disagrees and sneaks off to visit Mowgli.  Meanwhile back in the village, Mowgli and Ranjan spend their day teasing Shanti and playing on her fear of the jungle and especially of tigers.  But Shanti's fear is tested when Baloo is successful in whisking Mowgli back to the jungle and Shanti must save him.  She is accompanied by Ranjan who wants to find Mowgli too.  They encounter Kaa, who is searching for a snack and almost has one, but Ranjan stops him right when he is about to eat Shanti by hitting the snake over the head with a stick.  Mowgli and Shanti are soon reunited again and must face Shere Khan together.  The movie ends on a good note and not only does Shanti face her fear, but Mowgli is able to have the best of both worlds.  He is able to visit his jungle friends and remain in the village with his family and Shanti, who he discovers he cares for-a lot.The Music:This movie had some good songs and even though the Bear Necessities was reprised three times, it was still a good song for the movie.  There are also two new songs that add to the movie's greatness as well.  "The Jungle Rhythm", which is sung by Mowgli and his new friends in the village.  This song is one of my favorites because it's really catchy and really jazzy.  Mowgli sings this song to show Shanti, Ranjan and his other new friends just how happening the jungle life is.  His plan almost succeeds until Shanti sees what he's trying to do and gets him grounded by accident.  The other new song is "W-Y-L-D", which is sung by Baloo and several animals in the jungle.  This song is not one of my favorites, only because I liked "I Wanna Be Like You" a lot more.  Other than that, the instrumental score was really an attention grabber.  And I also enjoyed the first and last version of "The Bear Necessities".Musical Extras:The DVD also has some deleted songs that you can enjoy too.  The first song is called "I've Got You Beat".  This song was originally done by Mowgli and Shanti as a sort of competition to see what was better.  The jungle life or life in the village.  Although I didn't' like the version the DVD showed, I LOVE the version on the soundtrack.  The other song which is one of my absolute favorites is called "Braver".  It was supposed to be in the movie, but it never made it in because the producers and writers of the movie thought the song would give too much away of Shanti.  In my opinion, I think they made a huge mistake in not putting this song into the movie.  It's on the soundtrack, but I like the deleted version on the DVD a whole lot better.  I guess it's because I LOVE Shanti and she is my favorite character next to Mowgli, and Bagheera.  I love the way they developed her character and I really think Mae Whitman brings Shanti to life and she portrays her very well.  The reason I think "Braver" should have been in the movie is because it's a really pretty song and Shanti has a very pretty singing voice.  The other reason is that it showed how much Shanti was willing to risk for Mowgli.  She was willing to risk her fear to find him, which I think is a perfect example of what friendship really is.The humor in this movie was easy to see too.  The humorous parts for me were when Kaa, the snake, kept getting beat up.  But my favorite Kaa scene was where Ranjan hits him over the head when he is trying to eat Shanti.  And then after Shanti snaps out of her trance and tells Ranjan to stop, he gives Kaa another whack before doing as Shanti says!  I find that totally hilarious!  The other thing I really liked about the movie was the one liners between Shanti and Mowgli.  I especially love the scene where Mowgli makes Shanti fall into the river and drop her water jug.  The look on her face and the way she growled at him was priceless!In conclusion I really think anyone who has seen Jungle Book, should really pick up this movie.  It's a really good one and I even think it's better than the original.  So get with the Jungle Rhythm and join Mowgli, Shanti, Ranjan, Baloo, Bagheera, Kaa, Shere Khan and all their friends for another adventure full of humor, friendship and learning where you belong.Favorite Scene:Mowgli (to Shanti):  Well, keep your eyes and ears open and always watch your back, or the last sound you'll hear is...  (Ranjan jumps out of the bushes and roars.  Shanti screams and falls into the river, dropping her water jug.)  When does the tiger roar?Shanti:  You're horrible!  Horrible, stinky boys!  Come on, Ranjan.  He's a bad influence.  (They walk into the village.)  Now, don't move. That wasn't very nice you know.(Ranjan growls like a tiger.)Shanti:  Stop that!  You're not a jungle boy.Ranjan:  Why are you so ascared of the jungle?Shanti:  Because it's dangerous.Ranjan:  Dangerwis?  But Mowgli says...Shanti:  You shouldn't listen to everything Mowgli says.Ranjan:  But I thought you like Mowgli.Shanti:  I do.  I-I like Mowgli.  I...I...  (She turns around to see Mowgli standing there.)Mowgli:  You left this at the river.  (Hands Shanti her water jug back.)Shanti:  Thank you.Ranjan:  She's in a bad mood.Mowgli:  Hey, Ranjan, want to see a little trick I learned in the jungle?(Ranjan nods and Mowgli lassos some fruit down off a tree.)Ranjan:  That's a pretty neat trick.Shanti:  Well, here's a little trick I learned, right here at home.(She does the same thing, but manages to get the whole lot of fruit down.)Ranjan:  Wow!  That's a neater trick!Shanti:  Like I said, Ranjan, don't listen to him.
"Into the Night". I owned this film on VHS for years, and when it mysteriously disappeared I ordered it on DVD.  It's a sort of cult film with an amazing array of cameos and is one of my favorites.  It's quite violent in spots, but I like the story, and Michelle Pfeiffer and Jeff Goldblum are excellent.  I loved the ending, which I won't spoil for you.  Simply put, if you like a good suspenseful yarn with a lot of action, you'll love it, too
Mock On!. More than 20 years old now and a little dated, Spinal Tap is still loads of fun with the "mockumentary" gang including Christopher Guest and Michael McKean (who did the delightful "Best in Show" in 2000).  Every aspect of `60s and `70s rock music is lampooned.  Surprisingly, director/interviewer Rob Reiner comes off a little flat--but maybe that's just to help highlight the rest of the delightfully dim cast of characters.  "Big Bottom" (a sendup of "Fat Bottomed Girls"--one of my politically incorrect favorites), the "sophisticated" "Sex Farm", and the controversial "Smell the Glove" (ultimately released as Tap's "Black Album") are among "Tap's" big hits.
It can happen!. Probably one of Steve McQueens greatest movies. Only this one can happen
Teenager vs Goblin King. A young girl is tired of her stepmother and her new baby half-brother.  But when she makes a comment that she wants the Goblin King to take her brother, it really happens.  She is visited by the King (David Bowie) and learns that if she can get to his castle at the center of the labyrinth in thirteen hours, she will have the chance to get her brother back.  She starts out and quickly learns that things are very different and that things are not fair.  But ,fair or not, she needs to learn how to be unfair as well in order to penetrate the labyrinth.Along the way she meets strange characters and befriends a few.  all the while the Goblin King is doing what he can to impede her.  Traps and spells are laid and if she falls to any of them she will lose and her brother will become a goblin.  In the end we get a good strong message about not giving up on our dreams.With a script by Terry Jones, designs by Brian Froud and Jim Henson in charge of it all, you just know this is going to be something special and unique.  The film starts mundanely but quickly progresses to huge amounts of puppets and fabulous effects.  The characters are very memorable although I felt Bowie could have done without the blonde Elvira-wig.  Still, it have been a very rewatchable film that I have seen in the theater, on video, and now on widescreen DVD.  A fun film that is safe and appealing to almost all ages.  Check it out
Wonderful movie for children and adults. Regardless to what rubbish is usually written about this movie, it is aimed at the younger audience and I can say with much assurance that it is a wonderful movie for my three year old son and my two year old nephews.  I have family that bring their children over and when they watch this movie, they want copies of their own.  I don't think I've ever heard a child complain about the animation or special effects of this movie.  Kids just don't care what adults think about the shows they like, they are interested in the entertainment value of it.  So this movie is wonderful and entertaining with a hint of some life lessons that we could all use.
The Ageless Summer. It was a fantastic movie when it was first released and it is still just as good. Great photography, good narrative. Makes me long for the summer days I used to spend on the beach at Santa Cruz
BIG LOW-BROW LAUGHS!. This movie is hilarious. Danny Devito is a thug with Hollywood dreams, and his mob-ties make them all come true. Just imagine the endless possabilities! Absolutely stupid-funny!
Perfect prelude to the Terminator series!!!!. I would recommend anyone getting into the Terminator series should see this movie first.  Colossus - The Forbin Project demonstrates how computers and machines take over the world and for humanities first struggle to become free.  Very good plot and detail
A must for any Manson fan. This video features all of the Marilyn Manson music videos from Portrait Of An American Family to Mechanical Animals. Plus some extra concert footage. My favorite video off MA is &quot;Coma White&quot; which is a reenactment of the JFK Assassinations. &quot;Long Hard Road Out Of Hell&quot; which was featured on the Spawn Soundtrack features Manson nude! The videos off &quot;Antichrist Superstar&quot; are very eye-catching. &quot;Man That You Fear&quot; and &quot;The Beautiful People&quot; are my favorites. &quot;Sweet Dreams&quot; shows Manson and the band in a dilapidated house. &quot;Dope Hat&quot; is my favorite video because it's basically a really demented version of Willy Wonka &amp; The Chocolate Factory. &quot;Lunchbox&quot; is an old video which shows the band playing in a roller-rink. The concert footage is a real treat too. I hope they re-release this on DVD with videos from &quot;Holy Wood&quot; and &quot;Golden Age Of Grotesque&quot; added to it
A Welcome DVD. I've been looking forward to the DVD version of this film for ages. It's funny, and goes against form in showing the "heartless" capitalist as a moral, likable person. The proxy battle scene is one of my favorites in all of film, with Gregory Peck and Devito forcefully advocating different views on the purpose of a company.I will go against popular opinion and say it is strange that Devito's character falls madly in love with Penelope Miller's character. She does a lousy job playing a sexy street-smart lawyer, and all the revealing dresses in the world couldn't cover that ineptitude. Thus the 4 star review.The DVD is a pleasant surprise. The wide screen reveals what the cinematographer was going for with the short, stocky Devito strutting across the screen. It's both comic and adds to the character seeing a little man who walks like a giant. I saw this movie on my new Dell LCD monitor and the colors are deep and beautiful, with no noticeable dirt on the print: an excellent transfer for an obscure movie. Nothing special in the way of special features, but what do you expect
Who didnt get choked up?. When powder shows a father and son how to put away their differences, remember how much they really loved each other and helped them come together as father and son.Seeing the two embracing, powder cant help but to hold onto a pole with tears running down his face, wishing it were him and his father...Powder allows us to use him and abuse him, just as he says "How long do you think i will allow you to keep me here?" Its knowing that he can leave anytime he chooses, but stays behind because he so loves the human race that Powder takes the abuse just for the chance of contact with another being...As special as he is, he sees us as the greatest living force in the universe, while we see each other as evil and useless...This movie, if seen with an open mind can teach us all something that we may never fully accept...
Classic 80's movie - I LOVE it :-). I still love this movie.  I don't watch it all the time, but occasionally I love to take a trip down memory lane and watch this classic comedy.  It's so cool.  Corey Haim wants his license, doesn't pass the test, but still takes the car out to go on a date with his dream girl.  You can imagine the trouble he gets himself into.  It's one of the movies he teamed up with the other Corey and it's their best together.  It's so funny - even though now, some of the humour is a little dated.  But it has that great 80's feel.  I wished they made movies like this again today.  Anyway, you have to watch this.  It's also got the great Carol Kane (who is so funny) staring in this as Haims mother.  Watch the special at the end and see how the guys look today and hear what they said about what was going on during the making of this film.  I'd give this 10 stars if I could
Reality with humor. I love love this movie.  The thought of pulling a huge trailer like this on a narrow mountain road with a car is as white knuckle as the expressions on Lucy and Desi's faces imply.  My father sold and hauled these things in the 50's and 60's and the writers must have talked to him when they wrote this.  It really WAS as "interesting" as portrayed.  And as much fun, at times.  I love the mountain scene when they try to get around those curves with that big honkin' thing.  Brought back some very special but tense, memories.  Buy this movie because it's a wonderful time for the whole family.  This is the best.
Top ten comedies. Housesitter has been a favorite of mine for years!  It's hilarious how Goldie Hawn keeps digging a hole for herself, deeper and deeper, and she still comes out on top in every situation.  Steve Martin is incredible!  If you liked him in Roxanne....get that popcorn ready.... you are in for another treat
Compulsively Watchable...If you have the stomach for it. This movie is chockfull. Among my favorites parts are a very visual description of Sepsis, and a painting on the wall of an Iraqi bunker, featuring a portrait of Saddam in cap and gown.When I say it's chockfull, I mean it's coming out of the goddamn walls. Lots of details. Most of the time it's just flat-out top-notch filmmaking, smart and brand-new in a way seldom seen.And while it's balls-out style is the best thing about the movie, it's also it's main problem. A little too overdone. As an example, the set-up for the scene of Ice Cube tossing his C4 Nerf football was done so overtly, David O. Russel might as well have told us the scene number.But in the end, the film's message, never desert your friends, no matter what nationality, however heavy-handedly it may be have been delivered, is still a potent one.And watching it now, with all of its references to the First Iraq war, the first George Bush, brings that message, and all its attendant moral confusion, into harsh focus.
Visually Stunning. I'm a non-skier, and I found the photography beautiful.  The skier in the family loved seeing the different mountains around the world and loved the element of danger
My Neighbor Totoro- More of a dear friend. This is an excellent movie for all ages! Get it now.Experience the magic. Wonderful story, acting, and attitude sets this movie from all others
Classic. This is a classic for any hardcore skier or random Gen Xer.  I remember my friend RENTED A VCR so we could watch it.  Many, many classic lines in here, and gratuitous nudity galore
"Andersonville Will Keep You Glued To The screen!. "Andersonville" is an intense drama about a Civil War prison camp for captured Union soldiers.  The camp is a huge stockade, built for 5,000 prisoners of war, but is filled to overcrowding with 8,000 Union POW's, and more arriving daily.  The conditions are horrible beyond words, virtually no food, no sanitation, clothing in rags and tatters, no shelter from the rain, gangs rampaging through the camp, rampant disease, a hundred men dying a day - a literal hell on earth.  Puported to be historical fact, the story centers on a brigade from Massachusetts and their struggle to survive, and what a horrendous struggle it is.  Other reviewers have stated that the story is not entirely truthful. Due to the shortage of critical supplies in the south, I do not doubt that the deporable conditions existed exactly as depicted in the movie. I cannot comment on other issues as I have not read the book that the movie is based on.  Truthful or not, the film is absolutely riveting! You will be shocked by the condition of the men, the violence in the camp, the slow agony of starvation, and the inevitable deline in the men, both physically and spiritually.The film has no well-known "star" actors, but even so, the various actors perform marvelously.  Their characterizations are as real as if they were really in the camp and suffering unto death.This film was an eye-opener for me, for I never considered the fate of Civil War POW's.  I will remember the conditions the men lived and died in for the rest of my life. I recommend it without reservation.Jim "Konedog" Koeni
Dated? Sure.  Boring?  No way!. I watched this with my 6 year old daughter last night.  She was into it (with her short attention span) for the whole film.  One pleasant surprise...it has a pretty good chase scene.  I like chase scenes.    Any SF fan will welcome this in his/her collection.A few good comic shots.  Watch Richard Benjamin struggle to get into the saddle during the Jail break.
Explains a Great Deal. I read Uncle Tom's Cabin a few years ago, and was genuinely touched. I saw immediately why it became one of the most influential books in the history of our country, and possibly the world. The story of Uncle Tom is sure to leave you changed, whether you are black or white, racist or humanitarian. It really explains how different people viewed the institution of slavery. After reading this book, many die-hard proponents of slavery gave up defending it. And abollitionists were fired up more than ever before. If you read only 5 books this year, let Uncle Tom's Cabin be one of them. You'll never look at slavery, US history, or the plight of black people the same
Khartoum in Cinerama. 1966's Khartoum is an all star Cinerama achievement, based on the true story of the British Sudan set during the early to mid-1880's. Beautifully and epically filmed in three locations in Egypt, plus in London.See this breathtaking Cinerama motion picture the way it was meant to be watched - in widescreen, coupled with today's crisp stereo surround sound.The movie is based on a very important historical confrontation between Victorian English General Charles 'Chinese' Gordon, played by Charlton Heston, and a radical Muslim warlord who believed himself to be Islamic 'Mahdi' or 'The Expected One', played by the marvelously well cast English actor, Laurence Olivier. The Mahdi declares a total jihad against all infidels (sounds like today).Ironically the current Islamic dictatorship of OPEC's Iran have publicly stated they are attempting to provoke the 'return of the Mahdi' so he can 'assist the Muslims in destroying the infidels'. History does indeed repeat itself.Some of the other exceptional cast members include:Richard Johnson	 ... 	Col. J.D.H. StewartRalph Richardson ... 	William GladstoneAlexander Knox	... 	Sir Evelyn BaringJohnny Sekka	... 	KhaleelMichael Hordern	... 	Lord GranvilleZia Mohyeddin	... 	Zobeir PashaMarne Maitland	... 	Sheikh OsmanNigel Green	... 	Gen. WolseleyPeter Arne	... 	Maj. KitchenerOscar nominated English composer Frank Cordell's rousing musical score will pleasingly linger after viewing the this exceptional film.Khartoum -- where the Nile divides, the great Cinerama adventure begins
FAVORITE EPISODE. IT WAS ONE OF MY FAVORITE EPISODES A WAY TO GET BUFFY AND ANGEL TOGETHER WITHOUT CHANGING THE STORYLINE. AND THE CHARACTERS WHERE ABLE TO EXPRESS HOW THEY FELT TO EACH OTHER
Classically Chilling. This isn't Breakfast at Tiffany's.  Neither is it Nightmare on Elm St.  But Wait Until Dark, starring Audrey Hepburn, is truly chilling.  Hepburn plays a blind lady who, through the circumstances of the plot, is pitted against a dangerous criminal and his two henchmen.  She slowly realizes she is in danger and, after smashing the lights in to level the playing field, must struggle for her life in her apartment.  More along the lines of a thriller like Pyscho than a horror film, Wait Until Dark is scary, but classy
"Reciprocity Mr. Hutchins.. Is the Key to Every Relationship".. Anytime I think of this movie, I think of this brutally truthful line.. James Cromwell's Captain Dudley Smith is completely convincing as the tough as nails Irish cop that did things the old way.. You can just visualize this huge man cracking heads when he was younger..This movie deserves to be placed along side the great noir classics, such as Chinatown, Sunset Boulevard, Dark Passage, and Stalag 17.. And it was, definitely, the best movie of 1997.
Both Gritty and Delicate. It's easy to dismiss the residents of the seedier addresses of our culture.  But the "Blue Iguana" makes us look behind the pasties, not to just the flesh, but to the real stories of these women.  Whether caustic and hard, crippled and soft, or just plain exhausted, Blue Iguana skillfully pulls us into places we might not otherwise go, and shows us how much we DON'T see. Most notable are Jennifer Tilly, (who is in my opinion the 21st century's Marilyn Monroe), and Sandra Oh.  Oh delivers a breathtaking and heartbreaking performance as Jasmine, an intelligent and talented poet who dances because the money's better than waitressing.  While it's definitely easier to believe the somewhat stereotypical Darryl Hannah character(Angel, the deadly gorgeous but warm-hearted dingbat), Jasmine embodies the range of possibilities for each of the characters, and for all of us.  Without apology or fear, this is a terrific portrait of woman's resiliency, courage and spirit
"Goodness has so little fictional value". I love films which unfold complexities slowly, that use color with deep intention, and don't rely on words to say everything that must be said.The End of the Affair is a lovingly and carefully adapted film. To fit into time, I feel that you must allow a film like this to stand on its own. Many adjustments were made to the story, and what eventually emmerges is, to me, even more cohesive and personal.One thing I particularly love about The End of the Affair, is the color pallette and sharp attention to clothing. I love Sarah's red suits, her green jacket, her hair (carefully suited to the time), and the way the colors stand out, but with subtlety, from every scene that she stands in until her character begins to fade.This movie permanently affected my aesthetic sensibilities.The *most* affecting aspect of the movie for me however, was being able to deeply relate to the character of Sarah, as I think many people can. Most of us have our superstitions, even when we work to keep them subdued, and certainly a seemingly "miraculous experience," or great trauma (they usually go together don't they?) can bring those things to the surface.I thought that the Bendrix and Henry dynamic that played out in the film was fascinating. It created a contrast between two ways of living really: One figure, content to live on a straight line, climbing little by little with bits of satisfaction but no passion, and the other all passion and anger and intensity. Henry, in a way, created the passion Sarah felt for Maurice. He bottled her up and placed her on a shelf where she simmered, and I think the "vulgar sex scenes" as some called them, are extraordinarily necessary if you want to understand the emotions going on.Then again, Sarah's religious devotion followed her commitment to Henry, which before the vow she seemed to have no intention of lessening, so you also see that she was more than the sensual person that she was with Maurice, she was also the practical wife. Neither was a role she was playing.Every central character in this film, is a dichotomy, and more than that, they are wonderfully and spectacularly flawed, which certainly is the core of Graham Greene's insightful and philosophic writing.This is a labrynth of a film, rich in unanswerable questions, and contains the most brilliant use of perspective that I have ever seen. If you, like me, like to watch a good film several times, I recommend listening to Neil Jordan's commentary along with at least one viewing, then watching it again.-Stephanie
Great personal training in a video!. Very easy to follow. Slow, precise movements. Go through all the weight lifting exercises and repitions with Cory Everson. I feel fantastic after the workout. It motivates me to make healthy meal choices throughout the rest of the day because I focus more on what my muscles need to perform and grow, rather than what my emotions want me to devour. I am seeing definition in my shoulders and arms. Highly recommended for the home gym
MOSTLY A GREAT ARTIST. It's a common fact that great artists often make poor human beings, unable to connect with real life in a decent way.It was certainly the case with PABLO PICASSO and we knew that before this movie was made.The film seems to say that he only loved women for the sake of his art.Being SPANISH, he was a latin man with a deep inclinaison towards his own ego.His control over the people he knew really destroy them in many ways.While it is a work of fiction, the performances keeps it interesting ,even if we don't have to take it all too seriously
IT'S MY FAVORITE MOVIE. This movie is my all time favorite movie.  The cast is awesome, you really feel the pain and anguish in Amalia (played by Lee Grant) as she struggles to deal with the last day of her son's life.  This movie reminds you that its important to never leave issues with others unresolved.  I love the way that Randal Kleiser was able to throw humor into a not so humorous situation and not come across as heartless.  The movie at times feels a little forced but I can't think of how you can tackle this topic in under two hours.
Great Flick but.... I loved this movie when it was shown on AMC one time, so I finally ordered this movie and found it not to be closed-captioned. Great flick but kinda hard to follow, know what I'm saying ?It was advertised in Amazon.com that it was closed-captioned and it wasn't so I had to send it back. If it ever comes in CC or better yet on DVD, let me know
The Best Baseball Movie...Ever... I would agree that the baseball skills of the actors is somewhat deficient but, really only a trained eye could detect the. This a truly a great baseball movie for the ages and a truly great movie regardless of the baseball aspect... it is filled with emotion, intrigue, stunning photography, fabulous music, and even historical accuracy. It is an open door into the deep, rich history of negro league baseball. This truly is a film not just for baseball fans, Go get it!!
Great Product. The product was received in great condition and timely delivered by the seller.  I would buy agai
The best historical war drama from the Far East. I have seen many historical war dramas from Far East (mainly China's) and most of them are not only historically inaccurate but have a strong bias toward the enemy.Yi Soon Shin, however, is a rare exception.  Not only is the drama very historically accurate but it is also very comprehensive in detailing the meticulous battle planning of the admiral that leads to each victory but also the political in-fighting between the Chosun political factions (and the second-guessing nature of the king) which causes his eventual death.Also, the special effects are great.  The battle scenes (whether on sea or land) are realisitic and of outstanding quality.The only problem that I can find is that the DVD has not placed sufficient focus on the contribution of the Ming China.  Then again, this is not unexpected since this is a Korean drama focusing on the great admiral.Also, the entire selection should have 104 episodes.  I don't know why it stops at 101.If you want to have a more comprehensive knowledge on the subject, try Samuel Hawley's Imjin War (which portrays Yi Soon Shin more accurately by quoting original sources).Any who is only intered in the fighting may also want to check out Stephen Turnbull's Samurai Invasion (which has more colorful maps and detailed description of battles from the Japanese perspective).Lastly, anyone who is a fan of samurai warfare may want to check out Shogun:Total War by Creative Assembly (now in Gold version).
It was great. I think that Club Paradise is a witty movie and well acted. Robin Williams and Peter O'Toole are halarious and are anchored by Jimmy Cliff. I think it is a laugh a minute movi
Perfect on time delivery. Collected my items from the hotel a day before schedule! Good job!
better than the original. Kickboxer 2 followed up the first successful Kickboxer, but minus Van Damme.  David Sloan (played by Sasha Mitchell) is now the focus, the apparent 3rd brother of Kurt and Eric Sloan from the 1st movie.  Sasha Mitchell may not be anywhere as close to Van Damme in the athletic department, but that doesn't hurt Kickboxer 2 at all.  Sasha Mitchell is a better actor and as a whole, Kickboxer 2 does a better job than the 1st movie in that department.  The story is pretty decent too - this time both characters (good and evil) are out for revenge.  The evil is Tong Po, who returns from the 1st Kickboxer,  played by Michel Qissi.  He only has one line in the movie and doesn't appear until much later on, but it is a grand appearance.  Matthias Hues (Death Match, Blackbelt, No Retreat No Surrender 2) also has a role in the movie, fighting David early on in the ring, the 1st of 3 fights in the movie.  Vince Murdocco (Ring of Fire, To Be The Best) is also one of the main characters, who fights Tong Po, the 2nd fight in the movie.  This match is all in slow-motion, but it is the only slow motion fight I have ever enjoyed, creating a sense of suspense that supports a main element in the story.  The final fight of course is between David and Tong Po, which is about 5-1/2 minutes in length.  It is mostly slow-motion once again, but is still quite entertaining and bloody, with broken glass glued and taped to the fists (same used in the 1st Kickboxer).Kickboxer 1 is definetly a Van Damme classic.  Kickboxer 2 began a different path, but in no way did it succeed in being a bad martial-arts film.  I highly recommend this if you want to see some good fights backed by a decent story.
Another Truffaut classic. This review is for the Criterion Collection DVD edition of the film."Shoot the Piano Player" known in France as "Tirez sur le pianiste" is one of Fran?ois Truffaut's earlies works and is quite popular.It is about a pianist working at a bar in Paris. Depressed over the suicide of his wife, he begins to fall in love witha  waitress at the bar. The pianist's brothers have gotten into trouble with some mobsters and seek his help.The Criterion edition is a double disc set with many extra features.Disc 1 contains the film with optional audio commentary by film scholars, Annette Insdorf and Peter Brunette and a theatrical trailer.Disc 2 contains interviews with Charles Aznavour and Marie Dubois, director of photography Raoul Coutard, and Truffaut collaborator Suzanne Schiffman, Marie Dubois' screen test, excerpts from 2 documantaries on the film and the novel which the film is based on, and an audio essay on the film's music.In addition the liner notes have 28 bages of other material.This is the best edition of the film to get
Claudine- NYC... The 1970s... Somewhat light-hearted drama about a struggling, inner-city, single mother who meets a charming sanitation worker & the many bumps they hit in the road to further their relationship.Great performances by Diahann Carroll & James Earl Jones, & also the young actors portraying her children were quite convincing.The one obvious flaw to me, however, was that although an accomplished, seasoned actress, Ms. Carroll, isn't *quite* convincing as a 'true" inner-city resident. Someone like Cicily Tyson or Esther Rolle would've pulled it off more convincingly. Ms. Carroll has just too much of a glamorous charisma for it.This movie can appeal to many, but I'd think mostly for people who grew up in the 70s in the city. (like myself) They're likely to relate more to the characters.
Really, my all-time favorite. My husbands laughs when I say a movie is my favorite(I have many favorites), but this one really is. I also love to read and what sets this adaptation apart is the way the two complement eachother,truly brilliant. The movie adds elements that the book didn't dwell on and the book covers all the details that movies just can't. Some movies can touch your heart in such a way that they leave you a bit raw. For me, this is one of those movies. No, it may not be a cinematic event for all, but for those who have loved with their whole heart and have been (or even risked) being hurt, you will find a good laugh and a few tears here.  Only Nora Ephron herself could have wrote a screenplay that complemented her novel so well, and thankfully Mike Nichols brought it to life in such a way. Meryl Streep really is at her best here and the whole cast is excellent. I really do love this movie, it always amazes me that it is so underrated. Give it a try
"It's silly, but I love you. I wanted to see you, to see if I'd want to see you.",. I finally did it. I finished watching " bout de souffle" aka "Breathless". I kept putting it off because I usually have problem when everybody tells me that such and such film is the epitome of its era or it breaks all the rules, starts the revolution, and reinvents the cinema. Well, " bout de souffle" does not put you under the pressure, it takes you for a ride, and you follow for 90 minutes its incredibly young characters, common crook (Jean-Paul Belmondo) and his American free-spirited girlfriend (Jean Seberg) on their journey on the streets of 1960-th Paris along with Raoul Coutard's legendary camera. I am not going to tell here how great the camera work was, how fantastic the music score and the views of Paris were - the fans of the film know that already. They also know about the beginning of French New Wave, and how it influenced the future cinema. I just want to say that the movie was made over forty years ago - the smoking was cool back then, and Belmondo made smoking look very sexy. Belmondo fascinates me in this film. I've seen him in a lot of later movies - he's always been good (I recommend Le Magnifique, 1973 and Le Professionnel,1981 ) - but in  bout de souffle he is not just good - he is embodiment of cool, his face changes its expression every moment, you can not take your eyes off him. Is it me or he does remind the very young Mick Jagger - not commonly handsome but irresistible and sexy? He and young (she was 21 at the time) Jean Seaborg made one of the best screen couples ever. My favorite scenes:Michel drives the stolen car in the beginning of the film, and he starts to talk to us, the audience. The day is nice, the sun is shining, and the life is beautiful...Michel and Patricia drive in the convertible. The wind plays with her short hair. We only see the back of her head and her neck. Michel tells her that he loves the girl with a beautiful neck, wrists, knees, but she is a chicken...Patricia comes to the hotel to find Michel in her bed. They start talking about nothing and about very serious things. They smoke, she tries to find a good place for her new poster, and he wants to sleep with her. In the end of the scene, his face, he looks at her - there is love in that look...There is more - I am sure everyone who saw it has his/her favorite scenes.
We Want MORE Montez. This DVD is absolutely gorgeous. The technicolor is so vivid and beautiful-like an early Disney film. I have watched my new copy already three times- it is so much fun to watch on every level. Lovely to look at and the best campy humor to top it off. While I love this film, it is quite tame compared to some of the wonderful excesses that were to follow in this cycle of cult favorite Maria Montez classics.Thank you Universal for finally releasing one of your classic "Easterns" onto DVD. But please don't stop!! Maria's fans are legion. Her films are some of the hardest to find and most desireable to collectors. Remember of the six films she did with Jon Hall at Universal, only two were ever even released on VHS. The demand is high. Please Universal- give us a "Maria Montez Collection" with the remaining five Easterns. "Cobra Woman" alone is probably the most famous camp classic to never merrit a DVD release.We want more
Marvin and Bronson at their best. This film is a masterpiece for action and adventure.Great scenery and an ending where all the good guys win,BRILLIANT
1st is the best. toy story is the best cg movie ever i love pixar i hope toy storey 3 is as good as the first
Truly a classic. This is what Science Fiction is supposed to be, Thought Provoking.Excellent imagery. Superb plot. Well developed. Wonderful ending.
OPM- Used in my Business Management classes... There is no nudity in this movie but there are some vaguely sexual discussions.  Even some adults might miss the true points being made but you may want to consider that before allowing children to see OPM.That said, this is the best business movie I have ever come across.  When I first saw it in the theater I was all for Gregory Peck's character until DeVito's speech at the end which is truly thought provoking.  In teaching business management at the University of Southern Mississippi, I have my students watch the whole thing at the beginning of the semester to acquaint them with the notion that those who have the goal of making money are not all bad.  For some reason, even though they want to be in business, my students too often think of running a business and making money as grubby, nasty chores performed by evil people.  The characters in OPM force them to examine those beliefs.Other reviewers have made the point that this a funny movie and it truly is.  The humor is probably better appreciated by adults than children since it is not of the slapstick kind but rather uses plays on words.While the characters in OPM are somewhat one-dimensional, what I enjoyed is that they are always true to themselves.  When offered a million dollars by Piper Laurie's character to go away , DeVito responds "It is not enough."  She was being true to her goals of minimizing conflict in her company and he was being true to his goals of maximizing his wealth.  When asked why, he gives an answer that shows that he doesn't accept the idea that he is the bad guy in this drama.I particularly appreciated the movie not making DeVito's character out to be a totally bad guy.  That is a real failing of most movies coming out of Hollywood.  Other reviewers have talked about how his relationship with Penelope Ann Miller's character shows his humanity but I think people should take note of his relationship with his chauffeur and his secretary and their loyalty to him.  He makes use of his reputation as a tough guy to serve his business needs but there is much more to the man.All together, this is truly a great movie.  It amazes me that it took so long for it to come out on DVD since it has all the stars in the world (DeVito, Peck, Miller, Laurie, Stockwell, etc.)
It has become a cult classic. The "misfits" of Hollywood and the critics panned Kevin Costner's "Waterworld"; however, it has become a cult classic, and it will continue to be one of the most memorable films of cinema history.It is movie making at its original best, and truly innovative.  Those who panned it were ignorant, and did not understand its reach.  In every scene, there is something new and barriers broken; and after all, that is what great films are all about.The misfits of Hollywood have as much credibility worldwide as Stalin or Hitler, and they will never define the significance of "Waterworld."  Each person who views the film will give new meaning to it.Both Kevin Costner and Dennis Hopper are terrific, as they have been in so many other films.  The sheer logistics of making it in the waters off Hawaii were monumental
Clever comment on Reaganism set in a galaxy of post-transformational liberalism. Just kidding, I don't know what I'm talking about. You should see this movie if you like:1) Sex2) Nudity3) Hot babes4) Mickey Rourke5) Carre Otis6) Mickey Rourke and Carre Otis going at it for real7) Perfume commercials8) Directors trying to make their softcore porn look like art by filming everything sensually and in slow motion, so the film appears to be arthouse and "visually stimulating"9) Really, really, really bad dialogue10) Lots of good banging and screwing without a plot11) Mickey Rourke playing a total pimp (which is different than just Mickey Rourke - I mean, there's Mickey Rourke, and then there's Mickey Rourke the Pimp, which is even cooler)And finally...12) Hot female characters who wear glasses and carry around clipboards so the audience believes they are smart and successful businesswomen, when in fact they'd have a hard time calculating 1 + 1. (Also see: Alone in the Dark, Tara Reid's character; or Fantastic Four, Jessica Alba's.)Highly recommended to the appropriate demographic.I could kill myself for buying it. :
I can't help it, I love this movie. The 80's spawned one high school teen movie after another, and John Hughes was the king of that genre.  But somehow along the way among the Breakfast Clubs and the Pretty in Pinks, Three O'Clock High got overlooked.  It's quite rare when I actually meet someone who's heard of this comedy gem.  I had quite a lot of trouble even finding a copy of it on DVD and was going to purchase a copy here on Amazon, but finally found it at a buy/sell/trade store in Hollywood.So anyway, while I am very happy to finally have this movie on DVD in widescreen for the first time, instead of watching it on my VCR on a recorded scratchy tape, I was a little dissapointed that there were no features whatsoever on this disc (movie reccomendations don't count, you can get plenty of those on Amazon).  Further proof that not enough people know or care about this movie.Furthermore, Casey Siemaszko, the star, the heart and soul of this movie, failed to develop as a lead actor since this movie never really got any recognition, (he had a lot of supporting roles in the late 80s such as Young Guns, Stand By Me and Back to the Future) which is a shame because he is too funny in this movie.  The movie has a good cast too, even though the protagonist of the film who looks 15 years too old to be in high school, he's the perfect school bully.  Not to mention this movie has the best school yard fight you'll ever see.Please, check this one out.  John Hughes isn't the only one who could make good 80's highschool movies and this is certainly one of the best ones
Toys. Robin Williams is as funny as he can be.  A very delightful movie to be watched by all
Very Interesting. `Audition' isn't your typical horror movie, but like Japanese fashion, the movie gives a lot of detail and may be confusing to some people who aren't used to dream sequences explaining some of the story. I was overall impressed with the pacing and style of the movie, but I was a little disappointed to learn that one of my favorite parts of the movie wasn't in the original novel this movie was based on. Credit goes to Miike, the director, for the new ideas that were added to the story in this movie because the scenes that Miike added were probably the best parts. The biggest complaint I have of the movie is that the cameraman in some scenes couldn't keep the camera steady and it is shaky in a few parts. Nothing major, but it is enough to notice the picture not being steady.The special features for the DVD are a great addition and answer some questions about the movie, mainly when they interview the author of the novel. I don't know if this could be considered a horror movie, it is definitely more of a suspense story. The author of the novel, Ryu, himself said that this isn't a ghost story or about a maniac with a knife, but more about the dark side of the human heart. It's not until the last few minutes of the movie when things get really bad, most of the time it is like a normal love story with a twist. If you like thriller suspense stories like "Psycho" that deal with the outcome from years of abuse, then you will like this movie. But, if you want a slasher that goes for the throat, this isn't for you because this story builds up to the moment instead of going straight for the jugular. Remember, the movie isn't what I'd call "scary", but more disturbing than anything else and it doesn't become that until the last twenty minutes. Then, you can bet, you will hold on to your seats and you are glued to the TV.
A Woman of Her Word. While this film did not hit me as hard (emotionally) as THE ENGLISH PATIENT, it sure gave me plenty to think about.The cast and direction are first-rate.  The story is well-told.  It made me buy the novel and read it--and then wonder how much of the story really happened!If you enjoy intelligent, challenging love stories told against historical backdrops, then check this movie out.And be very careful what you ask God for
A charming, unconventional comedy. You probably won't see a film made in the U.S. in which a father and daughter are vying for the affections of the same man! This German film begins with the motley group of Zobel (played by handsome Gotz George, one of Germanys' most popular actors), his lover Karl (Christian Redi) and Zobel's daughter, Lizzie (Jeanette Hain) making their living by practicing petty crimes like picking pockets and con schemes. When Karl is hit by a car during an ill-fated scheme, Zobel and Lizzie search for a replacement. Rudolf, a cute 25-year-old gas station attendant fits the bill. But complications arise when both Lizzie and Zobel fall in love with Rudolf. Rudolf returns affections to both of his admirers, which of course soon results in numerous conflicts. This gritty comedy is infused with charm and pathos (both Zobel and Lizzie are lonely characters seeking a ray of happiness in their dreary lives). The film suffers from a weak ending that is not entirely satisfying but the film is one that is definitely recommended
Pixar creates a classic. Truly a family movie that we enjoy today as much as we did when it was first released. The only thing I think they should have changed is when the mother & all of the fish eggs except Nemo get eaten by the scary fish. THey could have come up with something different. It still doesn't sit well with my almost three yr old & my almost 5 yr old. They see it as Nemos mommy & brother & sisters. It's hard to explain to them why a bad fish ate Nemos mommy. Good grief...they could have gone with a less severe story line.Other than that...it is a wonderful movie in which I think DORY voiced by Ellen Degeneres steals the show.It will be a classic & enjoyed for many years to come
my god yo!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!. man this film was off the chain son......very violent though...wow!!!!!....no other words to sa
I'm Glad That They Have Finally Put This Movie On DVD!. Only The Lonely is  a good romantic comedy type movie that has a great cast that includes, John Candy, Ally Sheedy, Maureen O'Hara, Anthony Quinn and Milo O'Shea. The movie is about a Irish American cop who lives in Boston with his over bearing overly opinionated mother and he falls in love with a woman who is mother doesn't like. This is a cute movie and I'm glad that they finally have put it on DVD
Americana on the Plains. High-energy encapsulation of the American spirit in this tough-tender production.  Done lean and hard-scrabble, as opposed to the lush and green Hollywood version.  Curley really is as wonderful as he sings he is. Aunt Eller, the matriarch, as done by Maureen Lipman is tough, and loving.  Jimmy Johnson, the Welshman, jigs and does rope-tricks.  Shuler Hensley's Jud is repulsive, and vulnerable.  A classic.  For your permanent library.
Its Name Is Quetzalcoatl, but Just Call It Q. No matter how preposterous or cliche a film's bare premise may sound, if Larry Cohen's name is attached to it, you can be certain that it's an interesting and entertaining piece of cinema. Cohen's scripts and films are always filled with lots of wild imagery (both literal and figurative), often complex themes, and lots of sophisticated satirical subtext. And his 1982 opus Q: THE WINGED SERPENT is no exception, despite whatever the goofy-sounding title may seem to imply. As usual, writer/director Cohen's tongue-in-cheek film sidesteps the usual horror cliches and instead delivers a fairly tight story, interesting characters, clever dialog, and a ton of subtle yet witty social metaphor. And yes, there is also a little nudity and gore.The titular Q is Quetzalcoatl, a flying serpentine god of the ancient Aztecs who has been summoned to modern-day Manhattan via bizarre sacrificial rituals performed by a contemporary Aztec priest. Since its arrival in The Big Apple borough, the humongous beastie has been swooping down on unsuspecting pedestrians, swimmers, and sunbathers and chowing down, but police are initially skeptical of the eye-witness reports of a giant flying reptile but are at a loss for any other explanation. Enter street thug and opportunist Jimmy Quinn (Michael Moriarty). Having inadvertently stumbled across Q's nest, Quinn's willing to give that information to the cops--for a price.The special FX in Q: THE WINGED SERPENT, especially the stop-motion animation of the serpent itself, are admittedly cheesy. But the FX aren't really the point as far as Cohen is concerned; they're just window dressing. Instead, with his usual satiric flair, Cohen uses the film to take some playful pokes at the modern Western lifestyle. For example, Q: THE WINGED SERPENT draws several sardonic parallels between ancient pagan religions and modern Christianity. Notes one cop after learning the details of the Aztec sacrificial ritual: &quot;The victim's heart is ritually removed and presented to the god. Luckily, all WE have to do today is eat the wafer and drink the wine--that?s being civilized.&quot; And in several shots of the Chrysler Building, Cohen makes deliberate visual comparisons of the modern architecture to that of ancient Aztec temples.The acting in the film is pretty good overall, and Cohen manages to coax an especially outstanding performance from actor Michael Moriarty. In a role that is the opposite of the conservative types that he usually plays, Moriarty is hilarious yet believable and sympathetic as the dim-witted, hapless hood who hopes to sell his knowledge of Q's whereabouts to city authorities for a cool $1,000,000. David Carradine (of KUNG FU fame) does a pretty good turn as the city detective in charge of the Q case, and Richard Roundtree--cinema & TV's original SHAFT--is delightful as Carradine's partner. Cute Candy Clark, nominated for an Oscar for her performance in 1973's AMERICAN GRAFFITI, also does a great job in a minor role as Moriarty's live-in girlfriend.Blue Underground's DVD release of Q: THE WINGED SERPENT is a must-have for Cohen fans. It offers a nearly pristine digital transfer of the film in its original aspect ratio of 1.85:1 (16x9 enhanced), with audio options that include the original mono, an excellent stereo remix, a Dolby 5.1 track, and a DTS 6.1 track. Bonus features include an informative and entertaining running commentary with Cohen and his protege Bill Lustig, as well as a teaser trailer, a photo gallery, and some DVD-ROM-only goodies.In short, Q: THE WINGED SERPENT may not be Cohen's best flick, but it's a pretty good one that won't disappoint fans of the writer/director or fans of B-movie horror. And Blue Underground's DVD is well worth the price of admission
Much cooler than I expected. This is a surprisingly good show. It manages to have 'a little' violence, sex, and language but not enough to be too offensive to watch with my kid, and it's still intelligent enough to be interesting, humorous and kind of addicting to an adult. A modern Nancy Drew, is Veronica Mars. I wish seasons 1 and 2 were here; I wish anything more were here and I'd get that as well. I'm really not even much of a whodunit kind of fan to be honest, I prefer science fiction but amazon ran out of decent TV to sell me in that genre so I bought VM season 3 just for kicks. I'm glad I did
Magnificent in every way. This is the first Lear I ever saw and so it will always be dear to me as it touched me so deeply way back when it was first shown on TV as it still does now when I pop my video in the player.  I can't imagine any production topping this one as each character is played so thoroughly true and with such amazing skill and clearness of language.  Every student or lover of Shakespeare must watch this and is highly recommended to purchase it for repeated viewing throughout your life.  To me, Shakespeare's plays are so rich because they can be performed successfully innumerable ways.  So it is absurd to expect any one performance to encapsulate everything a play can offer.  You can't do it all in one production.  However, I could easily be satisfied with this one Lear without ever seeing another.  All the actors here, even the bit parts, play their parts essentially to perfection.   I suppose my favorites are Lear, Gloucester, Edgar, Cordelia and Regan, but that is not to diminish anyone else.  My only complaint about the play in general is that it is too difficult to believe that the others (excepting perhaps Lear himself since he is so old, nearsighted, half-mad/senile) do not recognize Kent for who he is merely because he has shaved his beard and put on ragged clothes.  But, of course, if they did, or he revealed himself, the plot would be ruined and it would become a very different play altogether.  I say enjoy the magnificent acting, the beautiful poetry and insights into human nature, and let Shakespeare sweep you away.  You can't help but be moved when Lear realizes he has "ta'en too little care" of the homeless wretches, or when Lear is reunited with Cordelia and she so tenderly speaks to him, or, alas, when Lear is overcome with grief as he carries the dead Cordelia onto the battlefield and desperately tries to will her back to life before succumbing himself.  One final note:  the violence of the play, though horrible to contemplate, is presented in such a way as to be believable but also watchable (not for small children of course).  Obviously, they couldn't be TOO REAL about it or someone would really get hurt
Tim Roth is Gifted. I was inspired to write because I like this actor SO much. The movie's script may seem improbable (jail dentist having affair with inmate)but who really knows...certainly the acting ability of the leads (Julia Ormand and Tim Roth)convinced me that the characters were destined for each other. The depiction of life inside, people's motivations, both good and bad seemed very realistic and thought provoking. I liked to see at least one movie that doesn't equate criminality with being evil or insane....sometimes it's just the bad, stupid actions or mistakes that good people make. Yes he committed the crime but he is paying for it. Also, I'm a hopeless romantic and the movie indulged me, e.g. the sex scenes were incredibly erotic and Tim Roth is my ideal of a man with intelligent sex appeal. I believe this movie would appeal to both sexes for different reasons
Best concert I've ever seen. And I've seen over 100, by almost as many different artists.Paul Simon's free concert in Central Park in the summer of 1991 is still the one by which I compare all others.Of course, it didn't hurt to be a life-long fan of the man's music. Music...flawless and absolutley joyful and fun. That was but a part of it, there was a universal positive energy that hundreds of thousands people there experienced. I was not at Woodstock,but I would speculate the vibe was similar. Unfortunately, this cannot be captured and transferred onto CD or VHS, even DVD. Still a joyous and magnificent concert to listen to and watch. Absolute magic. I remember Paul & co. performing You Can Call Me Al twice in a row, much to the delight of the crowd. During which, Chevy Chase made a surprise cameo on the stage, so surprising Paul, that he missed an entire verse. There were three encores that night. After finishing the second, Paul was so overwhelmed by the unconditional adoration from the audience, that he fell down the stairs!There is a review here from 'A viewer':"The one bad part of the whole night was that the crowd, a staggering 750,000, cheered at quite a few wrong moments"well dood, you weren't there.Now waiting for the DVD release of this timeless gem....
Bob Fosse. Bob Fosse was probably one of the greatest directors of USA and Dustin Hoffman is one of the best actors of USA. What happens when you put them together? They'll create a masterpiece like this one
When a woman's fed up. I hadn't seen this movie in 10 years until this past weekend when it resurfaced on TV -- whew!!! what a welcomed blast from the past.Martin Lawrence was still in his heyday as a comedian in this movie's 1996 release.A sober Bobby Brown delivers an entertaining performance as Martin's pseudo sidekick, Regina King plays a believable "it girl" role and Lynn Whitfield totally delivers an Oscar nomination-worthy performance as a woman scorned and determined to make her man pay for all the heartache that comes from lies and deception.This is one of those twist-of-fate movies for playaz who manipulate relationships just to "get some" and move on.The story is easy to follow.There's tons of subtle but gutbustingly funny scenes.The movie moves along at a great pace -- you won't go to sleep on this!For anyone -- male or female -- who's ever had an "adventure in dating" with a nut you later question why you ever dated, this movie's for you.As the movie's theme song says, "The sweetest woman in the world could (also) be the meanest woman in the world/Did you make her that way?"You're just gonna have to watch this movie to "get it.
Still love it!. Great movie, great delivery time, still entertaining!  Not as scary as when I was in elementary. Very happy
Funny Film. I bought this movie w/o seeing it first, which I never do. I was glad I did it, though. My money was not wasted.Colin Firth plays John Worthing, a wealty man who pretends to be his younger brother Earnest when he goes to London. The catch is, he doesn't have a brother. The reason why he does this is because he is smitten with his friend Algy's(Everett) cousin, who wants to marry a man named Earnest(hence the name). As the film goes on, Worthing finds a way to get rid of Earnest by telling those at his country home that Earnest had died. But before Worthing arrives home, Algy shows up to Worthing's house (because he falls in love with Worthing's young ward Cecily), pretending to be Earnest. Worthing comes home a day early, finds Algy and all heck breaks loose! This is all I am going to say w/o spoiling the ending! You will just have to see it!Now, despite some confusion the film is very funny, and it all came together in the end. Firth and Everett did a fantastic job and I would recommend this movie to anyone
Best  version ever. Probably the most romantic/tragic movie I've ever watched.  Leaves the Laurence Olivier et.al. version for dead. (That movie finished half way through the book). Ralph Fienne's tortured and damged Heathcliffe is mesmerising, but WHO cast Sinaid O'Connor for Christ's sake??? And Binoche as Cathy is of course "haunting"-(sorry couldnt help it!!!) The eponymous scenery and the music score stay in your memory long after the film has ended. You'd be a hard heart not to enjoy this on
My comedy collection. One of my very fav. movies!!  Love it as much now as when I first saw it way back in 70's!!
i never get tired of this one.... i saw OFM when it first came out, over ten years back.  it was on cable the other day.  it still keeps me glued to the set.  bill paxton, billy bob thornton, michael beach....great work.  too bad this one didn't get more media and a larger audience
I Definitely Have to Watch It Again. If you've heard of L'Avventura than you've probably heard people say that this film is about nothing. This is true...Nothing happens in this movie. Two movies kept popping into my head during my viewing of L'Avventura and they were "Picnic at Hanging Rock" and "The Passenger." The latter was directed by this films writer/director Michelangelo Antonioni. Picnic at Hanging Rock and L'Avventura have a similar event take place with a similar outcome. The Passenger and L'Avventura share the same sluggish pace that will turn a lot of audiences off. I think, overall, L'Avventura is one of the most beautiful films I've ever seen. It's got gorgeous cinematography and wonderful art direction; If you're willing to set aside what happens in the movie and let yourself get lost not in what's happening but what's portrayed, you'll find this film a lot more likeable. I, myself, don't love it. I think it's an overrated film (it's in Roger Ebert's The Great Movies), but despite that...It still weaves a spell on the viewer, if you're watching it. Oddly enough, for a movie in which almost nothing occurs, it's almost 2 1/2 hours long. It's running time is about 2:20. The movie is about a group of rich friends; Anna (Lea Massari) and her lover Sandro (Gabriele Ferzetti), Anna's friend Claudia (Monica Vitti) and some others. When they reach a small island, Anna and Sandro have a little quarrel and soon Anna has disappeared. Like Picnic at Hanging Rock, we will never see her again or find out what happened to her. This film offers up a lot more theories than that film did but, when Anna is gone, Anna is gone. Antonioni teases us a bit by letting us (almost) see a boat, leaving us to wonder if Anna left on it. Anyway, the group looks for Anna and calls the coast guard...Eventually, they give up and return to shore. The rest of the film is (more or less) built on the foundation of the characters trying to find Anna, but the film is not a search for Anna at all. Antonioni makes it very clear in the beginning of the film that Anna is gone forever. The plot, if one can call it that, has Claudia and Sandro becoming lovers. They don't fall in love, love seems to be nonexistent in this movie...I won't say much more than that. Truth is, there's not much more to say. The final scene of the film is, in my opinion, simultaneously the most beautiful and haunting shot of the entire film. To be honest, this is a movie I'll probably have to see again. I think most people will find that this film doesn't connect with the immediately (and may never do so). I actually liked it, which gives me hope for future viewings that I may come to appreciate what everyone else saw. As for now, the casual commercial-film viewer will not like this movie. That I can damn near guarantee. People who like film, The Criterion Collection, or Antonioni will. If you don't fall into either of these categories, you might want to check it out and see what you think of it. I've said all I can.GRADE: B
One of Drew's best films!. This film is totally under-rated. It is suspensful and keeps you guessing. If you like mystery this is pretty good and Drew did a good job on it. It's not her typical work, but she is such a good actress
White Christmas, DVD. This is a wonderful story.  Too bad writers can't create this type of heart warming story.  Excellent cast, and well written script
Keep coming back to this one!. I was 16 in 1986 when I was first introduced to Callanetics.  Over the last 20 years I have done my share of Tae Bo, Aerobic traing, running, and weight training. However, I can trully say that Callenetics gives you by far the fastest results.  This has always motivated me when I've been in an exercise rut.  Combining deep muscle positions and tiny prescise and powerful movements is the key to its success.  The best part is that it is a "no impact" exercise, so it is great for people with back injuries (See Callanetics web site)  But let me warn you, its a killer!!!! Until you master the positions, you will scream out loud!!  And you will see and feel instant results.  Try it, you will not be sorry.  Combine this with some cardio and some yoga and you will feel increadible in just days!! Honestl
With a Frenchman in New York. This movie never fails to humor me. I lost my original video so I finally decided to get this dvd.These two strangers (Andie MacDowell and Gerard Depardieu) couldn't be more oppposites. I love the scenery of the park and the apartment with the lovely plants. It isn't until the end that they learn what the two could offer each other. It still frustrates me that they couldn't stay with each other in the end when they did realize that they loved each other
Un-predictable. I found this movie unpredictable, even after reading the plot on the back of the box.  The acting is good and believable. Some of the scenes are designed to "shock"; The execution of these scenes are frighteningly effective.  I watched this on a 13" low resolution screen with a pair of small multimedia speakers on low volume, but the scene at about 39 minutes nearly stopped my heart.  If I had seen this in a theater, I may not be here to tell you about it.  Seriously... if you even think you may have a heart condition, you would be well advised to have a loved-one screen this movie for you first.  My only criticism, as mentioned by another reviewer, is not enough information about "Them" and their motivations to wrap my imagination around.Most young people can safely watch this movie with minimal  parental input, assuming they are old enough to know that the boogie-man doesn't really exist.  Refreshingly, there is no sex, although the main actor and actress who are barely acquainted, do spend 2 nights together, one in separate rooms, and one in the same bed and fully clothed
"It's like a G-Dog on a Fly Tip.". Take a out of work journalist, Charlie Sheen, a hustler of the streets, Chris Tucker, and 15 million dollars in diamonds and what do you got?A High-flying Buddy comedy that has the funniest momenst that you could hope for.This Miss-matched pair play back and forth with the quips, the hits, and the high-wire trips. Chris Tucker plays a hustler looking for the next scam but gets in trouble with the mob. Not only that but his life is falling down the tubes with him going to jail. In an escape attempt he is paired up with a french criminal that has a scam of his own. A scam involving 15 million in diamonds.Now, along with his buddy, The two will fight, chase, quip, and search to find the truth and clear their names.Final Verdict: Money Talks . . .and they got the walk down just to prove it.Enjoy
Excellent Film. Hilarious movie!! Dustin Hoffman and Jason Schwartzman were incredibly funny. If you're a fan of existentialism it's a great movie, but if you're not it is still worth seeing
A Great Classic. This was the first animation that I have ever seen and I was amazed at the quality and how real all of the characters looked on "Toy Story". It is so easy to fall in love with the toys and characters in this movie and the animation that Pixar has brought is amazing. Since "Toy Story" Pixar has brought us lo lot of wonderful animations to love and most of which are top rated films, but I will always remember that "Toy Story" started it all. Not only because "Toy Story" started the love of animmation in my heart but because this movie was so brilliantly animated and designed
One last Fandango!. Everytime I hear the word "fandango" this movie comes to mind. While its not my norm of entertainment I just cant forget the unforgetable Skydive scene, being a 15 year veteran with more then 1,000 jumps myself I find that one scene going over and over in my head just as it fueled my every trip to the drop zone when I was going through training in 1990! It is FUNNY!! (and very simular to a piolet we once had at Lake Elsinor - the funnest DZ west of the Mississippi!).While I don't remember much about the rest of the movie that one scene just stuck in my mind, and I saw it a few years before my own desicion to take up jumping, its just that memorable and that well done! Even funnier then Wesley Snipes 'first jump' in the movie "Drop Zone" (another well done movie and well worth mentioning!)FANDANGO!!Blue Skies everyone, see this flick
Best Movie Ever !!!!. Vampire Journals is one of my all time favorites. Anything from full moon pictures is good. The movie is very original, I love the scenery, the lighting, the music everything. The actors are perfect and I really enjoy the dialogue. It's very old world, movies that are filmed in eastern Europe rock, I love when Zackery is telling Sofia that Bucharest is one of the cities of mysteries, a city where the ways of antiquity exist in league with the modern world, stuff like that is priceless
Great show for kids. We watched this movie and The Mighty Ducks this weekend and both have similar story themes about the under-dogs and both are great movies for kids. Worth while renting or buying. We rented it
An unusual sci-fi allegory. This film is best interpreted in a symbolic and allegorical way.  The plot is too implausible and riddled with inconsistencies to be taken literally.  Instead, what Logan's Run offers is a bizarre vision of the cult of eternal youth evolving into a police state.  Some of the scenes are riveting, such as the early depiction of sanitized mass murder carried out in a spectacular ceremony.  There are clear references to a commercial culture that glorifies youth and lives in denial about death.  The world depicted here is at once hedonistic and claustrophobic.  The environment is a kind of shallow, Disneyesque paradise from which there is no hope of escape.  The implicit subtext of the movie, that hedonism is a kind of deathtrap, is well taken.
Hrm . . . Well, it is always a mistake to read the book before seeing the movie.  That said, I liked the movie OK taken by itself, but compared to the book it is pretty vanilla.  They moved the action from New York City to Chicago for some unknown reason, and got rid of two of the best characters - Pendergast and Smithback.  Also, I was repeatedly annoyed by the lighting, or lack thereof, while watching this.  It seems that about half of the movie you spend straining to see what is going on in all the shadows and the other half you're rubbing your eyes because they are shining bright lights directly into the camera *ouch*Aside from that, I liked the monster effects and I liked that they actually let us *see* the monster; so many "monster" movies never give you a good look at what is running about - I suppose because they don't want to be bothered actually creating the whole thing.  But this one had a great monster, and the pacing was good as well.  I wanted to smack around some of the annoying rich people, but I guess that was the point!If you like monster movies and haven't read the book yet, watch the movie first.  If you read the book first, you won't enjoy the movie as much.  Once you've watched the movie - read the book, 'cause it rocks
Cinderella DVD. I've been looking for this video in stores for a long time and never found it.  I watched this every year on TV as a child - so, when I found Amazon had it, I bought it for myself for my 51st birthday.  I guess you're never too old for a good fairy tale
Great Show. Bones is one of my favorite TV series. This one episode I missed so I had to get it to keep on track. Great show even if you have never seen it from the begining
Review of Stand and Deliver. I received the DVD in a timely manner. The quality of the DVD was good. I have had good service from Amazon. Overall, it was a good experience and a good product
Survivors unite against Freddy Krueger. New director for this third episode. The modern world is growing and we are starting to have the information highway coming into the picture. The new architecture is very striking and powerful. We come back to a girl as the center of the film, but at once that girl is living with her mother and her male guests. But also at once she is moved to a hospital where she meets a whole gang of young people who are Freddy's victims. Freddy does not try to make anyone kill the others. At first he tries to terrorize them into committing suicide. Society reacts as can be expected : the kids are calling for some attention and their dreams and suicides are nothing but the symptoms of their guilt. A junior doctor reacts positively when a psychiatrist comes into the picture, and this psychiatrist is the surviving girl of a preceding episode. This leads to a psychiatric ward in a hospital with all these kids, and group therapy. This time Freddy has a group against him, a group that can remain united, or at least the survivors can, and they can start a war against this Freddy. The film also densifies Freddy Krueger with a mother who was a medical personnel in the old psychiatric ward of the very hospital in which we are. This wing of the building was closed when this young woman was by accident left behind in the ward surrounded by all kinds of crazy criminals. She was raped and many other things and Freddy is her son. Even worse she lost her head, though not completely and could then dedicate the end of her life to religion. She became a nun. The father of the young psychiatrist who has survived Freddy was one of those who burnt Freddy to death when he was caught after kudnapping and killing twenty children. His remains had never been buried. The father will finally accept to tell where the bones are. During that time the kids and the young psychiatrist are getting into the dream to save the others who have been taken and to get rid of Freddy. They will not all come back, but they will come back after Freddy's destruction by the junior doctor burying the bones and sprinkling them with holy water before covering them with earth. It is the first time the christian theme is brought in with holy water and a crucifix, hence with a parallel to vampires. The film then is a new twist in the general fabric invented by Wes Craven and it is quite effective. We must go on in this saga to see where we are going, where we are taken to. Be sure Freddy will live forever and ever, ever after the end of each film.Dr Jacques COULARDEAU, University of Paris Dauphine & University of Paris 1 Pantheon Sorbonne
German with English subtitles version is better!. Of the two versions I saw, I preferred the German version with English subtitles.  Garbo's performance as well as that of the supporting cast was more inspired.  I will keep looking for that version before I buy
first class. I saw this movie on VHS at the end of the '80s and always wanted to have it on a good quality. I searched for it on the web and I found it on Amazon. I'm very pleased to have it in my collection and I ow it all to Amazon.Thanks
Love this movie. Just really love the story; great acting; wonderful drama, scenery and of course music...this movie is in my top 5 alltime list..
A Wonderful Criterion Issue. I am biased on this film - one of my favorites, right up there with the best of Hitchcock - so I will only say for the movie itself that image and sound meet the high Criterion standard.What I was more happily surprised about was the impression the bonus features had on me.My usual favorite bonus feature is the commentary track, providing interesting tidbits on the production and actors. Although it is quite informative (my only bone to pick is that Linda Darnell was 27, not 32 as stated, when making the movie, so that the age difference between the married couple was actually as significant as it was for the story), I believe it is outshone by two other bonus features.Terry Jones gives a quirky, heartfelt introduction that conveys a true love for Sturges and his work.Best of all is Sandy Sturges, Sturges's widow (and fourth wife). It is easy to understand how an erudite genius could love such a woman! Delicate, proper, articulate, self-effacing, diplomatic and blunt, she is worth the price of admission!
A MOVIE WITH A BIG HEART. doug [nicolas cage] is an fbi agent assigned to guard tess [shirley mclaine] a widowed, former first lady. he is a rules and regulations guy with no spontaniety, she is a free spirit with little tolerance for the fbi's button-down world. prior to being assigned to tess, doug worked under her husband, the president. one day while watching videotape of her husband's funeral, tess sees doug become emotional, a rare opportunity to see him vulnerable. it's obvious they have more in common than at first glance. doug is tested later and comes to realize he cares for her very much. great movie, with a lot of heart and humanity
Informative. This was my first download and it was "free".  The download performed well.  "The Mystery of Edgar Allan Poe" was informative.  It ran up to 50 minutes. This was a Unbox Video Download. It started with the typical intro and ended with the credits. Some individuals did not get a complete download so i included my experience with the Unbox download.  i hope the review was helpful. ty
Almost perfect. Don't read this if you haven't seen the movie!It took me more than a dozen views to start figuring out how everything was connected.  What's with the bugs?  What's that stickey stuff in his mainfraim?  How are his breakdowns and paranoia connected to his work, and what is the quite white place he ends up in?  All the weird stuff is chaos slipping in between the seams, chaos which he thinks he's fighting against... at first.  Max had a thread of a connection to the great infinite divine, that which human beings are not wired to see.  He does see it though, glimpses at first, then the whole thing.  It almost kills him.  It's the classic Iccarus story, except that Max survives and finds happiness at the end.  I disagree that the end is a 'cop out' or incongruous-- it is the cumulation of every frame of the film... it is the point!  He looks at the leaves blowing in the trees, *doesn't* see a pattern, can't see a pattern, doesn't want to see a pattern-- and, for the very first time, he smiles.Why isn't it perfect?  I would have like to see more actual math.  The concepts are there, but the details aren't.  Not a big deal.  "A Beautiful Mind" put a lot of effort into putting real math into the plot, and I like that.Also, some of the details didn't connect.  For example, the 'name of god' (216-letters long), and the 216-digit number his computer spits out before dying, wouldn't necessarily be connected.  The system they explained indicated that different numbers of integers would represent a single letter in Hebrew.  Like 42 would be a letter, and 2 would be different letter.  So, the number of digits wouldn't really equal the number of letters... Darren kind of painted himself into a corner there.  He wisely chose not to make the punch line of the movie a complex number theory proof, and I didn't even notice (much less become annoyed about) this detail until viewing #15.  Up until then, every time I saw it something different would finally make sense.Thus, five stars.  I'm inclined to give five stars to any movie that makes me think longer than the credits roll, so this one should get many many more.
This is the only comedy I like. This is a really film you don't have to worry about the acting or the story, just have a fun time watching Road Trip on a Friday night with a pal or your lover. Before I thought this was going to be a silly college buddy film, which it is, and have barely funny lines. I was wrong and I had a hard time trying to calm myself down from laughing too hard at some secens like the boys got in their car and jump over a bridge and then the car broke down. And my favorite part was the skinny boy having sex with a big black girl
Loyalty Worthy of a Queen. A very pleasant surprise, Guarding Tess, brings to the screen the story of a secret service agent guarding the widow of a former president and all that that entails. Could he possibly be biting more than he can chew?Even though the American Founding Fathers would probably not be pleased with the way their successors have been abusing their powers and with the "royal" treatment that they have been receiving (a far cry from the original humility and anti-monarchist rhetoric), one cannot stand idle and not recognize the strong bond that developed between the former first lady and her protector.Nicolas Cage, Shirley MacLaine, and the rest of the cast, have truly outdone themselves with their performances, which are outstanding to say the least!  All the actors, without exceptions, give it their 100% and it really shows (the chemistry is AMAZING)! Very well written and very well presented, it allows for a highly entertaining movie that can be watched over and over again!The setting, the plot, the dialogues and the music are all wonderful!In short, Guarding Tess is a movie definitely worth watching, as it will surely provide for an evening's entertainment! 4 1/2 Stars
John Grisham's "The Rainmaker". I loved this movie. Matt Damon, Clare Danes, Danny DeVito and especially Teresa Wright, give great performances
For Parents of Teens. Today's teens live in a different world from their parents, more so than ever before.  It's hard to teach your teens how to grow up spiritually, especially when you may not have had good guidance from your own parents.  This book is a great resource for learning how to connect to your teen.  Learn how to make connections with your teen that will give them their needed sense of authenticity, importance, security, significance, lovability, and responsibility.  My husband and I are already making great steps towards beginning to better relate to our teenage daughter
Nastalgia. My goodess!  I cannot believe that so many others had only slight memories of the details of the film and yet it had such an impact and never left their thoughts.  I've periodically thought about The Red Balloon for over 20 years and was just reminded to search for it  when my aunts beau was talking about some of the scenes at Thanksgiving dinner and I just screamed, "That's it!"I haven't purchased it yet, but thanks to you all for the reviews.  I'm going to get it right now
best series out there. best series out there on any sci-fi show, makes you think and imagine the worlds out there in the universe.  this is a good after thought of star trek
star is born. DVD very good, service very good.However would like to see DVD, CD & book purchases combined for shipping allowance.  Probably would order more
John Wayne and Rock Hudson together for the first/only time. I have fond memories of this 1969 film because of the way that I first happened to see it.  When my father was stationed in Japan we would have the opportunity every couple of months to go see a late show at the base theater.  The movie to be screened was never announced; you just went and took your chances.  One time it was "One More Time" (Peter Lawford plays Lord Sydney Pepper and Sammy Davis, Jr. was Charlie Salt) and another time it was "Beneath the Planet of the Apes" (I guessed the movie on the basis of the opening shot of the waves coming ashore).  One night we went and the movie starts off with a bunch of Confederate soldiers waiting for attack and then along comes John Wayne leading a Union cavalry charge and we got to see "The Undefeated" weeks before its normal rotation to our theater.Actually, John Wayne is not the best part of this film.  The opening scenes deal with the end of the Civil War.  Wayne plays Colonel John Henry Thomas, whose men have followed him from Texas to fight for the Union and are not sick of soldiering and ready to go home.  The plan is that they are going to put together a herd of wild horses and sell them to representatives of the Mexican government, who are offering the best price.  Of course, Mexico might be about to have its own Civil War.  Meanwhile, the defeat of the Confederacy and the arrival of Northern carpetbaggers have convinced Colonel James Langdon (Rock Hudson) and his men that there is nothing left for them in the South.  So his plan is to lead his men and their families to Mexico to serve in the military for the government of the Emperor Maximillian trying to hold onto power.The two groups of former enemies meet along the way and after fighting Indians together achieve something of a rapprochement, mainly because Rock and the Duke are manly men and hit it off.  They two big stars acting together, with Rock upstaging an amiable Duke at just about every opportunity.  The idea of what expatriate Confederates during after the Civil War is an interesting one, but the script only deals with that as a means of setting up the rest of the film.Of course since the former Confederates are traveling with women and the ex-Union soldiers only brought horses, the romantic subplots involve overlooking the minor past differences of the war that killed a half million Americans.  Colonel Langdon's sister-in-law (Marian McCargo) grudgingly sparks to John Henry, despite the fact his unit was as Shiloh where her husband was killed.  But it is hard to pay attention to any notion of a mature relationship when young Charlotte Langdon (Melissa Newman), the Colonel's daughter takes an interest in Blue Boy (L.A. Rams quarterback Roman Gabriel), John Henry's Cherokee Indian adopted son, which does not sit well with her beau, Lt. Bubba Wilkes (Michael Vincent before he was Jan-Michael Vincent, and I swear I did not make up that "Bubba" name).Another NFL player, a then relatively unknown Merlin Olsen, plays Corporal Little George, a gentle giant for gets to fight for the honor of the Confederacy from time to time.  You will also see former Miss America Lee Meriwether as Colonel Langdon's wife along with veteran character actors Ben Johnson as Short Grub, Harry Carey, Jr. as on of Thomas' riders, and Royal Dano as a dignified Confederate officer.This is really a 3.5 star movie.  It is not as good as I remember and there are all sorts of problematic elements to the film simply because "The Undefeated" is pretty much doing things by the numbers.  There are no big surprises here once you know the players and it is simply a question of watching it all play out.  In the end I round up simply because of the scenes between Wayne and Hudson, and that is without getting into the fascinating sub-text of the personification of American machismo acting opposite the biggest Hollywood star in the closet.  I have seen some evidence that the Duke knew about Rock's secret, but there is nothing in the film to suggest it bothered him
Guest Does It Again!. "Best in Show" is another of the very funny improvisational dialog movies that Christopher Guest has directed.  The situations are scripted by Christopher Guest and Eugene Levy, but after that they simply let the actors go where they will with the characters and keep the cameras running.  In this movie, he takes aim at dog shows, and the results speak for themselves.The plot of this film is very simple, as the audience is following 5 dogs and their owners and trainers as the go to compete in the Mayflower Dog Show.  Michael McKean and John Michael Higgins are hilarious as Stefan Vanderhoof and Scott Donlan, the gay owners of Miss Agnes (a Shih Tzu), and Parker Posey and Michael Hitchcock are equally funny as the preppy "win at all cost" owners (Meg and Hamilton Swan) of  Beatrice (a Weimaraner).  Christopher Guest plays Harlan Pepper, the outdoorsman owner of Hubert (a Bloodhound), Catherine O'Hara and Eugene Levy are the mismatched couple (Cookie and Gerry Fleck) who own Winky (a Norwich Terrier) where Gerry is a geek, and Cookie seems to have ex-lovers all over the country.  Last, but not least, we have Jennifer Coolidge who plays Sheri Ann Ward Cabot the rich owner of the two-time reigning champion Rhapsody in White (a Poodle), and Jane Lynch who plays Christy Cummings the trainer.The other key members of the cast are Fred Willard, who plays Buck Laughlin the know-nothing TV announcer, and Jim Piddock who is Trevor Beckwith, the knowledgeable color man and who plays the straight man for Willard's antics.  There are also some wonderful smaller roles, such as Larry Miler as one of Cookie's ex-lovers and Ed Begley Jr. as the hotel manager.  Those are just some of the names, but I can't do justice to their wonderful work in such a short review.  The actors are the key to improvisation, and the audience is in good hands with this movie.  The situations are funny, but the performances are even funnier."Best in Show" premiered at the Toronto Film Festival on September 8th, 2000.  It was not nominated for any Academy Awards, but it did win three American Comedy Awards including: Funniest Motion Picture, Funniest Supporting Actor in a Motion Picture (Fred Willard), Funniest Supporting Actress in a Motion Picture (Catherine O'Hara), and Christopher Guest was also nominated for Funniest Supporting Actor in a Motion Picture.  The film was also nominated for and won awards from many different groups such as the American Cinema Editors, Boston Society of Film Critics, British Comedy Awards, Canadian Comedy Awards, the Golden Globes and many more.This DVD includes an audio commentary by Christopher Guest and Eugene Levy which is somewhat low-key, but there are some very funny moments if you pay close attention. Also available are quite a few deleted scenes.  You will also find the features which are almost standard at this point, such as a trailer and cast/filmmaker profiles.  In my opinion, this is the best of the improvisational films after "This is Spinal Tap".
A minor classic. 1984's Crimes of Passion at first seems like some trashy, 80s 'hip' tale about a woman's double life as a stylish hooker, but what we really get is a disturbing, stylish 100 minute analysis of the nature of sex, desire and relationships featuring some utterly fascinating characters, who despite their over-the-top behavior are weirdly compelling and believable. Anthony Perkins is intense as the off-the-handle, violent street-corner 'reverend' who becomes infatuated with China Blue and his idea of 'purifying' her. When he sings 'Hallelujah, Come on Get Happy' to a tied up, horrified Kathleen Turner, and then proceeds to don Turner's China Blue outfit, we are in pure, demented Psycho territory. You can't take your eyes off of Kathleen Turner as Joanna Crane/China Blue, she is at her most beautiful here, despite a silly blonde fright wig that she wears when in her China Blue role. Director Ken Russell is at his flamboyant best here, intercutting wild erotic art ranging from Japanese prints to Aubrey Beardsley lithographs to undercut the intense scenes. A great synth-based Rick Wakeman score, of Strawbs fame, fills the movie with a weird tension
An eclectic, evocative and wholly outstanding collection. Composed by renowned South Indian recording artist L. Subramaniam, the &quot;Salaam Bombay!&quot; soundtrack features an invigorating blend of jazz and traditional Indian styles that serves to emotively embellish the movie's heart-wrenching tale. In fusing east with west in the plaintive and the frenetic, the work also manages to gloriously capture the spirit that defines the remarkable city that is Bombay. The album is not just distinguished though by its innovativeness or even its evocativeness, but also by the sheer brilliance of the musicianship on display. Track number 6 [&quot;Chillum's Theme&quot; - this song does not appear in its entirety in the motion picture], for instance, remains what is, in my opinion, one of the most incredible pieces of music to have graced my ears
Wait until dark - superb. Want a good movie - a good old movie that you can curl up with?  I'm trying to show my kids the Good Old Movies - the classics that I LOVED when I was growing up.  Loved them.  This is one of them.Thanks for having it available
A Bit of Amusement. This is a very 60's style comedy. It purports to be risqu, and I suppose it was by the standards of that day, but it is rather tame by today's standards. Much of it is dated but that did not stop it from being a fairly enjoyable romp.Walter Matthau and Robert Morse are the stars of the show. They play well of men who are friends and office in the same building. Both are reportedly happily married men. What differentiates them is that Matthau's character is a faithful husband while Morse is a philanderer. Matthau's faithfulness, however, does not keep his eyes from wandering and enjoying the bounties of feminine architecture. Morse, advises him that it is his duty to cheat on his wife, if he loves her, so that he does not completely lose it in public one day and embarrass everyone. He offers to train him up in the tactics and strategies to successfully hoodwink the wife and is taken up on his offer.Although Matthau and Morse are the stars, the film is filled with cameo appearances by other big names of the time. These appearances advance the story by presenting various vignettes describes successes and failures of infidelity. These are usually the source of the humor in this film. They are well thought out, often, convoluted or contrived and usually very funny. Jack Benny's penny pinching methods to dump a mistress play particularly well to his public persona.While all the immorality is going on, the film has a surprise ending just as the big goal is a bout to be achieved. It's a fun film but not particularly memorable.
A True Gem. This film is a masterpeice of Spanish Literature made into film.  With classic themes of Love, honor, family and pride this film is one everyone can relate to on some level.  In addition the use of light in this film will take your breathe away.  It is so vivid as to be like another actor in the scenes.  I rented this film with little thought and came away astounded.  Now I own it.  So if you can watch one movie without a car chase or an explosion you ought to make it this one!  What a gem
Great Episode. This is the first episode where we really see the heart of Tony in his dealings with a teenager struggling with the horrible death of his father. A must see
Out of the box,, unusual movie. This movie defies normal conventions and much of the storytelling is done visually.  The plot is easy to follow but the real meat of the movie is contained in the visual scenes.  Much like foreign films, The Cell is much more ambiguous and non literal than mainstream American films.  You could even say that the plot is pedistrian and cliche, but the heart of the movie is how the visuals are executed.  You are drawn into serial killer, Carl's mind.  D'Onofrio's persona disappears and you are left with the madman and the lost, vulnerable abused human.  Vince Vaughn is compelling enough to carry his scenes and doesn't overact.  J.Lo is also low key although I don't think she can convey the complexities of her character.  She does her job but doesn't go deep enough to make it an outstanding performance.  Beware of strong violent images.  If you can stomach it though, you may see an original, beautifully designed film.  I'd rather see gore in this context rather than the low brow slasher/horror type flicks
Mouchette. The greatest fil of one of the very greatest directors!Thanks a lot
One more time -- the greatest of all movies. It is impossible to overpraise this film on any dimension of quality. Visually, it is so rich that I have found in my many watchings of it that it is worth taking your eyes off the centre of the screen and just absorbing what is going on at its peripheries. Depth of image, chiarascuro, mise-en-scen, mood and texture -- all are so nuanced. The cast is almost the definitive Classical Academy of French film and drama of the last century. Only Jean Marais is missing (catch him along with the underrated Maria Casares, who plays the only muted -- and smewhat boring -- part in Les Enfants -- in Cocteau's Orphee -- same period roughyl, same visual brilliance and the same five star rating), Pierre Barasseur, whose 19th century grand passion performance from Othello is in itself superb, the haunting Jean-Louis Barrault who with his wife Madeleine Renaud was the leader in classical French theater post World War II, and of course Arletty, the enigma around whom the entire film centers.... I cannot think of any film with such a peerless cast. Them there is Jaques Prevert's script.... And Carne's direction is peerless, reflecting perhaps his own very enigmatic personality; his other films share the visual and dramatic power of Les Enfants but seem more dated; here, somehow he found the exact style to create a film deeply rooted in history but not locked into it. No one has ever directed such a cast of varied and great actors and given them so much space of expression and style while maintaining a unity.The film is Balzacian in its breadth of story -- reminiscent of Pere Goriot perhaps? -- and covers so many moods and themes and scenes. It can be very funny -- Brasseur as the vain, worldly Frederick LeMaitre -- and so deeply sad -- Barrault as Baptiste, both of which are portrayals based on real actors of the 19th century and both of which are genuinely great in their capturing of the grand acting style of the period without this being pastiche or artificial.It is impossible to overrate this film. If you haven't seen it, don't be put off by the idea that it's a period piece, black-and-white, French and sure to be boring. It's over sixty years old now and still profoundly beautiful, deeply moving and most of all unforgettable.
A must rent. Hands down the best Sci-fi/Horror series on tv today. I am completly addicted
Probably the Best Drama Series Ever Made. I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out
it came from outer space. I like the story line of this movie, but most of all I remember watching it when I was a kid of seven. It was scary back then, even with limited special effects and no graphic details. Watching it now was very enjoyable I found myself going back in time. This film is in its own right a science fiction classic.
Excellent! Simply Excellent. This episode embodies why I love this series. The bad guy is bad - and makes appearances throughout the series.And now, this episode offers some more understanding of the Wraith species and actually BEGS you to learn more of what initially seemed to be a barbaric bunch to kill at all costs.Now you really don't know what to think...except that today is a day of honor.I won't blow it for you. Watch this one FIRST if you're not sure about which episode to sample...and savor what makes this series a landmark in sci-fi adventures.
Cute show. Great shows about Binky taking up cycling and learning to challenge himself. There's a cycling champion, Vance Legstrong, who inspires him to succeed (wonder who that character is modeled after). 'Operation DW' is about DW having surgery to get tubes put in her ears. Some really funny stuff in this one but that's pretty much par for the course with the DW based episodes
Great story and Julia is at her best!. This is a great story which has been wrapped in an entertaining sub-story and well acted by all.  This is Julia's best work in my opinion.  Albert Finney is always a favorite and his role here is absolutely charming.  I would highly recommend this film
Emotionally Moving. This movie seems to come right from the heart of Angelina.  Showing the plight of the parts of the world that many turn their heads to is enlightening.  The chemistry between Angelina and Clive was awesome.  I am now a HUGE Clive Owen fan.I must say, though, I was not real happy with the ending.Am
all about eve. received the movie within a few days and the quality is excellent
GREAT MOVIE !!!. My only regret is that the producers of this DVD did not made any extra features! I would really liked to see some "behind the scene" features about this excellent movie
These guys are talented. I have to say that I picked this one episode out of the many as an example of the talent of these two gentleman.  If you see comedy and want comedy that is more direct and honest in how it portrays different groups, this is the series.I enjoy their skits and think that it simply pokes fun without being mean.  That is hard to do.  The different characters they take on makes me think there is more than two guys, they are that good. In my humble opinion. You do not need to be an Anglophile for the series but it would really help to be an Anglophile Valley girl for the Vicky skit.
Must buy for X fans. I viewed this years ago, and purchased on a whim.  It is a must buy for any X or punk fan
An Osmond's fan delight. This movie was a must see for me when I was a teen.  The antics of Donny and Marie are as wholesome and funny today as they were in the 70's.  I am greatful for this movie to have a bit of childhood to share with my nephews and nieces.  Pure family entertainment.  This flick did not deserve the pans of critics, but then again- if a movie lacks sex, drugs nad destruction who wants to watch it?? Thanks again to the Osmonds for another wholesome entity
A classic and a great vehicle for Ingrid Bergman. Set in the 1870s when the lighting in English households was powered by gas--hence the title--this psychological mystery worked as a diversion from the constant presence of the war for the American public when it was released in 1944.  Starring the incomparable Ingrid Bergman (Paula) in an Oscar-winning role as a woman who marries a dark, handsome and mysterious man (Charles Boyer) only to fall prey to his desire to drive her mad and steal her jewels, Gaslight remains one of director George Cukor's many triumphs.Joseph Cotton, Dame May Whitty, and Angela Lansbury (in her debut at seventeen as a saucy parlor maid) lent strong support.  I was particularly delighted with the busybody Whitty, who was born in 1865 and had made her film debut at the age of 49.   Here she is rapid-fire sure and feisty at age 78, and funny, both intentionally and unintentionally--or I should say that Whitty turned otherwise prosaic lines into little bits of delight.  I also recall her in Hitchcock's Brit classic The Lady Vanishes (1938) in which she had the title role. The interesting thing is that in both movies Whitty meets the young star on a train (Margaret Lockwood there, and Bergman here) and they become friends--well, here their friendship is a bit difficult for Bergman's character for reasons that will become clear when you see the movie.Some of this will seem familiar, especially the somewhat idiotic idea that a man may drive his wife crazy by playing nasty little tricks on her, such as taking down pictures and hiding them, or dimming the gaslights, or walking like a ghost above her bedroom.  And the treatment may be a bit leisurely for today's audiences.  However this movie is very carefully constructed with plausible twists of plot and some fine foreshadowing.  Boyer is almost comical in his machinations at times, mad with jewel lust and syrupy smooth by turns.A good reason to see this black and white classic is to compare how past-master Cukor features his leading ladies.  He also directed Audrey Hepburn in My Fair Lady (1964), Judy Garland in A Star Is Born (1954) and Katharine Hepburn in Adam's Rib (1950) and Pat and Mike (1952) to name a famous few.  One thing is clear, for several decades if you were a leading actress, being in a George Cukor film was an opportunity not to be missed.But see this for Ingrid Bergman.  She dominates the movie with her exquisite beauty and her oh so expressive countenance in one of her more demanding roles.  The famous, beguiling Bergman smile however is not much in evidence since her character is so long-suffering and passive--and this too may try the patience of today's audiences.  You may find yourself wanting to say to Paula, "Get a backbone," "Live a little" and "Get rid of that rake!"  But fear not.  Paula does eventual get back at her oppressor culminating in a (somewhat implausible, but nonetheless agreeable) scene near the end where he is tied up and begging her to get a knife and cut him free..
The Shooter. Dolph decided he wanted to make the transistion from action hero to well respected movie star, so he dedicated himself to acting on broadway in an attempt to relearn his trade, this was his first film afterwards, and you can notice the change, Dolph makes the jump from bare chested shenigans to silk suits and his acting stands him at head and shoulders above the rest , this film has at all, set in the beautiful city of prague, it has great scenery, action scenes(including the traditional groping for a gun, while hanging off the edge of a building), love scenes(dolph manages to turn a lesbian onto men) and great cliches, buy it, you'll love it..
My Favorite Episode. I don't have television, haven't for 11 years. When I learned CBS was allowing free viewing over the internet I checked it out and started watching episodes of CSI, CSI NY, CSI Miami, and NCIS. I found NCIS to be my favorite and this particular show Dead And Unburied is my favorite so far. I enjoy the light-heartedness of NCIS. So I decided to download this episode from Amazon Unbox.I really wish Amazon Unbox would allow me to burn shows I've purchased. As it is they are restricted to viewing on my computer. When Unbox expands this service to allow me to burn DVDs I will likely purchase many more shows this way. I like selecting individual shows
DVD in January 2006. This great film will finally be available on DVD on January 31st, 2006.
Are you "gaslighting" me? (recommended). When Roz asks: 'Are you "gaslighting" me?' in a first-season FRASIER episode, movie buffs instantly recall the tortured Paula (Ingrid Bergman) in GASLIGHT -- a movie classic so symbolic that it is immortalized in verb form. Paula's loyalty and sanity are tested to the limit as the deceitful Gregory (Charles Boyer) convinces his wife she "has no brain at'all" just like her mother. His obsession with gems, confiscation of letters, and mysterious disappearances in the night coincide with unexplained footsteps and dimming gas lanterns. Can her would-be hero (Joseph Cotten) save Paula from a fate worse than death? The conclusion may appear spellbinding to first-time viewers but in retrospect, provides sensible vindication. Each actor plays his part well but Bergman delivers considerable emotion in her facial expressions.Movie quote: "I am mad. I'm always losing things and hiding things and I can never find them, I don't know where I've put them.
HYPE!. After watching HYPE for the first time last year, I was left in awe at the beautifully created masterpiece that I had witnessed.  It came as a shock to me that this film was largely unheard of, and very upsetting when I tried to get my hands on a copy for myself but could not find one.  Therefore I am very pleased that Lionsgate decided to take on HYPE and release it in DVD format.  This movie opened my eyes to the wonders of the Seattle &quot;scene&quot; and the grunge music that I had previously ignored.  The film even inspired me to travle to Seattle and explore it myself!  You do not need to be a fan of NIRVANA or Soundgarden to enjoy this film as it deals with many other grunge acts besides the popular ones, and it is more of an exploration into the societal aspects of this large cultural movement than a direct focus on certain bands.  Enough said, I highly reccommend this movie to anyone interested in musical history.  HYPE is a crowning achievement in my books
Probably the Best Drama Series Ever Made. I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out
A real treat of a movie, and an important one, as well. The Firemen's Ball is one of a handful of Czech films that defined the &quot;New Wave&quot; era, and had a profound influence on filmmakers and critics around the world.  Other important films of this period include Forman's &quot;Loves of a Blonde,&quot; Jiri Menzel's &quot;Closely Watched Trains,&quot; and &quot;Larks on a String&quot; (a Menzel film that hasn't been released on DVD, to my knowledge).  But Firemen's Ball is a personal favorite, probably due to the fact that I lived in the Czech Republic for five years, and attended similar village balls.  The characters in this wicked satire are portrayed with humor, affection and above all a level of realism that remains unsurpassed.  In the end, Forman does what he does best -- he leaves you torn between laughter and tears.  This film is a must-see, especially for those who are interested in understanding how filmmaking evolved in the 60s
Paradise Lost. Everyone should see this movie.  Also, everyone should buy it so they can show it to their friends, so the word can keep spreading, and hopefully and finally, justice will be served
Great cast, but writing sometimes falls through the cracks. The casting here was excellent - Ben Stiller, Elle Macpherson, Sarah Jessica Parker were all great. In fact, I am convinced that Elle Macpherson can act because of the 3 movies I have now seen her in, she plays decidedly different people in each one. She is perfectly cast as Joe's dream woman. I found Eric Schaeffer's character the least appealing of the whole cast. Some of the jokes here are wildly funny.  The audience is never given a clue that the Jane Lindquist character is only getting involved with Joe to indulge the fantasy world he had created of her. I thought it was odd that she enjoyed his voyeurism and then seemed honestly interested in him sexually, but was not interested in a relationship with him. Earlier her character makes a statement that the world makes too much of the sexually charged days in the beginning of relationships, people move on after that part is over and that a lasting relationship is what she wants. That part did not make sense. This could have been improved by some better writing and better character development. The humor here is what makes this worth watching
I got what I ordered. Flesh Gordon is a funny and slightly naughty take-off on the old Flash Gordon serials.  I ordered the DVD.  It arrived quickly.Amazon did its job just fine.  Nothing more to say
The gypsy journey. Fascinating, educating, beautifully done. Congratulations to the film maker and the sound maker. A story in music louder than words
Hello Vietnam,and greetings!. "Hello Vietnam,and greetings!",says Bruno Kirby as Lt. Steven Hauk in one scene of this film. It was this scene where he filled in for radio personality Adrian Cronauer(Robin Williams) who was on reportedly on special assignment. Adrian arrives in Vietnam from America via aircraft. At first the military brass was delighted to have him grace the Vietnam radio airwaves. But they discover that Adrian's brand of humor is outrageous,very much like Howard Stern in real life. They also disagree with the rock 'n roll music he is playing. Hey,this was(set in) 1965 and rock 'n roll was dominating the music world especially with The Beatles and The Rolling Stones from the United Kingdom. When Adrian and Lt. Hauk first met,the lieutenant told Adrian that he was sort of a comedian himself. When the lieutenant first heard Adrian on the air,the lieutenant was not pleased at all with Adrian's stint. "You oughta stick to playing 'normal modes of music',not wild stuff",Lt. Hauk told Adrian in a meeting. The 'normal modes of music' refer to easy listening artists like Andy Williams,Perry Como,Mantovani,Jim Nabors,Lawrence Welk,Frank Sinatra and Percy Faith. "Would Bob Dylan be out of line?",Adrian asks Lt. Hauk and the lieutenant replies,"Way,way,way out of line!". Adrian becomes popular with the fighting men in Vietnam and they hoped that Adrian would permanently do his morning show there. The brass decides to suspend Adrian,bringing heartbreak to fans. When Lt. Hauk did his stint,many listeners wrote and telephoned about how they wanted Adrian back on the air. One listener said in a letter,"Captain Hauk sucks the sweat off a dead man's balls." Another wrote to Lt. Hauk,"You suck,eat a bag of s--t!". So Adrian is back on the air but not for long because Sgt. Dickerson(the late J.T. Walsh),the top man of the brass,demanded that Adrian be cancelled. Sgt. Dickerson's superior loves Adrian and even demanded his reinstatement. Sgt. Dickerson is transferred to Guam since his superior grew tired of the seargeant's abusive attitude. The title of this film is how Adrian began his morning show. On the very last show done by Adrian's friend Lt. Ed Garlick(Forrest Whittaker),Ed began the show saying,"Good morning,Vietnam",just like Adrian. Ed tells listeners about Adrian's departure from Vietnam. We hear Adrian saying,"Goodbye,Vietnam" in a pre-recorded message. Adrian also left Vietnam because of his association with a criminal who's the brother of a Vietnamese woman Adrian befriended. Other funny scenes include Adrian teaching the Vietnamese how to use profanity,Adrian doing a parody of the late Richard M. Nixon on the air and Adrian doing a live performance for a group of fighting soldiers while they were in a parked truck enroute to a battlefield. This film was a megahit for both Williams and director Barry Levinson. They were both at least nominated for Academy Awards. Levinson did win a Best Director Oscar for his next film,RAIN MAN. This film was released theatrically in late 1987 just like THREE MEN AND A BABY. Both films were made by Touchstone Pictures,a division of Buena Vista Pictures. THREE MEN AND A BABY was a megahit as well. Both films were still in theatres by spring 1988. THREE MEN AND A BABY inspired a sequel,why didn't GMV? Obviously nobody had any ideas,not even Mitch Markowitz who composed the screenplay
Wonderful and romantic Disney animation. I watched Disney's animated THE LITTLE MERMAID (1989) in one nasty, angry mood.  Within twenty minutes, I was feeling happy, caught in the spell of a strong story, gorgeous animation, and lively Oscar-winning songs.  The magic of Disney for kids of all ages permeates this story of Ariel, the likeable mermaid who falls in love with a human.  If she can go without her lovely voice for three days and still get the handsome prince to kiss her, she is a human for life.  The catch is that she can never again see her aquatic friends, like her king father and Sebastian the hilarious crab comic relief who almost gets eaten!  The central villainess is one of my all-time favorites, Ursula the sea witch, evil enough for adults and not too scary for kids.  She has stolen Ariel's lilting voice.  The story is taken from Hans Christian Andersen, but with a downbeat ending radically rethought in Disney fashion.  But I have a hunch the Andersen literary circle would approve of  the changes in making this a wonderful family film.  The voice work is perfection, including Jodi Benson as Ariel and Pat Carroll as Ursula.  Alan Menken and Howard Ashman collaborated on the songs; "Under the Sea" won a deserved Oscar, but I like "Part of Your World" and the hilarious "Kiss the Girl" also.The new double-disk DVD of THE LITTLE MERMAID is an absolute must-own, and not just for families with children.  If you are a child at heart, like me, you will treasure it.  And Disney Studios has restored the heck out of it--the colors are gorgeous, the image clarity is flawless, and the remastered soundtrack does justice to the music.  The 83 minute movie is on disk one, at its correct 1.78 moderate wide-screen aspect ratio, along with an audio commentary, should you decide (I did not) to listen to the co-writers and co-directors talk about the movie.  (They do enough of that on disk two.)  Also on disk one are a trailer for LITTLE MERMAID III (straight to video, probably a wise business decision) and a "Kiss the Girl" music video.  There is also a feature that lets you go to a particular song, a popular feature on a movie with these songs and an Oscar-winning music score.Disk two is mammoth, a good three hours.  I went to bed at midnight with the whole games section untouched.  There are 45 minutes of deleted scenes with commentary on what we are watching and why they were cut out.  There is another 45 minutes that goes behind the scenes at Disney Studios in 1989 at a time of great business upheaval to create the mood that this happy and romantic film was made under.  We also get a nine minute segment on animated special effects, like sea storms.  Disney was apparently thinking of doing THE LITTLE MERMAID back in 1941, but changed his mind and thankfully made DUMBO instead.  Or was it PINOCCHIO?  THE LITTLE MATCH GIRL is a lovely and sad animated short adaptation of another Andersen story, an exquisite bonus.  There are also LITTLE MERMAID art galleries and the original theatrical trailer.I still have Games and Activities to do, so I am not sure what to expect.  I gather that Disney was going to do a LITTLE MERMAID ride at Disneyland or Disney World, but changed their minds.  There is something called "UNDER THE SEA: A Virtual Ride" and a live-action segment on life under the sea.  It's an incredible two-disk DVD, and I have a hunch it belongs in every household.  Maybe even two copies--Disney is threatening to put this title back in the vaults for seven more years, and your kids may wear out one copy before seven years is up.  THE LITTLE MERMAID is not quite a Walt Disney immortal animated classic for me, but give it another decade and it might be.  For the time being, it is a fabulous way to spend a long evening with your kids.  Or even alone in a night bedroom.
"I am fire, he is water! How can we ever meet?". For all its low reputation, Samuel Bronston's much-mocked King of Kings is easily the best and most intelligent of the `devotional' versions of the life of Christ, largely because it sets Jesus as a historical figure and, to a degree, a victim of history and politics in troubled times. More importantly, it manages to do it without being as relentlessly dreary and one-note as George Stevens' The Greatest Story Ever Told, which becomes more of an endurance test with each passing year. Even the vigorously-staged battle scenes serve a real dramatic purpose, pitting Barabbas' Davidic warrior would-be Messiah against Jesus' spiritual deliverer ("I am fire, he is water - how can we ever meet?") that is many ways the real conflict of the film: the fight between material pragmatism (the Romans, Herod, Barabbas) and spiritual idealism (Jesus and his followers). Even Caiphas is given a very modern reading, not as a black-hearted villain but as an unpopular Roman-appointed religious leader who genuinely cares for his flock, fearing that Jesus' popularity could be used by the Romans to start a Holocaust that will destroy his people.There's much imagination at work too: while Jeffrey Hunter's Messiah suffers from MGM's insistence on redubbing the part in more `masterful' tones, he proactively interacts with the crowd in the Sermon on the Mount, played almost like a press conference, while the Last Supper takes its visual design not from Da Vinci but from the CND's peace symbol. The casting IS variable - Robert Ryan's John the Baptist, Hurd Hatfield's Pontius Pilate, Harry Guardino's Barabbas, Ron Randell's centurion, Guy Rolfe's Caiphas and Gregoire Aslan and the great Frank Thring as Herod Sr. and Jr. are fine, but Rip Torn is surprisingly awkward as an otherwise well-conceived Judas Iscariot doomed by compromise, Royal Dano's Simon Peter is a better idea on paper than onscreen (particularly when given dialog) and Siobhan McKenna's eminently punchable misty-eyed Mary is a tad too Oirish Catlic for my tastes. Yet despite its weaknesses and the virtual sidelining of Jesus for much of the running time - this is more a film about His times and His effect on those around Him than His life - it's never less than totally involving, and often genuinely moving.Despite reputedly losing interest in post-production, Nicholas Ray's direction is excellent, his mastery of the wide screen making great use of the 70mm format and showing real inspiration in his handling of some of the miracles, scenes greatly enhanced by Miklos Rozsa's superlative score. Even Ray Bradbury's poetic narration, beautifully delivered by Orson Welles, originally intended as a quick fix to paper over the cracks in the narrative, genuinely adds to the film's complex political picture of an occupied territory. Not that some of the cracks aren't still visible, as in the meaningful exchange of looks on the Temple steps between Jesus and Richard Johnson (whose constantly changing part - one day a freed gladiator, the next an Arab, the next a Romanized Jew - was otherwise totally deleted). But they're minor complaints in an extraordinary epic that achieves more of its ambitions than its given credit for.Incidentally, how on earth did they get the obscene graffiti on the barracks walls past the censors in 1961? Less obvious on the DVD copy, you can't miss it on the 70mm prints!Warner's DVD is a beautiful transfer and, unlike MGM/UA's slightly cropped laserdisc issue, in the correct aspect ratio. Extras are thin, though - a teaser trailer and brief newsreel footage
Needs Avatar the last airbender. Okay you guys have amazing, cool, and sweet videos on Amazon. My favorite though is Avatar and I have bought every single episode you have so far. Your episode downloads are magnificent to see on my creative zen vision: M.I had a quick tip though: Can you get more Avatar the Last Airbender Digital downloads. Please!
How to be yourself in spite of ignorance of others. What a delightful movie full of nuance and beautiful about a boy who loves wearing dresses and a family trying to accomodate him as best they can.  What is particularly brilliant is that the family tries to help but they are faced (as is the boy) with the tension between individual desires and the demands of society to live within strict gender roles and expression of those roles.  A GREAT MOVIE
Passable. This film is really only good for two things.1. Chris O'Donnell appears without his shirt on for one scene2. Faye Dunaway plays a crazy drunk (ultimate camp!
Still entertaining after 35 years. Just as entertaining as it was 35 years ago.  John Adams' opening line: "one useless man is a disgrace, two are a law firm, and three or more are a Congress" is still one of my all time favorites
Absorbing drama. A complex drama in two movements: this was a worth adaptation of Anita Shreve bestseller artistically directed for Kathryn Bigelow whose style camera work reminds us to the Chabrol of the seventies , (The butcher)and Antonioni (L eclisse) .The story is told in parallel times , when two modern couples decide to go to New Hampshire and visit the stage where two brutal murderers were commited 125 years ago , in which an innocent man is declared guilty and punished with death .The slow rhtym is revealed with nuance and psichological mood , the defiant glances , the sensuality and the lack of inspiration of William Burroughs (Sean Penn) . Precisely in contrast with absence of creative fire , his husband seeks the clues far beyond the official story .She will be rebuilding this macabre and mysterious puzzle , involved in a complex web of silents , incest and madness .In both narrative lines the tension grows , and these stories admirably never intersect but they are edited perfectly with extraordinary and dramatic links .All the characters have something to hide , the loneliness and hopeless are just behind the door , the poetry spills through the plot ; and the beating mistery slowly appears in front of the viewer with its merciless crudeness .Sarah Polley stole the show with her complex acting . She is an overwhelming young actress and is a hopeful promise in this craft , together with Naomi Watts .Certainly there is an undeniable european influence in its descriptive and paced flow . The corporal and visual languages are fundamental in this superb work .Watch that film . Bigelow reveals as a great promise director with this work.
An absolute MUST-SEE set of episodes!. I thought all three episodes were really great.  They all possess the elements that make watching these volumes an absolute priority.  The videos bring out the 007 in West and the master of disguise in Gordon.  The  episodes are action packed and dig deep into the rare science fiction which  is amazingly and marvelously applied to the 1865 setting making &quot;The  Wild Wild West&quot; the best western ever.  That's just my opinion.  Watch  the episodes and see for yourselves
Topper's RETURNED!. And he's got a carload of women! Actually, not a carload ,just two... One of whom happens to be a ghost! She drags topper to an old creepy house to find out who killed her. The house happens to be full of all sorts of secret passages, and WEIRD personalities.And of course, Mrs. Topper suspects that the young lady who got Cosmo over here is 'the other woman'. This movie is truly funny, and it's backed up by Eddie, or Rochester, Jack Benny's Valet. A Must-See
Crisp and punchy tabloid cinema. G -men is in some measure a calculated response by Warner Brothers to the new production code in Hollywood and the increasingly strident noises from the Catholic League of Decency about what it saw as the amorality of major Hollywood pictures especially the gangster genre.They took  their major gangster icon ,James cagney and put him on the right side of the law .In G-Men James Cagney changed sides but not his image; there is little to distinguish the ruthlessness of his gangster characters from the actions of his government agent in this movie.The persona is still built around cockiness,toughness and amorality allied to a dgree of temperamental headstrongness,but here these characteristics are deployed on the right side of the law.He plays James"Brick" Davis ,a yopung man pit through law school by McKay ,a paternal big shot crime lord ;when Brick's pal (Regis Toomey )joins the FBI on graduataing from law school he is shot and killed by gangsters.Davis vows revenge and joins the Bureau to seek vengeance on the hoods .This  fierce dedication does not prevent him from enjoying an amorous dalliance with his chief's daughter along the wayThe movie is fast paced ,with mostly short ,staccato action scenes and propelled along by brisk if somwhat featureless direction by Wiilliam Keighley .In the course of the movie references ( fictionalised ) are made to several prominent events of Bureau history -Dillinger,Baby Face Nelson ,the Kansas City depot massacre ,the Kansas-Missouri bank holdups .The movie was made with the full backing of the Bureau and featured several actual agents in walk on rolesThis is pure pulp cinema -streamlined and to the point .Cagney as ever is superb and the support performance from Robert Armstrong ,Barton McLane ,William Harrigan and LLoyd Nolan are on the money .Only Margaret Lindsay lets the side down in the acting department -her affected ,and un natural British sounding accent is incongrous .Strong second tier gangster movie making -slick ,propulsive and entertaining with scarcely a wasted second
We need more Tilghman movies. Amazingly, 3 of the 8 reviewers (myself included) are related to Tilghman....which says more about Hollywood than the descendants of this great man.  There is so much material from his life to base movies on and it simply hasn't been done for some reason.I found this movie to be wonderful if only to let the world know that Tilghman even existed..and his death was an important event so I'm glad it was portrayed.  The acting was well done and in general the casting was great.  The Wiley Lynn character at first seems over the top but if you are familiar with the man you realize that this was a very accurate portrayal.  Lynne was eventually brought down in a hail of lead but not after taking down another beloved man.I had some problems with the accuracy of the film though...if you've ever been to Chandler, Oklahoma you won't see huge mountains in the distance, and Tilghman never rode his horse from Chandler to Cromwell..he loved his car.  I love Sam Elliot (and he does a great job) but he's just not a 70+ year old man.  I wish the older children (from his frist marriage) were shown and the funeral and multiple memorial services he was given could have been mentioned.  Other than I highly recommend this film
Only interested in the performances. I bought this because I wanted to watch the performances. The rest was just gossip. I was not disappointed in the performances. They are great. I can see why people got a little bit attached to this period in his career, but if we all pay close attention, each period in his career is special. We get a chance to watch him communcate lovingly with his muse and their relationship always stirs the soul
Classic Movie, Recieved in a Timely Fashion. It was exactly what I wanted, and it arrived quickly
Van Helsing.... What an interesting monster movie!   You get vampires, werewolves, Frankenstein, and Dr. Jekyll & Mr. Hyde all rolled into one.   This movie takes advantage of the current state of special effects and makes most everything appear quite lifelike.The film has an overall dark, gothic feel to it, with good performances by vampire hunter Hugh Jackman in the title role and by the lovely Kate Beckinsale.The film is not for the faint hearted, there's lot's of violence and gore. If you're a fan of vampire movies, you'll like this one.
Ripe for the picking. A bit campy in spots, a bit ahead of its time in others, Westworld looms as a potential goldmine for trilogy-happy Hollywood.  Introduce an all-star cast at the beginning, split them up to the three different worlds, and end the first film with the characters escaping their grisly fate... only to find themselves in Medieval World.  Repeat formula for the second part, adding in the characters who went off to that park, then shunt the survivors off to join the rest at Roman World for the big third film finale.  Seriously, why is somebody not making this already
clever one of a kind reincarnation thriller. reincarnation, amnesia and a fascination with scissors combine to make this a little known classic. superb acting from british comedian emma thompson and shakespearean actor/director kenneth brannagh. the ending will surprise you
A White Cat?!. After viewing Wag the Dog I can say that I did in fact enjoy watching it, but I'm not wholly sure why. Well lets start with a few problems I had with it to give my head a chance to think it over one more time. My main beef with this film is that at some times the plot drags along a little too slow, without hardly anything happening, or much keeping you distracted until a plot twist came into effect. I also have to say that I thought their choice for background music quite odd for what the movie was based on; the music used although hardly used, makes the whole thing seem light-hearted or like a fairly tale which for this movie is bad because the whole idea of it is to make he viewer question what the media tells you. And music like that just makes it a little harder to believe.Anyway, I really liked the idea of not even including the president as a character in the movie. He was just heard from the other end of the phone saying dumb things like "That cat should defiantly be white." or "It sounds too corny." That adds to the main reason I enjoyed this movie; Its unconventional yet still effective. It doesn't really fit into one given genre, so I have to slap the broad Drama/Comedy label onto it. Which makes it difficult to compare to other movies of the aforementioned genres. What I mean by that is that I couldn't recommend this to a fan of Comedy or drama, because it ends up being a mix of both, so if you a genre buff you probably won't enjoy wag the dog. But people with an open mind will, however, be able to see past the need of having a genre plastered on everything and enjoy this movie for what it is.The acting is as expected from just a star-studded cast that includes such big names as Robert De Niro, Dustin Hoffman,Dennis Leary and Willie Nelson. I don't know how much better you could expect the acting in a movie to be. Of course its really Hoffman and Di Niro who shine in this movie; they work well off each other making you  forget who they are in real life and think of them as Stanley Motss and Conrad Brean.All in all I would recommend Wag the dog to anyone who enjoys movies, Comedies, Satires, and/or people who just enjoy a new idea or plot. Take it from Someone who has only ever really enjoyed a handful of movies in their life; you should see this movie
Ginger Takes Center Stage (DVD Review). In this eighth installment of Fred & Ginger films, Ginger displays her talents not only as a dancer but also as an actress and a singer. She performs all three simultaneously in The Yam. She causes mischief while under the hypnotic influence of Tony Flagg (Fred Astaire), throwing sticks and dinner rolls, breaking glass, driving erratically, and shooting skeet. The psychiatry is definitely unconventional, but it is a comedy after all. The slow motion dancing in the dream sequence is very smooth and kind of cool. A running joke where Aunt Cora (Luella Gear) keeps telling Judge Joe Travers (Clarence Kolb) to sit down adds a couple of more laughs. Typecasting prevails here; look for Hattie McDaniel (Gone with the Wind) playing a maid here, too.In the vintage short "Public Jitterbug No. 1" a group of "Feds" is out to catch Jitterbug Dancer #1. The tap dancing is superb. The cigarette and match-eating routine is a neat trick. (1939 Run Time 19:01)In the WB cartoon "September in the Rain" the labels of packaged goods in a general store come to life and perform. A written preface comments on how racist it is. However, the stereotyping did not bother me, and I would not have even noticed if they did not point it out. Nevertheless, I am glad they were sensitive about it. (1937 Run Time 4:39)Note: No featurette, running commentary, or theatrical trailer is on this DVD, which is why I gave it four stars instead of five
Cool Walk. I won't go into the details other reviewers shared, but the sound of Lee Marvin's shoes touching the asphalt in the beginning of the movie is quite haunting, fascinating and original. Marvin is shown walking through the airport and even though the next scene portrays him as standing by a window and meditating in a hotel room, the sounds of his walk continues. It gives touch to the dreamy atmosphere of the whole movie
The theme of Transcendence is important--not the "factual debates about Rubin Carter .". I was very touched by this movie.  It was not the actual story/plot, or it's accuracy that was important to me.  Rather, what was meaningful about this film was the portrayal of a personal Transcendence the main character brings about in his life--from rage, hate, and bitterness, to self caring, willingness to learning, inner directedness, to a sense of spirituality and something "bigger than himself," to forgiveness and "letting go," and then the untimate Transcendence--reaching out, risking trusting others with his core pain, and risking loving others.  Also, this film portrays some very rare people who demonstrate commitment to their principles, determination to care about "the individual" and to rectifying an injustice.  I do not know whether or not Rubin Carter murdered those people.  From my stand point, this is a movie that models personal healing.  It is touching and inspirational--even if it were to turn out to be total fiction
A terrific "B" film noir. No one smokes in it and there is very little rain on the night streets, but a 1941 Fox release called I WAKE UP SCREAMING is definitely a film noir--and a very good one.  Working with a Dwight Taylor screenplay, director Bruce Humberstone (who directed four Charlie Chan films at Fox) has a terrific noir cast--atypically cast Betty Grable is Jill Lynn.  Her fashion model sister, Vicki (Carole Landis), is found murdered.  Leading the suspects is sports promoter Frankie Christopher (Victor Mature), along with oily detective Ed Cornell (Laird Cregar) and hotel desk clerk Elisha Cook. Jr.  There is also a gossip columnist (Alan Mowbray).  Maybe Jill herself is the killer in an act of jealousy.  Possibly Jill and Frankie did the crime together.I WAKE UP SCREAMING has wonderfully atmospheric New York City locales.  The movie has beautiful B&W photography by Edward Cronjager, who worked in Technicolor with Ernst Lubitsch a couple of years later on HEAVEN CAN WAIT (1943).  And it has very suspenseful plotting, with the classic noir flashback device.  Vicki's body is discovered in the opening scenes.  For most of the movie, Frankie and Jill are being interrogated in two police offices under harsh lights, while also being given "the third degree" by the pesty Cornell all over Manhattan.  The ending is a real surprise, or was to me.I WAKE UP SCREAMING also makes beautiful use of "Over the Rainbow" (borrowed from MGM?) and the classic Fox "Street Scene" theme.  This is an 82 minute "B" movie and no classic, but is still a gripping and rewarding entry in the Fox Film Noir DVD series with an outstanding cast and crew.  It is certainly worth your time, if you like film noir.  The underrated Grable does excellently in a non-musical role.  Humberstone had just completed SUN VALLEY SERENADE with her.  DVD bonuses include an audio commentary by noir expert Eddie Muller, a deleted scene, and alternate HOT SPOT opening titles.  This movie is currently selling for only $10 brand-new from Amazon, so it is probably a better sales item than a rental.
Good for a little-wacked Monster movie. Notice to parents, there is some verbal material unsuited for little ones,  adult nature. A woman grows to 50-ft placing an extra strain on a strained  marriage. Daryl Hanna and Daniel Baldwin. This is a light monster film not  gory. It is good for that it carries some laughs, punny stuff, and summer  flick character. No deep story, folks
Xanadu DVD. The DVD was received in a very secured package.  Delivery was prompt and on time.  Watching this movie provided a welcomed environment
Mock On!. More than 20 years old now and a little dated, Spinal Tap is still loads of fun with the "mockumentary" gang including Christopher Guest and Michael McKean (who did the delightful "Best in Show" in 2000).  Every aspect of `60s and `70s rock music is lampooned.  Surprisingly, director/interviewer Rob Reiner comes off a little flat--but maybe that's just to help highlight the rest of the delightfully dim cast of characters.  "Big Bottom" (a sendup of "Fat Bottomed Girls"--one of my politically incorrect favorites), the "sophisticated" "Sex Farm", and the controversial "Smell the Glove" (ultimately released as Tap's "Black Album") are among "Tap's" big hits.
The best movie of all time!. This movie has it all, especially for baby boomers of the early 1970's. Blethyn, as a betrayed widow is priceless and Nigel Ferguson as her pot smoking gardener steals the movie with his characteristic good humor and good looks. The English scenery is charming and Blethyn's loyal village friends top off the movie's touching humor and happy ending. I have given this DVD as Christmas gifts and my friends have loved it too. A MUST OWN
Sergeant York is among my top 10 favourite movies!. This movie is among the top 10 of my favourite movies of all time!It not only honours the life and achievments of the great Christian man Alvin York, it honours many truths of the Christian faith, God's power to to transform sinners, the virtue of forgiving your enemies, putting God before man, the virtue of earning an honest livelihood.Though it does all this, it is not a "preachy" movie, it simply tells the amazing story of a simple farmer who becomes the greatest hero of WW1.Other movies in my top 10 include: It's a Wonderful Life, Forrest gump, Shawshank Redemption, To End All Wars, Les Misrables.
Groundbreaking Ark of a classic!. It was the summer of 1981 (I wasn't even born yet) and a movie that would give Harrison Ford's career a much-needed bolster with the first chapter in the ultimately successful Indiana Jones trilogy entitled simply "Raiders of The Lost Ark" and this is still light years ahead of it's time especially when placed against countless generic action movies of recent times.Set in the Dust Bowl year of 1936 Indiana Jones is a world archaeologist who is on the quest of recovering an ancient Artifact called the Lost Ark from a remote tribe in Amazonian Brazil but the ark is being persued by rival archaeologists who are trying to gain a hold of it and turn it over the German Nazi-forces who plan on using to completely take over the world and now with the help of a vixen bartender named Marion Ravenwood, Indie and Marion must recover the ARk and prevent the Nazis from gaining power from the Ark.This movie is just utterly amazing and has aged so well even after 23 years since it's release back in 1981. The special effects especially by 1981 standards are amazing and hardly look dated. The acting is awesome especially by Harrison Ford as he shows the emotional vulnerability of Indie and Karen Allen is head on Perfect as Marion Ravenwood.The third part "The Last Crusade" is my favorite of the three Indiana Jones movies but "Raiders Of The Lost Ark" is a very close second favorite tied with 1984's "Temple of Doom".This is a must-have movie but buy it with the Indiana Jones DVD collection! It is amazing!
Like Oh My God! This movie is totally Bitchin'!. The Popular `80s teen film "Valley Girl" based on Frank Zappa's Novelty Song of the same title, popularized the image of the "Valley girl". A Valley Girl usually referred to girls from The San Fernando Valley in California. This type of girl usually dressed in preppy colorful clothes, had their own slang terms, cared about their social status, and usually had money. In 1983 Valley Girl, the movie was released, and became a cult status film, depicting the Valley Girl lifestyle. The movie stars Deborah Foreman, as Julie Richman, a popular, preppy girl from the San Fernando Valley, and Nicolas Cage as Randy, a young punk from Hollywood. After dumping her preppy, good-looking boyfriend, Julie attends one of her friends parties and ends up meeting Randy, even though they are from 2 different worlds, these two show that opposites do attract and instantly become an item. Even though her parents are cool with their relationship, her friends aren't, and pressure Julie into dumping him, so she can get back with her Ex. This film is not only great, but has an incredible soundtrack, with so many great New Wave hits. Watch for musical appearances by The Plimsouls, and Josie Cotton in this film as well. For those of you who were around when this film came out will probably view it with nostalgia, as for those of us who weren't will love looking at the awesome fads, trends, and listening to the great music. Overall this  film is like totally trepindicular, fer Sure!
Don't watch with your parents. Great acting.  Don't the let the simple title fool you.
Good fun for all the family. I got his movie for my two little nieces because I knew they would love it and they did, and so did I!  This is a delightful and fun filled movie where the Wild Thornberries and the Rugrats meet up in an adventure of a lifetime.Stranded on a tropical island after their boat capsizes, the Rugrats and their families have to survive in an environment to which they are not at all suited too but help is at hand in the guise of the Wild Thornberries who just happen to be in the area on one of their jaunts.The adults squabble and bicker (but they all make up and work together when the children are in danger) whilst the Rugrats lurch from one crazy adventure to the next and we are treated to Spike the dog speaking for the first time (Bruce Willis) because everyone knows that Eliza Thornberry has a wonderful secret, she can speak to animals and they understand her and can speak back!It's a nice movie because it brings together two great animated series, it also is a fun film that young kids can watched and be enthralled with, that is what I like about it the most, it is an enjoyable cartoon romp for the whole family
A Movie So Bad It's Good. This movie breaks some story rules, including introduction/insertion of random new characters towards the end. Still, funny enoughfor a movie that seems to try so hard to be so good and comes out oh, so bad. *grin* Definitely worth watching
The Intersection Of Film, Fact, And Genius - Unforgettable. At its core, this is a film about what happens when a person defies the system, any system.  It is the true story of Frances Farmer, a beautiful, smart, and rebellious movie star of the `30s who seemed to have it all.  Because of her many advantages the system took a while catching up to her; maybe that's where the fury and vengeance originated.  Payback required more than a pound of flesh, the system wanted her spirit, her intellect, and her soul.  The portrayal of psychiatry as practiced in those days is unlike anything you will see anywhere else, it makes Cuckoo's Nest look like a vacation in Tuscany.  Indeed, psychiatry in this film is less a healing force than a means of preserving social order and conformity.Jessica Lange deserved the Oscar for this role, that she didn't get it is a crime.  This is a solo masterpiece performance easily on a par with Streep in Sophie's Choice.  Lange has the beauty, intelligence, sophistication, and edge to play this complicated woman, and she throws herself into the part fearlessly.  From saucy starlet oozing coy charm, to radical intellectual hanging with lefties in NYC, to belligerent scrapper knocking heads with studio moguls, to star-crossed lover inviting disaster and betrayal the way others invite friends over to dinner, to self-destructive victim descending into the darkness of booze and pills, to adult infant manipulated by a fiercely controlling mother, to psychiatric patient - abused for sport and disassembled; Lange shifts through facets like she's driving a Porsche on a country road, you never notice her changing gears, every minute of the ride is thrilling.The best thing about this film, apart from Lange, is that is shows, it doesn't tell.  The viewer is left to interpret without heavy-handed moralizing.  The truth of Frances Farmer's life is so fascinating and bizarre that simply bringing it to the screen is more than enough.  Few of us have had the experience of being involuntarily committed to a mental hospital - much less lobotomized - but all of us have tried to thwart the system at one point or another and paid for it.  Every viewer can applaud Farmer's irreverence and idealism, even when it's naive, and feel sorrow when she must confront the cruel consequences.This is a dark movie, not all Hollywood lives have happy endings, but it is a true movie.  Frances takes you places you have never gone and can barely imagine; Jessica Lange delivers the performance of lifetime - not just her lifetime, anybody's lifetime
Enjoyable. I bought two sci-fi movies at the same time...this one and Velocity Trap.  I have to say, I enjoyed Crossworlds far more than the other.
LOTS OF FUN!. This movie is great. Vanessa Williams is not only beautiful, but you would think she has been competing in professional Latin dancing for real-she is very talented. Chyayanne also heats up the dance floor and is very charming-not to mention easy on the eyes. The dance scenes are HOT!! It is loaded with not only great dances, but great Latin music and likable characters. It is fun from beginning to end and will leave you wanting to hit the dance floor!!!
Why isn't this movie on DVD?. It's been a long time since i've seen this movie, but it was cute and funny as well as fantastical.  I never thought the Cyndi Lauper / Jeff Goldblum combo would have worked, but their cooky combo made a lovable eccentricity and bond between their characters as well as with Peter Falk.Lots of humor in this movie depsite the subject revolving around two Psychics headed for South America chased by other psychics trying to beat them there.  Surprisingly infused in this cooky caper are some short poignant, heart-warming interludes with Peter Falk as well as some neat special effects.Bombed at the box office and did okay on cable, but a much underrated story with its own quirky charm.
Come on....it wasn't that bad. The movie wasn't as horrible as some make it out to be.  It surely wasn't "the worst vampire movie ever".  Jon Bon Jovi didn't suck in the roll either.
The Big One: Michael Moore's Crusade against Corporate America. G'D bless you Michael Moore for your crusades not only in the books you have written but also for your doccumentary movies to safeguard the working man blue collar workers. The Big One is depressing and funny at the same time. His political satire and savy humour helps you deal with the horrible reality of the coruption in government and in corporations in america. It is about time someone stood up to the corruption of the ceos and corporations. G'D gave michael moore the heart and the guts to go out there and fight the good fight not only for faith but also for justice.
Streisand proved she's not Nuts.  She's shrewd!. Nuts was a hit off-Broadway play.  Claudia Draper (Barbra Streisand) is a high priced call girl who has killed one of her johns (Leslie Nielsen).  Her parents, Arthur and Rose Kirk (Karl Malden and Maureen Stapleton), just want to sweep it under the carpet by having her committed to an institution.  But she doesn't anything to do with her parents or their scheme.Her high priced lawyer quits after she attacks him. That gets the attention of public defender Aaron Levinsky (Richard Dreyfuss).  The arraignment judge (Dakin Matthews) is displeased with Levinsky's wanting to take this to trial and only gives him the weekend to prepare his case for the sanity trial. Their relationship begins is a chess match of trust.Levinsky gathers the evidence he needs for the trial and the sanity trail begins with trial Judge Stanley Murdoch (James Whitmore).  The first prosecution witness is Dr. Morrison (Eli Wallach) who testifies that Claudia should be institutionalized.  This followed by her mother Rose who testifies about her past.  And then her stepfather Arthur testifies.  During the testimony, Claudia first draws her stepfather as a vampire then her parents with no mouths.  Aaron puts the clues together and discovers that Arthur was molesting Claudia.The defense puts up its only witness, Claudia.  Even under sedation, Claudia makes her points.  The prosecution recalls Dr. Morrison and his testimony inflames Claudia and she makes an impassioned rebuttal.Martin Ritt and Barbra Streisand assembled a flawless cast.  The role of Claudia was made for Streisand.  She has a field day with it.  Maureen Stapleton is always a joy to see and she hits all emotional levels with this role.  Karl Malden usually plays the stoic heroic man.  This was an underrated performance and should have been garnered more attention.  James Whitmore had a small pivotal role but showed what featured actor really means.  And this is probably Richard Dreyfuss' best performance.Martin Ritt was one of the great directors and he liked nothing more than a controversial film.  This was a perfect film for him.Streisand did triple duty on this film besides starring, she produce the film and did the musical score.  Streisand has shown that she has a talent for scoring films.  Before, she just wrote music for songs.  This was a big step for her and it proved that she can do more than the normal performer.If you like high drama, courtroom films or just plain good acting, this is your film.DVD EXTRAS: Commentary by Barbra Streisand
Profoundly disturbing... One of the most truly despairing documentaries ever filmed, this film chronicles the cruel exploitation and empty lives of Eastern European teenage hustlers. The boys are allowed to simply speak to the camera, and their stories are harrowing and unflinching. Their narratives are intercut with an astonishingly frank interview with a director of teen porn films, who eagerly recounts his abusive methods for soliciting performances while carving up cadavers in his part-time job as coroner. The documentary has a very cool feel to it... it's a gritty, unemotional glimpse at this slice of life. White-on-white subtitles are somewhat difficult to read, and music is slightly intrusive
The Magnificent Buster. There's nothing I can add to what has already been said about these films themselves, and how beautifully they showcase the genius of Buster Keaton--his brilliance with stunt gags in OH and with cinematic tricks in SJ.I would like to comment on the music.  Unlike a previous reviewer, I find the added music score of SJ mostly apt and a credit to the moods and tones of the film, although there are moments when it draws too much attention to itself. The music for OH, though, just doesn't work.  A great deal of it is ragtime--for a film set in the 1830s!--and it often doesn't match up at all with what's going on on screen.  (An exception is the climactic waterfall sequence, where the music is pretty good.)I have an old videotape of a "Great Performances" showing of "Our Hospitality" from the late 80s or early 90s, with a magnificent orchestral score by Carl Davis.  I wish THAT version was available on DVD, but it doesn't seem to be.  But at least these films do have orchestral scores, and not piano or organ accompaniment--which can work well enough in a theatrical showing, if it's done well, but which in general diminishes any film it's attached to
Makes you smile. This is just a wonderful, romantic, funny movie, which I finally just watched.  This movie seems as timely today as it must have been when it was released in the late 1980s.  I've always loved Kevin Bacon and this movie just confirms that he is a multitalented actor.  Loved McGovern also as a young and happy wife.  Wow, Alec Baldwin was good looking in his younger days!Anyways, this is a great movie.  Kick off your shoes, get the popcorn and cozy up!
tombstone. I love this epic western. The acting from all the cast is enormous and I would invite any western lover to purchase and enjoy
Real Movie-Hits home. The story of a young white lawyer who goes to play ball in Chicago's inner city Cabrini Green. With a lively cast of characters who play true to life people and a bumpin' soundtrack, it's a great movie. Michael Warren and D.B. Sweeney play two men who form a unique friendship to overcome the hardships of inner-city life, breaking many of the steriotypical molds applied to people of the home of some of the greatest basketball stars the world can ever know. As a white kid playing ball on the crest of the city, this movie is my untold story
One of Milos Forman's Best. Don't get me wrong. I love AMADEUS and CUCKOO's NEST etc. But this was just such a quietly funny and enjoyable film, I have to say it may almost be my favorite from Milos Forman. I think I first heard it spoken of by James Mangold(in the commentary for his film HEAVY). Mangold was in awe of Milos Forman and also enjoyed Ozu's films. That being said, I was quite excited for the dvd to be released, and was not at all dissapointed in the film. It's really funny and heartbreaking-I loved it
2 stars for narrator, 5 stars for story. If you are looking for an audio version on tape, this is a fine option for this wonderful book. As you can see from all the glowing reviews, Wind in the Willows is a can't-miss classic. I bought the cassettes for a long car trip with a 5-year-old (we've read & re-read an abridged hardback) and while the story and characters provided much amusement for the full 10 hours, I was entirely sick of the narrator's syrupy voice and odd accents within 15 minutes. All that being said, if this is the only audio cassette version you can find, go for it.
Strange, but true. This film had a powerful effect on me. 95% of the people I know don't read books. I met a millionaire not long ago, who boasted to me that he had never read a book in his life. Lady Di was reported never to have read anything --- except perhaps fashion mags. My children hardly read, and their husbands and wives certainly don't. My ex-wife never read anything. Her father thought Ulysses was a dirty book. I stopped watching television in 1980, and I own 10,000 books --- but not Fahrenheit 451, which I'd read about 45 years ago. This was long enough for me not to compare the film with Bradbury's text, but the message came through the movie medium loud and clear, and with a very solid punch to the plexus. The manner in which it is written, played and directed, added to its impact. This world of sleep-walkers perfectly matched what is already all around us. The style was strange, but gradually you realise that this strangeness is actually what is now completely normal. People live and work like automated morons. They can't think for themselves, and their critical faculties are almost totally atrophied. They can't conduct a stimulating conversation of any kind: in fact, present them with an idea, or attempt to initiate a discussion, and they'll often become angry. Some of the several low end reviews on this site illustrate precisely what the film depicts. Ludicrous suggestions: remake it with mad Mel Gibson. Have infantile Spielberg direct it. Bulk it out with computerised SFX. These ghastly proposals precisely reflect the mentality of the sub-humans which the film targets, and many of them seem unable to understand their own language, let alone write it, or spell it. This is a memorable film, for those whose memories still function. Unlike the Captain of the firemen
One of MGM's Best. Howard Keel, Kathryn Grayson, Ann Miller, Tommy Roll, Bob Fosse, Carol Haney, Keenan Wynn, James Whitmore, and music by Cole Porter.  "nuff said.Brush up your Shakespeare!!!
Informative. This was my first download and it was "free".  The download performed well.  "The Mystery of Edgar Allan Poe" was informative.  It ran up to 50 minutes. This was a Unbox Video Download. It started with the typical intro and ended with the credits. Some individuals did not get a complete download so i included my experience with the Unbox download.  i hope the review was helpful. ty
Scary and Wonderful. I had waited thirty years to get Let's Scare Jessica To Death, and now I have it on DVD thanks to this great seller. Fast delivery, too
Perfect love makes perfection in all. I find it odd that when reviewing the reviews of this film that people seem to either give it perfect or abysmal scores.  The dichotomy of opinion is probably a direct result of the skill and immense power of Leconte's images, (especially those that his chosen actress affords us).Leconte is a master and quite possibly the greatest living auteur currently making films.  His movies often contain a refreshing difficulty that gives one hope that images still mean something, that film is still worthy of being explicated, that someone still cares enough to think that much without being overly clever such as the Coens and Anderson.  I shouldn't say still.  I should say is and will be, as Leconte is on a different level than any who has ever worked including Kieslowski (the master of images).  I enjoy how Leconte has said that although it was his second period piece he approached the film as if that had nothing to do with it, learning from "Ridicule".  I should point that out I have no problem with "Ridicule" and the fact that it is a period piece has a great deal to do with the presentation, but I can see what he meant.  Like I said, I enjoy the statement, but I should also point out I'm a jerk.Binoche and Auteuil are two of my favorite actors and this film shows them at their virtuosic best.  They deliver amazing performances of a truly passionate couple who both hold unconditional love for the other which in itself contains ultimate trust of decision and character.  Possibly more Auteuil's for Binoche's but the sympathy generated by his character fuels her as an equally sharing partner, making any difference negligible.  There is a third character, Neel, but he is there only to accentuate the relationship between the other two.The movie, quite simply is about unconditional love and what it means to love unconditionally.  There is a subplot of equal merits (mainly concerning Neel) about the belief in redemption, and what it truly means to believe in redemption.  In short it is about the consequences of action through belief, more so out of the love for another than those of moral ground or stance.  Some people are not willing to accept the belief that actions can or should occur solely out of sympathy for another.  Some people will never allow themselves to love unconditionally.  Some people will not understand or even like this film.Binoche deserves a prize that doesn't yet exist for her most exquisite performance.  Leconte deserves recognition for what he has done and what he has given us with this film, certainly one of the best I have ever seen.
The best old movie I've seen. I recently read The Fountainhead and Atlas Shrugged for the first time and found this version of The Fountainhead to be the best old movie I've seen.  Granted, I don't watch a tremendous number of old movies, but I really enjoyed and recommend this movie
Epic Korean Drama. Koreans honor their greatest military hero in this epic drama which takes place in the late 1500s. The career and tactics of this Admiral are still studied at the U.S. Naval Academy, and doubtless those of other nations. The screenplay is based on a couple of novels, so there is some fiction, but the life of Yi Soon Shin was well documented, so there's plenty of fact supporting the story.If you are not familiar with Korean Drama, it's good to keep in mind that  this is not a Hollywood product, but they do very well with special effects and such considering the non-Hollywood budgets involved, and it's easy to see past all that and enjoy the tale being told.It's a long series, but presents an epic with power, depth and dimension and well worth watching it unfold through each and every episode.It would be great also to see KBS make other dramas available for viewing through Amazon, such as "Seoul 1945".
Can I give this 6 stars?. &quot;Clambake&quot; is by far the greatest piece of cinema seen this side of Memphis. I love Elvis! While the costumes are a tad sketchy in this film (this includes Elvis' suit that looks like a baseball and the transparent cover-up on the silver bikini girl), the songs (music *and* lyrics), are stellar. Scintillating, if you will. I wish I could find a cd-soundtrack! I have seen this film at least a dozen times. In fact, the first time I saw it, I watched it 3 days in a row, showing it to all my friends, who have since fallen in love with the cinematic genius that is &quot;Clambake.&quot;Shelley Fabares turns in an Oscar-worthy performance. Katharine Hepburn stole the award that rightly belongs to Ms. Fabares.Will this movie be loved by you? I have &quot;C-O-N-F-I-D-ence&quot; that it will be
nominado al premio nobel de la paz. basada en una historia real, nos pone pensar si realmente es la pena de muerte un metodo de justicia. Tookie nominado al premio nobel de la paz  por sus escritos sobre las gangas y/o pandillas en el estado de california y sus consecuencias, trabajo para orientar a los nios y alejarlos de estas y todo desde la prision donde cumplia condeda por asesinato. Claro y la estupenda interpretacion de Jamie Foxx en mi apreciacion unos de sus mejores papeles dramaticos
It's not that they're stupid, they just don't know anything. Stand and deliver is one of my favorite movies. It's the story of a man who begins teaching at a high school in the slums of Los Angeles, expecting to teach Computer Science. When he arrives what he instead finds is that there is not computer department, and he's stuck teaching basic math to a bunch of social misfits. The beginning of this movie sets the stage wonderfully by showing us the kind of people who inhabit the city as he drives through it on the way to the first day of school. When he arrives at the school we see the students in their natural environment (and a rough one it is). What is a teacher to do?The protagonist of this awe-inspiring story (Jaime Escalante) is a wonderful example of what can happen when a person chooses to adapt to certain environments and NOT adapt to others. When he's given the task of educating a group of kids that includes some scary gang-member type looking kids, instead of acting like a teacher he acts tough right back (reminding them that they're in HIS domain). Yet, when he's brought into a room with the other teachers and school staff, he goes against the grain. When the school's head advisor tells the principle that everyone is doing their best, he immediately says that he's not. And when she tells the principle that Escalante is asking too much of his students, he boldly tells her that the students will rise to the expectations of their teacher.This alone makes the movie interesting. But what adds even more drama to situation is the fact that each and every student in the class Escalante teaches has their own peer pressures to deal with. Some students have unsavory friends who would laugh at their taking a class seriously. Some of the students have boyfriends or girlfriends who don't understand their sudden interest in school. And some of the students have to deal with parents who don't understand why their education should come before taking care of their own family.As the movie progresses Escalante announces to the board that he wants to teach Calculus to his best students, despite the fact that the students hadn't studied any of the prerequisites for the course. Naturally this requires them to study through their summer break, and then six days a week with extra hours!In any teen environment there is always peer pressure. But what happens when positive peer pressure conflicts with negative peer pressure? When our gang-member type Angel first starts the class he is hesitant to get involved because of his rough and tough friends. When Escalante singles him out however, the pressure of the teacher is greater than the pressure of his "friends". Over time this has a tremendous effect on him. Towards the end of the movie, he's riding with his friend and starts acting stupid, and gets his friend a traffic ticket. When the guy becomes angry with him and wants to fight, Angel just walks away. What does this say about him as a person? To me, it shows that whether he likes it or not, he no longer belongs with his old associates, he's now turning into a responsible individual.As I said before, at the outset of the movie Escalante is the one who is thrown into pressure groups. He could become just like the other teachers, or just become uncaring like the kids in his class were initially. What he does instead is nothing short of a miracle. He uses his understanding of human nature, and the natural tendency of people to work better when their thoughts are united to his advantage. His class becomes its own little world, a club for the elite, the strong and the brave. And early on, when one of the students refuses to take a test, the other students quickly turn against her and ridicule her. She then quickly becomes obedient and gets back to work (positive peer pressure was too much for her). The harder the students are pushed and the more is expected of them, the more they feel like a team (how can I forget the scene where a student says that the rest of the class will have a better chance of making it without him?).The driving force of the scholastic miracle (and this movie) is Escalante. As he himself said, if the students don't have the desire, he will give it to them. And that's exactly what he did. He MADE them want to succeed. He MADE them have the motivation to keep pushing and striving for higher and higher goals. Basically, he educated them on how to be successful and hard-working individuals. People who normally wouldn't have anything to do with each other (computer nerds, homeboys, and rockers) all were united by their desire to achieve and make themselves into something great. They pushed themselves harder than anyone had ever done in their lives, and when push came to shove, they were successful in every way. Every single student Escalante taught passed the exam for college credit. Every one. Motivation is a powerful thing, and sometimes if you don't already have it an extraordinary person can give it too you.Everyone should see this movie
Nostalgic recollections. This movie was a staple at Christmas -- clean, funny, terrifically entertaining, familiar faces,  well known actors.  Script was written by a friend of mine and I missed seeing it on TV the past few years.  Now I have my own copy and can enjoy showing it to the younger set whenever I feel like it. Stanwyck played in it, she didn't write it! Its good clean fun any time of year.
A Masterpiece... I taped this off the air when it was first broadcast, then bought the LD's when they came out.  Seeing that a DVD release is not likely, I treasure them-a wonderful documentary
If you LIKE humor, you ought to purchase this tape. Chris Elliott's comedy tends to polarize viewers -- you either think it's the funniest thing you've ever seen, or you become violently angry that someone like THAT has been allowed on teevee. If there were more people  like the former, Get A Life would still be on the air, and Chris Elliott  would be rich and famous. Unfortunately, here on Earth, the show got  cancelled early, and until recently, has been unavailable on tape or on  reruns. If you're the kind of person who finds watching incredibly stupid  people (portrayed by smart comedians) doing incredibly stupid things  unbearable, maybe you ought to look and see if you can get Friends or  Seinfeld on cassette. If you enjoy smart comedy about stupid people written  for smart people, do yourself a favor, buy this tape and give Rhino a few  bucks, and convince 'em to release a few more volumes
Poem as Film, Film as Poem. I think if Charles Bukowski, Dylan Thomas, and Fellini collaborated on a piece of writing, it's possible they would have come up with this screenplay. This movie is exciting because it's soooo different from anything I've ever seen. Deliciously non-linear. The substance abuse aspect is a little overdone but that's the destiny of &quot;artist movies&quot;. I loved hearing the dialog, and Kristofferson's acting is the best I've ever seen by him. Anything so daring and so unconventional will naturally upset some people (like other reviewers here), but if you ask me that only validates the work. If ever I go to New York City, the Hotel Chelsea will be at the top of my list of places to visit. My favorite lines were by the crazy guy in the elevator, who after claiming to have had a conversation with Dylan Thomas said that ghosts naturally reside in places like the Chelsea because people will listen to them there. The DVD extras contain a couple of quirky interviews, one with director Ethan Hawke and the other with Robert Sean Leonard who plays a deeply troubled folksinger in the film
Interesting Sleeper. "The Big Town" doesn't break any cinematic ground but it's more than worth your while.  How can you go wrong with  a film that sports two Oscar winners(Tommy Lee Jones, Lee Grant) and three nominees(Matt Dillon, Diane Lane, Bruce Dern) in the cast?  Director Ben Bolt imbues the film with terrific period atmosphere and the selection of rock, rhythm and blues, and country and western music is impeccable.  The film has a gritty sensiblity reminiscent of classic film noir.  Dillon is fine as the kid from Indiana with a knack for dice rolling who seeks his fame and fortune in the seedy backrooms of Chicago.  It's Jones, however, who steals the picture in an understated turn as the film's ostensible villain.  Jones doesn't have to say a word.  Just a squint of his eyes and a look at his craggy visage says it all.  Good character turns from vets Grant and Dern as the couple who bankroll Dillon's endeavors.  The two women in Dillon's life, Lane's exotic dancer and Suzy Amis' aspiring DJ are kind of underwritten.  These two are kind of cliched in representing the good girl/bad girl dichotomy.  The promised showdown between Dillon and Jones is kind of a fizzle.  Another disappointment is Lane's less than erotic fan dance
Sad Next-to-Last McQueen Film. "Tom Horn" is a difficult film to watch at times knowing what we now know of the painful debilitating illness that star Steve McQueen suffered in his last years of life.  I recall at the time of the film's release it didn't get very good reviews but time has been kind to this film.  For starters, it's obvious that McQueen was in poor health when this film was made,particularly in the sequences that are more physically demanding.  He appears gaunt and fatigued.  They film him in shadowy lighting and in many cases it appears that doubles are employed.  It's in the latter half of the film, though, that McQueen's physical state adds dimension to his role.  The second half is devoted to Horn's circus trial for the murder of a boy.  The way Horn comported himself in the past made him a hero in the "old" west.  In the "new" west his methods are out-of-step and barbaric.  Horn seems resigned in the face of this acrimony to accept that he is a man out of time.  Though not quite of the same calibre this film brings to my mind John Wayne's final film, "The Shootist".  To appreciate this film I think one has to familiarize yourself with McQueen's essential work.  That said, this film stands as a fine elegy for a most outstanding career
Interesting movie from the H.G. Wells classic.  some cool effects. Again, picking this up as a free rental, I had little expectations, but its not bad. Alexander Hartegen is a profressor of Physics at columbia university, always busy with work and checking out new technology. He has managed by chance to get a woman that he wants to marry, although work keeps him tied up much of the time.  But, when he finally pops the question, she is taken from him in an accident.  So, using his knowledge, he becomes obsessed, and achieve building a machine that travels time.  Well, the movie takes off from their, with a decent story line and some good effects, such as Jeremy Irons as the leader of the underground human species in the end and the moon effects.    As with many stories, often I overthink the movie, why did he try only once to change the past before going into the future, why not go back a few more times...or did he and I missed something.  Or there are a thousand other ways to prevent that first accident, why did he do what he did, why not come back and take the gun or something?  Anyhow, don't overthink it, it does have some enjoyable parts and again decent effects and story
The Duke and the Rock Finally Together!. If you're a fan of either one of these late cinematic giants, you won't be disappointed by viewing this flick.  Both Wayne and Hudson were quite versatile actors, but their roles in Westerns appear to be their most memorable.  There's a fine supporting cast in this film which includes the two well-known former National Football League stars Roman Gabriel and Merlin Olsen making their acting debuts.  Although the plot of this movie may not be historically accurate, the average fan of western films will find this feature entertaining.  A western starring the Duke would not be complete without an elaborate donnybrook; the one in this picture doesn't disappoint.  Overall, this film is worth a look-see
Better than I had expected - a couple of good hours of impossible adventure. Disaster flicks were in their heyday during the 1970s.  Before the days of computerized visual effects, the big disaster films at times dazzled with what seemed to be impossible visuals and generated guffaws with some very cheesy effects.  Their fans loved all of it because they never took themselves seriously and it was more like a ride at an amusement park than anything like real life.  Even being scared was about having fun.This remake of the original "Poseidon Adventure" is much more serious in its intent.  Of course, the computer graphics make the images seem incredibly real and that does draw us in.  We think we feel the heat from the fires, the chill of the water, the panic of being trapped in the vents, our lungs burn for air as we swim underwater with the characters in the movie.We don't get the same characters that were in the first movie.  I won't discuss how the roles map or don't map onto each other, but I will say that in making all this more real, the director and writers made the people less distinguishable from each other.  Sometimes it is hard to tell who it is that is crying or screaming or whatever.Kurt Russell is terrific as Robert Ramsey, former fireman, former mayor of New York.  I think he is a widower, because he has no wife, but I don't remember that being explained amid all the noise.  He is on a cruise with his daughter, Jennifer (Emmy Rossum), and her boyfriend / fiance, Christian (Mike Vogel).  As always, there is tension between the father and daughter and the potential son-in-law (at the beginning of the film, the dad doesn't know how far along their intentions to get married are).Josh Lucas plays the mysterious Dylan Johns.  Since learning about this guys is a very interesting part of the movie, I don't want to discuss the character or what he does.  However, I do want to say that I loved seeing Andre Braugher on screen as Captain Bradford.  He plays the role with just the right amount of authority that an officer needs to lead people, especially in an incredible disaster.  Braugher also plays Bradford with enough humanity to endear him to us.The rest of the cast I will leave you to discover.  While they aren't as vividly drawn as they are in the first film, they are more compatible with the apparent desire to make such an impossible system seem more "real".While the comments I heard when the movie came out indicated to me that the film wasn't worth seeing, I think it more worthwhile than I had thought.  However, you have to take it for what it is.  It isn't "serious" (and who needs that all the time), and it isn't "real", but it is a good couple of hours of adventure
QUESTION. I am a very good flyer cheerleader and I was amazed at all of the illegal stunts in this movie. It was still really good though.QUESTION:WHEN CRENSHAW HEIGHTS GETS INSIDE OF THE COMPETITION..WHAT IS THAT SONG THAT IS LIKE "YOUV'E GOT TO BRING IT ONN" PLAYING WHILE THE CAMERA SHOWS GIRLS STRETCHING AND THE PIRATES PRACTICING???PLEASE HELP ME!!!! I NEED IT FOR STATES!!
Laugh out loud funny. I've seen Stephen Lynch live, in this Comedy Central special, and heard his audio cds.  Live is by far the best experience but this video is a close second.  The live audience really enhances the experience.  This is some truly funny stuff
The Hot Chick. This is one of Rob Schneider's best movies.Schneider plays as a middle-aged "hobo" thatswitches bodies with a popular mean high-school girl.Rachel McAdams has to find the guy that is inside of herbody so they can switch back before it is too late
Daughter likes it and so do we!. My 4 year old daughter likes her DVD.  Dad bought it for her because he remembered it from his childhood.  He was disapointed that some of the skits he remembered were not included in the DVD but on the whole it rated well with him.  It gets watched pretty often in our house
Finally!!!. OMG!!! Finally The New Kids get the DVD treatment. I've been waiting for this to come out forever it seems like. All I have to say is if you've never seen this movie buy it anyway. Trust me if your an 80's fan you'll love this hidden gem. I highly recommend it if your a James Spader fan also.Here's a short description of the movie from IMDB:A brother and sister arrive in a small town to help their relatives run an amusement park, and they find the town is terrorized by a local street gang.Cast:Shannon Presby  ....  Loren McWilliamsLori Loughlin  ....  Abby McWilliamsJames Spader  ....  Eddie DutraEric Stoltz  ....  Mar
Overhyped, but good. The Seventh Seal (Ingmar Bergman, 1957)So I've finally seen The Seventh Seal, Ingmar Bergman's most famous film and, perhaps, one of the most famous films ever created. And I have to say, while I found it interesting, well-written, and occasionally amusing, I ended up thinking that my view of the film was somewhat tainted by the constant praise to which the film is subjected; in other words, that it didn't live up to a level of hype that, perhaps, no movie (with the possible exception, of course, of the immortal Night of the Lepus) could ever hope to.The much-abbreviated version of the plot known to most-- that Antonius Block, a knight (Max von Sydow), returned from the Crusades, challenges Death (Bengt Ekerot, fresh from playing Hamlet) to a game of chess-- is hopelessly simplified. There is a great deal more to this film, and anyone expecting ninety-six minutes of chess playing is probably going to be quite confused. Block and his squire Jons (Bergman regular Gunnar Bjornstrand) have recently gotten back from a decade away, and Block is eager to return home to his wife Karin (Inga Landre, still alive and working as she nears the age of eighty). Death appears to Block, and the game of chess is proposed as a way for Block to buy time to get back home. The chess match acts almost as a framing piece; the journey's the thing here. Block and Jons, as fine a team as Don Quixote and Sancho Panza, have learned to suffer one another over the past decade, like an old married couple; Jons, however, an avowed and vocal atheist, has noticed his lord's crisis of faith, and spends much of the film subtly manipulating Block to his way of thinking. Block, meanwhile, is seeing more than enough in a Swedish countryside ravished by the Black Plague to make him think that God may, in fact, be dead. The clergy to be found in the film are all bombastic buffoons, and a good number of them are outright evil; Block and Jons, in their own ways, are determined to do right by the few souls they encounter (in contrast to the clergy's scope, which is the entire country, or so it would seem). The two of them gather a small band together, all headed for Block's castle; the chess game unfolds piecemeal as the journey continues.There is, certainly, much to be praised about this movie. The acting is good all around; von Sydow overplays a bit, but one gets the idea that that was stage direction straight from Bergman. The camerawork is well-done. The sound is a bit rough, but I'm more than willing to blame that on the transfer, or my particular copy of the disc. Where the film usually treads the line of greatness is in Bergman's understated script; Block's understatement and Death's civility are excellently counterpointed by Jons' brashness.An enjoyable film, and an exceptionally good one. While it may be all that, you might still have to buy the bag of chips yourself. ***
A White Cat?!. After viewing Wag the Dog I can say that I did in fact enjoy watching it, but I'm not wholly sure why. Well lets start with a few problems I had with it to give my head a chance to think it over one more time. My main beef with this film is that at some times the plot drags along a little too slow, without hardly anything happening, or much keeping you distracted until a plot twist came into effect. I also have to say that I thought their choice for background music quite odd for what the movie was based on; the music used although hardly used, makes the whole thing seem light-hearted or like a fairly tale which for this movie is bad because the whole idea of it is to make he viewer question what the media tells you. And music like that just makes it a little harder to believe.Anyway, I really liked the idea of not even including the president as a character in the movie. He was just heard from the other end of the phone saying dumb things like "That cat should defiantly be white." or "It sounds too corny." That adds to the main reason I enjoyed this movie; Its unconventional yet still effective. It doesn't really fit into one given genre, so I have to slap the broad Drama/Comedy label onto it. Which makes it difficult to compare to other movies of the aforementioned genres. What I mean by that is that I couldn't recommend this to a fan of Comedy or drama, because it ends up being a mix of both, so if you a genre buff you probably won't enjoy wag the dog. But people with an open mind will, however, be able to see past the need of having a genre plastered on everything and enjoy this movie for what it is.The acting is as expected from just a star-studded cast that includes such big names as Robert De Niro, Dustin Hoffman,Dennis Leary and Willie Nelson. I don't know how much better you could expect the acting in a movie to be. Of course its really Hoffman and Di Niro who shine in this movie; they work well off each other making you  forget who they are in real life and think of them as Stanley Motss and Conrad Brean.All in all I would recommend Wag the dog to anyone who enjoys movies, Comedies, Satires, and/or people who just enjoy a new idea or plot. Take it from Someone who has only ever really enjoyed a handful of movies in their life; you should see this movie
What price are we willing to pay for. As I write this review,I am two days removed from hearing of the tragic and senseless suicide of an acquaintance who had it all, risked it all,lost his family,fell into depression and substance abuse and hung himself.Why?.....his life WAS his startup and it came crashing down around him and he couldn't bear it.STARTUP.COM is a timeless look at the rise and fall of businesses and the people who rise and fall with them.Some people who will view this film will only want to know one thing:How do I succeed in building a business and make money? Others will view this film and learn about the trmendous sacrifices to self and interpersonal relationships that  comes from examining the failures of others driven by an intense desire or need to "succeed".This documentary examines both aspects of business-the technical and the personal.The two aspects are always competing.The lives of the "twentysomething"founders of gov.WORKS.com are examined in intimate detail as Kaleil and Tom are followed from the infancy stage of their internet organization,through it's quick rise to fame,(they were on every major mag cover and even had audience with President Clinton!!!)and it's crashing in 20 months.Loyalties and passions are questioned.This is a very realistic look at the down -and -dirty business world as portrayed in the .com rush of a few years back.What this film has to teach us is about the price that one  pays in blood for what one thinks is necessary for "success".This film is a sobering look for anyone,any age who needs to possibly reexamine their priorities in business and in life
Great classic for a great price. With a cable modem, took about 1 hour and 15 minutes to download Unbox, install the program and download the episode.  It's a great download speed considering the file is 803 mb.  I was able to still use my computer, IE 7.0 and RealPlayer, so the download is not a resource hog.  The menu bar includes a link to shop for more Unbox titles, which I found very convenient.The quality is great, but the video stutters in Unbox.  Maybe because it uses 3 applications when playing video?  I chose to watch the episode on Windows Media Player 11 and I had no problems at all.I've bought and watched 3 episodes, all with the same results.  Fast and unobstrusive download, great quality and low price.  Just use WMP, or another player that can handle wma files, to watch.
Cajun Spice. This colorful and fast moving film from director Jim McBride about an only slightly corrupt cop in the "Big Easy" and the pretty Assistant District Attorney sent to investigate the department is filled with cajun spice and atmosphere. The lines between right and wrong are blurred like a rainy windshield in this lightning paced and very sexy cop film.Dennis Quaid gives a terrific performance as Remy McSwain, a second generation cop who sold out early on in his career, accepting it as the norm but not letting it hinder him from doing his job. When the prim but sexy Ellen Barkin arrives on the scene in the form of D.A. Anne Osborne, he attempts to wine and dine his way out of trouble as the bodies start piling up in an apparent drug war.The charged encounters between Remy and the shy Anne blend seamlessly with some very brutal crime scenes and a lot of New Orleans' music to propel this film at a breezy and very enjoyable pace. When Remy's own corruption is exposed, their relationship becomes more complicated when he tampers with evidence and gets off. But her comment to him that he is no longer one of the 'good guys' causes him to take a serious look at himself. When cops are discovered to be behind all the recent drug trouble, the answers will hit far too close to home.A very unique cop thriller that manages to maintain a light and breezy ambiance throughout, this is one of the most memorable films of its kind. Its spicy flavor goes down easy and makes you crave more. A supporting cast that includes Ned Beatty, John Goodman, and Lisa Jane Persky, offer fine support in this very seductive and one of a kind film you must see.Recent events have added a melancholy tone to this flavorful cop film. One can only hope after rebuilding that a new chapter will be written in the city's storied and colorful history. This excellent film gives a real feel for what makes it what it is. Pick this one up today
What fun!. Elf is one of our favorite family Christmas movies.  We purchased this particular edition for the karaoke, coloring pages, games, and activities that were offered.  I really didn't think my kids would be very interested in the games, but to my surprise they loved them.  Even now after Christmas, we find ourselves using lines from the movie.  Maybe it's a little corny, but it always brings a smile!I recommend this edition to anyone who just can't get enough of Buddy the Elf
I Love this movie!. This movie has great actors, a great screenplay, and a great director.  I can't fully write how good this film is and why it's considered a classic. It won the Best Picture Oscar and is one of the few winners that really deserve the mention as an award-winning film. The director made the romance is low-key, which makes sense considering the cynical nature of the film. Billy Wilder (Director) also knew when to inject humor and when to inject drama. Very few directors are good at having a sense of when to incorporate humor into a dramatic moment. Any other time it just distracts and messes up the flow of the picture but here Wilder kept things smooth. I also love the ending which from my viewpoint is perfect considering the cynical mood set by the characters. This film has a little romance, mixed with a dash of drama, and a hint of comedy making a delightful piece of classic Hollywood film
Dreamlike. Alice starts harmlessly enough as we meet her, a dissatisfied NY housewife married to a wealthy banker. The fun starts when she goes to a Chinese doctor (played by a brilliant actor, whose name I cannot remember) and he gives her various remedies to her problems. This kind of plot could easily fall into caricature and cliche but miraculously doesn't. The cast play their parts subtly and honestly, and support the movie's delicate frame. Mia is enchanting as Alice (and I don't usually feel this way about her). This quiet film is one that stays with me. Each time I see it, I enjoy it more
"What's so memorable about a clown stealing a million dollars?". If you need a laugh or if you need a stupid idea that may land you in jail...than this movie will give you just that. Also, this movie has some well known actors to boot other than just Bill Murray as Grimm, Geena Davis as Phyllis Potter, Randy Quaid as Loomis. I'm talking about Tony Shalhoub as the cab Driver, Kurtwood Smith (Reginald "Red" Forman from: That '70s show) as Russ Crane A.K.A Mr.Lombino even the late Phil Hartman as Hal Edison and well known to movies of the '60s '70s and the '80s Jason Robards as Chief Rotzinger.   I do wonder why it took so long to release it to DVD?
Rodgers & Hammerstein's Cinderella  Dvd. I was very well pleased in receiving my purchase of a dvd movie, "Rodgers & Hammerstein's Cinderella".  For many years I have seached all over for even seeing this movie once again, which I saw for the very firt time on television way back when I was in 3rd grade in school.  I fell in love with that movie and I have even tried to order it through my Family Video Store, and they told me they couldn't get it at all.   I went online and Amazon.Com popped up and I saw it there saying there was only one copy left.    I immediately ordered it through Amazon.Com and received it very quickly through UPS, and I would like to say everything was excellent and thank you Amazon.Com.   I have also ordered a tricycle for my Granddaugher through Amazon.Com and the service and quality was also excellent.  I highly recommend for everyone to go to  amazon.com  for their special ordering needs.
I thought RUN LOLA RUN would never have any competition. Boy! Was I wrong?. Spun is an absolute pleasure to watch. It doesn't wait around to get noticed, instead it sets it's own pace, like for example - No credits roll in the beginning, no apologetic character introductions, there is no STOP sign in this film, everything is unhooked and raw,YET nothing seems to be out of place. The direction is bizzare, camerawork is staggering at places, the sets are like gutters, the music is extraordinarily amusing and the acting is another level. There are many characters in the film and a quite a wide variety too. The reason I compare Spun with Run Lola Run is because it was nearly as entertaining as the German wonderflick was. Spun is possibly one of a kind. I enjoyed it more than I enjoyed Trainspotting. Now, that is saying a lot.Unfortunately, I haven't seen many movies like Spun in Hollywood.  So I have no recommendations. This is an absolute must watch, if there ever was one
All-star-fun. This is one of the best crazy comedies of the 80s....  Surprises stand in line and the entire cast is at its peek. Anita Morris, Bette Midler, Helen Slater, Judge Reinhold and Danny DeVito are all of Oscar-material in this classic
Life is its' own reward. I read the book many years before seeing the movie. Both are testimonies of the mystery of the human spirit, the wonder and love of life, and the ugliness of human hatred
Excellent idea for the show. This is certainly one of the best Atlantis shows to date. Another one was Common Ground.
Creepy chiller. Young Cameron possesses some crafty telekinetic powers and inadvertantly unleashes a nasty Mayan demon...A great horror film done in a sitcomish/tvmovieoftheweekish style with a healthy heaping of late 80s style will be sure to please horror fans, and Scott Curtis enthusiasts. Never really scary, but somewhat eerie. Good sound sequences. Interesing images. Cameron is cinematic copecetic
It's a Mad Mad Mad Mad DVD. It's a Mad Mad Mad Mad World is one of the all time classic comedies. It may lose something in translation to the younger set who is used to far more vulgar comedy but this truly was a brilliant film for it's time. If anything, it gives people who have not seen the film an opportunity to witness some of the funniest comedians and actors of that era. A bunch of strangers played by an all star cast by happenstance find out about 350,000 dollars in hidden treasure and race to fictitious Santa Rosita State Park, Ca. to find it under a big "W". The fun of course is in what happens to them on the way. I recommend this movie to anyone who likes to laugh. Jonathan Winters was the Robin Williams of the sixties and the scene where he single handedly levels a service station is priceless. If the chase scene had an origin it was probably from this film. For it's time (1963) and without the use of computers, the auto chases and other stunts are amazing. To me, Mad Mad World is the comfort food of cinema.
Another Wayne/Ford Compilation. Many people know about John Wayne and John Ford's cavalry trilogy, three of the greatest westerns ever made, but another pairing between the two is not as well known. The Three Godfathers is a lesser-known John Wayne classic when he was at the top of his game.  Starring Harry Carey Jr. and Pedro Armendariz as the other two godfathers this classic should not be missed.  These three outlaws ride into the desert after a bungled robbery only to find a dying woman with a newborn infant.  The Duke promises to care for the baby which she names Robert William Pedro Hightower after the three outlaws.  They must then make the trek across the desert with very little supplies to get the baby to the next town.  Excellent supporting cast with many recognizable faces from other Duke movies, with Ward Bond playing the sheriff who attempts to track down the outlaws.  Truly funny scenes as Wayne, Armendariz, and Carey attempt to care for the baby.  As usual awesome scenery as is expected in John Ford westerns.  This is one classic that has to be put on DVD.  A must have for John Wayne fans
Argghhhhh. What a wonderful twist on the classic Treasure Island. Silver is a cyborg and young Jim is a typical teen looking to find his place. Morph is a wonderful addition and will grab you and pull you into the adventure and fun.
Beautiful, and Bold!. Beautiful, beautiful! Who doesn't want to dance majestically like this beautiful lady? She is captivating from beginning to end.Learn the beautiful Gypsy tango! Hips, swaying, skirt flying, beautiful hand movement. From posture to skirt basic technique, arm and body placement to hand, finger, wrist, movement very well broken down and easily explained.11 combinations guide you into a beautiful gypsy tango. Learn turns, skirt technique, intricate footwork.The Farruca with 10 combinations; the most interesting for me was the flat, point, heel. Try it with speed for a challenge!This is bold, heavy footwork with aggressive combinations.2 live performances by Puela Lunaris, who beautifully executes the Gypsy Tango and Farruca two dances of Spain. Although I am a belly dancer, overall I feel this program has brought more grace and elegance into my personal style.  Dance being so universal marries the common ground in gypsy tango that I devote to my dance to create my own special blend. This was a good learning experience bringing variety and versatility for my audience.
Tiki Fan Loves Blue Hawaii & Mai Tai's. The spirit of Tiki is alive & well in Blue Hawaii with Elvis, his BEST film! Everything seems to work in this film script, songs, costumes cinematography, & location, location , location. Filmed only two years after Statehood, Hawaii still has that unspolied/unoverbuilt vibe look. There's Hawaiian shirts, babes & Mai Tai's a plenty coupled with Elvis's charisma. He really looked liked he enjoyed doing this film & the final wedding scene is a Hawaiian kitsch homerun, WOW!!
Mmm, mmm Good!. This erotic drama is a keeper.  It definitely appeals to the senses.  Hot steaming chinese baths, firecrackers.  Passion, passion, passion all around.  You will love it.  Never thought acupunture could look so exhilirating.  Billy Zane -- whoo, baby! Wonderfully sexy film
Circus Side-show. This is done in good taste, and is a very enjoyable movie--well acted--well played--with added mystery effective in drawing you into the story to see someone get what he deserves
Very original comedy. This movie was well thought out and is not one of those movies wear an actor uses a catch-phrase that he did in 10 other movies.However, the sequel (Be Cool), basicly re-hashes the same jokes in this movie, with a similar storyline
my daughter likes. I bought this and the Care Bears Movie 2: A New Generation for my 6 year old for her birthday and she loves to watch both movies
Where are the other Moto films?. This is a good entry in the Mr. Moto canon, which comprises 8 films made between 1937-39. It is not my favorite, however--Mr. Moto Takes a Vacation, with excellent performances by Lionel Atwill and Joseph Schildkraut, is the best of those I've seen. However, they have been very hard to find, and I've only seen about half of them. Lorre is wonderful as the mysterious Mr. Moto, and the films are great fun and skilfully made, with a host of terrific character actors--in addition to Atwill and Schildkraut, Leon Ames, Jean Hersholt, Keye Luke, John Carradine, George Sanders, Virginia Field, Ricardo Cortez, Maxie Rosenbloom,  and many others all turn in outstanding period performances. It is a real shame that more are not being made available--I know that art houses sometimes stage special showings, and I keep hoping that someone will release all eight on DVD. PLEASE
Great for 3 year olds. My three year old loved being able to see the characters from Peter and the Wolf - it really solidified the story for him.  I highly recommend it
Liar Liar. This movie is great. Whoever have not seen it, should definately check it out. The funniest movie, I have seen in years.
catch me if you can and live to tell about it. There are two movies that come to mind, when I speak of this one,"Lonely are the Brave" and "Valdez is Coming". The same theme in all three of these excellent films, "the Law Hunts The Fugitive" The fugitive portrays the sympathytic hero in all three films. In all three, the persuer takes a liking to the one he hunts. They come to respect his courage and fortitude. This movie is full of twists, turns, thrills and spills, excitement, suspense, not to mention beautiful mountain scenery. Last but definetly not least, Lee Marvin and Charles Bronon, they alone are worth the price of admission. "Anonymously" Louie G
ROCK hard candy !. A very different type of movie. Minimum props. and cost in production but thrilling from almost start to end. A few good twists and acting, well some future stars in here there is. Found the movie entertaining and not disturbing but made the people I saw this with think. Personally liked this and was recommended for me to watch by a friend. I would do likewise to you
My Favorite Episode. I don't have television, haven't for 11 years. When I learned CBS was allowing free viewing over the internet I checked it out and started watching episodes of CSI, CSI NY, CSI Miami, and NCIS. I found NCIS to be my favorite and this particular show Dead And Unburied is my favorite so far. I enjoy the light-heartedness of NCIS. So I decided to download this episode from Amazon Unbox.I really wish Amazon Unbox would allow me to burn shows I've purchased. As it is they are restricted to viewing on my computer. When Unbox expands this service to allow me to burn DVDs I will likely purchase many more shows this way. I like selecting individual shows
Good but not the best. One of better movies from Jacq Clusoe series, although not the best. There are some dull moments but also plenty of laughs supported by Peter Sellers antics. Recommended for "Pink Panther" series funs but also for those who love European comedies in general.
The 3rd Best C&C Film. Hey Julio you forgot one Holmes.....what about the forgotten and seldom seen "Things Are Tough All Over" all of C&C movies are fun (except the Corsican Brothers....what a loser of a flick, even for us Die hard C&C fans) over all next movie is the 3rd best of their films (in my opinion of course) Up in Smoke the 1st and Best and "Things Are Tough All Over" is the 2nd best, nice dreams comes in 4th....any of these 4 films will give you plenty to laugh at
One of the best and most underrated rock n roll dvds!. I have seen so many rock magazines out there with its best rock movies list or reviews and for reasons I will never know,American Pop is rarely mentioned. Hello!!! Wake up critics! This is one of the best out there! It is the masterpiece from the artist who brought you The Lord of the rings and Fritz the cat. This is the story of 4 generations of young men trying to make it in the music industry. Taking place in New York during the early 1900's and ending in the late 1970's,each of the first 3 generations don't succeed for one reason or another with the last generation getting his big break giving this classic its happy ending. From the days of Vaudeville to the big band era to the summer of love to the punk era,this movie has it all. But to me,it is not just a rock n roll movie,it is a history book on dvd as well with such historic moments as the mobsters era,both world wars,the beatnik movement,and the drug problems of America,just to name a few. With music from legendary big band,jazz,and rock n roll legends,this dvd is for all age levels,though there might be a scene or two not recommended for the very young music lovers. This dvd may not be around long enough due to slow sales and lack of advertising so I recommend you buy this legendary and underrated animated rock dvd a.s.a.p.! Rock on!!!!!!!
Chato's Land DVD. Excellent film if you think the indians were grossly mistreated by us, and I do. Here they got some much deserved revenge, and justice
FOXFIRE - HEDDY BURRESS SHINES. Foxfire is a good story, wonderfully acted about a group of girls who reject being pushed around by the men in their life: one a teacher, one a parent. Margret (Angelina Jolie) is the stranger who wanders into town and befriends Maddy wonderfully played by Hedy Burress. Heddy Burress was a newcomer to movies when she starred in this film and delivered a poignant, thoughtful performance. It's a shame Hedy hasn't played more prominent roles in subsequent films. She does a lot of voice-over work to pay the bills
Stupendously awful. Cyborg is perhaps one of the worst movies I've ever seen.  The acting is bad even for a Van Damme film, the sets are terribly forced and the plot is simply pointless.  You will gain nothing from watching this movie.  Even the fight scenes aren't nearly as well choreographed as in Bloodsport or Kick-Boxer.  Plus it lacks an old Asian man to show our hero the way to defeat young and muscular Asian men (see Bloodsport, Kick-Boxer and The Quest).So why did I give it five stars?  The truth about this movie is that no more than one minute into it you are hooked.  It is like a train wreck and you cannot turn away until the full hour and twenty-six minutes have passed.  It isn't even that you are entertained, but more like in a trance.  Part of your mind says, "why am I watching this?  Turn it off" while the other says, "OK that had to be the worst scene in the movie so the next will be better, right?"  Wrong.  The ending (I won't spoil it) is beyond corny and is the capstone on the movie.It must be mentioned that in this movie, Jean Claude pretends he is Jesus.  Jesus Claude, unlike the other Jesus, found an almost miraculous way off his crucifix.  You simply have to see it to believe it.  Do not spend more than eight dollars on this movie, new
future filmmakers beware. Terry Gilliam is undoubtedly one of the greatest and most visionistic fimmakers of all-time.With that said it breaks my heart seeing this documentary but am glad i did.It's about gilliams attempt in making The Man Who Killed Don Quixote,a movie that the great Orson Welles made an attempt at as well but also fell victim to 'Acts of God',as this film demonstrates the same.I recommend this to any movie fan as it shows what goes into making a film from post-production on,something i'm sure most people take for granted. As a dreamer of making my own films one day,I also recommend the same dreamers and future film directors to see this as it also shows how much strength,mentally and physically,you need to get into the business.This is not to scare you out of your dream, but to show you what it takes.Johnny Depp is the big name here and you get to see him at work as well.Just the couple of scenes that were filmed of him are funny as hell,which breaks my heart even more knowing that those scenes will never be used else where.Yes it's heart-breaking,but it's also entertaining.I won't go into anymore detail of what happens in this film as you need to see it for yourself.Yet another Gilliam film added to my library
One Magic Christmas Review. One of the "must see" Christmas movies.  A family oriented movie that will rekindle the Christmas spirit in everyone.  We have this on VCR tape and have watched it so much that we purchased the DVD version. Enjoy
A journey into a dark and complex mind. I really hope this film gets released on DVD sometime soon as it is truly a rare and extraordinary find, a brilliant artistic acheivement. For those whose tastes run deeper than the mainstream and who may have a more than casual interest in World war 2 in general and Adolph Hitler in particular, or the very mysterious nature of evil itself, this film is a definate must see. The premise, portrayal and characterization indeed evoke the sense of a desolate self absorbed soul whose only possible source of comfort in an eternity of self reflection would be the constant reinforcement of his own pathological lies to any one who would  still be foolish or gullible enough to listen. A soul unable to face ultimate truth, the realization of which could only equal pitiful agony and hopeless despair
Im Might Not Be A Surfer... I Might Not Be A Surfer But I Really Like This Movie. I Thought It Was Gona Be One Of The Worst Things I'll Ever Buy But I Really Gotta Say This Movie Is One Of My Top 10 Favorite Movies In General
It almost goes the whole way to perfect... This movie was really on track to be an earth shattering experience for us sci-fi geeks.  Here's why:*creeped out techno music.  not creepy and etherel in itself...but creeped out in the sense that everything is angled and black and white in contrast to the driving beat.  it's incessant, and a great effect. Max's voice-overs add to the overall creepiness.*fantastic concept.  brilliant, really.  every pattern can be graphed.  What if you could graph the pattern of nature and discover a secret "formula" to life?  Max is in it to win it for the sake of knowledge...not $$$.  Great stuff.*tons-o-suspense.  the movie really builds up well.  almost too well, as my one negative comment will show.  you will get a really strong sense that SOMETHING of major importance is going to be revealed if you keep watching.*tripped out lead character...complete with hallucinations, quirkiness and the obligatory disdain for normal human contact.  we're talking visions of brains that shriek and vibrating walls.  The lead character is great...if not a little contrived at times by the actor.  I mean, he's getting revelations to the meaning of life, the universe and everything by the swirling eddies in his coffee!  YES!But, i only gave PI 4 stars for a reason:*the letdown.  i mentioned that this movie makes you feel like it's building up to something so grand that it may even aid you in your own life.  I mean, i was right there...hook line and sinker.  But i was left on the line at the end.  The ending isn't bad...but it seems like a cop-out.  Max solves the problem by drilling a hole in his skull.  No more special gift...no more math at the speed of thought...no more secret formula or mystery.Dang, i was disapointed.I tried really hard not to be, because the movie had me so enthralled...but I didn't get the "wham-bam" experience i was hoping for at the end.HOWEVER!  I would HIGHLY recomend you checking it out for yourself.  I've spoken with a lot of folks who totally disagree with me and dig the ending.Great addition to your underground sci-fi.  Pick it up!ste
best series out there. best series out there on any sci-fi show, makes you think and imagine the worlds out there in the universe.  this is a good after thought of star trek
The Secret of Roan Inish. To any and all ages, this may very well be my all time favorite movie.  So beautiful, so touching, what a great myth to put to film. I always have believed in mermaids, and the Irish music is so haunting. I recommend this film to all humans who love the sea and love music.
Holy Nostalgia!. I had the pleasure of watching this movie -- and the accompanying TV series -- in two different, but equally enjoyable, phases: First, as a 4th grader when they were first released in the 60s -- when I took them at face value as super hero adventure stories; and later, as an adult, reveling in the campy humor and the droll, dead-pan delivery of Adam West. This is a very corny movie -- but in a good way! Lots of fun. I especially enjoyed watching it while listening to the commentary by West and Burt Ward.And by the way, I'm not a kid any more -- but I still want that Batmobile in my garage, and want to take the Bat Boat out for a high-speed run on Lake Grapevine
one of the best. This episode is a classic, and is one of the best in the series. It explores time travel and alternate time lines, and it's storytelling had paved the way for many screen plays that followed.
All Dogs Go to heaven. Don Bluth's 1989 film, "All Dogs Go to Heaven" is a smart movie in it's own way. I agree with some out there that it does own a darkened tinge to it, but none the less, it's a good movie for most viewers. I, just especially love Don Bluth's traditional animation and movies including, "The Secret Of NIMH" and "The Land Before Time", which were made all around the 1980 decade. I personally think that was when Don Bluth's best and most memborable films were made. Though, back to the subject, this movie definetly stood out in my mind, with it's cute songs, but which could use more work and appear more in the movie, like "You Can't Keep A Good Dog Down". This song was the one with the main character, Charlie, a German Shephered and his loveable friend daschound, Itchy sing in the bar. With refrences to gambling, which in a dog's fantasy world, rat races, and subjects containing killing, can be gestured to adults though it has it's light-hearted, happy-go-luck kiddy moments with the graceful Whppet Annabelle and Charlie romping the the clouds of heaven and the little orphan who Itchy and Charlie take under, Ann Marie's loveable moments with charlie and Itchy. Carface and his sidekick, whose name is forgotten by me, are the nuisence of a villan, who plot to kill Charlie. Charlie who only takes care of and pretends to love Ann Marie, in hopes to pay back Carface with money owed so as he can live. After time and instinces, which the inseprible trio go through, helps Charlie to soon love the little girl. I myself, thought this movie was good if your looking for a movie with a few dark subjects and childish subjects, then this mobie is for you though I don's really recommened it to any child under 6
harry and the hendersons. this is a really great clasic i have found it on dvd. i just cant get enough on this movie i think ive worn out mv dvd player watching this movie
It's Jimmy Carr - Need more be said?!?. Thanks for keeping a Brit sane in a country full of "My wife says..." jokes.Your wife is fat and ugly and I don't care what she says. Because she's ugly. And fat.....and not my wife
A powerful and moving story. I initially wanted to see this movie because I am a huge Oliver Martinez fan and I wanted to see more of his work.  The fact that Oliver does not appear until the end of this movie did not really cause a problem for me.  I was so engrossed from beginning to end with this movie that I hardly noticed Oliver was missing.  Javier Bardem has to be one of the most passionate actors I have ever seen.  I was mesmerized by his protrayal of Reinaldo Arenas.  And while this movie may not be for everyone, I would say it is the best biographical movie I have seen in my lifetime.  As added bonuses, there was Oliver Martinez, for me, of course.  Also, Sean Penn was very good in his few minutes on the screen.  Johnny Depp had me lauging out loud at his potrayal of the transvite and the officer.  His facial expressions alone are pure comical genius.  And, while I am a huge Johnny Depp fan,as well, I am glad his parts were minimal as Javier Bardem is the true acting genius in this film.  I am now going to further investigate Reinaldo Arenas and Javier Bardem and see what else they have done that may interest me.  Isn't that the true motivation of a movie or writer....making you want more from them?
Fanatastic Micheal & Odeds characters were intense. Watched the whole seaon one. It was really good now i'm just upset that season two downloads aren't available. what's the holdup?
HG WELLS. This is an amazing service! For only 2 bucks i can watch what i like for the moment. In this case it was HG WELLS. Great biography
Another widescreen review. PICTURE QUALITY = 4-SOUND QUALITY = 5+The overall picture quality is pleasant and satisfying. Color is nice but pxilazation is very present in the begining of movie. Improves as movie goes on. This being a very senic movie I was not completly happy but still satisfied. Could've been a bit sharper and remastered from high definition but wasnt.The sound quality in Dolby was awesome. Not in Dolby Digital but on a system with Pro Logic II it souded great if not better than most non-digital dolby surround. All surround sounds are present and really stood out. The soundtrack is placed perfectly and surrounds the room. Very happpy with this DVD sound quality.THE MOVIE - *note spolier. The movie was excellent in all entertainment areas if your looking for a FUN Western movie. Comedy, action, stunts, scenery, and many great actors. Everything you would want in a &quot;fun&quot; western film in the old fashioned tradition. Light on violence and good enough for the whole family.*Spoiler - The best (and my favorite) thing about this movie is the fact that James Garner still plays as Maverick even though the audience doesn't know it. Watching it over and knowing that Mel Gibson is playing his role as &quot;the son of Maverick&quot; and James Garner is still the orginal character he played in the past makes this a great movie to watch over and over.My overall review is that it is worth buying and I'd give it 5 stars if the picture was just a touch better. Don't be fooled though, I have a large projection widescreen tv with a progressive component DVD player so I see almost any grain there is if any is present. Overall this DVD was satisfying enough to make me happy I bought it. On any other tv it will display a perfect picture. Sound quality is great on a home theatre sound system.This is a movie that should be made on a Superbit DVD
Great!!. This has been one of my favorite musicals and is great for those more mature musical fans
I am not a romance fan... I am not a romance fan... but this movie still remains in my top 50 list. And, I must admit, I cry at the ending, everytime.The acting, direction, editing, and cinematography are all excellent, a rare feat.I guess it is the story that gets me the most. If you have watched "Roxanne" you might recognize the plot.
best of the best 3 and 4. wow 2 great movies on one disk. they just dont make movies like these anymore
Great Show. Bones is one of my favorite TV series. This one episode I missed so I had to get it to keep on track. Great show even if you have never seen it from the begining
Wow...just "wow". There's not enough good I can say about this film. It is fascinating on so many levels.Filmmaker Andrew Jarecki's original idea -- to film New York City birthday clowns -- took a new tack when he met #1 clown David Friedman, who had a family secret infinitely more intriguing than his birthday work. It turns out that David's father was an infamous Long Island pedophile whose story had rocked the small town of Great Neck in the late 1980s.The film is a chronicle of the Friedman's story, from the days before the scandal until the present. Father Arnold Friedman is a beloved high school teacher who teaches piano and computer skills at his home. After police catch him with a few kiddie porn magazines, they start interviewing Friedman's students. Suddenly, Friedman and his teenage son Jesse are being charged with hundreds of incidents of sodomy and assault, and their lives are turned upside down. Luckily (from the point of view of the filmmakers) the family had always loved taking films of themselves and did not stop during the family crisis. Much of the family's film and video footage appears in the movie, either reinforcing or acting as counterpoint to the interviews they accompany.But "Capturing the Friedmans" is about much more than a pedophilia scandal. It is also about the way that the structure of the justice system -- police, lawyers, judges and legal procedures -- can sometimes generate convictions from nothing. The film is also about memory, specifically the way our memories are reshaped by the passing years. Research is now demonstrating that memories -- rather than being videotapes of the past -- are strongly colored by the way we see ourselves in the present. In the film, the juxtaposition of present day "recollections" with the written and filmed record is staggering.The filmmakers are not trying to exonerate the Friedmans or to indict those who brought them to justice. The facts are laid out with all their gaps and contradictions; the characters are allowed to tell their own stories with all their factual and self-serving facets. And we are asked to respond. Are the Friedmans victims, merely odd or truly evil? How did a community come to believe what seems to be a bizarre story? How did the legal system reach a verdict without adequate investigation by skeptical police or a trial before the peers of the accused? Was justice served -- or merely the justice system?The 2-disk DVD includes Jarecki's interview on the Charlie Rose Show as well as interesting material taken during Q&A sessions at the film's premiers. The film's participants react to the way they are depicted -- usually continuing to make the case for decisions made 15 years in the past -- sometimes escalating into confrontations and raw anger.In short, "Capturing the Friedmans" is a movie that I cannot stop talking about and recommending to everyone I meet
A charming, clever British comedy. Charles Laughton is typically wonderful in his broadly-played role as England's King, Henry the Eigth, who infamously married six different queens, divorcing or executing them as circumstances warranted.  The script to this magnificent Alexander Korda production is a witty jab at English history buffs, touching only briefly on the supposed treachery of Ann Boleyn,  concentrating instead on the preposterous emotional life of the lusty, capacious King. Laughton, as ever, is a marvel, skillfully presenting Henry at first as a thinly-cariacatured lout, and gracefully embuing him with gradual shades of pathos and humanity.  Viewers who look to this film as historical drama are clearly missing the point: this is all about the cleverly-rendered script, which turns British schoolboy lessons on their heads, and on the classy ensemble acting, which admittedly may be hard to focus on with the lamentable quality of the current print (I'm writing in the year 2003; perhaps Criterion or some other class-act movie restoration company can correct this problem soon).  Still, fans of early British cinema will enjoy this film a lot
One Of Truffaut's Best. Near the beginning of this film a character says real estate is the place to make money, not the movie business, but he continues to work in the movies because he loves it. That is what Francois Truffaut's "Day for Night" is all about. People who love movies making movies.I saw this film years ago, but, it was the English dubbed version. I found the dubbing distracting and it had an effcet on my overall feeling of the film. When the movie became released on DVD it included the sub-titled version. I am reviewing this version. By seeing the film with sub-titles I now think it is one of Truffaut's best films only behind "400 Blows".Maybe you're thinking I'm crazy. Can seeing a movie sub-titled really make that much of a difference? You have no idea. Just think about it. Now we can hear the original actors. We can hear the emotion they put in their lines. It is much different that hearing someone else plainly saying their lines. It is almost like seeing the film for the first time.As we watch "Day for Night" we see what it takes to make a movie. All the problems that can occur, amd unfortunately for Truffaut, everything that can go wrong, does. People die, actors get pregnant, crew memembers fall in love, actors forget their lines, and film footage is destroyed. But as the saying goes, "the show must go on". And why does everyone keep going on? Because they love movies. It's one of the many reasons so many people have called this one of the greatest films about films in a class with "8 1\2", "Contempt" and to a lesser extent one of my favorites "Stardust Memories"."Day for Night" won the Academy Award for "best foreign film"in 1972 and two years later was nominated for "best picture". Film critic Gene Siskel even hailed it as the best film of 1974.Bottom-line: One of Francois Truffaut's best films. And it may as well be one of the greatest films about the movies
An incisive portrait of british establishment. " The loneliness of the long-distance runner " is a honest expresionist portrait of british working class. Director Tony Richardson developed a short-story by Alan Sillitoe,who collaborates as scripwriter in the film, for what's probably the movie that synthesizes better than any other the subversive spirit of Free Cinema, a cinematographic social phenomenon that joined a group of angry young men revolted against the narrow borders of a manipulative and hygienic industry interested in keeping under latch the miseries and contradictions of british establishment. The film condenses wonderfully almost everything of the innovations and social worries that have converted Free Cinema in the most important experience of british cinematography: the use of documentary film tecniques following the example of Humphrey Jannings' movies and the documentary school of John Grierson; independent production; antiestablisment criticism;antiacademic performances;the rebound of glamour and stylism; the use of montage strategies inspired in political russian cinematographers and innovative technologies as portable cameras; and the interest in reflecting underground social subjects.Colin Smith(Tom Courtenay)is an intelligent and desillusioned teenager who has been sent to a reform school for youths from the low step of the british class pyramid due to a petty robbery in a bakery. Soon the reformatory governor ( Michael Redgrave ),obssesed in discipline and sports and in winning a cross country running competition against a local private school, ingratiates with him once he has could evaluate Colin's excellent background  as long-distance  runner, circumstance that supposes for him the favour of the reformatory governor and a excellent chance of getting a fast "freedom". During his "privileged" solitary runs outside the reformatory Colin reminds his life just before his incarceration, balancing his paradoxal situation. In the following lines I describe what I think are three representative moments of the combative ideology of the film and the " fresh " spirit of Free Cinema:the scene when the inmates revolts against their superiors in the reformatory's dinning-room for which Tony Richardson uses wisely montage tecniques learned of  vanguardist russian directors as Eisenstein or Dovzhenko;the ironic portrait of the "society of comfort" where we see Colin's family spending the money of the insurance in a succcession of vignettes preceded by "advertising curtains" and enclosed with a sardonic music and,finally, the brilliant parallel-action montage where we see the inmates singing a patriotic song in the chapel of the reformatory while at the same moment in a looser cell of the building  the inmate who had got to runaway days before is wildly punished. Another of the much achievements of this extraordinary film is the expressionist use of jazz music in the sequences of the solitary runs of Colin outside the reformatory gates.For when another "free cinema" ?
Great Film. My favorite Hepburn-Tracy film.  Not only the acting, but the rhythm and pace of the film and the actors.  I've seen it many times.  The story line is simple, fun and straight foward about a research department run by three chummy gals and Kate Hepburn, their very smart boss with a photographic memory.  (up to 13, that is)  All is fine, and the first part of the film is very much like watching a play.  The film moves smoothly along,  until the gals learn that they're about to get a mechanical brain (as they call a new huge computer that makes noises) which they fear will replace them, and thus their jobs. Tracy and Hepburn are terrific together (as usual) and there's not a moment lost in this outstanding comedy.There is a commentary.  Skip it.  Dina Merril, who plays one of the secretaries in the flm, does most of the talking, but she talks mainly about herself and her (uninteresting) career and practically nothing about the making of the film.
One of the best teen dramas of all time. This is a classical anti enstablishment movie with teens bringing down the man.  It is a classic Christian Slater movie.  Love it
Well worth the $$$. I love this video and my three-year-old daughter loves it too. She asks me to play it literally everyday and does the entire thing from beginning to end, all by herself. It's a great way for me to get some uninterrupted time to myself and to also have her doing something that's good for her. And what a great way for her to get exercise on rainy days! My only complaint is that I wish they had an advanced version. I know that my daughter will grow out of this and will want something more challenging. But I've definitely gotten my money's worth out of this video! I'm back to buy another one for my niece.
Uncompromisingly Brutal, Pessimistic, and Affecting. "Brute Force" is one of the most violent film noirs of the classic era, as well as one of the most pessimistic -and this is after some violence was removed to comply with the Production Code. The story takes place within the confines of Westgate Penitentiary, an overcrowded prison whose deficient living conditions and sadistic guards make the inmates' lives nearly unbearable. Prison life is no less than a war between the inmates and guard Captain Munsey (Hume Cronyn), who routinely uses blackmail and torture to control the prisoners. When the warden revokes all the inmates' privileges in response to the deaths of two men, inmate Joe Collins (Burt Lancaster) hatches a violent and risky escape plan with his cellmates and a senior, well-respected prisoner named Gallagher (Charles Bickford).Director Jules Dessin doesn't let a glimmer of hope into this film. The violence is brutal and wholly without sentiment or regret. The utter hopelessness of the situation in the prison is overwhelming. Brute force is the only means in Westgate Penitentiary. The standout performance is by Hume Cronyn as the Nazi-inspired Captain Munsey, an unabashed sadist who uses social Darwinism to rationalize absolute dominance of the prisoners, who are, after all, behind bars, not free to challenge him. The prison doctor, a disgraced surgeon named Walters (Art Smith), numbs himself with alcohol and articulates the film's themes. "Do you know what this prison is?" he says. "One big human bomb!"The film is a little too long, and the flashback scenes of wives and girlfriends are superfluous. This is perhaps the most blatantly existential film noir. It takes the position of Sartrean philosophy, articulated by Dr. Walters, which is juxtaposed with Nietzschean philosophy, articulated by Capt. Munsey. I'm not normally captivated by either of these schools of thought, but "Brute Force" kept me interested for the duration of the film. It is a brutal, beautiful film with sharp dialogue, solid character writing, and great attention to detail.The DVD (Image Entertainment 1999): This is a good print of the film with no obvious image or sound  problems. Bonus features include filmographies of director Jules Dessin, writer Richard Brooks, and 3 of the film's stars. (Choose "Filmographies", then  "next" to see them.) The "Stills and Pressbook Gallery" (4 minutes) is a slideshow, with accompanying them music by Miklos Rozsa, of production stills, posters, and advertisements for the film
A classic!. This movie is a great accompaniment to PBS's recent documentary Watergate Plus: 30 Years later.  We watched them back to back as PBS aired them this way as well
Doctor Who and the first Download. Doctor who materialised without his Tardis on this, my first timelord download in the amazon unbox, which is much larger on the inside than it appears on the outside.For a very reasonable sum, $1.99, my family and I were able to enjoy the first Third doctor adventure after his regeneration, where he encounters the Nestene Conciousness.The down load took only a few minutes although I had some considerable difficulty installing the microsoft program. thanks to the good people at amazon tech support I was able to obtain an alternative download from the gates empire itself which allowed me to enjoy our rental.a great experience and will not be the last. easy to navigate and fun for all the family. someone should tell the timelords on gallifrey about unbox and perhaps they could get rid of all the old type 40 tardis'
The Fab 4 Conquer America!. These shows are excellent capsules of the early 60's, featuring not just The Beatles, but Davy Jones (part of the Oliver! cast), Frank Gorshin (whom I remember better as "The Riddler" on Batman), Soupy Sales, Cab Calloway,etc.The point of sale, is of course, the 20 performances by The Beatles, presented in very good shape here (as opposed to the numerous copies of copies boots and chopped specials). The sound and pictures being from a 4-decade old videotape are better than expected, and kudos to whoever did the mastering.In other reviews, the other acts get panned, but they are good as well, Sullivan wasn't just a vaudeville rehash. Part of the problem with seeing the comedians,etc. now is that you need to know about the people being referred to (such as Allen and Rossi's bits with Sonny Liston and LBJ).Overall,well worth the price of admission for these trips back to 1964 and 1965
If you are a pilot or controller this is the funniest movie. I am an air traffic controller and this movie is a comedy to me.  It is so far removed from reality it is absolutely hysterical.  This movie makes &quot;Pushing Tin&quot; look like a documentary.  I think airline pilots will also be highly entertained by the flight sequences....especially where the airplane transforms into at least 3 different types during the flight.  The only thing in the movie that is realistic is the different ways controllers handle stress.  The rest of the stuff....equipment, procedures, phraseology is total fantasy.  People in the aviation industry will love it as a comedy, while people not in the know seem to enjoy it as a drama
I see that "I Heart the Huckabees" is meant for a selective audience. This movie is obviously not for everyone. It's not a comedy that you just put in and sit back and be shut down the old cranium for the two plus hour's. Nope, instead you get the muscle a-cranking. Huckabees requires you to really pay attention and think and take everything in. This film explores several questions mainly dealing with the connection between one person and to the heart, soul, and body of every other thing in existence in an ever-changing world. This film is a big orgy of questioning. And who doesn't like questioning? This film, in its own right, is very original and thought provoking that goes above and beyond any form of typicality of films."Huckabees" offers us an impressive cast with Dustin Hoffman, Lily Tomlin, Jason Schwartzman, Jude Law, Mark Wahlberg, Isabelle Huppert (one of my favorite international actress's) and Naomi Watts. Most notable performances by, namely, Dustin Hoffman as it's nice to see him in an exceptional role. He hasn't really been given a great script and chance to portray a great character since probably 1997's "Wag the Dog." It's very nice to see Hoffman play a great character, as Bernard, the quirky husband half of the existential detectives. Also, most notable is the performance of Mark Wahlberg, as Tommy Corn, another client of the detectives that befriends Albert. Tommy is a fire fighter who has his own environmental concerns as he refuses to ride on the fire truck and rather, rides a bike to the fire saying, "We'd all be heroes if we stopped using petroleum." Mark Wahlberg is hilarious in this movie and has his best performance since probably "Boogie Nights" and "Three Kings." However, this movie is much more of an ensemble performance than anything else. The ensemble's performance in this film is terrific and the chemistry between each character is flawless.The most credit to this movie goes to writer/director David O. Russell. Russell has obviously something going on up there in the cabeza to extract such a story. But the story is amazingly written. The script is out of the ordinary yet genius and comes out as one of the most intelligent films out there and hilarious at that.
HG WELLS. This is an amazing service! For only 2 bucks i can watch what i like for the moment. In this case it was HG WELLS. Great biography
"This ain't New York, This the Bronx". Man, I don't see how can anyone say anything negative about this classic movie.  Like another guy said earlier, it you have not been there, you should not say anything.  I was only 9 years old when "Beat Street" came out.  I remember that my mom took me to the freaking theater the first day it came out and she still remembers seeing my silly a*ss at the theater breakdancing to the "Frantic Situation" by Afrika Bambaataa.  This movie and breakdancing as a whole has the most special place in my heart because I fell in love with the culture.  That's right, breakdancing was about culture, expression, and more than anything MUSIC.  I am 31 years old now and I still listen to many of the breakdancing hits from back in the day.  One of my favorite bands was "Break Machine".  I am getting nostalgic just writing this right now so I'm going :).  Anyways, If you want to learn about the roots of Hip Hop, you need to get off your butt and grab a copy of "Beat Street".Breakdancing will always be in my heart!!
one of the best. This episode is a classic, and is one of the best in the series. It explores time travel and alternate time lines, and it's storytelling had paved the way for many screen plays that followed.
EXCELLENT MOVIE. Not a big box office success this is really a very good movie.  Great performances from Michelle Pfeiffer, Colin Firth, Jessica Lange and Jason Robards.
Landmark caper movie. The granddaddy of all crime caper movies, it's about four crooks who break into a jewelery store and rob the safe, only to get gunned down later. It's best remembered for the robbery sequence, which goes on for almost a half hour and is filmed in great detail with no dialogue or background music. Their careful planning, teamwork, and ingenious use of common objects are so admirable that we feel sorry for them when they get killed later on. There's a grittiness about the photography and a callousness about the violence (of which there is plenty) that make the movie an excellent film noir entry: the tone is very black. The movie inspired a million spin-offs, which is just another indication of its greatness
Probably the Best Drama Series Ever Made. I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out
A masterpiece of subtlety. 'Diary of a Country Priest' is not a film about christianity - though in many ways it is about faith. I see it as more of a meditation on failure. Indeed meditation is the right word because this is precisely the mood of the viewer while watching this film. Every sound becomes important. We are so used to the cinematic device of a score or musical accompaniment that the silences and dissonances of this movie take us off guard. Indeed many of the reviewers here have called this film boring. I would venture to guess, no offence intended, that the only reason this film is boring to these people is their blatant refusal to open themselves up to anything other than what they are used to.  They are like the countess of the film who is so stubborn right up to the end only able to resign herself at the last moment. Only such attention to detail can bring about the deep spirituality or pscychological probing that one may seek in this film. In Bresson - seek and you shall find....
disgusting and brilliant!. it was hard for me to beleive that bad taste was directed by peter jackson, the director of the amazing lord of the rings trilogy. bad taste was jackson's directorial debut. the film has that homemade feel, except for the special effecs and camera angles and directing wich are done pretty professionally. the movie is about a group of lame brain special agents fighting aliens who are planning on using earthlings as fast food. the movie is definately not for the faint of heart. the gore effects are pretty gross, especially the scenes of brains oozing out of broken open heads. there are also decapitations, dismemberments, disembowlments and a very disgusting scene were one of the agents enters and exits an alien by use of chainsaw. bad taste is a disgusting, gory, and very enjoyable film if you dont take it seriously(wich would be very hard to do). get out the barf bag and enjoy
Beautiful Musical Score. A very touching film and the Musical score sets it off just right
For gangster film aficionados. The film "Dillinger" charts the rise and fall of notorious gangster John Dillinger. The story presented distills his elaborate career, but some of the salient details are included. Dillinger's involvement with Baby Face Nelson, for example, is not mentioned once, but that is probably due to the fact that we are supposed to concentrate on the story of Dillinger and not suffer distraction with the crimes of another notorious gangster. In the film, John Dillinger (Lawrence Tierney) begins his criminal career as a petty crook, but a botched robbery sends him to prison. Here, Dillinger connects with career criminals, and he's admitted to their gang. Dillinger is released and then plans a bold jailbreak for the rest of the gang. Now on the loose, the gang begins a series of bank robberies. Soon Dillinger is on the FBI's most wanted list ...When the film begins, Tierney plays Dillinger as not very bright, but he soon shifts into the seasoned stone-cold killer whose methodical violence created headline after headline. Dillinger's character--as defined by the film--does not permit any explosive scenes. So Tierney's performance can't match--let's say--Paul Muni in "Scarface" or Richard Widmark as Tommy Ugo in "Kiss of Death." A fascinating character here is Helen Rogers (Anne Jeffreys), Dillinger's girlfriend--the gangster's moll who loads up on expensive gee-gaws while conveniently ignoring the source. Fans of gangster films will want to catch this one if it's possible to track down a copy--displacedhuman
This one gets alot of hate... but I thought it was good for a sequel.I'm surprised people actually expect much from them.If you go in with an open mind and expecting the standards of a sequel,it will be a fun horror flick with a build-off of the 1st one.It doesn't go too off track.It explores the environment the cenobites exist in that you don't see in the 1st.Channard's an interesting concept too.I love the whole phallic innuendo of his character.It's no masterpiece though.They use claymation for some effects and the story is a bit cheesy...though we are expecting this.I'd reccomend the 3rd and 4th too.After that,effort just flew out the window
Exciting Movie, Lots of Action and Beautiful S.E. I really enjoyed the watching the movie for it's scene with the Dragon and I thought the movie was interesting the whole time.  I've watched it several times since I purchased it
All I can say is "Wow" !!!. I work at a video store , and I would see people rent this movie once in a while . Finally , I decided to rent it , and ( with no expectations except that it would probably be wierd ) watch it on my day off . What I watched was one of the best movies I have ever seen . It is a perfect mix of a fairy tale and a nightmare . A dream cocktail , if you will . Incredible cinematography and equally great acting . I can't believe that I , being the movie geek that I am , hadn't seen this already . I am sure glad I did though . I highly recommend you do the same
A Textbook Example of Reactive Attachment Disorder. Watch this movie if you want insight into how childhood sexual abuse, neglect and trauma horribly affects children's emotional development and ability to authentically attach to new caregivers.  If you're a foster parent, adoptive parent, teacher or therapist of a child with Reactive Attachment Disorder, this movie lays out all the triangulation, manipulatiion and "craziness" that comes into play.  Though the abusive caretakers are dead, they continue to "haunt" the children and the children channel or are possessed by them.   This is symbolic for how abused children continue to recreate the chaos and abuse they experienced from their birth parents for years and years after removal.  I could go into greater detail, but this movie would certainly make an excellent subject of study and analysis for a graduate course in psychology or social work
Innocence revealed, though it's a struggle all the way. Cary Grant, convicted of arson/murder at a factory, escapes from death row and holes up at the house of old flame Jean Arthur (she believes he's innocent). Also staying at the house for the summer is famed law school dean and Supreme Court appointee Ronald Coleman. Coleman is all prim and proper law-by-the-books, facts only, and Grant and Arthur try to get him to help out Grant's case. There are some good sparring scenes between Grant and Coleman: fire vs. ice (Irwin Shaw worked on the script and it shows), and both, of course, are in love with Arthur. Coleman, about to turn Grant in on principles, changes his mind and helps find the real arsonist/killer.Coleman has always been a somewhat stiff, stagey actor, but at least here the role fits him. Arthur is a bit too squeaky (that voice of hers), but Grant is by far the best thing the movie has to offer. The plot is not very believable, and the ending gets preachy about law in America, the corrupt system, un-blind justice, etc., etc. But the movie is watchable throughout, and the script is a good one. In a somewhat unusual set of circumstances, two endings were shot and preview audiences got to choose the one they liked best: they liked Grant winning Arthur rather than Coleman - and Hooray! for that
A Great Film. It all started with John Malkovich. Me seeing the movie I mean, not the film itself. I was scanning through Malkovich's filmography and saw this film in their. I had heard of the film, but had no idea what it was about but I checked it out. Malkovich is close to top billing, but his role is really small...Having said that, this was an amazing film. Truly a work of art. The movie stars Sam Waterston ('Serial Mom') playing Sydney Schanberg, a New York Times columnist who heads to Cambodia on the brink of war. Bombs have been dropped, labor camps have been set up and Schanberg wants to write about all of it. When he gets there he meets Dith Pran (Haing S. Ngor, who won an Oscar for the role), who becomes his friend and interpreter. Malkovich plays Schanberg's photographer Al Rockoff; His role is brief, but he leaves his mark. After Schanberg's war entraps himself and his fellow journalists, Pran saves him from being executed but is himself placed in a labor camp. The script is based on a New York Times article by Schanberg called The Death and Life of Dith Pran. When I saw that, I figured this would be a rather depressing story. Truth is, the film is quite uplifting. The choice to use John Lennon's "Imagine" for the final scene was perfect. Anyway, back to the synopsis...Schanberg is back in New York, while Pran slaves at the labor camp. Schanberg has no idea whether Pran is alive or dead, but doesn't give up on the idea of one day reuniting with his friend. Most films that take place in this setting, I'm not a big fan of. I'm not saying I didn't like these films, but movies like The Constant Gardener and Beyond Borders are a bit like this movie. Although, for the record, this film is way better. Having said those last two things I was surprised that I liked this film. Whether you're a fan of these kinds of movies or not, you need to see this. It's an important and uplifting movie, that no one should not see.GRADE: A
DUTCH. Every time I was flipping the channels and Dutch was on I would end up staying on the channel and watching it.   I hated Married with Children so I was very suprised that I like this movie
The Creature Will Neve Die!. This movie is one of the best creature features made in the "Drive In 1950s."  The print on the DVD is excellent as is the audio.  Start making the popcorn now
A True Classic. I remember overhearing a conversation that included my father and other men around his age talking about the movies they loved as young people. All of them agreed that one film was perhaps the greatest film of their youth: CAPTAINS COURAGEOUS. I think it's easy to see why this is the case. The story may be old fashioned and this one time classic is hardly read anymore, but the story of young Harvey Cheyne coming of age aboard a Gloucester fishing schooner has a way at tugging at the heart and if given the chance, people can change.On of the reasons the film works so well is the acting. Depression era child star Freddie Bartholomew plays the incorrigible Harvey. Bartholomew plays the role with great skill. He's miserable enough that we're glad when he finally falls overboard, yet sympathetic enough that we are glad he does get rescued. The transformation is believable and by the films end, we begin to believe in Harvey and even grow to like him. Spencer Tracy won an Oscar as Manuel, the Portuguese fisherman who in some ways becomes the only true father figure Harvey has ever known. Today Tracy would never get away with playing a Portuguese fisherman with his Irish looks and somewhat clumsy attempt at an accent, yet his skill in portraying his character is undisputed. Lionel Barrymore is perfectly cast as the old salt New England sea captain Disko Troop. Mickey Rooney is somewhat underused as the captain's son Dan. My guess is that if the film were made a few years later when Rooney became a matinee idol, he would not be cast in such a small role or the role would be expanded.While a great cast carries the film, there are also smaller details that make the film powerful. The original sea shanties add a certain flavor. The special effects of the sea are magnificent for their time, and the sailing scenes are stupendous. This was no small feat in the 1930's. The film certainly is a timeless classic. People who purchase this DVD will also love the bonus features; trailers of the 1946 re-release, a short film THE LITTLE MAESTRO and a cartoon LITTLE BICK CHEESER.
A Near Perfect Movie. In America is a near perfect movie dealing w/ grief and learning to live again after tragedy. It is also about hope.The characters are engaging and each one is dealing with grief in their own way. They are all trying to find a new life literally in Amerca and figuratively w/ in themselves after a variety of tragedies and set backs.The only real downside I can note on this movie is that I would have liked a little more back ground on Frankie and Mateo but I think the movie tries hard to put you in the midst of these lives without arbitrary flashbacks.Besides, a great story the cinematograpy is well suited with its combination of views through a child's camcorder and closer scenes of the city and family life. I especially liked ths subtle way the camera shows the changing of seasons.If you want to enjoy a good story and a bit of tear jerker thent his is a must see. If for nothing else than the performances of "Mateo" and young "Kristie." Just amazing.
Lycanthropy; Landis Style!. The Werewolf sub-genre is one that has suffered over the years from poverty row production values and destructive self mockery. Like the Zombie, the Werewolf is the poor relation to the endless tales of vampirism and Frankenstein. This is mainly due to a lack of generic tradition in literature and art, but Hollywood has done little to redress the balance over the years. However for a short time in the early 1980's the Werewolf enjoyed the fullest of moons with both Joe Dante's HOWLING and John Landis' AMERICAN WEREWOLF IN LONDON thrilling audiences and winning important critical notices. Landis had scored with ANIMAL HOUSE and THE BLUES BROTHERS, and deftly combines the ribald humour of those films with all the horror clichs that had undone Universal's output in the 1940's. Importantly Landis's humour is not mocking, instead he gives us an affectionate parody, overflowing with enthusiasm. He is also very aware of the conventions and limitations of the genre itself. The scares and violence come in abundance as does the nonsensical narrative twists. England is both beautiful and eerie, a space in which the age old battle between science and superstition continues to be played out. The film works because of its lack of originality, through its post-modern appropriation of Universal's themes and iconography we have an early example of a horror homage. Wonderful special make up effects by Rick Baker however firmly anchors the film in modern horror seas. Full of excellent British character actors, the nostalgia of the film is pitched perfectly and represents the high watermark of Hollywood horror films for the 1980's.Universal's 2 disc DVD is misleading. The supplementary features amount to little more than 45 minutes, and the DVD could have easily been presented on a single disc.
COMPLEX. TANGLED IS ACTUALLY A REALLY GOOD MOVIE. YOU HAVE TO PAY ATTENTION OR YOU'LL GET LOST IN THE PLOT BUT OTHER THAN THAT IT WAS A GREAT MOVIE
beat street !!!!. Honestly beat street is the best breakin video out there period.This like the orgin of hip hop music,dancing and grafitti to this day.The storyline is alright not going to go into details but it send out a positive message to everyone that was there and even today.Honestly just buy the movie why read this review !!
Funny,Funny,Funny. Even though this is about 4 years old, it is extremely halarious.  I've been waiting to see a good stand up comedy. The first 15 min is just one hilarious hit after another. I love this guy
Touching, funny, and thought provoking. The Ringer succeeds in moving well though being laugh out loud funny, touching, and thought provoking.  Viewers who look for The Ringer to be simple slapstick or to allow them guilty laughs in the name of political incorrectness will miss the entire point of the film.  The Farrelly Brothers do an excellent job of presenting a story that challenges deeply held stereotypes and entertains at the same time.  Highly recommended, and hats off to the filmmakers
Acting masterclass served on a silver tray. There are no axe murderers lurking in the closet, but Joseph Losey's decadent class-struggle allegory "The Servant" matches Polanski's "Repulsion" as a classic of psychological horror. Dirk Bogarde delivers a note perfect performance as the "manservant" hired by snobby playboy James Fox (in his screen debut) to help him settle into his new upscale London digs. It soon becomes apparent (to the viewer) that this butler has a little more on the agenda than just polishing silverware and dusting the mantle. Actors talk about giving the character "an inner life"-just watch Bogarde's facial expressions and see a craftsman at work! A young (and quite alluring) Sara Miles is memorable as Bogarde's "sister" who is hired as the maid. If you've seen "Wings Of The Dove" or "Days Of Heaven" you will likely figure things out early on, but you'll enjoy the ride all the same. The expressive chiaroscuro cinematography sets an increasingly claustrophobic mood as the story progresses (Watch for the clever use of convex mirrors to "trap" the images of the principal characters). By the way, if you are a fan of 1960's British folk music, you'll want to keep your eyes (and ears) peeled for a rare, unbilled (and all-too-brief) glimpse of legendary (and reclusive) guitarist Davey Graham, playing and singing (live-not dubbed!) in a scene where James Fox walks into a coffeehouse. The DVD is bare-bones, but picture and sound are excellent. A must-see
Rodgers & Hammerstein's Cinderella  Dvd. I was very well pleased in receiving my purchase of a dvd movie, "Rodgers & Hammerstein's Cinderella".  For many years I have seached all over for even seeing this movie once again, which I saw for the very firt time on television way back when I was in 3rd grade in school.  I fell in love with that movie and I have even tried to order it through my Family Video Store, and they told me they couldn't get it at all.   I went online and Amazon.Com popped up and I saw it there saying there was only one copy left.    I immediately ordered it through Amazon.Com and received it very quickly through UPS, and I would like to say everything was excellent and thank you Amazon.Com.   I have also ordered a tricycle for my Granddaugher through Amazon.Com and the service and quality was also excellent.  I highly recommend for everyone to go to  amazon.com  for their special ordering needs.
Great show!. Desert Island Dish is a cute show about working together and nutrition  but 'The Secret About Secrets' steals the stage in this pair. It's a hillarious episode about DW trying to keep a secret
Great movie!. I've never been to New Orleans, so I can't vouch for the accuracy of the film in that regard.  Nevertheless, I love the whole atmosphere of the  film, right down to the inconsistent accents.  The romance is great and I love its portayal of the way corruption can creep up on a person.
Genius. Putting it simply, this film is the work of a genius. As a Tom Stoppard fanatic, I adored it from the moment I read the play, which was even the version he was considerably unhappy with. He was significantly more satisfied with the movie, and there is very little doubt as to why. He clearly had a handle on what he was doing and writing and with whom he was working.Any being who has ever had a single existentialist thought should see this film--they may or may not like it, but that's not what matters. This film is amazing
WHAT HAPPENS WHEN MISTER RIGHT APPEARS TO TWO SISTERS AS THE PERFECT MAN?. FIRST OFF:"The Man in the Moon", is a great film! With Robert Mulligan, the director of 'To Kill A Mockingbird' and 'The Summer of 42' at the helm, and a 14 year old Reese Witherspoon as Dani, who shines in the role of a coming of age teenage girl in love for the first time, the film certainly starts out on the right foot.IN A NUTSHELL: A TALE OF 2 SISTERS [some plot spoilers below]Its roughly the summer of 1957 in rural Louisiana. Maureen Trant, 17, [Emily Warfield] and Dani Trant, 14, [Reese Witherspoon] are sisters. Very close bonds hold them together, but this summer will put a strain on their relationship. The strain comes in the form of Mr. Right appearing without warning as the boy next store. His name is Court Foster [Jason London] and he is 17 years old.The trouble is, Dani saw him first, or more correctly he saw her. The family knows that Dani has an older friend next store who happens to a boy, but owing to the age differences and the boy's character nobody is worried -- except Court. He's got a little girl following him around and he has to admit it too himself that he wants her around -- and perhaps more -- too much more?!THEN THE PLOT THICKENS: [more plot spoilers below]Maureen never sees Court until we're about halfway through the summer, since she was out on a date when his family returned to the farm and they had dinner at the Trants. When she does see him, he has come to their house to visit Dani, but then something happens.Court and Maureen are obviously taken with each other and Dani can't believe it. How could her sister betray her like this? From this point on the movie is about the strain between the two sisters when Mr. Right appears to both of them as the perfect man.Robert Mulligan - DirectorSam Waterston  - Matthew TrantTess Harper  - Abigail TrantGail Strickland  - Marie FosterReese Witherspoon  - Dani TrantJason London  - Court FosterEmily Warfield  - Maureen TrantBentley Mitchum  - Billy SaundersABOUT THE DVD: EXCELLENT WIDESCREEN TRANSFERSPECIAL FEATURES: THEATRICAL TRAILER & SCENE SELECTIONS - WISH THERE WERE MOREBOTTOM LINE: THIS IS A 'REEL' SLICE OF LIFE THAT WON'T DISAPPOINTThis is quite a little story with a big punch. The supporting roles are impeccably played with Sam Waterston playing Matthew Trant, the father, and Tess Harper playing Abigail Trant, as the mother. They have their own personal dramatic subplot in this summer of 57 in Louisiana.
A Christmas Classic. I am so happy that I found this Christmas Classic, The Year Without A Santa Claus on DVD!  It brings back so many wonderful childhood/Christmas memories!  Plus it has 2 other classics on it.  The quality of it is amazing!  As if they filmed it yesterday!  A great Christmas classic to add to your collection
Odd film that is hard to stop watching. This seems more an experience than a film. I felt more of a voyeur peering into someone's private life than watching a film. Most likely this is a symptom of hollywood film conditioning, which this film is not. This film is unexpected and subtly jarring. It moves slow, like a heartbeat. I kept waiting for each pulse until, finally, it ended. Good for a quiet night to give a warm buzz. Nice performance by Daniel Auteuil (and others) that stands out from other parts. Watch the film "Aprs vous" as a nice contrast and to cheer you up a bit after
It's Jimmy Carr - Need more be said?!?. Thanks for keeping a Brit sane in a country full of "My wife says..." jokes.Your wife is fat and ugly and I don't care what she says. Because she's ugly. And fat.....and not my wife
Sometimes it's good to be bad!. Boy, I sure do love this movie!  That's quite a statement as I generally don't care a whole lot for westerns.   This one is a bit of a different sort of western, however.  We get to see Madeline Stowe, Mary Stuart Masterson AND Andie McDowell all in one film!  I've never cared much for Drew Barrymore, but I concede she does a pretty good job in this movie.Madeline Stowe still looks good today, but this movie was made in 1993, when she was @ the very apex of her beauty.  On top of being gorgeous & having a "mystery" about her (which intoxicates me so!) she is also a bona-fide accomplished actress.   It's great to see her go from a naieve woman in THE LAST OF THE MOHICANS to being a tough-as-nails, no nonsense cowgirl in the present flick.  She is a much more diverse actress than most women in Hollywood.   Now if only she'd agree to a candlelight dinner with me.....Anyway, this DVD has often been thought of as a female version of YOUNG GUNS.  Well, perhaps.  However, in my mind, BAD GIRLS is the far more entertaining of the two (I found YOUNG GUNS rather boring).   Also, one nice thing about the film is that it is NOT a film that's just set about to glorify male-bashing. While it does set about to accurately depict examples of unfair treatment of 19th century women, it never becomes "preachy."  Moreover, our cowgirls stumble across some nice fellas who help them out.If you like westerns, you may or may not like this one.  If you like un-conventional westerns where the main characters are pretty girls (not too many other movies can compete in this category), then this movie is a must. It was filmed in Texas and California & some of the screen shots had gorgeous scenery and a few of the sets really made me feel like I was back in the old west
A wonderfull heartbreaking and joyfull film. I was told to watch this film after I told someone I loved Memoris of a Geisha and I really liked this one. Told through mostly flashbacks the film tells the story of 4 elederly chinese women as they look back on there lives in China and then when they live in the us, the story then goes on to there children and they show how they live there lives. The film shows how the mothers are all in there children and then show the heartbreak and joyfullness of family. The story is wonderfull and will get you hooked from begging to end. The acting is great from each actress but the flawe is the film is long and I was ready for it to end. But overall it's agreat film to be watch by everyone
A real tear-jerker. This movie was so very well done, and so very sad.  It will reach-around from behind you and pleasure you in a way you didn't expect, but will leave you feeling very sad at the end.  Sad, but inspired - and that is what this movie is about.  Inspiration.  Morrie was a great, stand-up character who was always "pitching a tent", so to speak.  I highly recommend this movie
Grrrrr..... I liked this movie, and recommend that you rent it or buy it. Thank you
Beauty and the Beast - The TV Series. I don't understand why this series has never been released on DVD. Although I could never understand why it went off the air in the first place, when they continue to keep other shows on that is just not worth watching year after year. There were a lot of people that fought to keep it on and they lost. This series really needs to be released.  Another generation of movie watchers need to be introduced to it.  PLEASE RELEASE IT SOON.  I have been waiting year after year! Come On Amazon - get it release by the studio!  You can do it
Loved it. If you like Chinese movies, if you like simple down to earth stories, you'll love this.  And the actors are not really actors.  They're people from the district near where the film is supposed to happen.  They're real people but they give a moving performance.  And the subtitles work.  I don't speak Chinese
Jet Li's great. I really enjoyed Jet Li's performance in this movie. It's always refreshing to see unadulterated martial art. There were a few slow moments, but I liked the story line and Jet Li is always easy to watch
Great. I haven't heard the original cast recording so I can't compare this to it but, I think this is a very good movie/musical. Madonna and Antonio Banderas did a great job! The music is really good.This musical is not as good as The Phantom of the Opera but it is hard to be better than Phantom. You MUST see EVITA
Alien Nation sent promptly in great condition. Alien Nation was sent promptly. It is in excellent condition. Great service
So Adorable. I had completely forgotten that this movie existed!  I loved it as a small child.  My mother let me watch it over and over when I was little because it was so short.  It's so precious, and looks so classic and old-fashioned on-screen.  I must admit, though, that the animation definitely looks old and today's kids may want to watch Finding Nemo instead
The Best of the Bounties. Even though it tends to drag and the abuse gets a bit repetitive, this is by far the best adaptation of the famous British Navy story. Gable and Laughton are perfect for their respective roles and the period is brilliantly displayed.  I'm not a huge Gable fan.  This and Gone W/ the Wind are abt all I like him in
Magnificent!!!. My brother, my husband, a co-worker of my husband and myself, think this movie is a superb piece of art.  Chiristian Bale (Batman begins) is the main actor.  At his tender age of thirteen years, he delivers such a wonderful performance that makes me think he was born to be the one who would make this film.  Highly recommended movie.  Christian Bale lovers, "baleheads", buy the movie!.  Have some tissue ready on your coffee table.* I'm a spanish speaking person.  I hope my english is satisfactory
An older book that is still enjoyable. I came across "Caddie Woodlawn" as I was making my way through all the old Newbery books.  I was pleasantly surprised at the gentle style of storytelling, and the author's knack for telling a good tale.  The book reminds me a lot of the Laura Ingalls Wilder series both in style and content.The author is writing a semi-biographical account of her grandmother's life in the end of the 19th century on the midwestern frontier.  There are a few tales within the tale that are interesting as well.  The reader will not be disappointed.  It is definitely a must have for the young adult library
Camille Claudel. First saw this film in 1989 when it came out. Purchased this copy after the Detroit Institute of Arts Claudel/Rodin exhibit. Beautifully filmed. Poignant portrayal of Auguste Rodin and Camille Claudel's tumultuous relationship as artist and protege. Adjani and Depardieu, as well as everyone else give powerful performances. Film dwells more on the sensuality and subsequent madness of the relationship and doesn't focus on the fact that they eventually considered themselves equals in their art, how strongly they influenced each other and how much they actually worked together. Still a good buy and well worth multiple viewings
The Other Side of Midnight. In my opinion, one of Sidney Sheldon's very best stories, excellent movie, need to pay close attention to some events in movie i.e.(dinner party where Marie-France leaves table to go onto veranda)as it has chilling impact towards end of film.  Incredible scenery along with fantastic cast, with one exception S.S. Have waited quite a while for this to be available on DVD as have been watching my VHS copy at least once a year and do not become bored no matter how many times I watch.  You won't be sorry for purchase, even though it is an older movie
cuba is the best. just as good as i remembered! I have spent 10yrs trying to find this film as i first saw it on sky tv. Everytime i described it to someone they tried to point me to Outbreak! Anyway basic plot outline is a good old goverment conspiracy and the good guys (cuba gooding jr and co) trying to outwit the bad guys (omar epps and cronies). The only problem that some might find with this film is the fact that its not as polished as the hollywood blockbusters but it is a made for tv movie. Overall i'm glad i managed to find this film as i really enjoyed watching it again
...When I was very small... This episode of Star Trek, "The Man Trap" is my earliest memory of what would become a lifelong enjoyment of the franchise. Truthfully, "The Man Trap" terrified me (I was maybe two, or three, although I am sure by that time the series was limping along in it's third season and I was seeing a repeat for the first time); Star Trek was considered "adult programming", and as such I was not allowed to watch it - I used to sneak behind the couch while my grandfather watched it on nights I stayed at their house, then would lay awake in my bed scared by what I'd seen, but excited just the same. Like another space show I enjoyed and was terrified by (Lost in Space), I didn't recognize Star Trek as anything but a world I wanted very much to be in, but remained frightened of anyhow (I was, as I said, very young).
You feel like you're there!. Great music.  Makes you want to get up and dance - or sing - or both.  Filming in a New York winter helps to really bring you into their angst.  I loved it
Worth Watching Again And Again. This movie, the story of a teacher from an upscale area who is mistakenly assigned to a poverty-stricken school, is heartwarming and very funny. The acting is superb; the children are street kids who quickly win your heart as you get to know each one's distinct personality and life's story.  I am trying to learn to speak Italian, so it serves a double purpose for me. I've watched a number of other Italian movies, which were enjoyable, but this one I watch again and again
Down from the mountain concert. I heard a song from this show on the radio about 6 months before The Oh brother where art thou film was released on DVD. On hearing it I was hooked!  I have the film soundtrack and the DVD then this film was shown on satelite TV in the UK. It was so good I just had to have it. I was not disappointed on first viewing and I am sure I will watch it many times more. If you enjoy 'Bluegrass music' then this show is a mus
Hepburn's Best. Others have reviewed this film extensively in this forum.    Simply put, this was Audrey Hepburn's best performance, and should have brought her a second Oscar win
Classic Movie!. Nick Meyer did a great job at his first directorial debut for the Star Trek franchise. I liked the much more navy~ish feel and the more military style with clear cut ranks and the like. That is one reason I think that has attracted people to this movie. The effects used in the movie were good for the budget and ILM did good for what little money they were given (I think they were were also working on Jedi at the time as well, which has more budget for effects). Definetly get this for your collection.
Brilliant acting by Roth and Ormond. I stumbled upon this video very late one night about two weeks ago, quite by accident.  I was drawn in immediately and held absolutely spellbound by the performances of both Tim Roth and Julia Ormond.  Since then, I have purchased the video and rewatched it more times than I can count, each time loving the movie more.  This is a love story against all odds, a tender, heart-wrenching, passionate love story, of two people drawn together by lonliness, need, and desire.  I agree with one reviewer who said this was one of the most erotically charged films ever seen.   I have never seen Roth portray this kind of character and, I must say, I have become an avid fan and only hope he will take on more roles of this nature.  His performance was riveting, i.e., tender, sensitive, poignant, and very human.  I certainly don't mean to downplay Ormond's performance, it was superb as well.  The chemistry between the actors was incredibly real, both of whom conveyed so much feeling through their eyes, facial expressions and body language.  Since discovering this gem, I have read a lot of the reviews, and I totally disagree with one movie critic who said Roth was miscast in the part. The fact that he does not look like Brad Pitt makes it even more believeable for me.  Roth may not be handsome in the classic sense, but he has a unique look, very sexy, intense, charismatic and sensual.   This movie touches me deeply, I only wish that the ending had not been so rushed.  I would love to see this movie make it to DVD
Ryans Daughter DVD. Delivery time has improved from USA to Australia & all went well
No fool like an old fool. Carole Bouquet is the thinner Conchita who is somewhat severe.  Angela Molina is the one who dances and seems more natural.Jean-Claude Carriere wrote the script.  He may be the greatest screenwriter of all time.  He has over a hundred credits and some of them are among the best movies ever made.  Here's a brief list from those that I have seen: The Ogre (1996), Valmont (1989), The Unbearable Lightness of Being (1988), The Discreet Charm of the Bourgeoisie (1972), Diary of a Chambermaid (1964).There's some symbolism in Cet obscur objet du desir.  Sometimes Mathieu (Fernando Rey) carries around an old gunny sack.  We find out what's in it in the final scene.  It represents Conchita's virginity.  The terrorists in the background seem rather contemporary although this movie is from 1977.  Mathieu is rich and therefore represents the established European society.  Conchita and her friends represent the underclass.  Both Mathieu and Conchita are really character types.  He is the masher, the rake who is always working on a new conquest, although he is somewhat naive.  She is the tease who uses her wiles to get what she can from him.  Bunuel plays this ancient theme as a burlesque, exaggerating her coyness and his foolishness.  The ending may suggest that in some way he has won, or more likely that they are still at a standoff, even while the terrorists escalate the bombings.The question of why there are two actresses playing Conchita has more to do with Maria Schneider, who originally was cast in the role, but left because of the nudity or because Conchita's character was too contrary, than it has to do with any plot or symbolic necessity.  On the other hand, since she is that "obscure object of desire" (which really should be that "unobtainable object of desire"), and because Bunuel wanted to emphasize that Mathieu's desire for her had nothing to do with her personally, he used two actresses and made it clear that Mathieu didn't notice the difference!  A bit of absurdity here, but Bunuel is comfortable with absurdity.All in all an interesting treatment of an ancient theme, but not one of Bunuel's best, even though it was his last at age 77
Hepburn, O'Toole and Givenchy, what more do you need?. William Wyler's "How to Steal a Million" is the very best Stanley Donen picture that Stanley Donen didn't happen to make--just as Donen's "Charade," also with Audrey Hepburn, is the very best Hitchcock picture that Hitchcock never made.This is a truly stylish film.  "How to Steal a Million" looks like ten million ... a hundred million ... aw, in this inflationary era, let's call it a billion bucks on the screen.  Hepburn's roughly two hundred costume changes, her preposterous little car, her hats, her chateau, and everything else shout that this is what the (expensively) good life looks like.  In one scene, O'Toole invites Hepburn--for once looking a bit dowdy--to come as she is.  "Give Givenchy the night off," he says.A quick glance over the previous Amazon reviews shows that those who know and care about this film use the language of people discussing a classic.  And yet, whatever its considerable merits, "How to Steal a Million" was not a particular success at the box office when it first appeared nor is it widely remembered today.I can only speculate why this should be.  Perhaps it was the proximity of "Charade."  Good as this film is, "Charade" was better--a tighter script, a better balance between thrills and comedy and the overwhelming presence of Cary Grant.  O'Toole has always been excellent in comedy, but his part in this film is unquestionably a Cary Grant part and nobody did those as well as the old master, Archie Leech, himself.  On the other hand, it may be that "How to Steal a Million" is a Willy Wyler film and it doesn't feel right or entirely at home among that director's works.  Somehow I doubt that Wyler's many admirers are likely to list this one high among his masterworks.  Or maybe it came out when the public was satiated with well-acted, lavishly produced, well-made films and it just fell between the cracks.Whatever the reasons for its present semi-obscurity, "How to Steal a Million" is a gem and highly recommendable to anyone who believes that quality in movies extends beyond CGI effects and stuff blowin' up real good.  Five stars!A NOTE ON CHANGING TIMES: When I saw this movie during its first run, along with everyone else in the theater, I thought a million dollars was a lot of money.  Just listen to the 1960s prices quoted for major works of art; they are laughable (and a little sad, too) today.A FURTHER NOTE ON MARKETING: This is a movie about high-end art forgery.  It is filled with exquisite paintings and sculptures in almost every scene, all of which were forged for the movie.  Part of the publicity campaign for "How to Steal a Million" was a public exhibition of the forged artworks
Note to 50s Sci-Fi Fan. The Band is awesome. No doubt about it, but that's just it. They were a BAND. Robbie Robertson (spelling correct) somehow fooled the other Band members into letting him have songwriting credit (and Robertson got them to particiapte, against their better wishes, in "The Last Waltz" concert and accompanying film). Take a look at Band drummer Levon Helm's book, "This Wheel's on Fire," and he explains that Robertson and someone in the Band's management talked the group into giving Robertson sole (or majority) songwriting credit, so they all could supposedly benefit financially.  Robertson got rich, while the others didn't.  It's a shame, since Helm, keyboardist Richard Manuel (RIP) and bassist Rick Danko (RIP) all had better voices than Robbie's.There's also a great photo in Helm's book that has Helm showing Robertson how to play something on Robertson's Stratocaster. Great picture. It shows that it was a group effort, but Robertson and "The Last Waltz" film erronneously claim Robertson as the leader and chief talent. "The Last Waltz" concert was filmed by Martin Scorsese, Robbie's buddy. If Robertson truly was the lone genius of The Band, don't you think his solo work would have been much better?Also, in the words of the Arkansas-born Levon Helm himself, "Do you really think a guy from Canada (Robertson) wrote 'The Night They Drove Old Dixie Down' all by himself?'
Probably the Best Drama Series Ever Made. I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out
Mother's Day All Time Favorite Horror!. I First Saw this Movie When I Was About 9 Or 10 Years Old Back In 1984 Or 1985 At My Mom And Dad's Friends House I Still Remember Watching It When I Was A Kid It Scared Me To Death I Found The Mother In That Movie To Be Very Creepy The Scenes That Bring Back Memories Are Queenie At The End Of The Movie The Sleeping Bag Seen The 2 Hippies In The Car With Mother I Am A Huge 70's & 80's And Semi 90's Horror Buff But This Movie Here Is My All Time Favorite Horror I Lent This Movie To 5 Or 6 Of My Friends And They Are Horror Buffs They Have Never Heard Of This Movie Before And They Watched It And They Loved It I Have To Give Hats Off To Charles Kaufman For Making The Best Horror Movie Of All Time
Enjoyable!. I like to watch Cary Grant movies and The Talk Of The Town may not be his best movie but it is good and enjoyable! Cary Grant is very good and so are Ronald Colman and Jean Arthur
good family movie. awesome to watch with all age groups - funny with enough to keep parents laughing and enjoying as well as small children to teenagers
An Underrated Film. This is one of the most underrated war (or anti-war) films of all time. The story is a familiar one: a group of American and German soldiers call their own unauthorized truce during the holidays and learn that the enemy isn't such an enemy after all. The original took place in WWI; this one is "updated" to WWII. (Paul McCartney even used the storyline in an early music video-- Tug of War, I think.) But never has the story been told so eloquently and beautifully as in this film. If you're looking for an inspirational movie for the holidays-- one that doesn't involve Santa Claus, angels, or Ebenezer Scrooge-- you should definitely consider "A Midnight Clear."
Great action-fantasy. This film was definitely not nominated for any academy awards but it sure is a lot of fun to watch. Well filmed and well acted and really well produced, this movie is a great chance to shut off the old brain and just go with the flow
Wonderful video!. This is the first thing that I ever bought of the Spice Girls. I wanted to know more about them & their music before I got too invested. Well, this video tells you everything about the girls & more. It shows how hard they work & that they are all really down to earth girls who had a dream & made it come true. The girls comment on everything in the video, providing info on events and footage they hadn't even seen before. Follow the girls behind the scenes of the making of their video "Say You'll Be There", see them at the famous Oxford street lighting, a pillowfight, having some laughs, and tons more. This video also includes their first 5 full-length music videos for "Wannabe", "Say You'll Be There", "2 Become 1", "Mama", & "Who Do You Think You Are". Also, one of the biggest treats is at the end of this video when we get to see the girls perform their famous Brit awards performance in 1997 of "Who Do You Think You Are". A very good video if you want to know more about the fab 5 & their first year of success
The up-side of our country:. Regardless of how disenchanted one might become with its politics, its politicians, or its policies, a film like this restores one's faith in what our country has to offer its young people.  Even if you happen to think the sort of ruthless competition that goes on in this film is another strike against us as a country, there's still something very moving about a child being nationally recognized and celebrated for the size of her vocabulary rather than her socio-economic background, social skills, or appearance.  In a place saturated by the influence of beautiful people (valued often for nothing else), its refreshing to see the child with the braces and the bad haircut hold up a trophy that comes up to his chest, and walk away with enough money to see him through his first year of college.Beyond that, this movie is delightfully nerve-wracking!  Suspenseful and full of surprises, its as entertaining as it is important.
This sequel is better than the first!. This movie covers a crime most people know nothing about.  Indentity fraud.  At least they don't know about it until it's too late.  The Inspectors did a great job by adding Michael Madsen (many gangster movies, THe Big Apple) to the cast.  He always play an excellent bad guy and doesn't let you down here.  I see an Inspectors 3 in the future
Best In Show is Best in Comedy. This movie is a scream!  I laughed until I thought I was going to die.  Comedy doesn't get any better than this.  The characters are incredible.  It's amazing the actors could keep straight faces while making this movie!Do yourself a favor and watch this movie!  It's even better the second time around
Regression Therapy Gone Bad... 1980's "Altered States" is a very solid science fiction thriller featuring an excellent cast, intriguing special effects, and an implausible but fascinating premise: that man can regress through his prior evolutionary states.William Hurt starred in his first movie role as Jessup, a driven but still sympathetic scientist investigating the experience of water-filled sensory deprivation tanks.  After adding a powerful hallucinogenic drug to his sessions, Jessup seemingly begins to regress to altered states, initially as a primitive human, then into far more alarming forms.  A young Blair Brown co-stars as Jessup's scientist wife, stubbornly in love with Jessup but increasingly horrified by his experiments.  Bob Balaban and Charles Haid provide superb supporting performances as fellow scientists pulled into Jessup's unconventional experiments.The movie follows the results of Jessup's experiments and his rocky relationship with the character played by Blair Brown over several years.  Jessup is compelling as a scientist who has stumbled onto a great secret that seems unbelievable to his fellow scientists.  Almost too late, he comes to realize that his experiments may not be reversible.  The mounting horror of the storyline is accentuated by excellent special effects (for the time) and a sometimes haunting score.This movie is highly recommended to fans of good science fiction and to fans of William Hurt
Great Pirate Movie. This one came "first"--before the adventures shown on the big screen today. You will like this one just as much if you don't mind the dating of the movie
John Lennon in His Own Words. "Imagine" is a feature length documentary about John Lennon's life, centred around the "Imagine" recording sessions, but also featuring footage from the Beatle era, his marriage with Yoko, his "lost weekend" period and a few home movies, all the way to the year of his death. It uses John's own voice as narration, taken from the hours of interviews he did throughout his life, and features alternate and remixed versions of his songs as a soundtrack of sorts, as well as interviews from all sorts of people, from Sean Lennon to George Martin. Though it's not as detailed (or as long) as say "The Beatles Anthology", I still think it is a really fine look at John Lennon's life.Every moment of the film is interesting, I reckon, and if I was to pick a favorite scene, I'd probably pick the whole thing! There's John's encounter with a "tripping" fan at his doorstep, who he talks lyrics with and invites in for tea. There's an interview with May Pang (John's one time mistress), who suggests that John's "lost weekend" period wasn't so lost (he released a few albums during that period, socialized a lot more and collaborated with a lot of people). There's the bed-in debate between John and cartoonist Al Capp over lyrics, art and money (one of the most infamous scenes of the film). The movie captures who John was really well, I thought. He was a thoughtful man, a witty man, whose words were often misunderstood despite the fact he put out his point of view honestly and openly. The places he live in seem to be characters in the documentary too, I think, and evoke the things John liked to surround himself with. The peace of Tittenhurst Estate, the bustle of 1960s London, the "big Liverpool" feel of early 1980s New York, they're all great backdrops to the tale.Special features include "A Tribute To John Lennon", a more recent piece where the filmmakers (and Yoko) discuss the making of the documentary, gushing about John on the way. There's the "Truth Be Told" interview, which was originally done for radio, though for the DVD you get the visual footage too. In the interview John discusses love, sex and "selling out" throughout the history of art. There's an acoustic version of "Imagine", an interview with John's school principal William Pobjoy regarding John's school days and friendship with Pete Shotton, plus footage of John buying a constructing a small playhouse on an island in the lake at Tittenhurst Estate. What's most interesting about this footage, I think, is Julian Lennon's relationship with Yoko. At least in those days, they seem to be getting on quite well, Yoko waving to Jules across the lake and Julian happily calling back.Definitely worth a look for Beatles fans and documentaries
Mickey Rourke is awesome in 'A prayer for the dying'. Loved this movie, and thoroughly enjoyed Mickey Rourke's wonderful performance. It was my only chance to hear him speak with a very convincing Irish accent, and see him with reddish hair. Excellent plot, action, very nice cinematography and soundtrack. A real gem
GOT  MILK....??. Dario Argento fans have nothing to fear,Anchor Bay has done justice to this film.The video transfer from Anchor Bay is simply amazing and the digital 2.0 sound is great.Anchor Bay has given Dario Argento fans "The Cat O' Nine Tails" in it's 2.35:1 anamorphic widescreen format.The pristine video transfer is presented in all it's remastered,uncut and unedited glory.In my opinion the acting in this film is outstanding for a film from the 1970's.I think all the actors gave a solid performance in their roles and this film kept me guessing until the very end.I knew nothing about this movie until I picked it up at used dvd store,but it has quickly become one of my favorite movies.Whether you're a hardcore or casual Argento fan,this movie is definitely worth seeing.As a bonus some nice extra's have been included in this version.P.S. This movie will make you think twice the next time someone offers you something to drink
an intense and colourful ritual. Anyone with an interest in underground film or occultism, especially Thelema, should check this film out. Of Course as a &quot;Crowleyite&quot; Ken's film is very rich and extreme and he combines some striking imagery  with some beautiful music. I have no idea what the music is that he uses  but he manages to relate the on screen imagery to it perfectly. I have seen  two versions of the film with different soundtracks - One of them had a  soundtrack consisting of old pop tunes and I found this version to be not  as good. Anyways - check it out
the real west. It is movie about the strength of friendship and how three men carry out a promise to a dying friend.How men will fight to the end for a dream of one man.The characters drew strength from one another.It tells about the hardships of the old west.The unfortunate greed of men and how greed can kill.Tom Selleck's character showed the the ability to love a woman and his love of his friends.The other characters complimented each other.The movie was well worth the price.You will want more of the same
A Christmas Classic. For every season, there is a classic movie.  In our house, "A Christmas Story" tops the list when Christmas rolls around.  Without a doubt this movie is a classic!  Ralphie and his quest for the Red Ryder BB gun -- I do love this movie.
The Modern Animal Farm. George Orwell's Animal Farm has been looked upon as one of the best novels in the 20th century.  Through talking animals, the storyline cleverly introduces Orwell's bitterness towards communism under Stalin's rule.  The entire setting takes place on a European pasture accompanied with the talking farm animals and very few humans.  Due to modern technological advances in movie production, the realism of the farm animals was greatly affected.Director John Stephenson makes it very clear that all of the animals are mistreated and neglected by their alcoholic owner, Mr. Jones.  Since the animals were not cared for by their owner, they decided to start a revolution that would set themselves free from all human rule.  The animals rallied and soon were in complete self control and free from any higher power.  Shortly after the breakaway, there is a "government" issue in their animalism rule; the appointed leader, Snowball, is overtaken by Napoleon (Stalin).  Napoleon only cares about one thing during his communist rule, and that is being completely in control of everyone.  He violates all of the new animal rights by being cold hearted, ruthless,  and very human like in his attempts to become very powerful.  Snowball on the other hand is the reason behind all of Napoleons failures and mishaps.  He is also the main reason why the animal farm fails miserably in the end.By clearly expressing all of the animals emotions during the chain of events, Director John Stephenson does a great job of being very parallel with Orwell's novel.  The different intelligence levels are also depicted very well, from the quick-witted pigs all the way down to the dense but extremely strong horses and other large farm animals.  The movie is much easier to understand than the novel and it is also a great way to clarify any confusion one might have after reading the novel
Needs Avatar the last airbender. Okay you guys have amazing, cool, and sweet videos on Amazon. My favorite though is Avatar and I have bought every single episode you have so far. Your episode downloads are magnificent to see on my creative zen vision: M.I had a quick tip though: Can you get more Avatar the Last Airbender Digital downloads. Please!
I just want to tell everyone... When this movie came out and I saw it at the movietheater---You know the scene in the car where Tine finally gets enough and hit him back? Everyone in the theater started yelling and screaming, clapping their hands!! It was awesome and I will never forget it!
A kinetic ride!. "Shoot the piano player" reveals the enormous amount of expressive burden and creative energy respect to well know establsihed and fixed classic references.When you think in New Wave terms you should consider the term demolition and a whole game of distorted images of the irreverence 's mirror.In all creative process there is a visible tendency to destroy the ancient patterns. This fact demands from you all the possible considerations in order to enjoy and be part of this game.Visual metaphors, gradual destruction of the classical archetype of the criminal cinematography produce by its own the final product: a renovated narrative scheme and new stylistic perspectives.Go for this unusual film!
Not 'great' Hitchcock,' but a 'Hitchcock' after all!. We are taken by Alfred Hitchcock to the French Riviera where a series of robberies are occurring, and women screaming that their precious jewels are stolen... A black cat - in each robbery - is roaming stealthily in fear and shame along the roof of the elegant Carlton..From there, Hitchcock introduces us to John Robie (Cary Grant), a retired jewel burglar known as the 'Cat' who is living in peaceful isolation in Cannes...Robie is seen upset, bothered,, and worried because the 'Cat' prowls again... But, who is the 'Cat'? Surely someone is imitating his old style, using his ability and skill, almost his cleverness and talent...Naturally, the police in Cannes is blaming him... They had his hallmark stamped and classified... They would like to catch him in the act and finish with him in jail...Robie is worried how to catch the real thief being himself subject to harass! The characteristic plot of Hitchcock: To chase and to be chased at the same time...John Williams (H.H. Hughson) whose Insurance Company has been victim of great robberies, gives Robie what he wants: A list of their wealthy clients whom might be future candidates on the list of the skillful thief...Here we discover a future victim, the rich Mrs. Stevens (Jessica Royce Landis) and her cool, beautiful and sensual daughter Frances (Grace Kelly).Four scenes, depicted by the master of suspense, catch our attention:- The classic fireworks shot when Frances and Robies expressed their passion joining their lips in a torrid kiss, igniting the fuse of a chain of explosions in sensation colors and in VistaVision...- The annoyance of Hitchcock towards eggs: Mrs. Stevens, in her hotel's room, extinguishing her cigarette in the yolk of the fried egg...- The Gala night: An extravagant festival of precious stones (diamond, emerald, ruby and gold) displayed in all its beauty and rarity on the neck of women dressed in multicolored and multifarious costumes... Also a close-up for clear identification of the police and gendarme who are ready to capture, to hit, to surprise the famous thief...- The climactic classic roof-top chase sequence between Roby and the thief seen before in "Saboteur," and much later in "Vertigo," and "North By Northwest."With meticulous coiffure and fancy clothes, Grace Kelly plays her role with elegance and fashion... She is gracefully refined and polite showing good taste and style... In the French Riviera she meets her future husband Prince Rainier of Monaco... After finishing the filming of "The Swan," and "High Society," she becomes Princess Grace...The film captures the aerial shooting of the automobile chases on the Riviera Corniche, the Cote D'Azur, the flower market, the grandeur of the rugged coastal scenery, the sea with much sunshine sparkling flashes of wit and gaiety... It is a pleasant entertainment, a 'Hitchcock Champagne' indeed!Grace Kelly--contributing with our ideal romantic hero in catching his thief, was in fact scheming to catch him...
Excellent, a must see. I am an 18 year old white male from a high-class family.. I loved this movie.. The performance of Omar and ll cool j is just amazing.. i would recommend this movie to anyone who likes suspense movies and doesnt mind a movie about black suburbi
Send In The Clowns!. Plot: Three brothers -- Casey (Nathan Forrest Winters), Geoffrey (Brian McHugh), and Randy (Sam Rockwell) -- are left on their own when their parents leave town for the weekend. They decide to visit the local carnival/circus, even though Casey is terrified of clowns. And boy is this a bad night to choose! Three anonymous mental patients (Michael Jerome West, who is credited as "Tree", Bryan Weible, and David Reinecker) have escaped and run away...to the circus! After the show is over, the real clowns -- known as Cheezo (Timothy Enos), Bippo (Frank Damiani), and Dippo (Karl Heinz Deuber) -- are slaughtered by the inmates, who steal their clothes and makeup for a creepy disguise (then again, they do seem quite delightfully mad, so maybe they actually think they ARE clowns). They eventually find their way to the house of the three brothers. And, once they realize the residents are home, they decide to have a little fun. Of course, to the brothers, this will be nothing less than a night of terror! The inmates, for reasons unknown, seem to love a good kill, and tonight they're gonna give these boys a whole house full of horrific surprises!Clowns have always been an interest of mine, and lately I've become even more interested. So, as a horror buff, I figured Clownhouse had to be the perfect flick for my evilly kooky taste. Well, while there are a few parts of the film that are certainly less than genius, I was quite impressed. Most B-movies have to take themselves lightly, or they will be a wreck. But there are a few of them that try to be full-on horror and suspense and accomplish their goal. Clownhouse wasn't particularly scary to me, but I thought -- for it's lack of comedic approach -- that it was executed very well. The acting isn't all that great, but it's not too distracting either. Once the psycho clowns start doing their business, you forget all about any underlying flaws. I think the atmosphere was what this was all about. Not to mention the fact that it was mostly believable. Almost every scene took a fairly realistic approach to the story. This sometimes causes a little boredom here and there, but for the most part makes the movie much more entertaining. The score (often an eerie big-top-ish tune, calliope style or with a music box) was definitely a pleasant surprise -- especially the theme, which can be heard in its entirety at the end credits. And, whether you're rooting for the clowns or the brothers, there are plenty of good scenes and a few creepy moments to satisfy the viewer. The concept alone is a good enough reason to see this, but I think Salva pushed it to the limit and came out with an enjoyable film for any horror fan to own. Overall, I don't really think I have any complaints. For a blockbuster hit, this would've been a bit of a disappointment. But for a rarely known B flick, I've got to give it two thumbs way up. There aren't any special features besides the theatrical trailer, but who needs 'em
Take your time and keep doing it!. I did callanetics at a gym about 6 years ago, and I remember dropping 1 dress size after only one month.  Then life got in the way and I stopped doing it.  When I saw this tape on Amazon, I had to buy it.  I've been doing the tape for the past 2 weeks, and I have to tell you, I can feel my body getting firmer and more flexible.  The exercises are hard, so don't let Callan's soft tone and slow pace fool you.  Take your time and don't be discouraged.  Some reviews complained about how boring the music and Callan are.  I turn the radio on in the background while I do the tape to alleviate that problem.  Slow and steady wins the race.  Take your time, keep the right form, and you'll be fine.
A. Reader. Flipping through cable stations late one night, I came across a bearded Alan Bates intellectually and poetically analogizing a fig to "the female part" before a party of mesmerized and embarrassed picnickers. I, too, was mesmerized, especially by the quiet, deep, limpid restraint of the scene, the little subtle expressions on the faces of the main characters revealing their fundamental natures, Bates's clear, precise voice, his deadly serious playfulness, the rich green English countryside, etc. Oliver Reed's reaction to the monologue was especially impressive for its understated humor and intelligence. I was not able to finish the film, but what I had seen of it stayed with me in an uncannily powerful way, and lo and behold within a week I had discovered the DVD version at Borders of all places. I have since watched it completely and in part dozens of times. It is, along with the enormous Brideshead Revisited, the best adaptation of a novel I have ever seen, and a D.H. LAWRENCE novel at that! I'd have thought it impossible, but these fellows pull it off and then some.
What I wanted. I got the movie I wanted.  I saw it one summer many years ago and was never able to find it.  It was never played on tv that I saw.  It is a very touching movie and it is a true story.  I love watching true stories.My daughter orders from you a lot and this is the first time that I have did it and I got what I wanted.  Thanks so much......
this film kicked ass. western fans, you'll love this film. the other reviews where they're saying this film is dull just didn't watch it right. the gun fight at the end is so awesome. Randolph Scott and Joel McCrea give moving performances and the outlaws are so dirty and evil. Peckinpah's direction is great, all the great landscapes in the film are beautiful. it's a must see!!!!
As wringy as a bar and twiste as strong!!!. Major, Major Norton! Where's thatDavy Crockett DVD I told you to find?Listen up causeGeneral Jackson wants you to goacross the river into enemy territory,braving Red Stick's war party,if that's what it takes to see thisawesome series!For those times when theres onlytwo ways of getting out of that campand the man's got you stoppered-just yell "A-nock-a-hey!" and popin this DVD.Believe me, the Major's only bluffingwith that cannon pointed at you, andyou don't think much of his kind ofpolitics anyway.So kiss Polly goodbye and get in thereand stir up them red hornets withyour bar-grinnin' pal Davy and his gator-scared friend Georgey.Give 'em what fer Davy
a fasinating 1960 movie. a beautiful movie shot before the jesus statue was built on the top of that mountain. death followed the heroine all around...such a sad but very romantic story turned out to be in the end. great cinematography, beautiful original songs, poor but beautiful brazilians, young or old. watching this movie and compared it to the 'city of god', the world seemed to become worse and less hope after half a century.....what a shame
amazing movie. We watched this movie in my Modern Latin America class.  It moved me to tears.  What happened in Argentina in that period, la guerra sucia and los desaparecidos is something which must be exposed so that it never happens again.  This movie is subtile - it never shows torture or killing, although perhaps up to 30,000 Argentines dissapeared, but it shows the CULTURE OF FEAR that they were living in, and how it even created rifts within the same family.  I highly recomend this film
Roller coaster pal to psycho killer. Even though this film might be categorized as a guilty pleasure, it still contains excellent early performances by Mark Wahlberg, Reese Witherspoon and a maturing Alyssa Milano. Production value is high, so this is definitely not a B-movie. The well-developed plot is a familiar one - good girl meets great guy who ends up being a psycho. But the lack of originality doesn't take away from the interesting progression of the movie. Directing, editing, writing and acting are still top notch. And, even though Wahlberg's character ends up going off the deep end, he portrays a believable 'normal' guy in the beginning, even providing an intense roller coaster service early in the movie. He made a pretty good psycho, as well. I enjoyed the film and would even watch it again.
Eddie and the Cruisers. The movies were purchased for my wife - she has enjoyed both Eddie and the Cruisers and Eddie Lives very much -- she would highly recomend both movies
Excellent, but sad movie. Just forget about what "critics" say about this movie.  I just watched it for the first time the other day and I thought it was really good!  Sure, some parts are unexplainable, but it's a MOVIE!  IT'S NOT REAL, PEOPLE!!!  My opinion is the "critics" who gave this movie a poor review were just not happy because the movie has a dissappointing ending and for the most part, the story is dark all the way through.
Childish sometimes. But still very good.I bought this DVD just some days ago and it amazed me.Christina gives an entertaining show where she both sings and dances, and doesn't lypsinch at all.The fast songs are catchy and the low ones are beautifully sung, with strong emotions and the usual powerful voice of Christina.Christina can sing, Christina can dance, Christina can entertain us, she may not be the bestest artist of our generation, but she is surely underrated and deserves a lot of credits.Maybe her look and especially her hair were not that good, but well a singer is supposed to sing in the first place and I didn't really care about what she looked like.
One of the FIRM's best. I've tried most of the firm workouts and find this one to be oen of, if not, the best. It's upbeat and entertaining. I never watch the clock while doing this workout. Instructor Tracy Long is an encouraging leader and has a pleasant voice on top of that. Over all, one of the best firm videos out there! You CANNOT go wrong with this tape
Movies. My husband liked this movie so much he said he had to have it if ever came out on DVD.  He likes Sidney Poltler.  Good additon to collectio
GREAT MOVIE. I had seen this movie a couple of years ago and I have always wanted to see it since. I bought it finally and I'd have to say that I liked it alot more the first time, and it is not a movie I can watch "over and over"This movie is very dark, and there are alot of subtle funny parts to it. The cinematography is beautiful, and the children in the movie are superb actors. I suggest this movie if you don't mind subtitles and you have an open mind and a good sense of humor. If you like this movie you should also see Delicatessen
The river. This is a masterpiece by Jean Renoir. The river is the life itself with its contradictions. It deals with life and death, the problems of being a teenager and the condition of belonging to different cultures at the same time
Nag, Nag, Nag. This isn't one of the Dirty Harry series but it might as well be. Clint Eastwood plays a tough Phoenix cop who's been around a long time and has become jaded. Most of the other cops regard him as a drunk. When he is sent to Las Vegas to bring back a prisoner who is to be a witness in a mob trial, he thinks it is just another detail nobody wants. It seems like nothing out of the ordinary until he actually tries to pick up the prisoner.She is a small time hooker but she goes berserk. She says that if she leaves Las Vegas, she will be killed. The casinos are even taking bets on her not making it. Survival is a longshot. Eastwood doesn't buy it at first but a few stray bullets and bombs convince him otherwise. He realizes that he got the assignment because he was not expected to make it and that he is being set up by someone in his own department. That, more than anything else, convinces him to make it and get his prisoner delivered alive.Getting there means running a gauntlet of betrayal and lots of bullets. It also means he has to deal with the girl played by Sondra Locke. As he is fond of saying, all she can do is nag, nag, nag.It an action packed movie that is well suited to Eastwood's style.
Tom Drake (Alfred Sinclair &quot;Buddy&quot; Alderice) was fantastic!. I watched this film at least 17 times, it was a wonderful film. My all time favourite. Buddy was aboslutely adorable, proving that he was and still remains as the best actor ever
Excellent Audio Commentary by Stephen Prince. I knew that Akira Kurosawa's "Kagemusha" (1980) had some basis in history, but I didn't know how much until I listened to this DVD's audio commentary by film scholar Stephen Prince ("The Warrior's Camera: The Cinema of Akira Kurosawa").  According to Prince, virtually the entirety of the film's story is based on historical events -- the major exception being the character of the thief who acts as the double of Shingen, the warlord.  However, Shingen, a historical figure, had employed doubles in real life, so Kurosawa's fictionalizing of the title character isn't that much of an embellishment.What makes Prince's commentary so outstanding is his in-depth knowledge of Japanese history.  The historical events chronicled in the film are well-known to a Japanese audience, but they're unfamiliar to the average Western viewer.  So, Kurosawa's often unconventional depiction of these events are frequently lost on non-Japanese audiences.  For example, according to Prince, the wounding by gunfire of Shingen as he listens to an enemy's flute marks a monumental event in Japanese history.  But Kurosawa portrays the event only in an oblique manner: by having the sniper who shot Shingen re-enact the shooting for Ieyasu Tokugawa (another historical figure, and the eventual winner of the wars that Kurosawa depicts).  Just imagine a film about Abraham Lincoln that dramatizes his assassination by having it re-created by Secret Service agents, and you'll get an idea of Kurosawa's inventiveness.Prince discusses some off-screen historical events that were going on the same time as the incidents in the film, giving the listener a much broader understanding of both history and Kurosawa's accomplishment.  Also, Prince talks in depth about some of the artistic license that Kurosawa has taken with non-fictional events.  After listening to the commentary, I came away with a much deeper appreciation for "Kagemusha."Since so much has already been said about the film itself, I will only add this: It's unfortunate that Shintar Katsu, who was originally cast in the title role and is best-known for starring in the Zatoichi film series, was fired by Kurosawa before filming began in earnest.  Tatsuya Nakadai, who replaced Katsu, is a superb actor, but his screen presence doesn't have the comic warmth that Katsu could have brought to the role -- and that I think would have enhanced the film.  (And at the risk of infuriating Nakadai fans everywhere, I would also prefer to have seen his lead role in Kurosawa's "Ran" played by Toshir Mifune.)  I can't watch "Kagemusha" without wondering how the film might have looked if Kurosawa and Katsu hadn't quarreled.  Otherwise, "Kagemusha" is among Kurosawa's best period films.Even if you already own "Kagemusha" on tape, this Criterion DVD might be worth renting for Prince's commentary alone.(Disclaimer: I do not know Stephen Prince personally, nor do I have any vested interest in his work.)
"There you go with that wishin' stuff again.  I wish you was a wishing well, so that I could tie a bucket to ya and sink ya.". Everyone has to start somewhere, and while The Public Enemy (1931), directed by William `Wild Bill' Wellman (Wings, The Call of the Wild, Island in the Sky) wasn't James Cagney's (Yankee Doodle Dandy, White Heat, Mister Roberts) first film, it was one of his earliest starring roles...originally Cagney was set to play a supporting character, but after stealing the show in The Millionaire (1931), studio executives decided to set him as the star only a couple of weeks prior to shooting The Public Enemy, and the rest is history, as they say.  Also appear with Cagney is the original platinum blonde Jean Harlow (Hell's Angels), Edward Woods (Tarzan the Fearless), Joan Blondell (The Blue Veil), Donald Cook (Whirlpool), Leslie Fenton (Streets of Laredo), Beryl Mercer (Devil's Lottery), Robert Emmett O'Connor (A Night at the Opera), Mae Clarke (Frankenstein), Murray Kinnell (Anne of Green Gables), the man credited for getting Bette Davis her big break into films.As the film, set in Chicago, begins, it's the year 1909, and we meet two young delinquents named Tom Powers and Matt Doyle, later played as adults by Cagney and Woods, respectively.  Anyway, seems the junior hoods belong to a club run by a mug by the name of Putty Nose (Kinnell), a Fagin type who acts as a fence for whatever the street urchins in his club can lift.  As the years go by Putty Nose eventually hooks Tom and Matt up with their first, big heist, but things go down badly, causing Putty Nose to leave everyone's cheese out in the wind in saving his own miserable hide.  As time passes, Tom's older brother Mike (Cook), who's a real goody goody, goes off to fight the Kaiser, Tom and Matt fall into the lucrative bootlegging business, once prohibition kicks in, finding sponsorship through a relatively small time mug named Paddy Ryan (O'Connor), who hooks them up with local dapper criminal type named Nails Nathan (Fenton).  Eventually Tom returns from the war a bit shell shocked, learns of his brother's activities, and the pair have a falling out, causing Tom, who's swimming in coin now, to move out of the family home and shack up with some dame (Clarke) who he soon drops (by way of a grapefruit to the face) for another slightly more polished dame named Gwen Allen (Harlow).  After settling a score with an old acquaintance, Tom and Matt soon find themselves in the middle of a gang war, are forced to go into hiding, but are quickly ratted out, which leads to Tom taking matters into his own, psychotic hands (which he does, and then some).As far as gangster films go, The Public Enemy is right up there in my personal top five, due primarily to Cagney's indomitable presence and Wellman's wonderful direction.  Nearly every aspect of this film works together to create an engaging, moralistic prohibition era tale set in the bad old days of Chicago.  I learned a lot from this film, including the following...1.	The short-armed jab was a popular way to show affection back in the day.2.	Gangsters don't like it when you `lam out' on them.3.	Gangsters aren't very sympathetic, especially when they catch up to someone who's `lammed out' on them.4.	A beer keg makes an interesting centerpiece on a dinner table.5.	Black cats are truly bad luck.6.	Mike's got one hell of a right hook, at least before he joined the army.7.	Mike doesn't care for bootleg beer.8.	If you're looking to break up with your significant other, try shoving a juicy grapefruit in his/her face as it really gets the point across.9.	If you're ever thrown from a horse, best to protect your melon.10.	Criminal types had really cool nicknames back in the day like Nails, Dutch, Limpy, and Putty Nose (okay, maybe those last two aren't so cool).11.	Monogamy isn't a particularly cherished value among gangsters or their dames.12.	Platinum blondes are hard to figure.13.	Parents do have favorites.14.	Gangsters have a sick sense of humor (case in point, Tom's `homecoming' at the end of the film).15.	In terms of really lousy gooberment legislation resulting in disastrous negative after effects, prohibition has to be in the top five.As I said, nearly every aspect of this film worked for me including the strong performances (Cagney owns the film with his portrayal of the ruthless, cold blooded, unflinching, extremely lethal racketeer Tom Powers), the well thought out engaging direction by Wellman, and the snappy dialog (including lots of colorful gangster `speak')...the one element the felt a little off for me was Harlow's character.  I think she was supposed to be a classy, sophisticated type Cagney's character hooks up with once he begins moving up in the world, but she came off more as a street dame pretending to be a classy, sophisticated type.  This was a minor point for me, only noticeable because everything else worked so well.  My favorite scene from the film is near the end, when Cagney's character seeks revenge against a rival gang, and stakes out their hangout in the middle of the night during a pouring rainstorm.  As the men arrive and enter the storefront, Cagney produces one of the most psychotic grins I've ever seen, his character enjoying the supreme satisfaction of knowing he's about to permanently settle the hash of those who've wronged him.  Another aspect that works so well with this film is the fact that most all of the violence is off screen, providing clear and defined setups allowing viewers to utilize their imaginations in filling in the gaps, which is sometimes much more effective than displayed bloodshed.  All in all if you're a fan of early gangster films, or just great films in general (especially ones with a doozy of an ending), this one deserves your attention, ya lousy mug...The picture quality, presented in fullscreen aspect ratio, looks quite good, especially considering the film is over seventy-five years old.  The tones aren't as sharp as I would have liked, but overall the picture comes across well, as does the Dolby Digital mono audio.  Extras feature a bit called Leonard Maltin's Night at the Movies which includes an introduction by Lenny himself, a newsreel of the day, a comedy short titled The Eyes Have It (1931) featuring Edgar Bergen and Charlie McCarthy, a Merrie Melodies cartoon short titled Smile, Darn Ya, Smile (1931), and trailers, one for this film along with another for one for a Cagney film titled Blonde Crazy (1931).  Also included is a featurette titled Beer and Blood: Enemies of the Public (19:33), a commentary track with film historian Robert Sklar, the 1954 re-release forward (0:42), and subtitles in English, Spanish, and French.Cookieman108By the way, if you're interested in picking up this film on DVD, you might want to check out The Warner Gangsters DVD Collection which features The Public Enemy (1931), White Heat (1949), Angels with Dirty Faces (1938), Little Caesar (1931), The Petrified Forest (1936), and The Roaring Twenties (1939) as it's probably a better value that buying the films individually.
One of the few artsy films I enjoy. Like most artsy films, The Piano is a visual experience.  And, because it's an artsy film, it will be hard for me to explain why I liked it so much. As previously stated, the visual aspect of the film is mesmerizing and amazing: it's a great experience.  What gives this film it's strength is its visual expressiveness: meanings are shown through movements, gestures, expression, and of course, music, not words.I did not know of the feminist controversy surrounding this film before I saw it, but now that I know about it it still doesn't affect the way I see this film.  I don't think the point of the film is to make one see her as a strong or weak woman for choosing to do the things she does in her relationships with her husband and his neighbor George, but to see that her will is in control at all times.  She does what she wants; all the choices she makes are the choices SHE made.  As long as that continues to be true, she is still in control of her life, and that makes her a strong character.Performances are strong as well, especially Anna Paquin's character.  Holly Hunter as the proud, passionate Ada, Harvey Keitel as the desiring neightbor, and Sam Neil as the sadly pathetic yet pitiable husband, round off the rest of the powerful cast in this powerful movie.
We gonna have ourselves a car chase today. I guess that is the point of this movie, but there is a little more to it.  Kowalski played by Barry Newman is a car runner that always delivers his cars.  On his drive there he gets chased by a bunch of cops but he drives a Dodge Challenger, so nobody will catch him.  His back story is explained in a few scenes of how he used to be a cop and a race car driver.  Everything in the movie is very interesting but the car chases are the thing that is going to hold your attention.  Well, also the naked woman riding the motorcycle, you have to like her too.The dvd gives us the uncut UK version and wow what a difference.  Also a commentary by the director was a real treat to listen to.
A great film. I'm going to be brief here.  This is just a darn good movie.  It has sort of a Wes Anderson feel to it, but no voice over or things of that nature.  This is the type of movie that makes you laugh in places where you didn't think you were going to laugh.  Just watch and enjoy
In your face and gripping. Just a great movie.  A breath of fresh air, because unlike most of the films about girls, boys or men are the center of everything and this film focused on the relationships and love between the girls, and it accurately portrays the feelings of lost, uncontented teens who know that there has to be something more.The funny sequences in this movie are almost too funny- A couple of the people who were watching it with me turned blue, and it has some great one-liners.Fun to watch, it picks you up and won't put you down.
I enjoyed the season premeir emensely. I enjoyed this series premier tremendously and am looking forward to watching the rest of the series.  Enterprise started before I had my PVR and was either on at a time I was unable to watch it or I never made time.  I watched one episode of Star Trek the Next Generation yesterday and it peaked my interest in watching some Star Trek episodes again.  Rather than watch episodes I've already seen, Enterprise looks like a great way to enjoy Star Trek episodes.As far as privacy concerns mentioned in other reviews, if you're paranoid, the internet isn't for you.  Keep your private things private, and not on networked computers.  Hopefully Amazon will remove reviews that do not at all pertain to the show they are attached to
Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST!. The Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST drama I have seen ever. Korean, American, doesn't matter! This is better than anything I have ever seen on TV or in the movies. Hollywood cannot touch this one! Kim Myoung Min(Yi Soon Shin) is outstanding in this!(no wonder he won the 2005 KBS BEST ACTOR AWARD FOR IYSS)It starts from when he was a child to his adulthood and can be emotional, funny, sad, and can make you angry!! The numerous obstacles and prejudices this man had to overcome and then always bounced back with no complaint because of the love of his country is phenomenal!! He put his country above all else and Kim Myoung Min did a great job of portraying that!My whole family, kids and all, watched this with me and loved it!I can see why Yi Soon Shin is Korea's hero and why other countries teach his methods
This show is the funniest thing on TV right now. I've never watched any shows regularly on FX until this year, when I happened to catch a double episode of It's Always Sunny in Philadelphia, about 3 episodes into Season 2. I don't remember when I've laughed so hard in the past few years. This show is hysterical! Charlie Day, what can I say? I dare say he is the funniest character on television. Case in point, the episode: Hundred Dollar Baby.The gang's walking home in the evening (Charlie, Mac, Dennis and Dee) when an apparent Meth Head tries to mug them. Charlie Mac and Dennis all run away, knocking down Dee to fend for herself (intentionally or non-intentionally? You decide.).Dee gets mugged and decides she's going to take some kind of "box-er-cizing" thing to learn how to defend herself, but her dad Frank, played by Danny DeVito, pipes up and says if she wants to learn to defend herself she should learn from him, being that he's a former boxer ("Frankie Fast Hands"). She agrees.In the meantime, Dennis and Mac convince Charlie to become an underground street fighter after attending one and realizing that "All you really need is to be able to take a worse beating than the other guy." Mac asks Dennis "You know who can take a beating?" And they both instantly turn to each other and say "CHARLIE."What's great about Charlie is that he's usually up for anything as long as there's money or excitement in it, and this is no exception.Back to Dee - at the gym she's approached by another woman who offers her some assistance in the form of so-called "Performance Enhancing Supplements." Dee's now popping pills, which Charlie sees while accidentally catching her (she doesn't know he saw her), and now Charlie is popping her pills.I refuse to spoil the rest, but rest assured that this is one of the funniest things you will see this year, and the rest of the series is no exception.I have yet to see an un-funny character on this show, but Charlie steals the show almost every time. Charlie Day is comedy GOLD
Much Better Than I Expected. I avoided this movie when it was released because I couldn't imagine that a film based on the marital breakup of Nora Ephron and Carl Bernstein would interest me. Although I am an admirer of both these folks for their talents as writers, I had always agreed with Richard Burton when he said, when asked if he would be writing about his marriage and breakup with Elizabeth Taylor, that even though love might be dead, that it wasn't for sale. Be that as it may, this movie is certainly worth seeing. Although the plot is a little thin, there are some very funny moments. (Whether some of the events actually happened in the Bernstein/Ephron saga doesn't matter.) Any film directed by Mike Nichols, starring Meryl Streep and Jack Nicholson, with cinematography by Nestor Amendros is well worth seeing.Both Ms. Ephron and the viewer have the last laugh.
Excellent Rabbit Fantasy!. I Love this story for my Boys. It is now a story I put on for my Grandson. It keeps their attention and there is always something going on. I do wish that the few Cuss words that were put in this movie had been ommitted. You should explain that this has nothing to do with your Religous Beliefs. It is really entertaining. I Love the Bird and I Love the Song Bright Eyes. I would recommed this for anyone 8 and up. I don't think girls care for it as much as boys.
Almodovar the God!. No transvestites? No Transvestites? That's just sublime especially for an Almodovar film. Still there will always be this innovative edge that "eeks" strange. Psychic male nurses, crying lovers, and two comatized patients make one brilliant film by one eccentric director. It's doesn't have that Soap opera-esque appeal that Pedro is known for but it does contain a certain distinguished factor that is absolutely mesmerizing, the cinematography. The depth of the film is surreal, the bull-fighting is grotesque, and the adventurous ideals of the director are normal but still bold. Talk to Her (Hable con Ella) is a film about love, faith, deception, and innocence, each moment you discover these moments is another tear that comes dripping from your eye
Another fine effort by Criterion. Once again, Criterion does a classic movie justice.  The digital transfer is 100x better than previous versions available on dvd and the extras are strong, as usual
A fast-paced, different type of thriller. 15 Minutes is worth the money.  It probably will not be the number one DVD in your collection, but you're sure to go back and watch it from time to time.  This film gives an interesting, if not frightening, look at the role mass-media play in our country's daily life.  We don't think about it, since we are living it... but this film gives us a view of someone who might not be used to the faced paced, 24-hour news cycle lifestyle that most of us live today.At the center of the movie's plot is a greedy, slick breaking-news style anchor who is given the 'gift' of being the only personality in town to have the near-realtime footage of a string of murders, as they are being committed.  He has a moral pause, only for a second, before he unabashedly trumpets the news to the entire world.  The rest of the movie deals with the minds of the killers and the techniques used by the authorites to catch them.  All in all.. not the best movie out there.. but worth the money.
Excellent movie. This is probably one of the best horror movies of it's time.  It is still scary today.  It's not bloody, it doesn't need to be to scare you.  Great movie
excellent film!. this movie is a romantic tale of a young man who wants to be the best salsa dancer *in the world pretty much. it's kind of cheesy and corny, but the dancing in the film is superb.  the main character is a buff, good looking guy with a jerry curl *hehe* i guess that was cool during the time the movie was made! he is overprotective of his sister... blah blah, she goes out with his friend and he is against it but realizes that he is being stupid and goes on to become a great dancer. good watch for those of you into movies such as dirty dancing and llambada
Awesome Movie- I highly recommend. This movie was really great.  I could not take my eyes off of the television. I usually fall asleep during movies but, not this one!This is about Issac, the undercover FBI character was a complete confusion of motives and suggested unintended multiple personalities. Clips of Bobby Kennedy and MLK are injected into the middle of the film to substantiate the popular call for a lottery based Draft. Martin Mull as a lead FBI agent does an great job!the film is has 17 songs from that era and the songs are awesome.
One of the greatest films of all time. Despite what some people might think, Boyz N The Hood is in no way a film that glorifies a gangsta lifestyle.  It is a hard hitting look at growing up in the hood as a young black male in America.  I would challenge anyone to watch this film and not be emotionally moved by the events particularly at the end of the movie.This was John Singleton's first film as a director and it is hard to believe that a then 22 year old could write such a powerful script.  Every actor plays their part and you can empathise with all of them, Cuba gooding Jr is superb as Tre Styles, a troubled boy who is sent to live with his strict father Furious (Lawrence Fishburne).  Furious is also played excellently by Fishburne, despite appearing as strict, he keeps Tre on the right path and as a 17 year old Tre is a mature and well rounded individual.  Tre's friends are brothers Doughboy (Ice Cube) & Ricky (Morris Chestnut), two very different people, Ricky like Tre is an aspiring college student, while Doughboy is fresh out of jail, and looked down upon by his mother.  The script is so well written that even a character like Doughboy can be sympathised with, though he appears agressive and trigger happy on the surface, he is also loyal and caring to his friends.  It is the depth of all the characters, and several superb acting performances that make the film so great.I don't want to give away any plot details for those who haven't seen it, but the film is really tragic in the end, and is a realistic take on life in the hood in South Central.  I don't care where your from or what colour your skin is, you can enjoy and be moved by this film, a true masterpiece
Great for all dog lovers!. I was so pleasantly surprised by this movie. I'll admit, though, that I had low expectations because most kids' movies are ridiculous. I hadn't expected to sit and watch it with my child, but I found myself pulled in through this whole movie from the beginning all the way through till the very last great line of the movie. It may seem like a copy of other movies in certain ways, but it is so well done, funny, sweet and poignant.  And the little boy who stars in it does a wonderful job.  A great "feel good" movie for dog lovers especially!
Realistic Look At 50's Naval Aviation. This is one of the best movies ever made about the U.S. Navy.  If nothing else, the detailed scenes of a straight-deck carrier operating F9F Panthers is fascinating.  Many of the features of shipboard life and the procedures for carrier-based jet aviation survive onboard modern CVs.  I'm sure there were few things that could be more "exciting" that to be launched off a short deck in a first-generation jet fighter.  A solid story line with good acting makes all the characters believable.  A true classic
Great, Great, Great, Great, Great!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!. I Loved This Movie.  It Made Me Cry And I Am A Grown Man.  Michael Keaton Is Great In This Movie.  You Need To Get This Movie
Time Cannot Erode. An assault for certain, and all the more nefarious due to its artistic merit. Before going any further, to address this edition specifically, I have to say that it greatly enhances the film. It has an optional professor's narrative which can be enabled to play along as one watches. I know a considerable amount about the era, but found that I learned much from listening in to his lecture.There are two important justifications for valuing Triumph of the Will. First, even though it is contrived and propagandistic, we are privy to a primary source document from the period-which, historically speaking, is an end in itself. The Nazis were human beings, all-be-they particularly evil ones; men (for the most part) as opposed to Goblins or Orcs. We see this clearly with Himmler who appears to be the only one in SS uniform that cannot goosestep, and also in the awkward interaction between Herr Reichsfeuhrer and his master upon the podium. They don't know whether to shake hands or continue to jut their arms out erectly. Triumph... reveals, perhaps unintentionally, much that cannot be described by narrative or second hand account.A second reason to see and preserve this documentary is that it makes us more grateful for the democracies in which we live. Through these planned shots and compulsively rehearsed movements, we can feel what it must have been like to have had the misfortune to live within the pincer prongs of a totalitarian state. When confronted by this picturesque masterpiece, we feel a sympathy for the Germans that was not possible 60 years ago. For them, there was no CNN or BBC or Fox News; there was only Dr. Goebbels, and the projects and information he approved or fabricated. No way of hearing the truth was possible, unless they risked their lives to come across it.Life under the Nazis was as communitarian as could be, and that, as an American, is what I found most repellent. Being submerged within a uniformed mass of citizens is something our Founders would have never tolerated-and thank God for that! A life of conformity and ritual is not a life at all. Having to line up like the workers and youth here to listen to blowhards bellow was certainly an underrated barbarism of that time. Only the Nazis could have turned Nuremberg Party Day into a week's worth of activities. This is a living dedication to narcissistic leadership and the victory of self-adulation over reason. This society was so militarized that even the men of the National Labor Service wielded their spades as if they were rifles. Hitler appears often before us, and is presented in his best light. Yet, one can sense his detachment, and note his manners which are more studied than real. He peers out from hotels and airplanes with a benevolent expression while never remotely caring about the people he is supposed to guarding. Yes, this movie is very slanted, but all the horror you need to see remains visible.
Great movie, but transfer is not the best. I love this movie and could watch it many times.  It includes the best part of an earlier Harold Lloyd movie, the football scene from The Freshman.  There is also a wonderful scene where he hangs from a lion off the side of a building.The only thing wrong with this DVD is that the transfer is not the best.  The video and sound quality could be better, but is not horrible like the Milky Way DVD from the same company
Probably the closest to perfection possible. I recently watched this film again, as I do periodically, and thought I'd comment. Several reviewers have pointed out that although the film is uniformly excellent, the DVD presentation is lacking, and I am of mixed feelings on that point. While it's true that the DVD doesn't offer more than the film, it's a film of such understated perfection and poignant brilliance that I wonder if we have the right to demand more. Sure, a director's or screenwriter's commentary track, or even a quick comparison of this to Lumet's earlier and similarly-themed Daniel, would be nice, but sometimes a movie is so good it doesn't need help.I saw this movie on HBO as a kid, probably soon after it came out. I feel certain that I must have seen it several times, but although I vaguely recalled liking it immensely, I went for some years without thinking of it much. Then I went on a huge Sidney Lumet kick in 1997/1998 (owing to his compelling appearance on Inside the Actor's Studio and his intriguing book) and rediscovered this. To my utter astonishment, I began to see that the film had transformed me when I saw it as a kid, and it would be months before I unraveled all its subconscious shaping of my pysche.This is a gorgeous, unflinching and aching film about tough choices and living with consequences, and I'm glad to say that despite numerous opportunities, it never once sinks into the chasm of Hollywoodisms that have capsized most films that even attempt something like this. It manages constantly to be honest and to present the gray areas of its characters, rather than letting them fit into simple archetypes of hero/protagonist, etc. I like that, because I don't find it helpful to understand the world in black and white, and clearly Lumet doesn't either. Even the most villainous character is given the opportunity to express his point of view, and although I don't sympathize with it, I at least understand it.In short, there are really only a small handful of 'family' dramas that I would argue are completely genuine, and this is in that august company. (Ordinary People is the only other that leaps to mind at this moment.) It is a rare accomplishment indeed, and everyone in it is at least superb, with a couple of performances managing to go even beyond (Lahti's multiple, and heart-wrenching, inner conflicts toward the end are all clear without being tediously overacted -- an amazing feat, while Phoenix's Danny captures not only the torment of his character that's in the script, but the added burden of being a 17-year-old boy in general).So would it be nice if they gave this the Special Edition treatment? Of course, and I'll replace my copy if they decide to. But is the lack of special features an excuse for not owning this? An unequivocal no. That's like declining to purchase an original Michaelangelo because the frame isn't perfect
The Original "What about Bob". The insanity in this movie reminded me very much of the "What about Bob" obsessive desire to manipulate the will of another human being to suit your own intentions. Yet, in Strangers on a Train, things are slightly stranger and more ominous.Instead of playful, Bruno Anthony (Robert Walker) takes on a more intellectual and forward approach to his plans for a better life. Instead of staying at home, he has a determination to leave the confines of his environment and pursue his goals relentlessly.Guy Haines (Farley Granger) comes across as especially nave and more of a hopeless romantic. He meets Bruno Anthony on a train and the story unfolds in the cleverest of ways. Hitchcock traps his characters behind their flaws and unveils their deepest desires, which then become a reality.When reality starts to become too vivid, Guy Haines panics and tries to stop the process. This only leads to one of the most terrifying carousel rides I've ever seen in a movie and it is sheer brilliance in the making. The way in which they capture the playful nature of the child riding the horses with glee as they spin about wildly and the terrified women is such a delicious contrast. I can't explain why, but the carousel makes the movie. It is like every terrifying thing you expect happens all at once.Throughout the film, you may feel less connection with the characters and more of a subtle fascination with what they might try next. An enjoyable thriller that won't leave you biting your fingernails. Still it is especially intellectually enjoyable.~The Rebecca Review
Story of Flint presaged what has happened since. Michael Moore's first major film was one of his best in my opinion for two reasons. First off, since he did not yet have a trademark style, he did not try to go over the top in this film as much as he does in his subsequent efforts. He does his normal routine of tracking people down in an effort to embarrass them by asking them pointed questions, but for most of the film he lets the story and the citizens of Flint do the talking. As you probably already know, this is the story of Moore's hometown, Flint, Michigan, and the utter despair that fell upon it after GM began shuttering auto plants under the supervision of then CEO Roger Smith. The film really highlights how clueless Flint's elite are as to the suffering that all of this "consolidation" is causing. At one point in the film Moore is talking to some wealthy people at a party who seem to think they are doing the unemployed some kind of favor by hiring them to act as living statues at one of their fetes. When he asks the partygoers about what is going on in Flint they seem somewhat offended that there is such "negative publicity" circulating and say there should be more emphasis on the positive things going on in Flint - they name the symphony and the opera. Ah yes, let them eat opera glasses! The second reason I consider this film to be one of Moore's best is that even though this film was made in 1989, it is still interesting and relevant today. This is because the contrast between what average working people have to endure - the struggle to find secure jobs with decent benefits and their increasing vulnerability - and the desire of the captains of industry to improve the bottom line at any cost ... as long as it doesn't cost them ... has only worsened and deepened over the last 17 years since this film was first made.
A true Disney Masterpiece. This was the first Disney movie I watched as a child.I would still watch it today.  Disney successfully humanizes the movie to children by using "friendly" animals, while still keeping the main storylines intact.Thumbs up to the music; "Love Goes On and On" is a moving piece, and even hits my hard heart.Parents with younger children be warned: Some scenes may frighten them.
a review of a review. This is simply in response to the latest review made by "a viewer" about this film. I, quite simply, feel that the review has a level of narrow-mindedness about the film and recommend not basing your choice on their review. To state "do the world a favor and get rid of them" as well as saying that these criminals are "irredeemable and beyond any rehabilitation" is very prejudiced. The lack of restorative justice and the inability to find an effective deterrent is not necessarily the fault of the people who commit criminal acts, but is that of the state. Before saying that you wish that the cop was there to "take care of the hustlers and muggers that prey upon innocent visitors in (otherwise beautiful) places like Montego Bay and Negril" you should try to question why these muggers and hustlers even exist. Could it be because of the travler's presence in itself? Anyway, I do not believe that you can justify killing criminals to satisfy your own traveling enjoyment. It is reasons such as this that people who do lead a path of criminality do not get the appropriate attention and rehabilitation. Try questioning the methods of the state and not the 'hopelessness' of criminals. I recommend this movie, it's an A+. Just do not watch it with the mindset that this last reviewer quite narrowly insists.
Reese Witherspoon's Oscar came a deacde late. Better than both "Seven" and "Natural Born Killers", director Matthew Bright's "Freeway" is a looseleaf modern view of Red Riding Hood where Reese Witherspoon plays Red traveling to Grandma's house.Only she takes this trip after her prostitute mother and junkie stepdad are arrested, she escapes the cluthces of foster care, she says goodbye to her fiancee who is then murdered in a driveby shooting, she hitches a ride with a psycho who turns out to be a mass murderer, she kills a few people, ends up in lockup, escapes, finally makes it to Gradma's house, where some more bloody action takes place.Oh yes, she has homosexual and heterosexual sex, spends a lot of time saying the "F" word, brutalizes most anyone that gets in her way, and otherwise creates mayhem for everybody. Sounds like your typical Reese Witherspoon role, eh? No, not by a long shot.But one thing about her role -- she is fantastic, out of this world great. She is twice the actress in this role she was playing June Carter Cash, for which she won an Oscar as best actress. On the basis of these roles, Witherspoon must be considered one of the best actresses extant right now.As the description here and on Amazon indicates, this movie presses the envelope of the "R" rating as far as possible without slipping over into NC-17. There is gory, bloody violence throughout this film, nudity and more "F" and "F"ing talk than you heard by Matt Damon when he played that low-class genius at Harvard. Someone told me they said "F" 147 times in that movie. Witherspoon herself must say it that many times here.But none of this diminishes the astonishing electricity and action that swallows the viewer right from the opening scene, where junkie-hooker mom gets arrested and weirdo-junkie stepdad forces Reese to do the nasty while mom's out earning a living. There is an uncompromising level of reality in these characterization, too, although it's clearly an over the top psycho young Sutherland plays.In an astonishing bit of casting, squeeky clean prom queen type Brooke Shields is cast as the uptight, upscale wife to lurid pervent and child molester Sutherland, whose character is even more disgusting than Witherspoon's. While everyone wants Sutherland rubbed out, Witherspoon manages to keep viewer sympathy because of for her terrible place in life even throughout her ongoing antisocial activities. Other players, incluidng Dan Hedaya as a cop with sympathies all over the place, contribute a lot to this film.This is recommended for viewers unafraid to look inside the dark side of our culture where youngsters like the one Witherspoon plays actually exist. There is nothing pretty or orderly about this movie; much of it seems upside down. But it is unrelentingly exciting and is full of action in almost every scene, action you may never have seen in a film before.
a simple masterpiece. For a plot synopsis please read the Amazon review. I wish to talk about the reasons why you will love this film.As a longtime fan of both Sam Raimi (of the Evil Dead series) and Bill Paxton (Aliens, Twister), I went to see this on opening night. Not many people can claim this I'm sure because it was and is, such a small film that received next to no marketing. For shame.This film is in the best tradition of modern film noir including BLOOD SIMPLE and FARGO, both made by the Cohen brothers. Film buffs will be able to draw the connections to those films and their filmakers, so I won't bother to get into that. Should you have seen either of these films and enjoyed them, I suggest you stop reading and immediately rent A SIMPLE PLAN. If not, keep reading and I will try to express why this film is so remarkably brilliant. And why I hope you will take a look at it.A SIMPLE PLAN is, at its core, about four people. And underneath all the plot devices and twists, it's about how they relate to one another. Notice I did't say characters, because this film doesn't have actors simply delivering dialogue. It's about people you get to know, understand and sympathise with as they undergo the most brutal of dilemmas. Sure, finding a mysterious bag filled with money is an excellent plot device, but the heart of this film is much simpler than that. It's about the basic human flaw of committing a criminal act and trying to weasel your way out of it. And being forced to do the most unthinkable things in the process.That's what gives this film such depth. You watch these people try to figure out how to cover every angle so they can get away with stealing a whole lot of cash. And in the end it falls apart for two reasons: the details and the human factor. They say the Devil is in the details and this is never truer than with a crime. As for the human factor, where greed is concerned, people cannot trust one another because they fear the other person's greed while are unable satisfy their own.In many respects this film is almost an homage to BLOOD SIMPLE and FARGO, but in many ways I think it is superior. I often draw the comparison by a scene which is both A SIMPLE PLAN and BLOOD SIMPLE where a body is increasingly difficult to dispose of. And even afterwards, after the emotional toll the has been taken, once one evil act is committed, another is sure to follow. It's so painfully facsinating to watch a person work out their problem on camera, frantically going over the details in their mind, all the while their heart is beating a mile a minute. Bill Paxton does this better than anyone. He is such a likable man (both in the film and in life) that you can't help but feel sorry for the mess he has created. His entire performance is a balancing act between getting away with a seemingly harmless crime, keeping his partners at bay and their mouths shut while being prodded along by his conspirator wife. That may make them all sound malicious, but really the opposite is actually true. They're all normal folks, like we've all seen a hundred times. And in the end it really gets to you because you can imagine how you would react in the same situations they find themselves in.After all, were you faced with the choice to steal a couple million dollars that no one would miss, what would you do?But then again, nothing is ever that simple
THE BEST. YOU KNOW THE STORY. PROBABLY THE BEST AND MOST TIMELESS CHRISTMAS MOVIE EVER. ALL THE CHARACTERS ARE GEMS,(ESPECIALLY DARRIN McGAVIN AS THE "OLD MAN". ONE OF THE CHANNELS WE HAVE SHOWS THIS FOR 24 HOURS STRAIGHT FROM CHRISTMAS EVE THRU CHRISTMAS DAY. TRUE CLASSIC.
Excellent, realistic, intense slice of an addicts life and how he gets clean despite himself. Michael Keaton is perfect in this role. No one else could have played that part. He is selfish, demanding, self-centered and hard headed and most of all full of fear. Slowly he begins to change even though is chaos all around him. Not only is this a good movie for addicts/alkies, jail inmates, etc. People who are trying to control an addict/alkie would also benefit from this, there is no way to control someone elses addiction.It is very entertaining. there are some hysterically funny scenes and for once aa is not made fun of.I couldn't find it to rent it and so i bought and watched if 3 times all ready.
Absolutely riveting!. No this isn't Courtney of Friends, but once you get past that - this is MUST WATCH TV!  While the show has content that can be shocking, it is so well written and edited it all fits.  It is definitely a sequential drama and makes much more sense watching the episodes back to back.  That fleshes out the characters so you start to care about and understand them.  Courtney shows her acting chops best at those moments when she is silent and lets her expressions say it all because sometimes her dialog is a bit stilted.  The best character is the functional schizophrenic photographer, Don Konkey.  He is exhibits an endearing combination of weirdness, loyalty, insight and sweetness to become the break-out star of this series.  If you only watched one episode and wrote this one off - go back and watch a few back to back and you may just find yourself addicted.
Romaticaly Gothic. I have been a fan of vamp movies for a long time, books, movies, at any other type of media. This movie was a very romantic type of Gothic film. Sure the actors may have been better, but what the heck, I have seen far worse than this one. I myself found it a pleasure to watch and was hoping for a second installment into this sad vamp life
fabulous. Another amazing read by duras...I have yet to read another writer that comes close to duras where words and meaning are concerned...Highly recommended if you're a Duras fan
Kama Sutra. Wow, everything you wanted to know but were afraid to ask. Mature audiences only please
COULDN'T TAKE MY EYES OFF OF RITA HAYWORTH!!!. The story line is good, the acting by all parties is excellent--But what really drew me to this movie was the breathtakingly beautiful Rita Hayworth!!!  Where are the Rita Hayworth women of today?  I watch a lot of movies and there are no starlet's out there today that even comes close to her enchanting beauty!!!  This movie is a must watch!UNSURE HOW TO ADD VOTING BUTTON IN
Beverly Hills Cop II. Axel Foley (Eddie Murphy) is back in the  hit sequel, Beverly Hills Cop 2. Many times sequels  to original blockbuster films are sucky.  There even more sucky when the sequel is done by a different director (Tony Scott)  than the original film (Martin Brest) ,  but in this case that's not the case. Beverly Hills Cop 2 is amazingly good, it's funny, has a good script,has action and suspense.THe story in this film is that Axel's buddy, and friend former Chief Andrew Bogomil (Ronny Cox) has been shot  and left for dead by a crazy lunatic arms dealer named  Karly Fry (brilliant done by Brigitte Nielsen).Axel , back in Detroit, heads to Beverly Hills to see  his friend and to aid his fellow friends Billy Rosewood  (Judge Reinhold) and John Taggart (John Ashton)  in getting justice for his friend.However, a new police chief Harold Lutz (Allen Garfield)  a small man with lots of power, plans to derail their investigation while at the same kissing the butt of the mayor (Robert Ridgely) to further his career and  reputation.Like I said, Beverly Hills Cop 2 has alot of action.  There are gun fights, car chases and everything  found in a good action flick.However, I also liked the fact that all the characters  were back in the film and that all of them were as  close as ever.Billy Rosewood, the nice and anal friend of Taggart,  has become a wannabee Rambo type guy collecting  guns and weapons leading to Taggart telling him  that "We need to talk". lolHowever, Billy and Taggart in the last film do become  helpful in helping Axel, along with giving us a couple  of good laughs.Axel (Eddie Murphy) is again at his comical best, doing everything legal and illegal to find out whose behind  his friend's shooting and bringing them down hard.All in all, Beverly Hills Cop 2 is a great sequel to the original. Many of the cool music tunes are back  along with a couple of new ones, plus the  film manages to recreate the hysterical  laughs from the first film and adds alot of action.There has actually been 2 games  made of Beverly Hills Cop. One for the PC and  one for the Commodore 64.
The true story of an outstanding soldier... Audie Murphy's screen autobiography is a much better film than it has any right to be... The Army provides a Depression-era kid from East Texas with a strong family structure that he has never really experienced...In 1937, a young Audie Murphy (played by Gordon Gebert as a boy, by Murphy himself later) is forced to become the head of a family with an ailing mother and an absent father... He drops out of grade school and goes to work full time to provide for his younger siblings until, at roughly the same time, World War II starts and his mother dies...By enlisting in, Murphy can provide more money for his brothers, but neither the Navy nor the Marines were interested in the small guy...In the Army, Murphy is promoted to Corporal on the troop ship carrying him overseas where he joins the 3rd Infantry Division, B Company, 15th Regiment... It soon becomes apparent that the likable 'baby face kid,' hardly old enough to shave, has a genuine aptitude for soldiering...After North Africa, his outfit takes part in the invasions of Sicily, Anzio and Southern France... In every engagement, Murphy steps up and excels as a soldier... At the same time, he becomes friends with Brandon (Charles Drake), Johnson (Marshall Thompson), and Kerrigan (Jack Kelly). He sees himself as part of a unit, and everything that he does is meant to advance the unit, not the individual... Murphy liked to work alone, putting only himself at risk...The one long scene that moves away from the Military--an interlude in an Italian town where he meets Maria (Susan Kohner) and her family, is embarrassingly bad... As long as the focus stays on the platoon's activities on the battlefield, the film is in fine shape... Director Jesse Hibbs makes the cold mud and rain of the Italian campaign believably real, especially a series of scenes revolving around a farmhouse and a burning tank...One might assume that Murphy's indomitable courage would be described as Rambo--like heroics, but in comparing the film with the official combat reports, it is clear that Murphy became an astounding soldier by skill, training, intelligence, and luck... He was an equal opportunity soldier, doing everything the front line combatant is required to do in order to take and hold ground through Sicily, Italy, France, and into Germany...All of the events recounted in the film take place before Murphy was 19 years old... In that brief military career, Audie L. Murphy becomes one of the best fighting combat soldiers of the last century... He never really seemed to care about the medals or glory, just the men of his unit and friends who fall down in the European Theater of Operations...Murphy died tragically on May 28, 1971, when the private plane in which he was a passenger crashed into a mountain near Roanoke, Virginia... He was 46.His last film role was earlier that year, playing Jesse James in 'A Time for Dying.'
Flight of the Intruder.......Book.and DVD. I rcvd the book,and I liked it,I also ordered a DVD which I never rcvd,and have had no luck finding it with your tracking program,and have had no luck trying to contact Amazon.This has been upsetting,and I will not be ordering again until I get the DVD
Great. This is a very fun show and i enjoy watching it. i bought all the episodes available and they all worked great! its good to pay less to view
"Civilization is like a thin layer of ice upon a deep ocean of chaos and darkness." Werner Herzog,. *** This comment may contain spoilers ***"Aguirre, The Wrath of God" is a fascinating tale that was told by its matchless team of creators, two madmen not unlike Aguirre himself. Full of powerful images of impressive landscapes and natural wonders, this film as many of Herzog's films explores his favorite theme - magnificent indifference of nature against the man's obsession that borders with madness.One of the best endings ever - tragic and comical in the same time - mad and delusional man on the wrecked raft with the monkeys - and he does not see it. He lives in his own world that he created in his feverish mind.When I watch Herzog's films I think of his words, "If I had to climb into hell and wrestle the devil himself for one of my films, I would do it." Each his film deserves to be wrestled for.
Mogambo. Frankly, I have not watched this DVD version yet as I have it on Laser Disc
Greate Movie!. I always loved these movies love jasonget it you won't be dissapointed
Excellent Movie 4 Traders. Ok 4 Others. To fully apreciate this movie you have to be a trader, a trader who has experienced loses.  Many of the emotions that Nick goes through are similar to the emotions that most people experience when they begin to trade.  While Nick's trading style is different than most people's (price arbitrage and huge amounts of equity), the emotions are still there, fear and greed
Outstanding!. This was a wonderful movie when I was younger and first saw it!  I am so glad to have watched it again and still feel the same
Rebel Without a Cause. "Rebel Without a Cause," the film that made James Dean a star and a film that still seems relevant today. If you ignore the style and words that the characters use, kids are still like this today. #59 on The American Film Institute's Top 100 List the film stars Dean as Jim Stark. When we meet Jim, he is stumbling drunkenly through the streets. He's arrested and at the police station we meet the other two major players Plato (Sal Mineo) and Judy (Natalie Wood). Plato, nowadays, would be a likely candidate for a school shooter. In the police station, we learn that he was arrested for shooting puppies. He's a lonely kid, with no parents and no friends. Judy is a typical-High schoolgirl, who hangs out with the local gang and has Daddy-issues. Jim, himself, is the new kid in town trying to find a place to belong. His parents are constantly fighting (in one famous scene early on he reveals "You're tearing me apart!") and constantly moving him around. While on a field trip to the Planetarium (an odd thing to do on the first day of school), he finds himself in a knife fight with the head of the local gang, Buzz. Jim wins, but is challenged to a game later that night that involves two people driving a car towards the edge of a cliff and whoever jumps out first is a "chicken." The movie, miraculously, takes place over the course of a day...Odd, since it has enough events to fill at least a month of time. This is the first film I've seen with James Dean and this is a terrific performance, making it not hard to see why he has remained a screen-icon all these years. Many people will recognize while watching the film that it still works to this day. Kids don't dress like this or call each other "chicken" anymore (unless they're in Kindergarten); Knife fights aren't "in" but it still manages to capture the feelings and problems one has in adolescence. It's one of the few "classic" movies that modern-day kids will be able to enjoy as well as their parents.GRADE:
Still As Good As I Remember. Back in 1988 when I was in college we all sat in dining hall one night and sang the School House Rock songs to each other.  There, in our twenties, all of us could well remember the music and lyrics.  Taking these songs off the air was the worst decision for Saturday morning cartoons ever made.  They are fun, educational, memorable, instructive and their goal is not to get a parent to buy something (well, that explains why they are no longer on the air regularly).  I loved them as a 5, 6, 7 year old and have never stopped (along with the majority of my generation).  In fact, when I sat through my law school class about how a bill becomes a law I could not get the &quot;I am a Bill&quot; song out of my head and every time I hear someone describe a verb without using an adverb I have to wonder, did they ever see Lolly
The best historical war drama from the Far East. I have seen many historical war dramas from Far East (mainly China's) and most of them are not only historically inaccurate but have a strong bias toward the enemy.Yi Soon Shin, however, is a rare exception.  Not only is the drama very historically accurate but it is also very comprehensive in detailing the meticulous battle planning of the admiral that leads to each victory but also the political in-fighting between the Chosun political factions (and the second-guessing nature of the king) which causes his eventual death.Also, the special effects are great.  The battle scenes (whether on sea or land) are realisitic and of outstanding quality.The only problem that I can find is that the DVD has not placed sufficient focus on the contribution of the Ming China.  Then again, this is not unexpected since this is a Korean drama focusing on the great admiral.Also, the entire selection should have 104 episodes.  I don't know why it stops at 101.If you want to have a more comprehensive knowledge on the subject, try Samuel Hawley's Imjin War (which portrays Yi Soon Shin more accurately by quoting original sources).Any who is only intered in the fighting may also want to check out Stephen Turnbull's Samurai Invasion (which has more colorful maps and detailed description of battles from the Japanese perspective).Lastly, anyone who is a fan of samurai warfare may want to check out Shogun:Total War by Creative Assembly (now in Gold version).
Epic Korean Drama. Koreans honor their greatest military hero in this epic drama which takes place in the late 1500s. The career and tactics of this Admiral are still studied at the U.S. Naval Academy, and doubtless those of other nations. The screenplay is based on a couple of novels, so there is some fiction, but the life of Yi Soon Shin was well documented, so there's plenty of fact supporting the story.If you are not familiar with Korean Drama, it's good to keep in mind that  this is not a Hollywood product, but they do very well with special effects and such considering the non-Hollywood budgets involved, and it's easy to see past all that and enjoy the tale being told.It's a long series, but presents an epic with power, depth and dimension and well worth watching it unfold through each and every episode.It would be great also to see KBS make other dramas available for viewing through Amazon, such as "Seoul 1945".
Great Movie. Great Disc. This is one of Hitchcock's best movies, which means it's one of the best movies period. The two different versions of the film aren't really substantially different, but the extras are fun and informative. If you love this movie, this is the edition to get. And if you don't love this movie, what's wrong with you
I never get tired of watching it. This movie will grow on you if you like the sweet romantic comedy.The cast is great.  Ed Walters (Tim Robbins) the Garage Mechanic falls in love at first sight of Catherine(Meg Ryan) when she appears at his Gas Station with a failing car with her  pretentious fiance James Mooreland (Stephen Fry).  Ed decides to go ask her out and appears at her home and knocks on the door.  The door opens and there is Albert Einstein(Walter Matthau) "You're Albert Einstien!"  "Zank you" and thus begins the plot to break up the engagment and bring Ed and Catherine together.The subcharacters are great!  Especially Einstein's pals played by Lou Jacobi, Gene Saks, and Joseph Maher.   "Three of the greatest minds and together they can't change a light bulb."All in all a great warm funny film!   Matthau again has to mentioned as his performance was brilliant.   He should have been nominated IMHO.   You can't go wrong with this one
What fun...with my own reservations... I have to admit that a few things about this film disappointed me. The acting was better than expected, and the script was somewhat literate. Other than that, this was all the schlock, bad F/X I expect from films of this genre &amp; time period. It's interesting to know that this film was released by Allied Artists, which was a studio neck-to-neck with American-International for the drive-in crowd. A-I went somewhat legit when they went with the Corman/Poe/Vincent Price movies, later the Beach Party films. Allied Artists went a different route: they picked up the options for the American release of &quot;epics&quot; like EL CID and 55 DAYS AT PEKING. (My vote goes to A-I, for sheer originality...) Enough history... This is a fun film. The special effects are absolutely laughable, my favorite being the alien saucer leaving the polar ice cap, obviously a toy being pulled up through soft wax. A previous reviewer referred to this as &quot;warmly corny&quot;; I couldn't put it better. Bad sets, bad effects...and, of course, after Brett Halsey proves himself to be a hero and not a wimp, his shirt is suddenly open showing lots of manly chest-hair. What a guy! I've always liked Arthur Franz (especially in &quot;Monster on the Campus&quot;). All in all, it's loads of fun for the &quot;bad sci-fi&quot; afficianado. My major disappointment with the DVD, though it has great picture &amp; sound quality, is that it should've been in Widescreen. At the beginning, they show News Headlines declaring horrible stuff, but you could only see the middle of the headline...there was no perifery. As far as sets go, the perifery wouldn't have mattered...but no one can deny that the majestic scenes of the Arctic (few as they were) would have been awesome. Watch this, and keep all of your other guilty pleasures (beverages, junk food, etc.) handy. If you can ignore the good points of the film, the bad points will overwhelm you and entertain
first class. I saw this movie on VHS at the end of the '80s and always wanted to have it on a good quality. I searched for it on the web and I found it on Amazon. I'm very pleased to have it in my collection and I ow it all to Amazon.Thanks
Scary Potrayal. A very scary potrayal when ignorant people are given even a little bit of power.  A white woman accuses a black man of raping her an all hell breaks loose.  Sane minds are hard to find and a race war breaks out in the rural southlands of Florida.Whereas many innocent people most African Americans are killed, the touching drama of the story is how a black man and a white man lead a group of displaced black women and children to safety.  The scenes to capture the spirit on how African Americans have overcome some much prejudice and hardship.Its good to see taht our prsent generation has preached toelrace for one's fellow man.  Lets hope that this continues an that movies like Rosewood can hopefully continue to educate people into the evils of prejudice
SO TOUCHING!. I have to confess that I went to tears watching thIS movie, and usually I don't get emotional easily. It's so touching, a PhD professor of middle age find out that she is sick. Ovarian cancer. It was a shock for her, the doctor is talking to her and she can barely react. All through the movie, she looks at the camera from time to time and tell us all what she is thinking and suffering. There is a "brilliant" young doctor (yes, one of those who always wants to be the first and the best no matter what, with a big ego, the big shot of the class) who was her student in one of her literature classes. It made me very angry, his attitude, because he was treating her in a very cold and selfish way, only thinking in the results of the research. I want to say that most of the doctors and scientists are not that way. But once in a while you can find one of these.... weird specimen. The nurse was nice and treated her in a better way. This kind of movie makes us think about the fact that we are all just humans, not matter the title or knowledge you can have. And we are here to help each other, no taking advantadge of each other. I strongly recommend this movie...just be sure to have a box of facial tissues near you.
Underrated gem with a bonus... This film is light and fun, well acted and knows what it is.  A film that doesn't take itself seriously yet does present a convincing love story in a beautiful setting with a fun take on an historical figure.And I might only give it 4 stars, but it gets the extra star for showcasing the beauty of... New Jersey.  My home state gets a bad rap, and this film shows just how lovely much of the state truly is.  While it's meant to take place in the 50s, the scenery is still there and still beautiful.Oh, and one other thing that makes it a five...  As a man, this is one of those "chick films" that I'll gladly watch with my girlfriend.  It's Meg Ryan at her cutest, and Tim Robbins is weird enough looking that I look pretty good in comparison. This movie helps perpetuate the myth that goofy looking guys without much to offer can attract smart, attractive women, and hey, what's wrong with that? ;
Dustin collection. What a classic!!  Good sound and picture, and if you want to see Jon and Dustin starting out, get this dvd!!
The Phantom of the Opera is there, inside my mind... I like a lot "The Phantom of the Opera" - what a fun, grand movie - it's got all the right components to entertain, to take you into the different dimensions for 143 minutes of its duration - sweet innocence with an angel voice, mysterious creature of the dark - genius and madman, prince charming (who in this case is just a viscount but who cares?). The film itself is spectacular, gorgeous, sparkling with the colors so powerful, images so magic and real, and melodies so...familiar.I don't know if it was the new cinema born in front of me or just a return to old good times when cinema was supposed to entertain, to take you to the Dream Worlds - someone said once that new is well forgotten old. Whatever it was, "The Phantom of the Opera" directed by Joel Schumacher, the way "how it moves, how it looks, and how it plays" is perfection itself and who cares that the story is silly and naive? Certainly, not me.
cold truth. This is the West as I imagine it actually was, rough, unrefined, and brutal. Similar in tone to DAYS OF HEAVEN, another bit of American history, THE CLAIM is told in unsentimental bleak fact; nobody is spared, and there are no real winners except the railroad.Daniel Dillon arrives in the wilds of Northern California during the gold rush with his wife and infant daughter in hopes of making a fortune in the gold fields. They arrive at a claim shack, cold, hungry, and out of hope and are taken in by the claimer, and in short order, Dillon unsentimentally sells his family to the lonely miner for the claim. The wife, Elena, aware that she has little say, goes with her new master, but does not close the door on Dillon.Years later, we find that Dillon has made a go of things with his claim; he has built a town called Kingdom Come, wrested out of the mountains virtually by himself, a rough-and-ready place without amenities beyond the ubiquitous saloon and whorehouse to supply the miners. A survey crew appears; negotiations are begun to possibly bring the newly-constructed railroad through Kingdom Come and establish Dillon as the baron he envisions himself to be. The survey crew brings with it, however, a nasty shock for him; his erstwhile wife and now-grown daughter - who is unaware that Dillon is her father. Elena - the wife - is dying; she has come back to make some sort of arrangement with Dillon, as the man she was sold to has died and left her destitute, and she wants to provide for her daughter, the unlikely-named Hope. Dillon, on seeing her, realizes suddenly that his ambitions have left him hollow; his closest association is the madam of the town bordello, who loves him, but who he has no intention of marrying. He unceremoniously dumps the madam and presents Elena with an offer she can't refuse, and they are married - despite already being married - before all the townsfolk and move into a - for a town like that - palatial house overlooking his mountain fiefdom.Both Hope and the madam view all this with equal suspicion and disapproval. Hope is aware that some connection is involved of which she is ignorant; the madam is deeply angry at being shunted off like yesterday's news. The survey company comes periodically into town for refreshment, always greeted enthusiastically by the girls from the bordello, played just right with a brittle gaiety and hope by the cast of women; you can see the wavering despair of one in particular, hopelessly in love with her regular customer and played to the pathos of hoping against hope that he will return each time and maybe, MAYBE spirit her away from Kingdom Come some day. The town itself is crude and unapologetic; no church or school, totally utilitarian, without sidewalks or a good road. Dillon's hopes of the coming railroad elevating the town are clearly laid out in his efforts to sway the survey crew, but his dreams of dynasty - and of leaving it all to Hope, the daughter he abandoned and regained - lie in the hands and at the mercy of the railroad company.There is nothing soft or romantic about this movie; it is told in real-life format. People make choices that are wrong or right and pay the consequences thereof. There is no silver lining here; frontier life was hard and nasty sometimes, and this makes that very clear. Nothing came easy in the Old West, and justice was meted out unofficially and with speed. There were no second chances here.This movie got under my skin almost immediately. It is shot in winter, for one thing; I was cold the whole time I watched it, merely from suggestion. The performances are top-rate; Wes Bentley - a young man I was previously unfamiliar with - plays the chief surveyist with careful consideration of his surroundings, sizing up every situation; Hope, played by Sarah Polley, shows just the right mix of doubt and loyalty as a daughter; her mother, played sublimely by the legendary Nastassja Kinski, faces her slow death bravely and accepts the life she was given.Daniel Dillon, played by Peter Mullan, takes his role as the king of Kingdom Come and makes it believeable, with equal parts of strength, bravado, and regret for mistakes made.This was not a big movie; I'd never heard of it until I chanced on it, but it was a worthwhile couple of hours' insight into the life of a frontier mining town near the end of the 1800s West. And the scenery can be pretty awesome also
Great News!. While Paramount Home Video has successfully marketed DVD packages of I Love Lucy, Warner Bros. Home Video is now getting into the act with a package that includes the only two feature films Lucille Ball and Desi Arnaz starred in together, The Long, Long Trailer in 1954 and Forever, Darling, in 1955. A third movie, Too Many Girls, produced in 1940, stars Ball in the leading role and Arnaz in a bit part. The two reportedly met on the set of the film, fell in love, and married a few weeks afterward
Joe Pendelton says, Evelyn Keyes GOOD... Rita Johnson BAD!. (January 1, 2007)A WONDERFUL, WONDERFUL MOTION PICTURE...Very happy to see that this terrific film will finally be struck to DVD.But please, Sony, correct the cover art faux pas that has plagued this great film since its VHS release.The actress pictured next to Robert Montgomery should be Evelyn Keyes, but is NOT!Instead, actress Rita Johnson is pictured. Rita Johnson played the part of the murdering, adulteress wife of Bruce Farnsworth (Montgomery) in the flim. :-\This art was obviously created or selected by someone who has never viewed this fine film--or the very beautiful Evelyn Keyes.Please, Sony, correct this miscue before this DVD's February release date
An Uplifting Album. Another one of Commissioned's masterpieces. My husband and I love this CD, and are usually fighting over who gets to listen to it. My husband's favorite song is &quot;I'm Learning&quot;. One of my favorite songs (and I have a whole lot of them) is &quot;We Shall Behold Him&quot;. Of Course it talks about the Rapture, and meeting the Saviour in the air. I am anticipating for His return! Just to see Him face to face would be so awesome!
Awesome Episode!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!. Scooby Doo rocks!  This was an awesome episode, and an awesome way to download some of the earlier episodes of Scooby.  Fun stuff, and an inexpensive download
Definitely the best of the Mann Westerns. Yea, it's great that most of the other ones are out on DVD, but this really is the best of the Mann/Stewart westerns and deserves a Criterion-quality release.  "Man of the West" is also a great film, although a shade too self-conscious and abstract for my taste.  "The Naked Spur", on the other hand, is perfect - I've had the privilege of seeing it a couple of times at the Pacific Film Archive here in Berkeley.  The last sequence, which involves crossing a raging river on a rope, is incredible.  And as good as Stewart and Ralph Meeker are, Robert Ryan (as usual) steals the picture.  (See Mann's "Men at War", Fuller's "House of Bamboo", Ray's "On Dangerous Ground", and countless other classics.)  He is simply the most underrated actor in American films.
Fabulous. I am a big Micky Rourke fan any way.  This movie just does something for me.  It isn't for everyone.  If sexual content movies bother you, this movie definitely is not for you
'Talk to Her' with truly speak to you... Pedro Almodovar has again given us a beautifully haunting film, a film that causes us to truly think about our lives and the way we live it.  In `Talk to Her' we have the story of two men brought together by the women they love, both of whom have fallen into a deep coma.  The first man is Benigno Martin (Javier Camara), a male nurse who has fallen in love with young aspiring dancer Alicia (Leonor Watling).  Alicia has been lying in a coma for four years after a tragic car accident and he has been caring for her day and night ever since.  The second man is Marco Zuluaga (the remarkable Dario Grandinetti), a journalist who is brought to the hospital after his girlfriend, bullfighter Lydia Gonzalez (Rosario Flores), is gored by a bull and thrown into a coma as well.The real story here revolves around these men bonding in the face of their trials.  Marco struggles with loving Lydia, struggles with guilt over her predicament and his battles with whether or not she ever really loved him.  Benigno on the other hand ahs never had Alicia's love for she never truly knew him, but after spending four years at her side he feels as though they are in love and truly meant to be together.  He talks to her constantly, divulging his secrets to her, his passions, and he begins to live her life for her, watching the movies she once loved and seeing as much live dance as he can in order to have more to tell her.The script is original and captivating and is only heightened by the superb acting and directing of this film.  Benigno's unconventional love of Alicia is a subject that is sure to cause a lot of controversy and talk, but also is Marco's devotion to Benigno in his time of dire straights.  Their relationship is an ambiguous one, one that raises my suspicion, especially in the final frames when Marco sees Alicia.  I'm brought to wonder if he wants to be with her for himself or in an attempt to have yet another part of Benigno.  You watch and you decide.  A truly wonderful and unique film
Teacher's Review. By far, this version of Julius Caesar is the best.  Marlon Brando is outstanding in his portrayal of Marc Antony ( note his "Dogs of war" speech as well as his eulogy of Caesar and use of verbal irony).  Also of note is Sir John Gielguld and his portrayal of Cassius.  This film really brought to life this wonderful Shakesperian play for my 10th graders (although they were bummed out that it was in B&W)
My Favorite Episode. I don't have television, haven't for 11 years. When I learned CBS was allowing free viewing over the internet I checked it out and started watching episodes of CSI, CSI NY, CSI Miami, and NCIS. I found NCIS to be my favorite and this particular show Dead And Unburied is my favorite so far. I enjoy the light-heartedness of NCIS. So I decided to download this episode from Amazon Unbox.I really wish Amazon Unbox would allow me to burn shows I've purchased. As it is they are restricted to viewing on my computer. When Unbox expands this service to allow me to burn DVDs I will likely purchase many more shows this way. I like selecting individual shows
Ill fated torrid love affair. Drifter Frank Chambers played by John Garfield is hired to work at a California roadside diner by owner Nick Smith played by a plain looking Cecil Kellaway.  Kellaway is married to the sultry blonde Cora played by a bleached Lana Turner.  Garfield takes one look at Turner and the sparks begin to fly.  They gradually fall in love carrying on a steamy affair unbeknown to Nick.  Together they conspire to do away with Nick in a household accident.  Nick survives without suspecting the plot.Garfield, in frustration packs his bags and leaves heading for Los Angeles.  He ultimately can't stay away and gets lured back by Turner's charms.  Upon his arrival, Nick drops a bombshell telling both Garfield and Turner that he's decided to sell the diner.  Nick and Cora are to move to Canada to care for his invalid sister.  Turner feels trapped by this decision and again they plot to do away with Nick.They arrange an automobile accident on a treacherous stretch of road as they all are driving to Santa Barbara to consumate the deal for the diner.  The car is pushed down the side of a cliff after bludgeoning NIck with a liquor bottle, but Garfield is unable to get out of the car and is severely injured.  Unfortunately the suspicious local D.A. Kyle Sackett played by Leon Ames has been tailing them.  He observes Turner climbing up the cliff while clutching her white handbag, making it obvious that the accident was bogus.Sackett coerces a hospitalized Garfield into signing out a complaint against Turner for murder of Nick and attempted murder of himself.  Turner, with the help of slick shyster lawyer Arthur Keats, excellently portrayed by Hume Cronyn, gets off with only a manslaughter charge and no jail time.Garfield and Turner resume a guarded relationship working at the diner which has been fixed up.  They're relationship is filled with mistrust. After a few serious bumps in the road they reconcile when fate intercedes and they both get deserved retribution."The Postman Always Rings Twice" released in 1946 pushed the envelope with it's lurid sexuality in a time of heavy Hollywood censureship.  The code established where bad deeds do not go unpunished was quite apparent in this excellent flic
My Favourite Movie. This is the most hilarious movie,with John CAndy stuck inside a terrible soap opera!!HE can control events and turn himself into a hero by using his magic typewriter.It is sooooo funny,the characters are idiots,like the doctor who keeps yelling,"I..am a...medical..DOCTOR!!!',and the man whos being poisoned and his hair comes out and then he wipes his finger over his eyebrow and it comes off in his hand and then his teeth fall into the sink and then he tries to shoot his sister,who is poisoning him,only it isn't really his sister because she was swapped at birth so he accidentally shoots his real sister,and he cant talk properly anymore and so he says,"Ah,shthit." LOLOL.My mum is grossed out by the man who is losing his bits so she taped over the movie once.I love it!!!Its soooo funny
Stand and Deliver. Superbly directed by Menndez for PBS's American Playhouse, "Stand and Deliver" is a cut above most motivational storytelling, because it bypasses sentimentality in favor of a more complex, authentic tone. Olmos is a marvel as Escalante, a brilliant but idiosyncratic educator, and he deservedly nabbed an Oscar nomination. Among a dynamic supporting cast, Lou Diamond Phillips also impresses as the troubled youth who faces a choice between gang life and academic glory.
Great quality. There is a good reason you'd want to buy this from Amazon. The quality. Sure, you can watch it for free on CBS, but the quality isn't very good. It's streamed and the bitrate (quality) is low. Personally, I want to watch Survivor on my 50" plasma, not on my computer screen. So, I use Unbox + Windows Media Center to make that happen. Survivor from unbox is as good as getting the show directly from my cable provider.
As Good As It Gets. Usually sequels are not as good as the original films they follow...one need only think of,say"Jaws"to get this point..But with "The Two Jakes"the sequel to"Chinatown"the sequel is every bit as good as the original...The film follows the main charecter from "Chinatown",detective Jake Gittes,who has a new and disturbing case that has threads reaching back into time and inter-connecting with the original plotline..Many of the stars from the original reprise thier roles,most notably Jack Nicholson,who also directed..At the time of its original theatrical release the critics were not kind to the film,or to the director/star...Perhaps this was to have been expected,inasmuchas "Chinatown"ranks high on the list of"Best ever"films..on the other hand most professional film critics are not only herd animals,who too often follow one another's lead like dogs sniffing each other's rear ends but have little regard for what the public thinks..if one or two"Famous"critics get a bug up thier backsides about a film it is a sure bet that the rest,afraid of being contrary,.will follow suit..also,having to sit through films of all sorts make these people jaded...they expect novelty,and are disappointed by stories,direction,acting,ect that the rest of us find quite entertaining...And most professional critics seem to find the most obscure,often foreign films to be spectacular,while most normal people do not,as if cutting edge films about,say,three men who have hernias and like bowling together on friday nights offers the very zenith of acting and film-making achievement...So forget what the professional critics might have thought about"The Two Jakes",it was a dandy film...You won't be disappointed..
One of the Greatest Sci-Fi Films of the Past Decade!!. This movie, Equilibrium directed by Kirt Wimmer (Ultraviolet) is one of the most overlooked and forgoten gems of cinema in almost a decade! Amagine a world without emotion. There is no war, no hate, no envy, or crime. A perfect world? There is also no human being that can emote, feel, love, care, or empathize with thier fellow man. The cause of this... a drug that soceity takes daily to keep thier emotions at bay. This is the story of one man's awakening to emotion and love and about how he fights back against a system that keeps humanity under it's control by taking away what it truely means to be human. The story is epic in its scope and scale. The acting is beyond great. The action in mind blowing and intense. The star of this film is Christian Bale who would become the future of the Batman movies in C. Nolan's Batman Begins
Sam Elliot was. born to be a cowboy! Lots of action, lots of bad guys getting their due and at least one lady being rescued!
Really, my all-time favorite. My husbands laughs when I say a movie is my favorite(I have many favorites), but this one really is. I also love to read and what sets this adaptation apart is the way the two complement eachother,truly brilliant. The movie adds elements that the book didn't dwell on and the book covers all the details that movies just can't. Some movies can touch your heart in such a way that they leave you a bit raw. For me, this is one of those movies. No, it may not be a cinematic event for all, but for those who have loved with their whole heart and have been (or even risked) being hurt, you will find a good laugh and a few tears here.  Only Nora Ephron herself could have wrote a screenplay that complemented her novel so well, and thankfully Mike Nichols brought it to life in such a way. Meryl Streep really is at her best here and the whole cast is excellent. I really do love this movie, it always amazes me that it is so underrated. Give it a try
Great DVD. A real classic in the comedy genre. I continue to quote lines from the movie. "I came for your daughter, Chuck". "Kids, you know I love 'em
Just as great as the TV episodes. The great thing about this "movie version" is that all the original voices of Clifford (John Ritter), Emily Elizabeth, Cleo, and T-Bone are exactly the same as the Clifford episodes on TV. Basically, it is a longer version of a regular Clifford episode but they've added a few new friends and some songs here and there. Speaking of, the songs are actually upbeat and a bit catchy.  But NOT so catchy to where I find the tunes stuck in my head for hours........unlike some other kid movies (i.e. - Thomas the Tank Engine) where they play the same droning chorus over and over and over again. This movie is a great compromise because my 2 and a 1/2 year old son LOVES it, and after watching it with him numerous times now, I still like it too.
Star Trek At Its Best. Shore Leave is one of the best episodesof the classic series. It uses all thesci fi props but also has a great story,if you don't even care about Star Trekand have to watch one, watch this one.
Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST!. The Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST drama I have seen ever. Korean, American, doesn't matter! This is better than anything I have ever seen on TV or in the movies. Hollywood cannot touch this one! Kim Myoung Min(Yi Soon Shin) is outstanding in this!(no wonder he won the 2005 KBS BEST ACTOR AWARD FOR IYSS)It starts from when he was a child to his adulthood and can be emotional, funny, sad, and can make you angry!! The numerous obstacles and prejudices this man had to overcome and then always bounced back with no complaint because of the love of his country is phenomenal!! He put his country above all else and Kim Myoung Min did a great job of portraying that!My whole family, kids and all, watched this with me and loved it!I can see why Yi Soon Shin is Korea's hero and why other countries teach his methods
Ab Original. This really fine film deals with itself on its own terms and does not try to answer all of its own questions.  For example -- the death and position of the native boy in the tree reflects the way the father ended at the beginning and suggests the same sexual passion for the girl -- which explains her attitude toward her Dad and perhaps his immolation.  Some innocent nudity toward the end.  Well worth it
Clever comment on Reaganism set in a galaxy of post-transformational liberalism. Just kidding, I don't know what I'm talking about. You should see this movie if you like:1) Sex2) Nudity3) Hot babes4) Mickey Rourke5) Carre Otis6) Mickey Rourke and Carre Otis going at it for real7) Perfume commercials8) Directors trying to make their softcore porn look like art by filming everything sensually and in slow motion, so the film appears to be arthouse and "visually stimulating"9) Really, really, really bad dialogue10) Lots of good banging and screwing without a plot11) Mickey Rourke playing a total pimp (which is different than just Mickey Rourke - I mean, there's Mickey Rourke, and then there's Mickey Rourke the Pimp, which is even cooler)And finally...12) Hot female characters who wear glasses and carry around clipboards so the audience believes they are smart and successful businesswomen, when in fact they'd have a hard time calculating 1 + 1. (Also see: Alone in the Dark, Tara Reid's character; or Fantastic Four, Jessica Alba's.)Highly recommended to the appropriate demographic.I could kill myself for buying it. :
Amazing Plot, Superb Script, And Sublime Acting From A Brilliant Cast. I saw "The Great Santini" in the theatre in 1979 when it was first released. I always thought that Warner Brothers did a huge disservice to the film by retaining the original Pat Conroy book title (although the later re-release as "the Ace" also fails to inspire.) Despite the somewhat lackluster title, this is an absolutely superb film when viewed on many levels. I was originally interested in the film because of the aviation context, but that really only provides a medium for Robert Duvall to develop the character of Bull Meechum.The real story here revolves around family and interpersonal dynamics in an early 1960s military family. Duvall gives a stunning performance in the title role as a hard charging Marine fighter pilot who finds expressions of affection next to impossible. Although a PG rated film, the language and violence (there is no nudity) are not excessive and are only used when necessary to further the plot (largely in the anti-racism subplot.) Despite this some of the scenes are very difficult to watch as they hit very close to home for people familiar with difficult family situations. The scene where Michael O'Keefe beats Duvall in basketball is one of the all-time most amazing scenes in cinema.I think that the entire cast is perfect in every way. Stan Shaw gives an incredibly effective performance as Toomer in a subplot that addresses the futility of racism better than any other film I have ever seen. I find the scene of Red and Toomer with the bees and the dogs is one of the most poignant and brilliantly acted in history. The subtle complexity of the emotions (especially hatred and sorrow) in that one scene make the film worth watching, and should be required viewing in film schools everywhere. Likewise, Blythe Danner is amazing as the longsuffering military wife and mother.By far the most important component of the film is the family relationships within the Meechum family, and in particular the conflict between Duvall and O'Keefe. Both were nominated for Oscars for these roles, and I firmly believe that both should have won, as both give brilliant performances. Of the two, though, I actually think that O'Keefe does the better job in the exceptionally difficult role of the 18 year old son. The emotional range that O'Keefe demonstrates in this film put him in the league of truly great actors like Duvall. Every time I have seen this film I have come to admire O'Keefe's portrayal more.This is one of the best films from the 1970s and deserves more recognition than it has ever received. I give the film five stars (no question about that) although the Warner Brothers packaging leaves a lot to be desired. There are no commentary tracks or other extras on the DVD and that's a real shame. Nonetheless, this is a world class drama with occasionally brilliant comic insights that is as finely done as any other film I have ever seen.I highly recommend "The Great Santini" to everyone.
Laugh out loud funny. I've seen Stephen Lynch live, in this Comedy Central special, and heard his audio cds.  Live is by far the best experience but this video is a close second.  The live audience really enhances the experience.  This is some truly funny stuff
A beautiful movie. Tortilla Soup is an amazing movie filled with not only hilarious scenes, but brilliant acting and real and down to earth characters. Hector Elizondo gives a brilliant performance as the father, Martin in the movie, Constance Marie is amazing as Yolanda as well as Raquel Welch as the overbearing mother of Yolanda. Their are also great supporting performances from Elizabeth Pena as the middle child Leticia, Jaqueline Obradors as the oldest Carmen, Tamara Mello as the youngest Maribel and Paul Rodriguez as a baseball coach and the object of Leticia's affection. This is a beautiful movie about family, losing the ones we love, having to deal with living a life of your own, love, heartbreak, everything that we deal with in our everyday lives. This movie made me laugh and cry and it is just another example of amazing acting by brilliant Latino and Latina actors and actresses
One of the BEST episodes!. I urge everyone out there to download this episode!  This one totally rocks! Shep, a Wraith and Kolya all in one episode!  Any episode with Shep (Joe Flannigan) and Kolya are well worth watching!  Download this and download every other Stargate SG1 and Stargate Atlantis episode!
Richard Pryor - Master Storyteller. You know it kind of bothers me when folks label others. Especially when the label minimizes a person's worth.  Ask just about anyone to describe Richard Pryor and most likely you'll hear - he was a funny dude, a comedian.  While of course both are very true it's also an incomplete and unfair assessment of Richard Pryor because he was much more than that.Along with being the quintessential stand up comedian, he was an incredibly talented writer, actor, cultural scribe and comedic visionary.  But, one of Mr. Pryor's most overlooked talents was that of Master Storyteller.When Richard Pryor talked about events from childhood through adulthood or shared an observation it was more than just a bunch of funny anecdotes strung together. He carefully, skillfully recreated the moment, the mood, the scene and the context of that story.  You weren't just hearing a simple recollection of his experience; he actually took you there and was almost able to witness it firsthand.  Richard Pryor tells his stories by bringing together special elements and ingredients and expertly mixing all into an amazing experience.  You can say it's like watching a tapestry being made - all the parts big and small, no matter how inconsequential that they may appear to be individually, combined with a master's touch you have a fine work of art.This 1979 release of Richard Pryor in Concert is a wonderful film that illustrates those talents and more.  Seeing this movie again made me realize how nice it was to have someone so talented as Richard Pryor to entertain us and make us laugh until we wet ourselves, but yet sad that he's gone and there will probably never be someone as talented or as remarkable again.
mystery/murder. the movie should be remaded, in color.  The movie had a excellent review do to acting of Ms. Stanwyck
Great show, works now!. Avatar is one of my favorite shows. I am so thrilled that it is on Amazon. At first, the episode I downloaded didn't work, but they fixed the bugs. I have it on my Creative Zen Vision:M and it looks great
Joan Shines in Spruced-Up Classic. Crawford fans already know that while this movie was a famous flop for Joan, it contains one of her most interesting performances. Now they can see it struck from a near-immaculate print and enjoy both the gorgeous cinematography and those wild closeups of Joan. A friend of mine who is not a Crawford fan described her look in this movie as &quot;Makeup Poisoning&quot;. Personally, I love Joan's characterization of South Seas prostitute Sadie Thompson. Highly stylized, it's a little ridiuclous, but  compelling. In her &quot;redeemed&quot; scenes  Sadie is quite moving (and stunningly beautiful! This was Crawford at her peak). Sadie's ascent up the staircase to confront Walter Houston's lustful preacher is brilliantly handled and has to be one of Joan's best confrontation scenes ever --ranking  right up there with Mildred slapping Veda. A little talky and slow in spots, but the rewards are worth the wait
Good as gold. How to steal a million was a light-hearted farce starring too skilled performers in their own right.  Audrey Hepburn is delightful as the sweetheart bedazzled by Peter O'Toole an expert in forged art works.  The two have you rooting for them in their improbable caper.  Once you remind yourself that this is all just healthy fun than you can enjoy their performances.  Greed becomes almost a worthy attribute as they endeavor to outwit the perfect security system guarding unknowingly a fake artwork.  It is all good fun as the security system is foiled without harming a hair on anyone's head.  Dishonesty doesn't enter your mind as the caper comes to a pleasant climax.  Everyone ends up with their reputation intact and some spare change jingling in their pockets.  The two stars are engaging and carefree and are so effortless in their actions that they are a joy to watch.  Mind candy doesn't necessarily have to rot your brain.  It can give you some mindless enjoyment on a quiet night
Great movie. I had to watch this in a college course i was taking.  I enjoyed the movie.  My Family/Mi Familia describes the tale of three generations of an immigrant family's troubles and achievements. Maria and Jose, the first generation, come to Los Angeles in the 1930's, meet and marry, and then they face deportation. They establish their family on the east side of Los Angeles, and their many children Chucho, Paco, Jimmy, Memo, Irene and Toni.  This story starts with the father of the family, Jose Sanchez, who makes a one year journey on foot from Mexico to Los Angeles in order to track down his long lost brother. Once he gets there, he meets and marries the love of his life, Maria.  The two of them begin a family and the stories of their children begin to develop.  These stories involve Chucho who gets involved in gangs and has to deal with his father for his constant troubles with drugs and the police.  Jimmy begins to follow in the footsteps of his older brother but eventually realizes that he needs to think about the future and that this way of life will not cut it.  As the second generation become adults in the 60's, the focus of the story shifts to the son, Jimmy, and tells the story of his marriage to Isabel, their son, and Jimmy's journey to becoming a responsible parent.  This story shows the life of a family that sticks together through adversities, through crime, gangs, prejudice, no matter what they are faced with, they will be a family.
Funny,Funny,Funny. Even though this is about 4 years old, it is extremely halarious.  I've been waiting to see a good stand up comedy. The first 15 min is just one hilarious hit after another. I love this guy
Powerful  movie. Frances is a powerful movie that tells the story of a very gifted, beautiful and smart actress falling apart as she struggles to fit into the Hollywood mold of her time. It is not quite clear if she is suffering from mental illness of if she is just overwheled with rage and frustration for which she has no outlet, but regardless, like used to happen and still does at times, she enters the world of the psychiatric hospital and gradually looses her freedom, her life and her mind (literally, in the sense that at some point in the movie she is lobotomized). As she endures all of this, we begin to understand that Frances has a very sick mother, that is probably more in need of psychiatric care than her daughter. The mother betrays her over and over, not allowing her to be her true self, denying her true needs and handling her over to the butchers at the psychiatric hospital whenever she feels that Frances may be slipping away from her control.This is a very sad and at times horrifying story. It may not be Frances Farmer's true story however, as it seems that she may have never had a lobotomy. Also it seems that she had a far bigger problem with alcoholism than was highlighted here. However, this does not detract from the movie, which tells a story that could have been true for many people of that era. Lobotomy and in particular the "icepick" style lobotomy was practiced liberally at the time by a variety of doctors and mental health practitioners, some of which did not even have any kind of surgical experience or license. Lobotomies of this kind , apparently were administered to war veterans struggling to adjust after the traumas they endured. Now they would be dignosed with PTSD and treated accordingly. Eventually lobotomy went out of fashion as it was seen for what it was: a barbaric practice that zombified people by robbing them of their essence, not a cure. I hope the same will be said soon of electroshock treatments, that, believe it or not are still used today. The history of the treatement of severe mental illness is rife with horror. In many ways we are still so very ignorant in these matters.This is not a movie for the faint of heart. However, it is an important movie in many ways. And Jessica Lange's performance is one of the best female performances I have ever seen. It is worth watching this picture just to see her act. A disturbing yet beautiful and powerful movie
It's Jimmy Carr - Need more be said?!?. Thanks for keeping a Brit sane in a country full of "My wife says..." jokes.Your wife is fat and ugly and I don't care what she says. Because she's ugly. And fat.....and not my wife
Offscreen Drama. Frances Farmer was a 1930s actress who starred in movies such as "Come and Get It".  But she was known more for what happened in her real life than her movies.  A native of Seattle, Frances was a non-comformist.  She was outspoken, independent, politically active, and unlike the many celebrities of her time--and even ours--pursued acting for the sake of acting.  She didn't pursue it for the money, the fame, or the recognition.  She did it because she loved it; it was what she wanted to do.  And she wanted to be free to choose her own roles.  She was very much her own person, the Susan Sarandon and Jane Fonda of her time.However, she was doing all of this in the 30s, a time when being a rebel in Hollywood was frowned upon.  In fact, it was downright discouraged.  The studio executives didn't take too kindly to this, and they made sure Frances paid for it.  Oh, boy, did she ever pay.  Hollywood may not have directly contributed to her downfall, but they surely played their part.  Coupled with the troubles in her own life (such as her drinking and brushes with the law), not to mention a very troubled relationship with her mom (a controlling, exploitative woman who seemed to live vicariously through her daughter without caring what she was doing to her), Frances spent the better part of her adult life in various mental institutions where patients were mistreated and sexually exploited (men would be snuck in after hours to have sex with them).  She was eventually given a transorbital lobotomy, robbing her of all the traits that made her who she once was.  Some have said that she never really got one and others have said that she did.  We'll never really know.Frances Farmer really wasn't crazy.  Sure, she was no angel, but she absolutely wasn't crazy.  She was a strong, independent woman who was just herself and wanted to be true to that.  After all was said and done, she was killed, not physically, but emotionally and mentally
HG WELLS. This is an amazing service! For only 2 bucks i can watch what i like for the moment. In this case it was HG WELLS. Great biography
The best historical war drama from the Far East. I have seen many historical war dramas from Far East (mainly China's) and most of them are not only historically inaccurate but have a strong bias toward the enemy.Yi Soon Shin, however, is a rare exception.  Not only is the drama very historically accurate but it is also very comprehensive in detailing the meticulous battle planning of the admiral that leads to each victory but also the political in-fighting between the Chosun political factions (and the second-guessing nature of the king) which causes his eventual death.Also, the special effects are great.  The battle scenes (whether on sea or land) are realisitic and of outstanding quality.The only problem that I can find is that the DVD has not placed sufficient focus on the contribution of the Ming China.  Then again, this is not unexpected since this is a Korean drama focusing on the great admiral.Also, the entire selection should have 104 episodes.  I don't know why it stops at 101.If you want to have a more comprehensive knowledge on the subject, try Samuel Hawley's Imjin War (which portrays Yi Soon Shin more accurately by quoting original sources).Any who is only intered in the fighting may also want to check out Stephen Turnbull's Samurai Invasion (which has more colorful maps and detailed description of battles from the Japanese perspective).Lastly, anyone who is a fan of samurai warfare may want to check out Shogun:Total War by Creative Assembly (now in Gold version).
TV's Best Miniseries. The title just represents my opinion, but this is without a doubt, one of the best if not the best of the TV mini-series.  This was followed by the all-too-short regular weekly series (also available on dvd) and V - The Final Battle.  And that's the order you want to watch them in - that way everything ties together and you aren't wondering what went on and why something in The Final Battle is happening.The original though, is still the best.  "Friendly" aliens come to Earth in need of water (supposedly)and we find out they aren't what they seem and it makes for gripping viewing even if you've seen it before.  It even features a young Robert Englund (Freddy Kreuger in Nighmare On Elm Street 1- 102)as a "good" alien.There are shades of Nazi Germany and the persecution of the Jews running rampant through the series - showing perhaps that what happened once can happen again and it doesn't have to be a madman who's responsible for the genocide taking place.While it came out over 20 years ago (1983), V is just as gripping and exciting today as it was when it first came out.
An Insanely Funny Comedy for those with the RIght Background. This is a work of genius. It is creative, original, funny and well done. That being said, it is probably not for everyone.This wonderful takes as its starting point a couple of very minor character from Shakespeare's HAMLET. These are the stars of the show. In Hamlet, they are merely a couple of friends of the prince called in to help deal with Hamlet's melancholia. They appear briefly and are gone. The last mention of them comes when the royal court hears a message that Rosencrantz and Guildenstern are dead. They are merely there to drive forward the story of the prince.In this work, the hapless two are called in for the same purpose but the story centers around them. The spend the entire film trying to figure out what is happening to themselves and to those around them. As they discuss existential questions, the tragedy of Hamlet plays out around them. It is quite funny but some background helps.It helps a great deal if you are comfortable with Elizabethan speech. Whole pieces are lifted from Shakespeare and the added dialog is of the same style.It helps if you are familiar with Hamlet. That makes understanding the context easier.It is great fun if you have some knowledge of physics. Rosencrantz spends the whole film on the verge of making monumental discoveries in basic physics but is thwarted at each turn.It's is fun.
The best baseball movie ever made. ... and perhaps the best movie, period, is &quot;Pastime,&quot; a perfect blend of character study and morality play, both a slice-of-life and larger-than-life view of minor-league ball in the late 1950s and a portrait  of a protagonist worthy of anyone's admiration. The casting and acting  (particularly of William Russ in the main role and Noble Willingham as the  manager) are superb. All the other elements of the film - its reality, its  values, its script (many choice and insightful lines), its cinematography,  its music (particularly &quot;Swing Low&quot;), its attention to detail,  its real-star cameos - engage both the mind and the heart. The only reason  I can see why it has not received more notice is a lack of marketing and  big-name stars. &quot;Capra-esque&quot; in the best sense, it puts to shame &quot;Major League&quot; and would-be mythic silliness as  &quot;The Natural.&quot; - Clay Eal
Very Good. I found this video very enjoyable. I had seen most of these cartoons before on t.v., but only the butchered versions that the censors felt were appropriate for you and I to see.  I highly recommend this video if you  wish to see Tex Avery's work as it was originally intended, not to mention  that these are some of the most hilarious cartoons ever made anyway
Epic Korean Drama. Koreans honor their greatest military hero in this epic drama which takes place in the late 1500s. The career and tactics of this Admiral are still studied at the U.S. Naval Academy, and doubtless those of other nations. The screenplay is based on a couple of novels, so there is some fiction, but the life of Yi Soon Shin was well documented, so there's plenty of fact supporting the story.If you are not familiar with Korean Drama, it's good to keep in mind that  this is not a Hollywood product, but they do very well with special effects and such considering the non-Hollywood budgets involved, and it's easy to see past all that and enjoy the tale being told.It's a long series, but presents an epic with power, depth and dimension and well worth watching it unfold through each and every episode.It would be great also to see KBS make other dramas available for viewing through Amazon, such as "Seoul 1945".
Prepare to laugh yourself silly. One of the greatest funny man teams of all time:  Jack Lemmon and Tony Curtis.  They work so well together!  I only wish they had made more than two movies together.  The plot is farsical and the characters over the top, but it all works.  Peter Falk is fantastic as Prof. Fate's sidekick.  Even my father who never watches a movie twice has watched this one over and over.  Don't miss it.
Sparkle Review. I have loved this movie ever since I was a little girl.  The DVD is awsome.  It has been re-mastered beautifully
Rich in metaphor, hard to categorize. Like del Toro's "Pan's Labyrinth" which has made huge waves in the non-Hollywood world, "The Devil's Backbone" is not easily categorised. Ghost story? yes, but much more. Picture of the scary tensions in Spain in the early days of the Civil War? yes, but more. Wonderful tale of how a group of children mature amid disaster and tragedy and come to be almost their own family, to replace the ones they never had or are separated from? Yes, but more. Rich in symbols and allegory...yes, but...The richness of what T.S.Eliot called the "objective correlative" gives one that sense of underlying depth. For instance, there's the huge unexploded bomb stuck in the middle of the school courtyard. What is it but a metaphor for the hidden ghastly secret that waits to explode and reveal the reason for the mysterious ghost of the boy Santi? We only find out Santi's story near the end. Then there's the Devil's Backbone itself - in reality a congenital deformity where the spine is exposed, but spooky-looking in the sample floating in a jar of preservative - doesn't Jacinto exactly match that name? An irredeemable core of evil, like a Shakespeare villain or the Captain in Pan's Labyrinth. del Toro doesn't want to claim that there's something good in everyone: he says no, some characters are just irreversibly turned to the dark side, the very backbone of evil.Then there's the subtle end-to end connections that add more richness. In the early scene of the school classroom, the children are shown the picture of a mammoth and the teacher makes the point that in these days the creatures were so big and strong that the hunters could only succeed by working closely together as a group. At the end, the children - that have survived - do exactly that as they hunt the gunman, and with pointed wooden spears yet!I don't really agree with the reviewers who see a strong parallel to "The Lord of the Flies." The children here (wonderfully acted, by the way) don't regress to a primitive kind of anarchical ritual-filled state: in fact they bond ever more closely and deal very directly with the real world around them.One thought: having seen this, I now don't think any more that in Pan's Labyrinth we are absolutely, definitely meant to take Ofelia's fantasy scenes as all in her mind. Clearly del Toro doesn't mind creating "real" supernatural entities. Perhaps in "Pan" he just wants to leave us in a state of permanent uncertainty, though the majority view among reviewers is that it's literally just fantasy.
A memory of 30 years comes to life. I first saw this film when I was thirteen - perhaps even younger, as I recall seeing it in black and white. Thirty years on, propelled by memories which still stuck in my mind, I bought this disk from America (it is not released in the UK where I live).Seeing again through adult eyes, one notices the joins - the songs which do not really work, the occasional twee touch. But what a film! Presented in marvellous technicolour, with a cast which takes the script seriously and does not go over the top unnecessarily, thus bringing Dr Seuss's amazing (Freudian?)dream/fantasy to life.This is not an epic. It is an intimate film, which talks to you rather than throwing endless special effects at you to stave off your boredom. (It's also nothing like the recent live action 'The Cat in the Hat'which some consider the worst film ever.) It reminds us of the gulf between adults and children, and Dr Seuss reminds us that sometimes adults have to see through children's eyes to see the truth. But it also lets the adults have their say as well.This is ultimately a film of its time (the early 50s) but it's a  film which takes its chances and doesn't play safe. It's a film which is strange, dreamlike - and worth taking to your heart.Thirty years on, I'm glad I did. Why not try it? - you might too
SAD CHAPTER IN AMERICAN HISTORY. Based on actual events, Rosewood relates the events that led to as many as 150 African Americans being murdered and burned out of their homes in Rosewood, Florida in 1923, by whites from a neighboring town.  All this happens because a white woman falsely accused a black man of raping her.Truly a horrific tale, all the more so because it happened, although an accurate death count has never been determined.  This sad account went unknown for many years due to a cover up as well as resident's refusal to talk abou the events.  Director John Singleton probably takes a worst case scenario view of the body count and pure horror with burning bodies being hung by the neck and other such gruesome crimes.Caught up in this chaotic story is Ving Rhames playing Mann, a former soldier who was merely passing through town and ends up having to fight for his life as well as heroically saving a number of children from the marauding racists.  Don Cheadle gives an outstanding performance as a Rosewood resident who proves smarter than the rednecks.Jon Voight plays a local business owner who is sympathetic to the blacks and for that is labeld a "_____" lover by the other whites.  But Voight doesn't care and actually provides a safe harbor to several blacks after the attack begins.Michael Rooker, who also played in Mississippi Burning gives a fine performance as sheriff Walker who while racist himself, finally realizes that the accusations were false but by then is unable to stop the mayhem.  Bruce McGill is the typical, fat, white redneck as Duke Purdy.The film is beautifully shot and John Jenson deserves a big tip of the hat for his cinematography as he captured the small-town, ramshackle look of 1920's Florida that greatly lent to the film's look of authenticity.  Very powerful film. So sad yet an important film for people to watch, especially our young people as incidents like this should never be forgotten
Disturbing and Real. This movie will stay with you for a long while, whether you want to remember the images or not. It tells the story of the underbelly of small town America- poor and uneducated people like Stevie who fall through the cracks of the social system and end up in jail for pedophilia. You do not know whether to feel pity for Stevie or disgust- generally, you feel both. I did find that the film maker attempted to establish some kind of bond with Stevie throughout the film, but that there was, in fact, no bond. Scenes with the film maker Steve were flat and boring. Sometimes you could sense stifled hostility in his demeanor with the film's subject, Stevie. Not exactly a Big Brother relationship, given the horrible facts of Stevie's current crime. The most amazing scene happens early on- when the film maker's young son encounters Stevie and is led out of the room by his father with a look of pure terror on his face. Wow. Kids sense danger.
Classic James Cagney Performance In One Of The Landmark Gangster Films Of the Depression Era. Few performers have become so identified with one particular type of role as James Cagney did with the gangster genre and even though in later decades he proved his ability in many diverse areas of screen acting his tough guy playing in early classics like Warner Bros Studios hard hitting gangster story "Public Enemy", is what stays in the mind.
Original Angelina. I am really glad that I got the unrated version of this movie.  It was worth the extra cost.  I would put this at the top of my favorite Angelina Jolie movies list.Hot Dawg!  This one rocks!MC White said: Check it out
Surprisingly moving and rich. This fine film really snuck up on me emotionally, but the superb performances of Jennifer Lopez (Sharon) and Jim Caviezel (Catch) are rich, nuanced, and ultimately captivating.  ANGEL EYES works on so many levels ... suspense, action, drama, and of course, romance.  It intricately and sensitively deals with issues of life and death, loss, betrayal, and redemption.  The ending doesn't tie up everything in a neat little cliched package, either.  But aside from a wonderful script and crisp direction, the key to this film is the chemistry of Lopez and Caviezel, who can communicate so much from a look or a smile or tears.  Particularly intriguing is the character that Caviezel plays, the enigmatic Catch.  Is he dead or alive?  An angel or devil?  Is he psychotic or just deeply wounded?  Somehow, as the viewer sorts it all out, Caviezel plays Mr. Catch as a warm-yet-tragic figure who steals the viewer's hearts just as surely as he touches Lopez's Sharon.  Speaking of Lopez, this is one of her best performances; it's truly one from the heart.  She's gritty, yet vulnerable...tough, but gorgeous.  I'm not really a weepy type, but all I can say is that Sharon's amazing "tribute" to her father near the film's end had me getting embarrasingly misty-eyed. This is certainly a fantastic date movie; it really would not be appropriate for children or younger teens, however, due to some salty language, intense themes, and brief scenes of sensuality.  I am amazed that Caviezel didn't experience a superstar breakout as a leading man after this film, but it is without question a brilliant and heart-rending performance.   Comparing his work here to what he has accomplished in other films, including his landmark portrayal in THE PASSION OF THE CHRIST, one sees his incredible versatility and range as an actor. ANGEL EYES is, in some ways, a collection of many small, intimate vignettes, that are woven together in a beautiful narrative tapestry.  While this film may not have burned up the box office in 2001, it's definitely a great way to spend an evening with someone you love.
King of the Wild Frontier. Walt Disney made five television shows about Davy Crockett with Fess Parker in the title role and Buddy Ebsen as his sidekick George Russel.  You can now own all five of these television shows in two versions.  This version presents all five television shows as they were first presented on ABC in the mid-1950s.  There is also a two-movie version that combines these five television shows into two movies.  I personally prefer the Disney Treasures version.  This version also includes additional material that may be interesting to a fan of the series.  The gem of the additional material is the interview with Fess Parker.The television shows in this set are diverse in style.  The first three television episodes are "Davy Crockett - Indian Fighter," "Davy Crockett Goes to Congress," and "Davy Crockett at the Alamo."  These television shows have some basis in historical fact, though many of the things portrayed in these shows are wrong.  For example, Davy left the rifle he called "Betsy" back in Tennessee when he went to Texas.What is amazing about these television shows is the response of Americans.  Suddenly children everywhere were sporting coonskin caps and carrying replicas of muzzle-loading rifles.  It became unfashionable to be a Native American, and very fashionable to say "bar" instead of bear.Though Davy did not survive the events at the Alamo, Davy's popularity was such that Walt Disney brought Davy back in two additional television adventures, "Davy Crockett and the Keelboat Race" and "Davy Crockett and the River Pirates."  According to Walt Disney, this second set of adventures was based on stories created about Davy Crockett, who had become a legend in his own time.  The stories were more humorous than the first three, and showed an even larger-than-life version of Davy Crockett than the first three adventures.What is most remarkable about these television shows is how well they hold up.  The story of Davy Crockett is timeless.  Davy's attributes are those that form the basis of how Americans see themselves.  Self-reliance, honesty, keeping your word, and being plain-spoken remain characteristics that most Americans value.A viewer does have to forgive several things that we now regard as politically incorrect, particularly in the first part of the first movie, where Davy seems to have little regard for Native Americans.  However, in later episodes Davy clearly values his friendship with Native Americans and attempts to honor the commitments the U.S. government made to them.I allowed my children to watch these movies when they were very young.  Yes, there is some violence in these movies.  However, Davy and George Russel used violence only when there appeared to be no other reasonable way out.  Given that the era depicted in these movies was violent, I think the movies were directed and produced well.These movies are a great way to introduce your children to an era when the American ethic for honesty, hard work, and trust were formulated.  Davy Crockett was instrumental is being an example we can all follow, perhaps now more than ever.  This movie is a must for every family film library.  Enjoy!
very good c d. good quick service,and good price.jim
Great quality. There is a good reason you'd want to buy this from Amazon. The quality. Sure, you can watch it for free on CBS, but the quality isn't very good. It's streamed and the bitrate (quality) is low. Personally, I want to watch Survivor on my 50" plasma, not on my computer screen. So, I use Unbox + Windows Media Center to make that happen. Survivor from unbox is as good as getting the show directly from my cable provider.
ONE OF BAKSHI'S BETTER ONES. In anticipation of the upcoming DVD release of Bakshi's Wizards, I ordered several of his other films on DVD. Of the ones I ordered, this is the only one I've never seen. It's also turns out to be one of his better ones (as in as good as Fritz The Cat but way better then American Pop and Streetfight [Coonskin]). An excellent addition to your animated DVD collection. Just don't forget about Wizards
Classic. A must have for anyone who likes love stories. A true classic and should be in everyones collection
FAVORITE EPISODE. IT WAS ONE OF MY FAVORITE EPISODES A WAY TO GET BUFFY AND ANGEL TOGETHER WITHOUT CHANGING THE STORYLINE. AND THE CHARACTERS WHERE ABLE TO EXPRESS HOW THEY FELT TO EACH OTHER
The Indisputable Kurosawa Masterwork Given Worthy Criterion Treatment. Leave it to the Criterion Collection to give Akira Kurosawa's seminal 1950 masterpiece its due with this superb 2002 DVD package. First, renowned Japanese film scholar Donald Richie provides a terrifically insightful commentary as he does on classics of other Japanese genres, Yasujiro Ozu's family drama, "Early Summer" (1951), and K Ichiwara's sun-tribe melodrama, "Crazed Fruit" (1956). Second, there is a seventeen-minute excerpt about the film from a feature-length documentary about its masterful cinematographer, "World of Kazuo Miyagawa", who did similarly amazing work on Kenji Mizoguchi's "Ugetsu" (1953) and Ozu's "Floating Weeds" (1959). Third, if you choose to buy rather than rent the DVD, there is a beautifully designed booklet with relevant excerpts from Kurosawa's autobiography and the two short stories by Ryunosuke Akutagawa from which Kurosawa and co-writer Shinobu Hashimoto based their screenplay. Add a brief testimonial introduction by Robert Altman, and this becomes one of the best of the Criterion Collection DVDs.Set in feudal 12th-century Japan, it is a far more intimate film than its vaunted reputation leads one to believe and quite brief at 88 minutes. Ostensibly a courtroom drama, the multi-layered story focuses on the rape of a woman and the murder of her husband in a forest grove. The events of the crimes are told from four different perspectives - a swaggering bandit named Tajmaru, a woodcutter who witnesses the crime, the wife and even the murdered husband by way of a medium. Each account unfolds in a distinct style - an extravagant samurai adventure according to Tajmaru, the wife's melodramatic recollection as a victim, a heroic martyr's tale from the dead husband. In a blessedly economical style, the contradictions in their accounts multiply as the story unfolds.The framing device is the woodcutter's own flashback of the incident as told to a commoner, but his version is far from the definitive one as he may have stolen a dagger from the crime scene. Kurosawa does such a brilliantly dexterous job in structuring the differing accounts that as the film progresses, it becomes less about seeking the truth and more about the power and inevitable conflicts arising from everyone's sense of ego. The only thing that becomes clear by the end is how individual perceptions shape reality and that the absolute truth is a myth. Miyagawa's expert camerawork is stellar in a way that raises the bar for subsequent cinema, especially the vivid facial close-ups of the main characters, the sharp angles of the sun-dappled forest scenes, and the dramatically ink-tinted raindrops.A sterling cast has been assembled with Kurosawa's muse, Toshiro Mifune, a youthfully feral presence as Tajmaru. Masayuki Mori and an especially vibrant Machiko Ky, who later reunited in the ghostly "Ugetsu", lend particular distinction to the couple ensnared by the tragic situation, and the three legendary actors show impressive versatility in highlighting different aspects of their personalities in the various accounts. Takashi Shimura, who later starred in Kurosawa's poignant "Ikuru", is also superb as the woodcutter. Many filmmakers have since copied Kurosawa's then-daring narrative structure (for example, Martin Ritt's "The Outrage" and Edward Zwick's "Courage Under Fire"), but none comes close to capturing the pervasive sense of ambiguity that makes this movie retain its initial power
Happy To Watch. This movie is a classic - a young(er) Nicholas Cage is fun to watch, as is the entire cast!  One of my favorites to watch over and over!!
groundbreaking. I believe this is known as the first official known documentary film. Like all good documentaries, it was able to make me, the viewer, relate to the subject. I was able to empathize and feel for the plight of Nanook and his family. Such a classic
How Far We've Come. When I watched this classic documentary, I couldn't help but think that if we ever had to get back to the level of living portrayed here, we just wouldn't make it. What it took for Inuits to survive and the almost always smiling faces on them makes me think that despite our modern proclivity for shopping malls, body-piercing, Hummers and rap music, underneath it all is a heritage that is raw, rich and admirable; and thank god somebody was able to capture it to film before it was swallowed up. It would be interesting to produce Nanook II and show what goes on in this remote part of the world now.
Mel Ferrer directs this movie!. We are in presence of a film that at least, it dared to challenge the delicate issue; civilization against enrooted ancestral beliefs, whose fate has been previously decreed and the lead man, of renovated ideas.The film had dated but still conserves the interpretative vigor of Anthony Perkins and the well known sweetness of Audrey Hepburn who looks like more an angel than a Bird Girl.Original in its purpose.
Under the Full Cherry Moon. I think you have to see this movie a second time to fully appreciate it.  There is alot of subtlties that I didn't pick up on until I watched it again years later. All the acting was fantastic.  A standout performance for the actor who played the "salesman" at the hotel.  Weird-a-rama!!!  The movie ends up being completely freaky and surreal, and ya got to have a warped mind to fully grasp the surrealness of the Coen Brothers.  Strange-a-rama.........
Great Show. Bones is one of my favorite TV series. This one episode I missed so I had to get it to keep on track. Great show even if you have never seen it from the begining
War Pigs. This film should be seen and discussed in classrooms and small gatherings across the country.KMoor
There has to be more on the way. I need to see more Voltron. They need to come out with a box set or something. This was a great video to watch because it brings back so many memories. Everybody that watched Voltron knows what I'm talking about. If you used to like it, then you might as well get this one too
Dark and Light. This drama is filled with possitive messages but has a darkness to it that will make you angry, in a productive way
Many writers are dead before we know how great they are. Director Julian Schnabel, an artist himself, has centered his two best-known films on fine, misunderstood artists. "Basquiat" (with Jeffrey Wright) was well-received and lovingly portrayed. The life of Fernando Arenas, in "Before Night Falls", was a little more complicated, but true artistry shows through. This writer, a victim of Castro's Cuba, had a tough time dealng with his own personal situation as well as his powerful desire to write. A fearless, powerful performance by Javier Bardem carries this beyond any simple story. Mr. Schnabel managed to get Johnny Depp to provide a dual role (or was it?); one as a gorgeous transvestite and the other as a nasty Lieutenant of the guard. Olivier Martinez ("Unfaithful") was strong. So many beautiful men in one film, acting against type. Very intriguing. Cameo appearances from Sean Penn, and the great old character actor, Pedro Armendariz (as the grandpa) were well-integrated. The great director Hector Babenco ("Kiss of the Spider Woman") also has a small role.It's Bardem who carries this to greatness, with Schnabel's sure hand; cinematography was remarkably beautiful for an independent film. Here's the influence of Schnabel, always the artist. Extras on the DVD include a real interview with Arenas; a short video recollection by Schnabel's daughter, Lola, taken during the filming in Mexico. Another longer extra includes a tour of Schnabel's art studio, which I thought might be a self-indulgent trip, but is actually quite insightful into the mind of this talented man.But it's the remarkable, beautiful Javier Bardem that is the #1 reason to see this film. He'd won many awards for it, including the Independent Spirit Award, and an Oscar nomination. I'm very impressed.
Audie Murphy. I think our most decorated war hero was type cast in action films,namely low budget westerns.  He may have been a better actor than that, if given the chance
Powder. I loved this quirky movie.  I am glad to have it on dvd.
A Wild & Creepy Sleeper !. Stuart Gordons "DAGON" is a unique horror gem that belongs in every true horror fans collection! While not as well known as Re-Animator this film adaptation of another H.P.Lovecraft nightmare is one of the very best out there. This one is truly what nightmares are made of & I for one enjoyed the hell out of it. Excellent horror film!
AWESOME SERIES! MUST HAVE!. Everyone seriously needs to sit down and watch this series.  It is full of action and surprises!  The stories are phenomenal and I am totally hooked!  I purchased the season 1 dvd and have purchased the digital season 2 to hold me over until the dvd comes out! Please take the time to watch the series and then definitely BUY IT
An Intruiging Plot, With A good Message. Insomnia is quite simply about a web of lies, and the consequnces they can produce. It is very well acted on both Pacino's and Williams part, and Swank was brilliant as well. Besides all that good stuff, I am also a fan of the director, "ever since I saw Batman Begins" and find his artistic vision to be incredible.The only problem I had with this movie was the ending. Sure, it showed how lying could defeat a person, but I thought a little redemption would have been nice.However, if you have a strong stomach, or a good editing company, I suggest you see this.
Classic musical given the star treatment. Some of the re-writes for this movie are a bit hard to take.  While the new opening is a little hard to take, it does establish the animosity between Fred and Lily quite well.  It also makes "Too darned hot" acceptable.  Censored lyrics are not awful, but they rob Porter of some of his depth.  Katherine Grayson rises to the occasion quite well.  Her early scene is contrived, but after that she's on firm footing.  Howard Keel is wonderful.  His acting is just a tad square, but that was in part the format of the time.  Ann Miller dances up a storm.  And, speaking of dancing, what a treat to have Carol Haney, Bob Fosse and Bobby Van as featured dancers.  There isn't really a complete rendition of "Another openin', another show" and "Bianca" is cut entirely.  But the rest of the numbers come through great.Why 4 stars?  Partially because of the cuts.  But also the color has just a little fluctuation at times.  This isn't a restored print, but it isn't bad either.  I wish they had a few more of the 3-D excerpts in the Special stuff.  I also with they sent some 3-D glasses.
Small, precise movements target the glute area. The Lotte Berk Method is a form of exercise developed by Russian dancer Lotte Berk and brought to America by Lydia Bach. Drawing from dance and other similar disciplines, many of the exercises require the use of a ballet barre, and the focus is on making small, precise movements to facilitate the development of long, lean muscles. As the title suggests, High Round Assets particularly targets the muscles in the glute area with the goal of creating a higher and firmer behind.Like all of the Lotte Berk videos, this workout begins with high knee lifts to warm up. Instructor Kristen Lilley leads two other Lotte Berk instructors, one of whom shows modifications and one of whom uses a wall (actually a column in this case) instead of a barre. Also included in the warm up are push-ups: 2 sets of 10 on your knees, and then 2 sets of 10 "reverse" push-ups, performed with your hands behind you and your chest up to switch the work to the triceps. After the warm up, the workout moves to the barre for several sets of leg lifts. Beginning with a straight leg, you lift your leg behind you and make small, slow lifts upward for 2 sets of 10; the next 2-3 sets are performed more quickly. After repeating on the other side, you then do a bent leg version, again starting with slow lifts and progressing to quicker lifts. This focus on doing only a couple of different exercises with a very high number of repetitions is different from the other Lotte Berk videos, but I found it to be more effective. However, like the other videos, there is an emphasize on stretching, so you always perform stretches between the movements.After the barre work, it's on to the floor for "back dancing," which is basically a series of pelvic tilts done while lying on your back. These moves are performed a variety of ways, including emphasizing one side only and placing your feet into different positions, but you are constantly moving with no breaks inbetween. The workout ends as all the LBM videos do with a "Shape by Stretch" section in which you perform hamstring and other stretches. At 31 minutes, this is a short, efficient workout for targeting your glutes; mine were definitely sore the next day! I found the instructor, Kristen, to be more tolerable than some of the other Lotte Berk instructors, but the style of these videos might not appeal to everyone, especially since the exercises are quite repetitive. However, I would recommend this workout to anyone looking for an effective means of making the most of their "assets."
Funny,Funny,Funny. Even though this is about 4 years old, it is extremely halarious.  I've been waiting to see a good stand up comedy. The first 15 min is just one hilarious hit after another. I love this guy
Not one false note in any of these films.... The Decalogue is indeed as collosal and as moving as people have said.  Each film is inspired by one of the Commandments, although the commandments are never mentioned directly.  Kieslowski made these films all in one year, which to me is amazing.  This was made for Polish TV, showing that television doesn't have to be completely stupid all the time.  All of these segments are full of moral ambiguity, and clear answers are never given, just like in real life.  I love the fact that Kieslowski never answers things directly.  If this was an American production, it would have gone 2 ways.  First, it could have been a right wing, simplistic, heavy handed "message" film that would have been dumbed down to the level of a 4 year old, like an "Afterschool Special".  Or it could have been a whiny, left wing politically correct "tolerance" episode where everything would have worked out because people are basically good and everyone needs self esteem.  Either way is both insulting and disingenuous.  I especially like the 2nd film, where a woman, who is having an affair and is pregnant by her lover, has a husband who is the hospital.  Her husband could possibly die.  She pesters the doctor to find out about her husband's condition, partly out of concern, but because of her fetus as well.  She tells the doctor that if her husband lives, she'll abort the fetus.  If he dies, she'll have the baby.  That's a very murky, morally ambiguous situation.  When sitting through this part, I wondered what I would do in that situation.  I haven't a clue, really.  When I saw Clint Eastwood's masterpiece Million Dollar Baby, I thought of these films, because Eastwood's film and Kieslowski's films dealt with morally complex issues in an adult and artistic way.  These films are about life and art.  There is no time in this film (or the other segments) where you feel that you're being lectured to, and I love that about it.  It's about religious things, but religion isn't mentioned.  It's about morals, yet, you don't feel that it is.  It's great art, that's all, and that is enough.
A Time to Think. Grisham once said he wrote his other books, e.g., The Firm, et al., so he could afford to write important books, like this one, upon which the movie s based.  Matthew McConaghey gives a fantastic performance--and why hasn't Hollywood ever--EVER--given him another part this good!  Thought provoking, great acting, great story, highly recommen
If you loved the movie, you will love this. I really enjoyed most of the cd. I would have liked some other songs to replace 2 of the remixes of the &quot;Dancehall Queen&quot; track. I jammed to &quot;Little and Cute&quot;, &quot;Joy Ride&quot;, and &quot;My Jamaican Guy&quot;. And the track &quot;Unbelievable&quot; reminded me of my husband! All in all, this was a great cd and I would buy it for a friend
Another incredible Richard Widmark performance. I am SUCH a big fan of Richard Widmark, he's my favorite actor, and SO underappreciated (Well,at least in my opinion)I'm thrilled this has finally been released on video because it's not only a landmark film - it's a great one. Also of course we have the chance to see the brilliant debut of Sidney Poitier and he is very powerful. But Richard is just mesmerising playing a character so convincingly different from the way he really was. The storyline has already been recapped by others, suffice to say, this is a slice of history that pulls no punches in tone and language of the racial tensions of 1950s America. I am sure as with the film Pinky, the studio took a risk with this release. Even if you are not a rabid fan of Richard (or Sidney!)this film holds up over repeat viewings, and so is worth having in your collection
SPOON!. The Tick kicks ass. This is one of the best episodes.  It's a must have
beat street !!!!. Honestly beat street is the best breakin video out there period.This like the orgin of hip hop music,dancing and grafitti to this day.The storyline is alright not going to go into details but it send out a positive message to everyone that was there and even today.Honestly just buy the movie why read this review !!
Memories Are Made Of This!. What do the following have in common?A boy named Ralphie and the phrase 'You'll poke your eye out'!A Red Ryder BB Gun and a sexy, black-mesh, undulating leg that's a lamp.A bar soap wielding mother and a expletive shouting father.A pepto-bismol pink Easter bunny suit and a boy who eats like a piggy.You're right! They all add up to A Christmas Story!It is about Ralphie, wonderfully played by Peter Billingsley, who longs for a Red Ryder BB Gun!He repeatedly hears 'You'll poke your eye out' every time he mentions the gun.Darrin McGavin is terrific as the contest entering father who is ecstatic when he finally wins.His prize, a leg-shaped animated lamp complete with a black mesh stocking!In his eyes the leg of lamp (I coudn't resist) is absolutely beautiful and,much to the dismay of his wife, he proudly displays it for all to see in their front window.The lamp is a major source of contention between them as each one attempts to move it!His language when anything goes wrong - from the exploding furnace to the sparking wiringto the neighbors free roaming dogs has reprecussions when, in frustration, Ralphie repeats them.Enter Mom with the soap! Don't worry you won't hear the actual words being said but you will getthe gist or should that be drift as this is a winter story!Little brother, Randy, is a picky eater and is only successfully coaxed to eat by his mother, played perfectlyby Melinda Dillon, when she has him pretend to eat like his favorite storybook animal, a pig!With his face firmly in the plate he eats like one much to the disgust of his father!Although based on the Red Ryder BB gun, there are many other storylines highlighted in this wonderful movie.There are bullies, school friends, Christmas tree lots, Santa coming to town and the hilarious Christmas giftof a  pink Easter Bunny outfit poor Ralphie has to try on! You will enjoy this movie!It takes place at a time when I was growing up and many of the scenes recall my childhood.To those of us who grew up in the forties and early fifties it brings back fond memories of our past Christmases.We had real trees adorned with tinsel and glowing with big colorful bulbs, no themed trees with just whitelights, our trees glowed with a rainbow of colors. We had favorite radio shows, wore galoshes and hadbackyards with snow covered sheds just like the ones in Ralphie's backyard.All of those are in this film, and as such, A Christmas Story has a wonderful familiarity about it.You can almost smell the heavy scent of pine mixed with the delicious aroma of a roasting turkey.This movie is a classic and will, once again, be eagerly watched by our family.Ah! Memories are made of this!
who's having a baby?. BIG fan of 80's... music and culture, and most of all The Movies.  she's having a baby is not just a teen movie like "sweet sixteen" or "breakfast club".  Its somewhat a true newly wed story with many funny moments wishing your marriage will be like that some day.  Soundtrac is great with kate bush "the woman's work".  My girlfriend cried and as i hand her the tisue when this song played.  i told her i'll feel the same if she were the wife.  boy i got lovin that nite... i would watch over and over again and the last credit when 80's famous star show their contribution suggesting the name for the baby, i thought it was clever.
Worked Wonderfully. Download takes awhile, but the picture quality was great, even full screen. It played all the way through. And, to boot, it's an excellent show
Warm and fuzzy. This one has one of those touching endings where you get to see that even Booth has a heart...well, more so than we already know.  The ending got me, I got misty over it.  Enjoy with someone you love
A ton of cheese... What I loved about this movie and the TV show was that Adam West, Burt Ward, and the rest of the cast played it completely straight.  It's so campy and over the top, but they were never self conscious about what they were doing.  They weren't being "ironic" or detached.  That's one of the main reasons why the show worked so well.  Of course, the dialogue and situations here have to be seen and heard to be believed (my favorite is the dolphin who sacrifices his life, so that Batman and Robin may live).  A ton of cheese, but really good cheese.
My Favorite Episode. I don't have television, haven't for 11 years. When I learned CBS was allowing free viewing over the internet I checked it out and started watching episodes of CSI, CSI NY, CSI Miami, and NCIS. I found NCIS to be my favorite and this particular show Dead And Unburied is my favorite so far. I enjoy the light-heartedness of NCIS. So I decided to download this episode from Amazon Unbox.I really wish Amazon Unbox would allow me to burn shows I've purchased. As it is they are restricted to viewing on my computer. When Unbox expands this service to allow me to burn DVDs I will likely purchase many more shows this way. I like selecting individual shows
Another Poignant View of the Holocaust from Prague. Writer Jir Hubac and Director Matej Minac have created a fine and very different approach to the Holocaust stories of WW II - its insidious origins and relentless destruction of a beautiful Czech family - in the film 'Vsichni moji blzc' ('All My Loved Ones').  Though the subject matter has been treated in countless films, this relating of the story of a large, happy, well adjusted family in Prague and its gradual disintegration does not dwell on atrocities of the camps but instead slowly unwinds the story of how Hitler's masterplan overtook and crushed so many innocent people.The Silbersteins include a physician and his wife and son, a brother who is a gypsy of sorts, another brother who is a concert violinist and falls in love with a non-Jew, accepted by his family but eventually rejected by her and her family because of the pogrom, and all manner of extended family circling in the warmth of the good life in 1939.  Very gradually the Nazis take over the Czech borders, not really heeded by the Silbersteins ('no one could be as mad as Hitler may seem') and gradually the evacuation and genocide of the Jews begins.  Dr Silberstein is introduced to an American Nicholas Winton (Rupert Graves) who has come to Prague to save the children by providing them safe transport to America. The Silbersteins reluctantly release their son when they see that is his only hope for survival: the remainder of the family's future is doomed.  The rest of the film deals primarily with the homage to Winton, showing the real man and the many of the 600 children he rescued.  It is deeply moving.The color and camera work is elegant and very much in keeping with the film's emphasis on the dignity of the Silberstein family.  The acting by this Czech troupe is excellent, never cloying, always sensitive to the very human response to the black cloud of the Third Reich's Holocaust.  In every way this is a film to treasure. Highly recommended.  Grady Harp, September 0
How Far We've Come. When I watched this classic documentary, I couldn't help but think that if we ever had to get back to the level of living portrayed here, we just wouldn't make it. What it took for Inuits to survive and the almost always smiling faces on them makes me think that despite our modern proclivity for shopping malls, body-piercing, Hummers and rap music, underneath it all is a heritage that is raw, rich and admirable; and thank god somebody was able to capture it to film before it was swallowed up. It would be interesting to produce Nanook II and show what goes on in this remote part of the world now.
To The Top Of The World!!!. Great movie, loads of fun. A must have for anyone collecting movies. Enjoy a cup of JO while you take a train trip to the top of the world
The best historical war drama from the Far East. I have seen many historical war dramas from Far East (mainly China's) and most of them are not only historically inaccurate but have a strong bias toward the enemy.Yi Soon Shin, however, is a rare exception.  Not only is the drama very historically accurate but it is also very comprehensive in detailing the meticulous battle planning of the admiral that leads to each victory but also the political in-fighting between the Chosun political factions (and the second-guessing nature of the king) which causes his eventual death.Also, the special effects are great.  The battle scenes (whether on sea or land) are realisitic and of outstanding quality.The only problem that I can find is that the DVD has not placed sufficient focus on the contribution of the Ming China.  Then again, this is not unexpected since this is a Korean drama focusing on the great admiral.Also, the entire selection should have 104 episodes.  I don't know why it stops at 101.If you want to have a more comprehensive knowledge on the subject, try Samuel Hawley's Imjin War (which portrays Yi Soon Shin more accurately by quoting original sources).Any who is only intered in the fighting may also want to check out Stephen Turnbull's Samurai Invasion (which has more colorful maps and detailed description of battles from the Japanese perspective).Lastly, anyone who is a fan of samurai warfare may want to check out Shogun:Total War by Creative Assembly (now in Gold version).
one of the best. This episode is a classic, and is one of the best in the series. It explores time travel and alternate time lines, and it's storytelling had paved the way for many screen plays that followed.
Joan Shines in Spruced-Up Classic. Crawford fans already know that while this movie was a famous flop for Joan, it contains one of her most interesting performances. Now they can see it struck from a near-immaculate print and enjoy both the gorgeous cinematography and those wild closeups of Joan. A friend of mine who is not a Crawford fan described her look in this movie as &quot;Makeup Poisoning&quot;. Personally, I love Joan's characterization of South Seas prostitute Sadie Thompson. Highly stylized, it's a little ridiuclous, but  compelling. In her &quot;redeemed&quot; scenes  Sadie is quite moving (and stunningly beautiful! This was Crawford at her peak). Sadie's ascent up the staircase to confront Walter Houston's lustful preacher is brilliantly handled and has to be one of Joan's best confrontation scenes ever --ranking  right up there with Mildred slapping Veda. A little talky and slow in spots, but the rewards are worth the wait
losing control. One of Kira Reed's best. In case you don't know, Kira Reed, a former playmate who besides being beautiful, is a very good actress. The movie has a plot you can follow and keeps you intrigued til the very end. If you've  never seen the uncut version on cable you won't know what you're missing,  if you have, than avoid buying this movie, you will be disappointed
Crazy cool. The actress Jeanne Moreau, now almost 80, pauses from talking about her film career, as if something urgent has occurred to her. She looks dead at you, the viewer, her eyes dark and instantly hypnotic. "You think you know a lot," she says. "And you don't."Moreau then casually returns you to the story of how she made the groundbreaking "Elevator to the Gallows" (1958) with young Louis Malle, her director and lover. "It was the decisive moment for the rest of my life," the storied French actress says.Moreau's talk is one of several compelling extra features on Criterion's release of "Gallows" (Ascenseur pour l'echafaud). The movie itself, somewhere between noir and new wave, is remembered mostly for its innovations in camerawork and for its soundtrack, a work of improvisation by Miles Davis that pushed jazz in new directions.The French director made quite a few better films. But "Gallows," his first, certainly will be of interest to jazz fans and the new wave hardcore.The "Gallows" set devotes three short films to the all-night session that produced the Davis soundtrack. "Malle had nerves of steel to put something as important as the score in the hands of an improvising musician," the critic Gary Giddons says in the 24-minute interview piece "Miles Goes Modal." Davis recorded in Paris with the expatriate drummer Kenny Clarke and three Europeans. Each worked in front of a screen displaying a rough cut of the movie.Davis seems to duet with Moreau's character, who walks wraithlike through the streets of Paris as he plays. "It was a flow," says the actress, a witness to the session. Also on hand was a French TV crew, which came away with severely hip footage of Davis improvising (it runs about 4 minutes).The one-channel audio, taken from the 35mm print's optical track, benefits from significant restoration. Davis' horn sounds silky yet distinct. In action scenes, the cymbals and bass pounce out of the speakers. Henri Decae's black-and-white images are works of art, casting nighttime Paris and Moreau in natural light. The free-moving camera and low lighting were innovations that inspired France's emerging new wave. ("Gallows" is presented widescreen with the 16:9 enhancement.)Extras also include a fun chat with Malle and Moreau at 1993's Cannes festival; an interview with the (somewhat disgruntled) pianist who played on the soundtrack; and Malle's absurdist student film "Crazeologie," which bops along to the titular Charlie Parker song
A good, smart, funny movie. As soon as I walked out of the theater I declared that I had to own a copy of this movie.  I had to wait a long time for it to be released to DVD (it was in theaters in late winter but they didn't put it to DVD till almost a year later...probably hoping to capitalize on awards' season reviews and recommendations).  It was well worth the wait.It is a shame that this film was overlooked with the awards.  I think that the timing of the release factored in but maybe it just appeals to some people (like me) more than others.  The entire ensemble does a great job.I just rewatched it and I still enjoy it after at least 6 viewings.  It would make a wonderful addition to your video collection, especially if you are a Michael Douglas fan.  (And having a Pittsburgh connection helps too...the movie really captured a lot of the essence of Pittsburgh even with the weather when there is snow on the ground, the sun is peeking through and it is raining all at the same time!).  It is just a good movie all around and should appeal to viewers who enjoy smart films.There are just truly funny scenes and some really touching parts.  What a wild journey these characters find themselves on over the span of just one weekend.  I think the best part is that it isn't non stop action and things don't get so out of the realm of possibility.  It still retains a good touch of believability, even as some pretty unbelievable things happen.Pick up the soundtrack while you are at it.  Bob Dylan's "Things Have Changed" is great (and it recieved an Oscar).  It is mostly a CD to just kick back and relax to.
Great companion DVD to the Rankin-Bass collection. We bought this DVD and the Rankin-Bass collection and they get played continually the last two Christmases.Nice DVD, nothing fancy in the packaging.  It's Rankin-Bass!  How can you go wrong..
Informative. Nice little video for my Zen during my long wait at the doctor's office.  Confucius overcame many difficulties
SIMPLY BEAUTIFUL... I never heard of this film until I saw it on somebody's amazon list. I read many reviews and decided to give it a try. Wow, what a film!!!The story is quite simple: a group of kids living in a new city eager to attract new investment... and that's it. No movie theaters, no malls, no parks... nothing. And they are there on their own. Then all things start to happen.The planners just forgot that a quarter of the city's population was under 16.Anyway, it is rare to see a film with so many kids delivering electrifying performances... and Matt Dillon and Michael Kramer DO leave you in awe. They're so so so good that i wonder why isn't this film considered the classic it is.This is one of those small films where everything on it is big:Cinematography: Top-notch. This film has one of the best cinematoraphy jobs I've ever seen. On this film, the image really speaks. There is one scene, when the protagonist is being hunted, when he spends the night in an empty house with the girl he likes... it's early morning... the Sun is just rising... they say goodbye... and the most beautiful sunrise (outside) is framed by the doors... simply one of Cinema's great moments. I am one of those people who hate intelectuals who "look for the meaning" of every scene of every film they see... and here is one scene that trully gives the viewer some space for interpretation. It really made me cry.And that is great screenwriting. Period.Music score: again another fine work. The kids only listen to 70's rock - but that's just diegetic music here and then. But the music score you'll listen when we get deep into the story is absolutely beautiful, rich and powerful. It is not just there instead of silence... it really contributes to showing the emotions those kids are going through.And Mr. Kaplan does know where to put the camera. He really knows what he wants us to see.It is true that, being from 1979, some situations are dated. Some problems are dated. Some conflicts are dated... but that only makes this film more valuable as a document about what it was like to grow up on that part of America at that particular time.Still, this film aged a lot better than other better known films about the generation gap.This is a film to be studied.I strongly recomend this film. It's a gem!
Review of 5 Day Abs. 5 Daily, short abdominal routines was a great idea from the FIRM! This one is comprised of segemtns from five of the original, total body volumes. 	This tape is great if you want to just do ab work every day, or to add extra abdominal work to any of your workouts. It includes very classic and traditional moves as opposed to the moves in the other ab video, More 5 Day Abs. These sets, however, are a lot of fun and also produce great results
Good movie as always, where the subtitles?. This movie is still as good today as it has always been. I had the original on VHS, but decided to get the DVD because I don't have a video machine any more. The only problem I have is that I was hoping for subtitles because the accent is a bit thick in places and I can't make out what they are saying. I checked the spec and Amazon says the DVD had subtitles. But when I played the movie it said there was were no subtitles. Besides that, no other issues with the DVD.
wholesome entertainment. this film is just long enough to enjoy a small part of beethovens life. however humorous, it is seriously sad when beethoven expresses his pain from the loss of his hearing.  the gatekeeper learns selflessness and becomes understanding of the importance of people in our lives.  this approx. one hour video is reccomended for all ages
funnier than a breakaway chastity belt. This film should be seen in its uncut and unrated video version; the theatrical release was butchered by moralists and punishment freaks when it first hit the screens in the mid 1980's. Kathleen Turner shows what a fine and brave actress she is in every scene. However, the film belongs to Anthony Perkins, who seems to be overdosing on meth with his breathlessly loony performance; he proves that he can find the sadness and humanity in a completely insane character. He was a supremely gifted actor and its a shame he died when he did. This is strange and enjoyable movie. But prudes beware: it has a lot of sexual content.
Butch and Sundance Ride into Film History. Butch and Sundance is an amazing wonderful film: in this ultimate collectors edition it sparkles like a beautiful jewel. The package is complete (I always thought the 1997 version was missing William Goldman's commentary - this one has it!): if you were a fan of this terrific western when it first appeared in the first flush of 1969-70 you will not be disappointed to revisit with Butch and Sundance and their hole in the wall gang. Its also a great chance to listen in again as 3 beautiful stars and countless other key personnel recount what it was like to put this wonderful film together.God bless Geo. Roy Hill et al for making this western and changing many of our lives in the process. For this formerly 11 year old boy, I left the theater determined to be a film director. I studied writing by reading and re-reading Goldman's original screenplay over 40 times. When I finally got a chance to shoot film, of course I experimented with sepia tones!This is not the most coherent review I've ever slapped together but it makes up for coherence by being heartfelt. If you haven't seen Butch (and I know a lot of film scholars who haven't) you really don't know film.This is a classic film from several key players who have made their share of immortal classics. And the best part is, its not a bitter pill to swallow. This one tastes good going down!note: this review is for the 2 disc version, although the special edition released a few years back is also a wonderful buy. no matter how much Butch you want in your life, they are both worthy editions. In general, anything by Redford or Newman is well worth watching (when its penned by Bill Goldman, you're in for a special treat!) .
My Favorite Episode. I don't have television, haven't for 11 years. When I learned CBS was allowing free viewing over the internet I checked it out and started watching episodes of CSI, CSI NY, CSI Miami, and NCIS. I found NCIS to be my favorite and this particular show Dead And Unburied is my favorite so far. I enjoy the light-heartedness of NCIS. So I decided to download this episode from Amazon Unbox.I really wish Amazon Unbox would allow me to burn shows I've purchased. As it is they are restricted to viewing on my computer. When Unbox expands this service to allow me to burn DVDs I will likely purchase many more shows this way. I like selecting individual shows
Gritty and Utterly Realistic Fights. "The Hunted" is a fantastically gritty, pulse-pounding chase film with refreshing realism, and is a fine return to form for the occasionally brilliant Friedkin, who has not been this on top of things since "To Live and Die in L.A."  I will not here attempt to offer a synopsis of the film, as that has been done to death in this forum, but will instead offer some commentary.First, those complaining that this film does not really have much of a plot, or that the plot of this film is confusing and messy, have entirely missed the point.  William Friedkin was not here trying to make a story-driven film, at all.  As for the second complaint, Friedkin has stated that he purposefully wanted much of the film to remain ambiguous.  The viewer, for instance IS NOT SUPPOSED TO KNOW whether the del Toro character is crazy or not.  Those complaining that they can't figure out whether he's right in his suspicions or not have entirely missed the point of the film.  Friedkin here was trying to develop an intense, gritty, extended, mano-y-mano conflict between two men who are clearly more dangerous than anyone else in their environment.  Jones' character, fearing he's found himself in a Dr. Frankensteinian scenario, having created a monster only he can stop, feels both responsible to bring in del Toro and guilty for hunting a man he essentially feels fatherly towards.  Jones' character could train del Toro's to kill, but, after having done so, he is unable (or unwilling) to help him psychologically.  This is insufficient training, an insufficient initiation into manhood, resulting in the playing out of the Abraham/Isaac mythos.  Unsophisticated viewers insisting on a "good guy"/"bad guy" take on the film will likely not enjoy this movie.  Jones' character is not the "good guy" and del Toro's is not the "bad guy"; they are just both tormented men.  Some viewers have interpreted Jones' character as the good guy, but just as many will see del Toro's character as a good guy being hunted down by his own government which he has just finished serving.  This ambiguity of not having a clear cut "good guy" and "bad guy" is exactly what Friedkin was going for.  Life is not black and white.  In fact such Hollywoodian portrayals are naive and absurd.Those complaining that Jones' character is unrealistic should watch the film with the commentary turned on, and learn about the real man that Jones' character is based on.  Was it unrealistic that the two characters quickly fashioned knives out of raw materials in the wilderness? ...Not when the actors were trained to be able to do such themselves in real life.What "The Hunted" has to offer the viewer is an absolutely enthralling action film harkening back to the grittier days of action movies (such as The French Connection or Bullitt).  The main character is fascinating to watch.  He's full of nervous energy that he is constantly shaking out.  He can't stay still; he's twitchy.  Something is clearly bothering him.  He knows how utterly dangerous his adversary is, and feels responsible for teaching him the destructive maneuvers he knows.  The army trains men to be cold-blooded killers.  This changes some men.  It's a door you can't walk back through.  The army does not train them to reenter society.  That's left to them, and not all of them can effectively pull it off.  Benecio del Toro's character thinks the government is stalking him, spying on him.  We don't know if this is true or if he's merely snapped.  What we do know is that he is an extraordinarily dangerous man who is out on the loose.Martial arts fans should take special note: this movie has the absolute best and most realistic hand-to-hand fight scenes this critic has ever scene (I say this having studied many martial arts in real life).  The art on display is Kali knife fighting.  Both Tommy Lee Jones and Benecio del Toro trained in the art and did the fighting in the film.  It shows.  (Allegedly Jones broke del Toro's wrist in one of their fights!) These are the most gritty and breathtaking fight scenes you'll ever see (the first of which I would pick as the best fight scene in film history).  They are utterly realistic, and look very much the way a real martial arts fight looks (i.e. brutal and short).  No nonsense wires or high-flying kicks here, just deadly street fighting.The tracking scenes in this film are wonderful, relishing the details.  The cinematography is downright breathtaking, and the soundtrack is one of the greatest and most effective in years.  Friedkin makes the viewer feel that even after the antagonist is brought into the city that he's still in a wilderness...a wilderness of concrete blocks instead of trees and moss.  Once the chase is on, it doesn't stop until the end of this wonderfully fun movie.  Ignore the negative reviews and check this one out!
My favorite. This was my favorite episode as a kid.  I was so happy to see I could download it to watch with my kids
Barbarella is the unchallenged Queen of the Galaxy. After watching Jane Fonda as "Barbarella" I have nothing negative to say about her
Incredibly funny. Certainly one of the funniest films ever. Great acting and directing. Especially suitable for dog owners, but not limited to them.
If you love wild westerns.... you'll love this movie.  I love watching movies about Billy The Kid, Jesse  James, Butch Cassidy, and more.  I'm tired of movies about good guys.   Here's a good one about the BAD ones.  The OUTLAWS of the wild west
My favorite Hartley Film. If you like Trust and Simple Men then you'll love this film. Personally I love all of Hartley's works, but to me these three films just go so well together. They're all earlier works and in these films you witness an incredibley inspired director do more with a low budget film than most high paid directors could ever dream of doing. I'd also like to say that if you've never seen a Hal Hartley film then this is probably the best point to start out at
Perfect film for the entire family. One of the first signs of civilization in the old west was the arrival of the Fred Harvey restaurant.  This is the Hollywood version of the opening of one of these rest stops.Judy Garland plays Susan.  She answered a lonely hearts ad and is coming out to marry him.  But when she arrives it turns out that its gruff cowhand, Chill Wills.  She joins the Harvey Girls.  John Hodiak is Ned, the proprietor of the Alhambra Saloon.  While he runs the saloon, he is a straight shooter.  If he can't beat the Harvey House fair and square, then he'll move on.Of course, Judy and John battle but in the end, fall for each other.Others include Angela Lansbury as the head saloon girl who is in love with Ned, Ray Bolger as the new blacksmith straight from Massachusetts, Virginia O'Brien as on of the Harvey Girls who falls for Bolger, Marjorie Main as the Harvey cook.This is a piece of fluff, like most of the MGM musicals by the Arthur Freed unit.  But it has a great score by Johnny Mercer and Harry Warren including the Oscar winner On the Atchison, Topeka and the Santa Fe.  This number is one of the best staged musical numbers of the 1940's.  But the best scene is when the meat is stolen from the Harvey House and Judy grabs a couple of pistols and charges over to the Alhambra to retrieve it.Judy is perfect in the role and there is chemistry between her and Hodiak.  The supporting cast is perfect.  Virginia O'Brien's trademark dead pan deliver has never been put to better use.This film use to be played every Easter weekend and I always looked forward to this.  Thirty years later, it still holds up perfectly!DVD EXTRAS:Cast and Crew List - This is just a list and does not give any background on the actors or crew.  It would be interesting to know what happened to Hodiak.  This is his only major starring role.Deleted Musical Numbers - A duet between Garland and Hodiak - My Intuition that was cut for time.  Production number  and reprise - March of the Doagies - not used due to rewrites, the reprise is the master shot only.  Both are good numbers.Stereo reproduction for On the Atchison, Topeka and the Santa Fe -  The original multi-track recording survived and a stereo reproduction was created.  This is fine but the musical number is the first real number of the movie.Commentary by George Sidney - I never listen to these and therefore cannot evaluate.Singsong Express audio Track -  Additional recording of some of the song - Audio Only
So Beautiful... So German. This film is touching and poetic, beautiful and desolate.  It is truley of the post-war zietgiest, interspersed footage of the clean up of Berlin and multiple references to the toll taken on the German people by the Third Reich.The story of Damiel's love for the trapeze artist is almost secondary to his love of the human condition.  This condition is masterfully shown as both euphoric and tragic through disjointed and philosophical dialouge, the haunting imagery, and Bruno Ganz childlike joy at his first cup of coffee.I cannot recommend this film enough.  5 stars seems to sell it short.  It is an absolute MUST for anyone who loves the German style of cinema.
There is an Easter Beagle!. The 1970s were the artistic prime for the Peanuts specials, and "It's the Easter Beagle, Charlie Brown" is no exception. The voices, animation, and music are all superb. It has some quite funny moments, such as the store having their Christmas decorations up and Marcie's antics with the eggs. I wish some of the music was released on CD (I don't know why it wasn't on Charlie Brown's Holiday Hits). It's a classic perrenial show. Some have disliked the lack of religion, but I think Schroeder's quote, "It's a time of renewal, a start of spring" is sufficient."It's Arbor Day, Charlie Brown" is a foreshadowing of the poor quality that would come in the 1980s. It was made in 1976, one year after "Be My Valentine, Charlie Brown", but the voices aren't as good. The voices are the main problem here (although they're still better than the '80s), but they're not the only one. The backgrounds aren't as good, and the baseball field is more brown than usual, even with all the plants. Even Vince Guaraldi's music isn't quite as lively as usual. Still, this is a good show with some quite funny moments. It is fun to have a special for an obscure holiday, even though I don't know when it is.I don't understand the relevance of the Charlotte's Web 2 game, other than just commercialism. I think it only works for the three to five age group. A regular advertisement would have been more useful.This is a fun DVD.
Everyone must watch this !. Now this is a film for the whole family, and I don't mean that as a bad thing. This is a great film. Full of charismatic characters, great costumes and wonderful story. The first time I watched this movie was when I had borrowed it from a library. I thought I'd give it a shot since it was free. Never thought it would be this good though. I took it more like a joke at first, but then I realised this is infact a masterpiece. It is also a bit funny at times and is alot of fun to watch if you're into fantasy stories like Labyrinth, though not as deeply fantastic as Lbyrinth, this still is a great tale and must be seen.I think it's meant to be a story for kids, but it doesn't make it any worse, infact it's better than most movies you'll see today, if not all.Just get it, it's always cheap where ever you buy it, and is worth much more than any shop sells it for. It's a must have and I can't imagine what life would be like if I had never watched it.It is one of the most important movies I've ever seen. Brilliant and unmatched.6/5 stars, if I may rate it that
Two thumbs up. In my opinion this movie is exactly what you would expect it to be. Sure it is vulgar, sure there are a lot of explicits throughout the movie and much drug use, but it is what it is. Scott's charachter is coming to grips with his friends death and looking to fit in and rebel where ever he can. It is a dark movie not suited for children, but if this is the type of movie that you enjoy and go into it knowing that it is dark, vulgar and morbid, and that is what you want to see at the moment then you get what you rented. No this is not what teens are like, nor is TX Chainsaw real either, the point is just sit back and either enjoy it or hate it, but I give it 4 out of 5 stars. It is what it is
Classic 70s thriller, one of the decade's best. This movie is yet another of the untold examples for why I'd like to pound the heads of the movie production execs. When is this going to be released on DVD? Okay enough ranting, I'll get to the specifics.A small time hood Macklin (Robert Duvall) is released from prison just in time to find out a couple of killers shot his brother. The bank they robbed was run by the syndicate. Its the classic crime deal gone wrong scenario. When a killer comes after him also, he ruthlessly sets out for revenge with the aid of his friend Cody (Joe Don Baker.)This thriller moves with contiguous action. There aren't any unnecessary scenes. I credit the fast paced direction of John Flynn (who also co-wrote the excellent script.) This was only his third movie as a director, and believe me, this doesn't contain any of the corny stuff found in "Out To Justice."Duvall makes a convincing ruthless thug. Its a scary portrayal. There are solid performances all around from an excellent supporting cast, consisting not only of the aforementioned Joe Don Baker, a gorgeous Sheree North (cameo), in addition to three of Hollywood's late great legendary icons of the classic film noir days: Elisha Cook, Jr. (Maltese Falcon, The Big Sleep, The Gangster, et al); Jane Greer (Out of the Past, The Big Steal); and in his last film appearance, the great Robert Ryan (The Set Up, The Racket, et al).Now if the production companies would stop putting out retarded remakes 60s/70s shows (hello!!!) and give us restored classics like this one our Saturday nite's would always be fly. Criterion, please save us
Great Cult Classic. The first time I saw this film was back in high school, over 20 years ago.  At that time we thought that this was the craziest movie we had ever seen and whoever it was who had written the script and made such an off the wall film was somewhat insane himself.  Yet, we were hysterically laughing throughout the entire film.  Upon watching the movie again, years later, nothing had changed.  I still found myself laughing throughout the entire movie.  It was just as off-beat as before.  It is a great cult classic and I would definitely recommend this film to others
Great Performance. I'm not a big Judy Holliday fan.  She seems to have played the ditzy but smart squeaky-voice role over and over.  This said, Born Yesterday is easily her best movie.  The script is smart and sweet and she and William Holden have a natural, believable screen chemistry.  The performances are excellent as is the Pygmalion like transformation of Holliday's character from mouse to lionness.  A great comedy of manners and morality
Fine film! (too bad about all the Nazis in it...). As another reviewer rightly pointed out, this film is one of the most influential films in cinema history. A masterpiece of editing, cinematography, and all around directing. It is a shame, then, that because of the subject matter - much like the Communism of "Battleship Potemkin" and racism of "Birth of a Nation" - it is another film doomed to always be a taboo, a guilty pleasure for film buffs. I sincerely doubt it's the kind of movie you'd watch with your girlfriend, but as a historical piece it's still recommended.1934: the Nazi party, now in control of Germany, holds a party rally at Nuremburg. Leni Riefenstahl has been hired by Adolf Hitler to film it as a "documentary" to show young Germans. It opens with shots of the clouds, flying over the city of Nuremburg, finally showing Adolf Hitler's plane landing. From then on it is a collection of cheering crowds, Hitler Youth festivals, and military parades...LOTS of military parades. It is, however, a feast for the eyes. Riefenstahl sees to it that every single shot serves a purpose, and that every scene flows together nicely. Some of my personal favorite sequences include: 1) a cat looking down on Hitler's car as it passes; 2) the addressing of the workers; 3) a great bit of cutting in which men  bring their torches together close, and we cut to a firework going off. Most amusing, of course, is the propaganda value of the film. There's a long sequence at the beginning showing the Hitler Youth laughing, playing, eating food and just being young boys. Watching scenes like this makes one almost think, "Wow, it must've been cool to be a Nazi!" This complex, in fact, still exists today, in which people watch documentaries that may have intended or unintended falsehoods and readily believe it.This film is important for three reasons. First, it is obviously a classic that if not respected then should at least be studied in terms of filming. Second, it is an outstanding piece of history, showing a regime that seduced a nation and would eventually move onto its own destruction. Third, it is important to see the Nazis as they wanted to see themselves, and realize HOW they could have seduced a whole nation. Not everything out of Hitler's mouth was "Purge the Jews." As Dr. Anthony Santoro explains in his commentary (which, by the way, is an excellent listen, especially when he points out a few bloopers) Germany had just gone through their own Great Depression and lived under the chaos of the Weimar Republic. This film was meant to show the Germans, "Look at us now: we are united, we are strong - we are better than ever!" Most of all, it was about the faith in the party. Santoro makes the excellent observation that the German army itself is in only about two or three minutes of the film; the rest of the units are paramilitary units under the direct control of the Nazis. The film portrays a united Germany not by the mere power of the German people, but under the leadership and direction of one man: Adolf Hitler.Some people are sensitive about the subject matter, so this film may not be for them. However, if you want to see history, or you're interested in examining the filmmaking...or you're just curious, I would definately suggest watching it.
Deserves far more than 5 stars!!. I've been looking for a DVD like this one for years! I've been dancing Middle Eastern for years, but have always been fascinated by gypsy and flamenco dance. I've bought several videos, some of them better than others, but with one exception (and that DVD only offered a few steps), they don't break down the posture, hand movements, upper body/lower body steps, etc.Lunaris' DVD is completely the opposite! Lunaris breaks down both dances into combinations, which she then carefully breaks down still further, beginning with the absolute basic -- how to get your skirt up to your hand. From there, she explains posture and attitude, separates and explains upper and lower body steps and hand movements, and then demonstrates how to put it all together.On top of this, Lunaris is lovely, and her demeanor and accent are delightful. She provides additional personal commentary on a few steps, too -- for instance, she describes how, in Spain, children learn one hand movement as "picking an apple, eating the apple, throwing the apple away." The DVD is so detailed and careful, I'd happily pay this much for a video that provided just *one* of these dances!I also *love* the way Lunaris explains dance as a language. She teaches the steps as "vocabulary," then suggests that once you know the vocabulary, you can improvise to music.My only complaint with this video -- and it's slight enough, I still wish I could give this DVD a dozen stars! -- is that she faces the viewer and uses terms like "this leg" instead of "right leg."Nevertheless, this DVD is an absolute must-buy if you've ever been intrigued by Spanish dance, whether gypsy or flamenco. It's a fantastic addition for Middle Eastern dancers who would like to add a little flair to their dance. When I'm finished with this review, I'm going to buy both of Lunaris' other videos!
Awesome movie!. This movie has affectionately received the title of "The Lysol Movie" in my house, because it has eliminated 99.9% of unnecessary garbage movies are filled with today.  The swearing is at a low (less than ten times in the whole movie, I think is what I counted) and there is absolutely NO inappropriate jokes, clothing, or ANYTHING.  This is definitely a breath of fresh air!  Almost every movie is being polluted lately, and for my Christian family this movie is so welcomed.The story line is ingenious.  Far fetched, sure, but so is Pirates and everyone loves that.  (I am in no way comparing the two movies, Pirates is completely different, but they do both have storylines based on something real that has been exaggerated)  It is pretty historically correct; Benjamin Franklin really DID write Silence Dogood letters, and the clock tower on the 100 dollar bill really DOES say 2:22!Nicholas Cage does a fantastic job portraying Ben, and Riley is just hilarious.  No matter how many times I've seen this movie, he always cracks me up.This is the best action movie made lately because EVERYONE can watch it.  The little kids don't have to leave at certain parts; sure, it's not perfect, but that's why I call it the Lysol movie
Hey look! A war movie I like!. Like many of the other reviewers, I went into the movie thinking it would be about the horrors of war. But it was much more than that. It was a story about prejudices and how they can exacerbate already terrible situations. It was remarkable to see the interactions between the Chechens and their Russian prisoner. On a human level, they were so similar. In another life, they could have been friends. But in that moment, they were enemies, and no matter how comfortable each were acting, you could tell they never forgot that.The movie started out very slow, but toward the middle it started to pick up. There were some very funny moments. I'm not sure they were supposed to be funny, but I had a good laugh. Overall, not a bad movie, but not for everybody.
Re-animate me. I'm another one of those reviewers who saw this hilarious film in the 80s and fell in love with it. This DVD with it's many bonuses has a special place on my shelf. It never gets dusty there. I consider this a classic spoof that stands the test of time
mean machine. My son, being a hugh soccer fan liked it a lot. I liked the "longest yard" story line
Oh Yeah!!. "Opera" aka Terror At The Opera was the first Argento movie I ever saw.  It was fantastic!  Great storyline, great gore, great Argento style.  This movie flowed, music was all heavy metal- yeah!!  You have to buy the 2-disc version of this film so you will also have the soundtrack.  The soundtrack in this movie is outstanding.  Great murders, great gore, great acting, great everything.  Argento should be very proud of this film
Green Equals Money!. Green infernos wage when you mess with knock off artists. Van Damme plays the 'Most Legitimate Businessman' in this comical farce. His partner is played by Rob Schneider and they sell cheap jeans. After another businessman is killed, Van Damme must find out what the problem is. Of course he solves everything by kicking people left and right and proclaiming, 'we're not criminals, we're innocent!' Van Damme delivers another side-splitting performance that was overlooked by many mortals. But, not this one. Me
Very, very good comedy. As other reviewers have said, Leonard Maltin is absolutely wrong about this film.  The comedy is very tight and well timed.  The dialogue is the wittiest of any movie I've seen from the era.  It does tend a little toward one-liners, but it doesn't matter because it's fall-out-of-your-seat funny.  Ingrid Bergman is divine in a role you would never have expected for her.  The signs of the times are ubiquitous -- references to &quot;the Pill,&quot; &quot;hippies,&quot; &quot;squares,&quot; etc., but the comedy is far from dated.  The best aspect of the film is its unconventional plot.  Romantic comedies are highly predictable as a class -- this one keeps you guessing.  Puts even Neil Simon to shame.  Highest recommendation
I enjoyed the season premeir emensely. I enjoyed this series premier tremendously and am looking forward to watching the rest of the series.  Enterprise started before I had my PVR and was either on at a time I was unable to watch it or I never made time.  I watched one episode of Star Trek the Next Generation yesterday and it peaked my interest in watching some Star Trek episodes again.  Rather than watch episodes I've already seen, Enterprise looks like a great way to enjoy Star Trek episodes.As far as privacy concerns mentioned in other reviews, if you're paranoid, the internet isn't for you.  Keep your private things private, and not on networked computers.  Hopefully Amazon will remove reviews that do not at all pertain to the show they are attached to
Cajun Spice. This colorful and fast moving film from director Jim McBride about an only slightly corrupt cop in the "Big Easy" and the pretty Assistant District Attorney sent to investigate the department is filled with cajun spice and atmosphere. The lines between right and wrong are blurred like a rainy windshield in this lightning paced and very sexy cop film.Dennis Quaid gives a terrific performance as Remy McSwain, a second generation cop who sold out early on in his career, accepting it as the norm but not letting it hinder him from doing his job. When the prim but sexy Ellen Barkin arrives on the scene in the form of D.A. Anne Osborne, he attempts to wine and dine his way out of trouble as the bodies start piling up in an apparent drug war.The charged encounters between Remy and the shy Anne blend seamlessly with some very brutal crime scenes and a lot of New Orleans' music to propel this film at a breezy and very enjoyable pace. When Remy's own corruption is exposed, their relationship becomes more complicated when he tampers with evidence and gets off. But her comment to him that he is no longer one of the 'good guys' causes him to take a serious look at himself. When cops are discovered to be behind all the recent drug trouble, the answers will hit far too close to home.A very unique cop thriller that manages to maintain a light and breezy ambiance throughout, this is one of the most memorable films of its kind. Its spicy flavor goes down easy and makes you crave more. A supporting cast that includes Ned Beatty, John Goodman, and Lisa Jane Persky, offer fine support in this very seductive and one of a kind film you must see.Recent events have added a melancholy tone to this flavorful cop film. One can only hope after rebuilding that a new chapter will be written in the city's storied and colorful history. This excellent film gives a real feel for what makes it what it is. Pick this one up today
Thanks, Mom from Janet. This movie, if nothing else, defines my childhood. Appearing on "The Children's Hour" with Ed Herlihy every Saturday, amid  early morning rehearsals, and all that, I saw this movie at least 20 times! Mom was a real Sinatra fan. There have been so many remakes of what are now considered clsssic songs by Sinatra and gang, but(thanks to Mom) I have the original LP and know a good rendition when I hear it. If ever. Guess you had to be there and experience the movie. I was just 8-years-old at the time and, even at that age, able to figure out that "Pal Joey" was something special. It's fun! It's a lark!! It's an era!!! It's Rogers and Hart!!!
One of Argento's best. Great kills, inventive and stylish sets, lighting, and camera work...what more can you ask for. This is pure Argentoright here. I personally enjoy the ending and think that those who don't like it should watch it again and be a little more open to what Dario crafted. A must have for fans of Argento, Giallo, or thrillers in general.4.5 star
What movie did the other reviewers watch?. Luchino Visconti is a master of the epic, however, his epic style always takes place within a family and always leads downward towards an inevitable doom. His movies tends to remind us of the 'Godfather' but Visconti, dare I say, even gets closer to the marrow of the issues than Coppola does at his best (I am nevertheless, a big fan of 'the Godfather'). To Visconti the finest details of a film are of the utmost importance - you can watch a film like 'Rocco' or the 'Leopard' several times and still miss things. Visconti's cinema is one which reveals itself in every character, in every piece of furniture, in every moment.'Rocco and his Brothers' is if not my favorite Italian film - certainly one of the top ten. To see the brilliant camera work of Giussepe Rotuno combined with Visconti at his peak is simply magnificent. The film itself is extremely radical in structure - slowly revealing itself - focusing sometimes on what appear to be small conversations - but everything is woven to make a perfect whole - wherein the seams are all neat - and though at times are barely hanging together - it always holds as if there is some greater purpose in mind. Visconti reveals much about both the family and their society. One could be bold and comment that the whole film is about fighting to survive (sometimes fighting one another). Life - sometimes- is like a boxing match but the match is sometimes not the one you choose to fight - you are thrown into it and some of the factors working for or against you are money, pride, love, and family
Better of many older submarine thrillers. I was really impressed by this film and I must congratulate Hollywood for presenting the Soviet war machine in such a realistic way. The direction was fine, the actors well chosen, the script very good and Harrison Ford's acting top quality. I think this film was superior to older ones like "The Hunt for Red October" or "Crimson Tide" whose story was rather flat and predictable. The key advantage of the film is the intense psychological charging of the crew's attempts to cool the damaged reactor and the marvellous portrait of traditional Russian self-sacrifice
HORROR,TWISTED,. This movie is not for the weak or for kids. this movie is 200% HORROR.
What about your wife?. A young Czech man named Milos Hrma begins work in a train station in Nazi occupied Czechoslovakia.  His father retired from the same job and is now on paid retirement.  Milos is very pleased to have a job that doesn't require hard work, and his mom is very proud that her son has been given an attractive uniform, the envy of the neighborhood.At the station, the employees are more interested in romance than in work.  There's a lot of sex going on during those slow hours in the night when few trains appear.But our poor hero Milos is not part of the sex play.  He is a virgin, and a very funny and naive one.  There is a beautiful, sweet girl interested in him, but she doesn't know that he is a virgin and she is in for a disappointment during his first attempt.  He's really not ready for her.Meanwhile, his funny co-worker is having a ball.  In one cute scene, the co-worker uses the official German stamp presses to decorate the body of a beautiful girl.  In other words, he puts a few official stamp imprints on her butt and elsewhere.I like one of the characters, a German fool who explains the troop movements in World War Two to the boys on the job.  He describes all of the military setbacks as strategic withdrawals, pretending that his side is winning the war, even as the Allies roll back the German defense in Europe.Near the end of the film, things get a bit political, yet still in a comedic way.  There is a plan to sabotage an ammunition train, to blow up a trainload of German ammunition.  The central characters in the plot are the Czech playboy with the stamper, our poor hero Milos (who is distressed at his inability to make love to a woman, to the point of suicide), and the other boys at the job.A stunning young woman comes by with a bomb.  She represents the Czech underground.  She hears of Milos's problem and decides to take action.  Leave it to a Czech undergrounder to solve the problem.  She makes a happy man of him.As a result, now that he is a man he is more than able to join the resistance to Nazi oppression.The film has a powerful ending.  It is really a wonderful story.The only criticisms I have are that it starts a bit slow for me, not really picking up until the middle chapters, and that it is overly flattering to the Czech population, a bit self serving, as if every Czech male was happy to lay down his life for the chance at fighting the Germans, as if all of the Czechs were as kind and innocent as the characters in this story, without a hint of racial hatred in them.  We know that to be false.Czechoslovakia was caught up in the vicious antisemitism of most of Europe, so the people weren't as kind and funny and adorable as the characters in this film.I almost hear the director saying "This is who we were, we were wonderful, innocent, funny people", and it simply wasn't true.  Europe of the 1930s and 40s was a cesspool of hatred and prejudice, a land that could only be described as hellish and demonic, because the people themselves were that way, partly as a result of economic difficulties.The strength of the movie is in its heart, and in its comedy.One of my favorite moments is when poor Milos, who has already tried to kill himself because he thinks he will never be able to have sex like a normal man, is instructed to find an older woman to help him learn, and he asks a co-worker "What about your wife?"  I could have fallen on the floor laughing.  All he meant was that the man's wife might know someone, but it was so funny.  And to keep the joke going, he later asks another friend "What about your sister?"I happily give this film the highest rating of 5 stars
Certain times I like it, others I don't. How do you separate a socially important film from a great film? Sure this film tackled the AIDS/homosexuality issue head-on but that doesn't automatically make it a great film. I'm not knocking this film, of course not. But there's a lot of parts in it that I didn't like which maybe made it appear to be a lesser film than what it wants to be, it is or what everyone makes it out to be.Andrew Beckett works for a prestigious law firm working on a big account. His health declines a little bit nothing overly serious until he's fired for apparently botching the case. Turns out not only is he a homosexual but he has AIDS so he figures that's why he was fired. He needs representation so he hires Joe Miller, a top and famous attorney who is, rather bluntly, very intolerant of gays. So they form an unlikely duo to battle a top firm while dealing with gay bashers to closet gays.One small nitpick: it seemed like anyone that is in Andy's family or friends circle is against him. There was not a lot of normal everyman citizens who supported him. A similar problem in Brokeback Mountain where any scene with the 2 men was gorgeously shot while them with their wives looked rather bland and desolate looking, complete with sad looking wives. It's nothing that derails the film though. And I don't know why but I never liked Jonathan Demme's trademark of looking in the camera. It works for Silence of the Lambs but here it looks...weird, and maybe a bit too on the nose.Now Tom Hanks did win the award for Best Actor but honestly it should've went to Denzel Washington who manages to be visibly struggling with his less-than-enthusiastic view on gays and the changing perspectives dealing with the case. Hanks, in a way, reminds me of Charlize Theron who put on ugly makeup for Monster. Losing a crapload of weight does not automatically give you an Oscar. No knock against Hanks but it seems funny it went to him instead of Washington.Is it a watchable film? Of course, it's quite good and performances are excellent. I don't know whether you should blind buy it though, that's up to you
the champ in czechoslovakia. this is a charming comedy set against the backdrop of the velvet revolution, wherein a middle-aged musician (reduced to playing for funerals) marries a russian immigrant for money, and subsequently inherits her child when she takes off for a better opportunity. in a movie that could have been cloying, it is consistently fresh and funny, watching the eventual bonding twixt curmudgeon and urchin. maybe its not the type of movie i usually go for -- but i did.
This gave me nightmare's!. Honestly as an adult I should know better,that its all Hollywood,but seriously I didnt sleep for 2 days after watching this. I'll never look at an airport the same ever again..
Probably the Best Drama Series Ever Made. I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out
Transformation of a life -a masterpiece. In short, this movie shows how a man who's succesful and rich but lives in a permanent lie suddenly cracks up -in a very healthy way- and starts from  scratch to re-evaluate his life: his job, his feelings toward his wife, his  father, his lover. The confrontation between the establishment and someone  who just wants to &quot;live&quot; -as he puts it- is brilliantly depicted.  Elia Kazan's genius is very clear here. Very good acting from Kirk Douglas,  Faye Dunaway and Deborah Kerr. I found interesting similarities between  this movie and Peter Weir's Fearless
Lots of funny moments make a great movie. Bill Murray proves that he can direct as well, and a first rate supporting cast (including TV's Monk Tony Shalhoub and Kirkwood Smith from that 70's show).  Jason Robards plays the policeman trying to catch Quade, Murry and Davis who have robbed a bank.The bank job is inspired but every attempt to leave the town end in  a comic riot.  I won't say more since we don't want to give it away.  It is inspired lunacy and very much worth your while.Buy i
Brilliant and Profound  Film. This French film (with subtitles) of a play of the 19th century is excellent. It's hard to describe other than it's about love, integrity, courage, not being a "yesman"  in opposition to the trickery, murder and bad luck (tragedy) of this fallen world. If one doesn't have courage, the other virtues are impossible. I watch it regularly with my children and let this beautiful and uplifting film wash over us. No teenager should grow up without seeing truly this film and Disney's Pinocchio.  I live in Ireland and had to buy it in the U.S. because for some reason the DVD is not available on this side of the pond
Very True to Life. Great movie all around.  Lucas is a little guy with heart.  Maggie (Green) was very pretty and kind.  I relly liked how Cappie (Sheen) stukck up for Lucas and was nice to him.  I feel I can identify with Lucas because I too was a bit of a nerd in high school.  I had my share of troubles with jocks and was disapointed when girls I had a crush on only liked me as a friend or liked someone else.  But Lucas mananaged to gain the one thing by the end of the film that we all yearn for: RESPECT
??????. How can anyone bash this serial?. It was made in 1949. All batfans across the world can thank this type of thing for making the franchise what it is today.Good honest (early) filmaking, a pleasure to own and watch
A Fine Tune  Indeed !!. A great opportunity to see two of the worlds finest Actors toe to toe in this gritty drama about the Army in post war (1945) Britain. Mill's portrayal of Stiff Upper Lip Barrow and Guinness's 'Jock Sinclair' is a masterpiece. The resentment of the two officers to each other grows until the climax of the film.SPOILER BELOWThe most saddest moment is Guinness at the end supported by some his his fellow officers after breaking down following his animated version of the Funeral procession that will take place.
Shirley Valentine. I was very pleased with this motion picture.  The casting and script were well developed and the performance exquisite.  I found Pauling Collins to be a very credible and delightful personality in the story.  I give this rating 5 stars!Thank yo
best horror movie i've seen in a LONG time. Freddy Krueger (Robert Englund) is been dead for years in the Real World and the Dream World. Since Freddy is literally in hell and forgotten in the real world. Freddy has a plan to bring back Crystal Lake serial killer Jason Voorhees (Ken Kirzinger) to life in the real world. Freddy thinks that by bringing Jason back to life to bring fear on Elm Street and making teenagers believe in Freddy again, he can break loose from hell and restart his killing spree.However, now that Jason is a instant killing machine, he isn't willing to step aside, and with a terrified town in the middle, Freddy has to find a way to kill Jason by going in his dreams before Jason takes over Elm Street. A scared teenager (Monica Keena) finds a way to bring Freddy to reality from her dreams, thus pitching Freddy and Jason into a horrific and bloody showdown.This film is directed by Ronny Yu (Bride with White Hair, Bride of Chucky, Formula 51) who made an entertaining Spin-Off to the "A Nightmare on Elm Street" and "Friday the 13th" Series. Robert Englund, who played Freddy Krueger for the 8th time, reprises his role as Freddy, and it seems that he had a blast making this film. Kirzinger replaced Kane Hodder (Hodder originally played Jason in the last four films) and adapts to his new role beautifully. Kirzinger is excellent as the new Jason. Sean S. Cunnigham, who produced and directed the original "Friday the 13th" is back producing this silly but larger than life epic. The film also stars Jason Ritter (Jason's father, the late John Ritter, worked with Yu in Bride of Chucky), Kelly Rowland (R & B singer from the group-Destiny's Child), Lochlyn Murno (Scary Movie), Chris Marquette (The Girl Next Door) and Katherine Isabelle (Ginger Snaps Trilogy).DVD has an sharp anamorphic Widescreen (2.35:1) transfer (also in Pan & Scan) and an superb-Dolby Digital 5.1 Expanded Surround Sound. DVD has an ingraining Commentary Track by the director and actors:Englund and Kirzinger. Disc Two has Deleted Scenes with/without Commentary, Many Behind the Scenes Featurettes, Music Video (Ill Nino- How Can I Live, which in my opinion is worth the price of the DVD), Hidden Features, DVD-ROM Content and more. The film has an strong music score by Greame Revell (The Crow, Dark City, Pitch Black) that pays tribute to the "A Nightmare on Elm Street" and "Friday the 13th". This film ended being a Box Office Smash for the studio New Line Cinema. Extremely entertaining for the Fans of both Freddy and Jason. Watch for New Line topper Robert Shaye (one of the executive producers of the film) as the Principal in a cameo appearance. Great gory fun all the way. (*****/*****).
A true Disney Classic. I have seen this movie many, many times and It still hasn't gotten old. I would love to see this one on a two disc special edition
Sophia Loren is the best. I think this movie is one the best movies that were ever made. I really loved it especially the third part. Sophia was really gorgeous, and I think she is the most beautiful and sexiest woman in the world. The story was really good. It has three different stories. Each one was enjoying to watch, and they were funny and entertaining. I think Sophia can make any movie she appears in very enjoyable. I really enjoyed watching the movie, and I recommend it to everybody to watch.
Love it!. I did this video faithfully for 4 weeks, until my pregnant belly wouldn't let me do push-ups anymore, but my arms improved so much it really was amazing. I can't wait until my baby is born, so that I can do this video, as well as the legs and buns, and the abs video, which I also own. It's so encouraging that I only have to work out 10-15 minutes each time and will be seeing results! It's amazing. I recommend this video very highly. You will need one set of 5-lb weights and one set of 2-3-lb weights, though, just so you know, but it works! Oh, and Denise's voice does not bother me at all - I think she sounds really sweet. I say that because some other reviewers said they didn't like it. Great video
Duh? Communism. Did any of you people know that animal farm can be read on 2 fronts? It is not only about animals. It is also a mock of the russian revolution and a start to communism. If you had every went to school you would know about the Bolsheviks, Leon Trosky, or come on even Joseph Stallin. It was only 50 years ago. I give animal farm 4 stars because it illistrates how much communism sucks. Be glad you r the capitalist u r. We will never become a communism or we wil all die.
a classic story that's worth your attention. As much as I adored the original version of this film with Albert Finney and Aileen Quinn, I am not the type of person who instantly shuns remakes. I love the story of "Annie" and was very excited to see a new version when this first came out in 1999.The 1980's "Annie" flick had a specific passion and energy that pretty much cannot be equalled by anything. But this remake has something special going for it, partly because of what many other reviewers here have indicated: it follows the Broadway musical production much more closely than the undoubtedly fabricated fluff from the original. This movie tells the famous story in a lighthearted and simple fashion without going overboard with the music and dance numbers, and that is one important factor that can reel in younger viewers better this time around.Really, the only thing I didn't particularly love about this film was the acting. Alicia Morton is adorable (you can also catch her all grown up as the middle school "mean girl" in the Lifetime movie "Odd Girl Out"), but she lacks the mental and physical toughness that made Aileen Quinn's performance such a knockout. Morton is too soft-spoken in her role, and she seems to be reciting lines more than she emotes in front of the camera, but for the movie it still works okay. Kathy Bates' performance was arguably one of the biggest mistakes; we all know what kind of character Miss Hannigan is, and Bates portrayed her as a relatively nice woman whose biggest problem with the little orphans seemed to be just getting a little annoyed with them from time to time. Victor Garber is a terrific actor, and I enjoyed him in this movie, but he didn't show Oliver Warbucks' typical transition from gruffness to having his heart melted by little Annie. The woman in the role of Grace Farrell probably did the best job; she was kind, sensitive, and just loved Annie--her performance was right on target.In this film's defense, maybe their reason for toning down the demeanors of some of these main characters was to keep it a light, easy and enjoyable movie for children. In that sense, I think kids will like it better than the original because it just tells the story from Annie's viewpoint and keeps a youthful, innocent glow to it. So, even if you are very loyal to the original, this is certainly something worth examining with an open mind--if nothing else, you get a sweet, classic story in a fresh new perspective
Somber, Subdued And Well-Done Serial Killer Movie. Here's an oddity: a modern-day film about a serial killer that has no fight scenes, nobody seen dying, no car chases and no loud noises.....and it takes place in Russia. There are only two short action scenes but they are horrific.The rest of the story is detective work, and how much red tape the poor detective had to go through to solve the murders. This is a very somber movie, and "somber" best describes the personality of the hero (Stephen Rea), as well. Yet, the story is not depressing and it's very interesting all the way through.Rea is outstanding as the determined, harried-looked detective. Jeffrey DeMunn is downright scary as the killer. Donald Sutherland's Russian accent is suspect but he plays the only character in this film that has some warmth.Once again, the story is dotted with liberal agendas (i.e. not one but two references to bias against gays, the total validity of secular psychology, police and government officials being boorish/crude/bigoted, yadda, yadda, yadda.)Otherwise, it's an intelligent and refreshingly low-key crime film. This is a somewhat unique film that probably is not well-known but is well-liked by the people who have seen it. Since it's based on a true-life account of this killer, it's all the more chilling. Don't pass this by just because you haven't anything about it.
You bring me peace in a time of war... Okay, "Philadelphia" what can be said about it ?When i first seen it... I was moved and it made me think-- while watching the opera scene & Tom's funeral and seeing him as a child  ( not only those both scenes made the movie) but made me think about "god, he looked so innocent & happy" and how scary it is to grow up in a world so cold & unkind. Also the opera scene gave me goosebumps as Tom hank explain what the arist was talking about...How beautifull and emotional was watching Denzels reaction. Neil young's "philadelphia" is possibly one of the most beautifull song i've ever heard & it realy brought me peace. If you decide to rent "philadelphia" ? Think about what i said and also how truly beautifull Antonio & Hanks relationship was with so much love and how sad was for Antonio "Miguel" knowing that his bestfriend, lover and companion could die at any moment. ::sigh:: Just watch it
True love. There are many nice scenes an dialoques in An affair to remember. The screenplay renders perfectly the true love.The story is very romantic.Nicky and Terry met on a cruise and fell so madly in love with each other.They had to go separate ways, but decided to meet again after 6 months to see if they are still in love.They didn't meet then because of tragic circumstances. But they met later and noticed that their love is very true. There is also that beautiful opening song by Vic Damone.
FAVORITE EPISODE. IT WAS ONE OF MY FAVORITE EPISODES A WAY TO GET BUFFY AND ANGEL TOGETHER WITHOUT CHANGING THE STORYLINE. AND THE CHARACTERS WHERE ABLE TO EXPRESS HOW THEY FELT TO EACH OTHER
Great Series Entry. Friday the 13th Part 2 is definitely a worthy sequel and a very good debut of the modern monster Jason Voorhees. Even though Jason has yet to wear his infamous hockey mask, he still comes off as very creepy, kind of like a crazy hillbilly. In reality, his look was based on the killer on the movie "The Town that Dreaded Sundown", which is another really cool movie if you haven't seen it.The acting in the movie is about what you would expect from the genre, which isn't that bad actually. The acting isn't important; it is all about the gore and how the kids are killed. The story itself is really cool and explains that in fact, Jason didn't drown, but actually survived and has been living in the forests for all of the years he has been presumed dead. You can see a difference in this Jason later in the series, in this movie, Jason actually is afraid of Jenny with the chainsaw coming after him. In later movies, he wouldn't even bother to move. Overall, this is a really cool movie for fans and a great introduction to the Jason we have come to know and love-without the mask.
See How Good A Movie Can Be?. Since the storylines of this fourteen-year-old film must surely be well-known, let me say that The Piano, one of my favorite movies, is a unique production whose makers went out of their way to truly give it the appearance of the mid-nineteenth-century. It strolls forward with an anti-modern slowness in order to accentuate the unspoiled scenery of New Zealand, and successfully bring certain moments to prominence with a pace that matches that of the pre-electronic era in which it is set. The quality of the visuals is heightened by the performances given by Holly Hunter, Sam Neill, Harvey Keitel, and most especially Anna Paquin, whose skillful portrayal here won her an Oscar at the tender age of eleven. The plot of The Piano is highly unusual, even unique. For filmmakers to have accomplished the release of a tale concerning a woman of the 1800's, who went from Scotland to the most remote of British colonies in order to marry a stranger, for this woman to be one whose self-imposed muteness is compensated by her lovely playing of a piano...I'm daunted by the courage of those who brought The Piano into reality. For the wealth of feeling in its story, for its setting, for its cast and for its sheer brave inimitability, it is a fine motion picture
Love the new download!. I wanted it for my collection, however you can sift through all the youtube stuff and end up with the same video for free if you want to do the work
One of my 10 favorite films. There were 96 reviews of Aguirre at the time I wrote this one. Here is mine. Werner Herzog presents a minimalist and completely awe inspiring film of a Pizarro like adventurer and their disasteroustrip down the Amazon. Shot on location at a fog shrouded Machu Picchu. One sees only the jungle and the exposure in the begining as the party lead by Aguirre decends into the jungle below. They are soon swallowed and slowly die from everything including the river to the indians. The film is completely raw and the locations props and indians completely real. The etheral film score carries it along like a dream. Klaus Kinski is perfect as the beligerent, and foolish leader of the small party
Love and Romance. This film is a must for a collector. Brilliant acting by all and the music/theme is wonderful. I would recommend this as a "chic's flick"
When films knew how to be cool. This film is a cat's cradle of relationships in which some strings touch and others don't. Jeanne Moreau's Florence is never seen with her lover Julien, played by Maurice Ronet, except in photographs at the very end. A German couple on holiday crosses paths with two reckless teenage lovers and end up dead. Although this film, directed by a 24-year-old Louis Malle, is generally considered a precursor to the French New Wave, it has all the elements, in particular a mysterious, emotionally tortured femme fatale played with quiet elegance by Jeanne Moreau. Her penetrating eyes are haunting as she walks through the rain searching for her lover. She has one of those faces you either adore or are annoyed by. I go back and forth myself. But my own opinion of this film is that Malle was showing off his tremendous talent just a bit too much and it comes across sometimes that he's trying too hard to be cool. But most of the time his film really is cool. And it's nice to be reminded how cool a film can be
Newman in a great role. Paul Newman plays a Boston lawyer on the skids with alcohol who takes on a negligence case against two prominent doctors and a hospital run by the Boston Archdiocese. It's a sort of do-or-die case for Newman, and it goes pretty badly against him, until he is able to get the help of one of the nurses who was in the operating room when the negligence took place. It's pretty much a one-man show for Newman, and he does a bang-up job. We can see into his character thoroughly, and it's not all goody-goody idealism: after he's turned down a $210,000 "payoff" (out-of-court settlement) thinking he has a chance to win, and then his chief witness is bought off, we see him try desperately to get the settlement money back. The trial is pure Hollywood, with the judge, too, against him, and Newman winning the jury over with a plea for compassion and doing right. Jack Warden does a good job as Newman's senior partner and mentor, as does James Mason as the suave and wily defense lawyer. But Charlotte Rampling is a total non-entity as the double-dealing woman who falls in the sack with Newman. There's much hokum and predictability here, but Newman is so good he makes the movie hum. Definitely worth a watch
A good Idea how Heaven  looks Like !. But i don't beleave in re-encarnation..
Way to Go Amazon!  Very cool. Just got done watching the show and it was awesome. Of course I had to download the tool, how else do you get started? Once it downloaded it worked very well and the video was right there to watch when I was ready. Note to self get cable, DSL is a slow download but it worked great and the picture quality was awesome. No commercials!I didn't have any troubles installing it on my computer and the help tool walked me through it.
FBI misses chance. Hey it's really sweet where the fbi girl gets her chance to do that thing with the black guy but come on, really, if the sexes were turned wouldn't the agent be expected to do "something else" first
The Total Remake of "The Private War of Major Benson". Dear Reader,It is true I was in training to be a film-maker of some portent...Yes, I was properly versed in the International  Film Art scene, Avante-Garde and Film- Noir...I have been exposed to "Potemkin", "400 Hundred Blows", "The Bicycle Thief", "Day for Night", etc... but.......Again let me indulge you in another one of my film "guilty pleasures"...."Major Payne"...Yes, it is a remake of 1955, "The Private War Of Major Benson" but it's as opposite as the two Kirks in TOS, "Mirror, Mirror".....The 1955 movie definetely has a feel of "gosh, golly, and swell".....Although "good" for it's time it generally has the "sickly sweet" feeling thoughout."Major Payne" takes a completely 180 degree turn....That's right, the 1995 Major (Damon Wayans) is not a boisterous, chauvanistic, drunk....No Siree, Bob!  Major Winifred Benson Payne is  a 100% killing machine...Out of his own platoon he not only captures the head "bad guy" but the bad guy's entire army! When one of his platoon mates is shot in the leg, the  Major has a very "sick" solution to "Getting your mind off a that pain?" This Major is a "human terminator"; Great example is his story telling version of  "The Little Train that Could"...I would go into detail but I won't as the children reading this  may acquire horribly scarred pysche's...The children in the movie are not the cute, innocent, gum chewers of 1955 but can be equally venomous and dangerous as the Major as seen in their exploits of getting rid of the Major....C'mon what kinda of kid tries to photograph a boy dressed up as a girl pretending to be sleeping with their ROTC instructor....PRETTY DEMENTED KIDS!!!!Yes, this movie goes way overboard on the Major's character (live ammo on the training grounds) and the children's character (payola to the local town motorcycle gang leader) but at least it has the guts to come forth and tell us just how hard it is to teach today's kids!!!!!But, seriously folks, let your hair down and have a good hard laugh....Check out "Major Payne"....P.S. Seeing the partial parody of "Apocolypse Now" at the beginning well worth seeing this movie!Vulcan863
A Lost Gem from Carpenter. John Carpenter's "In the Mouth of Madness" is one of his older films and many people have never heard of it. Too bad, really, since this is one of his better movies. Once the slimy monsters show up, I think it lost a little bit of it's effect but other than that...It's pretty solid. The movie opens in an asylum, where a man is being thrown into a padded room as he insists that he's not insane. Minutes later, a man shows up and tells the insane man that he's here to get him out...He doesn't believe the insane man is insane either. Then the movie flashes back so we can see how the insane man wound up there. Sam Neill ('Jurassic Park') plays John Trent, an insurance claims investigator who is quite good at his job. While sitting at a diner, an axe wielding man asks him "Do you read Sutter Cane?" right as he tries to kill him. Sutter Cane is a world renowned horror author, who sells billions of books and is more popular than Stephen King. Problem is, his books affect many people...Drive them to do insane things. Trent is hired by Cane's publishers to track him down, but Trent doesn't believe it. After buying some of Cane's books, he discovers a map hidden in the covers that leads to a town no one knows about called Hobbs End. With Cane's editor, Styles, in tow Trent sets out to the mysterious town. When he gets there, he'll wind up straddling a fine line between fiction and reality. The movie is actually pretty smart...As I said, they should've ditched the slimy monsters...But, the movie 'It' should have ditched the giant spider. Everything that happens, technically, makes sense...There are no plot holes or anything. Neill turns in a surprisingly strong performance. This movie isn't as creepy as say..."Halloween" but it's entertaining. If you like John Carpenter, then you should like this movie. Also, look for appearances by a very young Anakin Skywalker (Hayden Christensen) and that kid from Transamerica & Air Bud (Kevin Zegers).GRADE: A-
test of time. This movie is still quite fresh and very tense. Stands tall among the current slasher trend
Tender Mercies. Excellent movie, Mr. Duvall did his own singing in the film an love the song Over you that was played in it.
The best movie in the world. This was the best movie I have ever seen.  But I hated the end, it depressed me for days, because I wanted them to be together.  It is still my favorite movie.  Cuba Gooding Jr. is the sexiest man, he is a very good  actor.  And Moira Kelly is a good actress.  You can tell they are because  you could feel the love between the two characters and they didn't even  have to say I love you.  I really wish the end had been different.  I  wanted them to make love so bad.  He should have escaped with her or they  should have found a cure and then they could have lived happily ever after  and had a baby.  And I hated when Willie died. The end of that movie made  me so mad.  I don't see how she could go on without him.  They should have  made love, no matter what.  They were very good together.  They should do  another movie together. I love that movie so much but when I watch it ( I  have the video) it leaves me depressed for days. But it's still the best
My Favorite Episode. I don't have television, haven't for 11 years. When I learned CBS was allowing free viewing over the internet I checked it out and started watching episodes of CSI, CSI NY, CSI Miami, and NCIS. I found NCIS to be my favorite and this particular show Dead And Unburied is my favorite so far. I enjoy the light-heartedness of NCIS. So I decided to download this episode from Amazon Unbox.I really wish Amazon Unbox would allow me to burn shows I've purchased. As it is they are restricted to viewing on my computer. When Unbox expands this service to allow me to burn DVDs I will likely purchase many more shows this way. I like selecting individual shows
When the past becomes the future... A unique library of old and modern photographs are put under threat when the building they are housed in is suddenly sold.  The new owner of the property, Liam Cunningham played by the able Christopher Anderson, has no interest in the photos and doesn't care what happens to them.  In fact most of the photos will be destroyed with the crme de la crme of the collection being sold on.  All Liam is interested in is renovating the building and making a hefty profit for the business he represents.However the library's many eccentric employees won't give up without a fight and from then on a war of wits and determination is played out among a wonderful array of black and white photographs that represent the past, the present and even the future.The characters in this film are truly delightful, especially Timothy Spall who plays the oddball Oswald Bates, a man with a memory for faces so attuned that he can see resemblances between a person he has only seen once and those whose pictures are imprinted upon photographic paper.However the battle to save the collection seems doomed, with every attempt the Library staff makes being thwarted but fate has something wonderful in store for Liam Cunningham and it is this wonderful twist in the story that ultimately will save the collection for future generations.This is a fabulous film, originally a three part series for the BBC in the late 1990s I think it would have been a success if it had been released in Art House Cinemas all over the World.A final pointer, watch (and listen) out for the superb Lindsay Duncan who plays the diminutive Marilyn Truman, the Head Librarian in the story, she has the most amazing voice and when telling Liam Cunningham stories around certain photographs, she captivates her audience to the point that you think that you are in the same room as her and Liam.A good musical score, a sound cast, wonderful photography and camera work, "Shooting the Past" is a classic of a film that Stephen Poliakoff has every reason to be proud off.  Look out for Poliakoff's other masterpiece, "The Lost Prince" both are worth having in your DVD/video collection
i so loved this movie so much!. This movie is so comforting to me.Its sweet, funny and def. gives you a message.No matter how green the grass may seem (A  man that has a lot on his plate: Kevin Bacon is on the verge of a affair with a pretty young woman) it's not always.moral of the story is you need to go with your heart.He realized at the end that his wife and baby on the way meant more to him that reconnecting with his "single self"I absolutely love this movie.love the music, love the actors, love the scenes where bacon and his wife are trying to have a baby. too funny!:)
Good Spy Story. If you have ever worked for a government bureaucracy and you keep up with history and current evets, this movie will bear out greater believeability than the more popular blockbuster spy movies.  Got to be watching it for the story itself, though ( there are NO massive explosions, intense car chases, hot sex scenes, etc.
Informative. Nice little video for my Zen during my long wait at the doctor's office.  Confucius overcame many difficulties
Dated? Sure.  Boring?  No way!. I watched this with my 6 year old daughter last night.  She was into it (with her short attention span) for the whole film.  One pleasant surprise...it has a pretty good chase scene.  I like chase scenes.    Any SF fan will welcome this in his/her collection.A few good comic shots.  Watch Richard Benjamin struggle to get into the saddle during the Jail break.
EARLY KUROSAWA: FORETELLS HIS CINEMATIC TALENT. This early Akira Kurosawa film is outstanding. What captivated me about this early Kurosawa film was the way in which he allows us to see post-war Japan. It is truly remarkable that we are seeing the streets that just a few years before were being laid to waste by massive bombings.The character played by Toshiro Mifune is also a great glimpse into what will become one of the greatest actors ever to come out of Japan. And there is the presence of my favorite Japanese actor, Takashi Shimura.And with Shimura guiding the young Mifune through the maze of police work, and suggestions on how to proceed with his obsession in finding his missing, stolen handgun: we see a wonderful study in character development in this early Kurosawa classic.Criterion did a wonderful transfer with this film. This is a truly great classic. Just looking at post-war Japan itself is a cinematic masterpiece. Highly recommended.
End of Evangelion is a must... You can do without Death & Rebirth if you own the series.  The End of Evangelion is the ending the series, in many ways, needed to have: while the original ending was adequate, Evangelion was never just a story about Shinji and, with all the talk about Adam and Third Impact, it needed something bigger than complete introspection.  That said, both this "film" ending and the one occuring in the series do compliment each other and aren't entirely at odds.  The difference between Third Impact and Human Instrumentality isn't quite so clear...as maybe it shouldn't be.  Nonetheless, we get both.  Oh, and Asuka gets a finale worthy of her character.  I rate End of Evangelion a 5 star flick;  Death & Rebirth, basically the entire series edited into an hour with the idea that Asuka, Shinji, and Rei are "performing/dreaming" this collectively, is beside the point.  Still, if you want a proper ending to Evangelion, The End is a must own
The Frontier Mentality. I saw this movie last year and came away wondering what all of the praise was for.  I enjoyed a lot of it but I kept asking myself "Whose paying the bill?".  I tend to get a bit too pragmatic at times and that has ruined a number of movies for me over the years.  I suppose that I should just accept that idea that whatever government these guys were working for was footing the bill.  However, watching these guys risks their lives and planes daily to cross the mountains with somebody else's mail...I didn't get it.  That aside, it is a pretty good movie.  Cary Grant is the ultimate man with a mission.  He runs the operation and seems devoid of emotion.  He somehow manages to ignore Jean Arthur (why is she in this movie?) but deserves an Academy Award for ignoring Rita Hayworth.  There's plenty of other types of action, though.  These flyers live by a code and refuse to say "Can't be done".  All this brings me back to the question of why.  (Also the question of how did the guy get up to the mountain-top lookout post).  I guess my need for a purpose left me missing the point about men who needed no purpose other than a barely acheivable challenge.
Hilarious Cary Grant. This is one of Cary Grant's most hilarious films - and certainly a classic.He is a riot here trying to hold his unstable "family" together. Arsenic poison deliberately flows like water in their house and innocent men are being killed. There is even a makeshift grave in their basement! It is up to Cary to put an end to the madness - this is where hilarity ensues."Chargeeeeeeeeeeeeeee"
I dust my lemon lies with powder pink and sweet. This is an awesome video.If you like The Cure, you will love this video. It is full of classic Cure songs and is lovely to watch. If you get a chance to get this video, or even just view it once (it is out of print) TAKE IT
This is one of the saddest, most painful films I've ever seen. I thought I had it bad on the set of my little student film in college.Whew!Watching this documentary was very difficult and very interesting at the same time. I enjoyed it, despite the tragedy that played out on the screen.What makes the film so heartbreaking is that you know that the film will inevitably fail. So the entire movie-watching experience is steeped in dramatic irony. We, the viewers, know the outcome of this ill-fated film project known as "The Man Who Killed Don Quixote." But the filmmakers themselves, at the time of the filming, obviously do not know that all their actions are essentially in vain.A great film, and a powerful warning to those who thinking making movies is easy
Harvey=Hilarious. James Stewart in a roll that is anything but Vertigo. Here Mr. Stewart plays Elwood P. Dowd a likeable fellow who's only problem is his friend Harvey, a 6 foot 3 1/2in. rabbit that only he can see (much to his sister Veta Louise* chagrin). A great film for the entire family as Dowd, and Harvey teach us all a little about kindness and friendship.*Josephine Hull (Aresenic and Old Lace) won a 1960 Best Supporting Actress Acadamy Award for her role as Veta Louise Dowd.
An entertaining ride. A road movie for the fairer sex, "Boys on the Side" is helped immeasurably by the performances of Mary-Louise Parker, Drew Barrymore, and Whoopi Goldberg. The latter plays a lesbian nightclub singer (!) who agrees to share the wheel with repressed, straight-laced Parker on a trip to San Diego. Following a serious misadventure with her drug pusher boyfriend, the still pixy-ish  Barrymore joins the journey."Boys on the Side" is as contrived as a soap opera with each character facing a personal crisis, but the three stars are so good, it's easy to overlook the frequently smarmy plot developments and enjoy the performances. Parker is particularly good, especially when she unwinds by lip-synching to Elvis Presley's "Jailhouse Rock." The soundtrack is nicely compiled, too, and features performances by the likes of Sarah McLachlan, Bonnie Raitt, The Indigo Girls, and Annie Lennox.Brian W. Fairbanks
Informative. Nice little video for my Zen during my long wait at the doctor's office.  Confucius overcame many difficulties
Where The Boys Are (1960). Sister #2: I was about eight years old when the entire family went to see Where the Boys Are.  It was so much fun watching the adventures of college girls and thinking one day, when I grew and became a teenager, these things might happen to me.Dolores Hart was so lovely and earthy as Merritt.  Paula Prentiss was so funny as Tuggle.  Yvette Mimieux was so gracefully fawn-like and, because of her meltdown scene in the film, amongst my sisters and I, her character, Melanie, was always thereafter referred to as "the girl who walked out in the street."  Of course, Connie Francis' belting and heart-felt rendition of the title song was the icing on the cake for his dessert of a film.
Better than 34th Street. I love this movie. Every year there is a 24-hour marathon on the television of this film and my family and I watch it at least ten times. It truly never gets old with us as the characters are authentic and full of good humor. It is hysterically funny at times, especially when the father receives the leg lamp in the mail and pronounces the word stamped on the box "fragile" as "fra-gee-lay; huh, must be Italian". Ralphie and his family make my family's holiday a lot brighter and we all look forward to watching this movie every year.
Classically Funny!. You will love this film. It is like a real life spy V spy! Good movie for a good price
Missed out in Washington. I missed the last few episodes of this series as I had to travel out of state. Now I have to buy the series to find out what happened. Thoroughly engrossing. I hope there are more episodes in production
Needs Avatar the last airbender. Okay you guys have amazing, cool, and sweet videos on Amazon. My favorite though is Avatar and I have bought every single episode you have so far. Your episode downloads are magnificent to see on my creative zen vision: M.I had a quick tip though: Can you get more Avatar the Last Airbender Digital downloads. Please!
Ginger Takes Center Stage (DVD Review). In this eighth installment of Fred & Ginger films, Ginger displays her talents not only as a dancer but also as an actress and a singer. She performs all three simultaneously in The Yam. She causes mischief while under the hypnotic influence of Tony Flagg (Fred Astaire), throwing sticks and dinner rolls, breaking glass, driving erratically, and shooting skeet. The psychiatry is definitely unconventional, but it is a comedy after all. The slow motion dancing in the dream sequence is very smooth and kind of cool. A running joke where Aunt Cora (Luella Gear) keeps telling Judge Joe Travers (Clarence Kolb) to sit down adds a couple of more laughs. Typecasting prevails here; look for Hattie McDaniel (Gone with the Wind) playing a maid here, too.In the vintage short "Public Jitterbug No. 1" a group of "Feds" is out to catch Jitterbug Dancer #1. The tap dancing is superb. The cigarette and match-eating routine is a neat trick. (1939 Run Time 19:01)In the WB cartoon "September in the Rain" the labels of packaged goods in a general store come to life and perform. A written preface comments on how racist it is. However, the stereotyping did not bother me, and I would not have even noticed if they did not point it out. Nevertheless, I am glad they were sensitive about it. (1937 Run Time 4:39)Note: No featurette, running commentary, or theatrical trailer is on this DVD, which is why I gave it four stars instead of five
Gimmie Shelter - The Stones in their Golden Era. A fantastic behind-the-scenes rockumentary of the Rolling Stones during their peak in the early 70's. Very highly recommended for any Stones Fan. The commentary is fun and the rare live performance clips are great! Go Keef & Co.While, in my opinion, "Ladies & Gentleman... The Rolling Stones" contains the the ultimte concert footage of the Stones during this period of their career - it's not commercially available. This is. Gimmie Shelter is simply the best performance of Glimmer Twins & Company that you can get at your hands on. Buy it today.I bought this product from Amazon.com and I suggest that you do the same if you love the Stones and this sort of stuff. Trust me. You will not be disappointed.
Kind of BLUE...Kind of Great...CLASSIC. Dexter Gordon's virtuoso performance as archetypal saxman Dale Turner is a wonder to hear and see.The blood is on the tracks(and  reeds)in this inspired Jazz tableau by director Bertrand Tavernier. ROUND MIDNIGHT sounds few false notes coda-fying the last hurrah for jazz legends of the ilk of Lester Young,Bud Powell and Charlie Parker.Often times,Clint Eastwood's,BIRD evokes"Hollywood" wearing its soul on its sleeve. Not so,RM.If it's "kind of blue" ambience occasionally "sticks" in the craw/groove...like an old 33/3rd with too many trips to the EM "outhouse";jail;or vin rouge bench cafe...c'est tout! There's no Barbara Streisand(PEOPLE who need PEOPLE!)or Michael Moore pseudo-ette to bail it out. The film declares wounded soul like a Jazz Angelus: human warts;dreg boredom-ennui;and musical ephiphany-lightning comprised.Herbie Hancock's score is unostentatiously superb. The battle-array of "side men" is peerless and legendary in its own right. Technical ambience of the film is startling menage of art film; home movie; bums'travelogue; existential sermon and spectacular jazz ensemble,cafe-house concert footage. Sax solos by Dexter Gordon are sad;sharp;hip and utterly convincing as art and spirit-renewing "entertainment". The film will move you and reward you if you let it.It does not"lip-synch"suck-up,or gloss what is cheap,rank or pathetic about a world that usually honors and pays the wrong people and breaks the best while doing so. ROUND MIDNIGHT celebrates hard-won glory of genius creators.This film is jazz'ROAD NOT TAKEN. It's a classic that allows viewers brief,safe,sojourn-amble down the usually very rutted;lonely; uncertain-or-appreciated,sometimes dangerous,path of the artist hero who is "human all too human"...
Didn't know what to expect - very impressed... V for Vendetta was already out on DVD before I finally saw it. My college roommates told me that it was a great movie, so I finally went to blockbuster and rented a copy. The next day I returned the copy and went to Best Buy and bought my own copy of the movie, it was that good.V for Vendetta takes place in the not so distant future in England, where the residents have a curfew that they need to follow if they don't want to be arrested, dirty cops and policemen hand out their own cruel form of justice, and where our female hero Evey [payed by Natlie Portman] lives. After being cornered by several dirty cops Evey is rescued by the charismatic, fast talking, highly intelligent masked man simply named, V.V is a man of many words, and he explains in the movie that he is tired of the "big brother" style of living that everyone has to endure. Although the government controls the entire city V is upset that the population is not fighting back and taking back their own lives. He explains he is a one man crusade to Evey as he blows up the Old Bailey building to opera music as he laughs uncontrollably at one point.This is a movie anyone will like, except you probably wouldn't want the kids watching because of the violence and language. V is a guy you will totally like because he is charming to the ladies, cool to hang out with and watch movies [his favorite is the Count of Monte Cristo] and also is one tough son of a bitch who uses knives and martial arts to take out his enemies.Evey is also great to see in this movie. She is the daughter of political activists who were killed after speaking too loud against government corruption. She also literally got her head shaved in one of the scenes in the movie! Natalie Portman was great.The movie is awesome to watch. It is fast paced and exciting in a lot of scenes. From V taking over the tv station in England and talking on every single tv screen in the city as he fights the government, to Evey getting caught by the government and sitting in a cell for several months with a shocking ending. Great movie to see.The extras include:"Freedom Forever!" The making of V for Vendetta"Designing the Near Future" The artistic look at making V for Vendetta"Remember Remember" The look at the man named Guy FawkesEaster Egg! A Saturday Night Live digital shortPlus more!
" the King of Serials on DVD...VCI Entertainment ~ Jack Armstrong (1947)". VCI Entertainment and Columbia Pictures present "Jack Armstrong the All-American Boy" (1947) (Dolby digitally remastered), adapted from the radio feature15 Chapters of vintage serial episodes loaded with action sequences...story line involves one of the most popular radio show dramas on the airwaves adapted to the big screen in a serial with episodes keeping you guessing all the way through all 15 Chapters...Columbia keeps this serial in tune, right down the line with the original radio serials formula and it works... Armstrong, who we all know is the "All-American Boy" has his hands full battling the no good and rotten to the core Dr.Jason Grood...is it possible there may be a death ray orbiting Earth aboard Grood's spacecraft....what advenures lie ahead for Jack, Betty and Billy Fairfield with the help of  Uncle Jim (James Fairfield)  owner of an aircraft company...can this very intelligent and outstanding athlete in high school foil the plans of all the henchman Jack Ingram, Eddie Parker, Terry Frost and mastermind bossman Charles Middleton who has to be the meanest man on the planet....all we need now is a full signed confession from this group of evildoers or will there trouble afoot...and who is Vic Hardy really?...keep that thought as each chapter is more exciting than the previous one...return next week to this local theater for another episode of action and adventure that will keep you thrilled until the next chapter.Under director Wallace W. Fox, producer Sam Katzman, associate producer Melville De Lay,  story treatment by George H. Plympton, with original screenplay by Lewis Clay, Arthur Hoerl, Royal K. Cole and Leslie Swabacker, music score by Lee Zahler...the cast include John Hart (Jack Armstrong), Rosemary La Planche (Betty Fairfield), Joe Brown Jr (Billy Fairfield), Claire James (Princess Alura), Pierre Watkins (Uncle Jim Fairfield), Wheeler Oakman (Prof. Hobart Zorn), Jack Ingram (Blair, chief henchman), Eddie Parker (Slade - henchman), John Merton (Gregory Pierce), Charles Middleton (Dr. Jason Grood), Terry Frost (Jackman - henchman), George DeNormand (Traffic Cop), Hugh Prosser (Vic Hardy) and Knox Manning (Narrator-voice) ...special behind the scenes note that actor John Hart was the perfect choice for radio-comic strip hero Jack Armstrong in the 1947 Columbia Serial...Hart also was called upon in 1952 to play the "Masked Man" in 52 episodes for "The Lone Ranger" television series...television again called upon Hart to star in James Fenimore Cooper's "Last of the Mohicans", his role this time was "Hawkeye"...not a bad resume when you remember Hart's beginnings was acting on the stage of the renowned Pasadena Playhouse as a young man before turning to pictures and television...now back to the feature at hand  Columbia Pictures stuntwork is always good till the last drop and this serial is no exception...there is a great deal of entertainment here for the cliffhanger fans out there...all courtesy of VCI Entertainment, who in my humble opinion is the best there is in restoring early serials and features.CHAPTER TITLES: (Disc One)1.  Mystery of the Cosmic Ray2.  The Far World3.  Island of Desception4.  Into the Chasm5.  The Space Ship6.  Tunnels of Treachery7.  Cavern of Chance8.  The Secret Room9.  Human TargetsBIOS: (Disc One)1. John HartBirth Date: 12/13/1917 - Los Angeles, CACurrently Living2. Rosemary La PlancheBirth Date: 10/11/1923 - Los Angeles, CADied: 5/06/1979 - Glendale, CA3. Wallace W. Fox (Director)Birth Date: 3/09/1895 - Purcell, OKDied: 6/30/1958 - Hollywood, CACHAPTER TITLES: (Disc Two)11.Battle of the Warriors11.Cosmic Annihilator12.The Gortto of Greed13.Wheels of Fate14.Journey Into Space15.RestributionSPECIAL FEATURES: (Disc Two)VCI CLIFFHANGER TRAILERS:1. Buck Rogers (Buster Crabbe)2. Adventures of the Flying Cadets (Bobby Jordan)3. Drums of Fu Manchu (Henry Brandon)4. Jungle Girl (Frances Gifford)5. The Phantom (Tom Tyler)6. Zane Greys "King of the Royal Mounted" (Allan "Rocky" Lane)7. Secret Agent X-9 (1945) (Lloyd Bridges & Keye Luke)8. Adventures of Red Ryder (Don "Red" Barry)9. Secret Agent X-9 (1937) (Scott Kolk & Henry Brandon)10.Zorro's Cliffhanger Collection (Reed Hadley, John Carroll & Linda Stirling)11.Dick Tracy's G-Men (Ralph Byrd)12.Flash Gordon Conquers the Universe (Buster Crabbe)13.Jungle Jim (Grant Withers & Raymond Hatton)14.Miracle Rider (Tom Mix & Tony Jr)If you crave action, drama and plenty of adventure then this is the place for all of the above...check out another release from VCI Entertainment and Columbia Pictures present "Captain Video: Master of the Stratosphere" (1951) (digitally remastered), 15 Chapters.finally for the first time on video the really great Columbia Serial that broke the mold...we have everything a serial fan would want...the tinted sequences by Cinecolor and unique inventions that were unlike any other serial out there in the '50s...get out there as they're going fast, this is the one you've been waiting for.Great job by VCI Entertainment for releasing "Jack Armstrong the All-American Boy" (1947), the digital transfere with a clean, clear and crisp print...looking forward to more high quality releases from the vintage serial era of the '30s, '40s & '50s...order your copy now from Amazon or VCI Entertainment, stay tuned once again for top notch action mixed with deadly adventure from the "King of Serials" VCI...just the way we like 'em!Total Time: 270 mins on 2 DVD's ~ VCI Entertainment 8323 ~ (4/27/2004)
HG WELLS. This is an amazing service! For only 2 bucks i can watch what i like for the moment. In this case it was HG WELLS. Great biography
A STRANGE AND QUIRKY DARK COMEDY. First of all, "Motorama" is not for everyone. Most people view the film negatively. And that's all right, because the film isn't for everyone. Is it a masterpiece of comedy? No. Is the acting terrific? No. Is there a plot? No. And that's fine with me. Once in awhile I like these quirky little comedies. [i.e. "The Vagrant" comes to mind.] This strange surrealistic and dark comedy stars young ten-year-old Gus (Jordan Christopher Michael) And he's about to rev up the engine of his Dad's Mustang and take off on one hell of a journey.Gus is trying to win a game: MOTORAMA. If you collect all of the letters to the game a 500 million dollar cash prize awaits you. Problem is everybody gave up on the game long ago, since no one ever won the money. Plus, many of the gas stations no longer carry the letters and no one [i.e. adults] are even playing the game anymore. But Gus is one obsessed juvenile in quest of that one missing and elusive letter. Will he find it? Well, that's the point of the game. No one was ever supposed to find that one missing letter of the alphabet. But Gus does.Therefore he's rich, right? Wrong. The company that set the game up devised a way in which no one could ever possibly win; and they did this by placing the winning letter in an out-of-the-way, run-down gas station at the edge of some surrealistic and strange borderland, in God knows where. Now Gus is driving throughout the southwest in his quest for the winning letter, and along the way he meets all sorts of mean and eccentric people. Moreover, he goes through all sorts of cruel and physical tortures from the various denizens he meets along the way.This comedy is very strange and very quirky. As I wrote in the beginning, it is not for everyone. But there is something about the film I found fascinating while watching it years ago. It is just so very strange that I couldn't help not liking the film. Yes, the script writing is flawed, and the acting is not too great. So what, I don't need a "Casablanca" all the time. A strange and quirky film will do just fine once in awhile. I recommend renting the film, just to see if you like it.
Simon and Garfunkel-Central Park. Abeautiful concert in the heart of Manhattan, N.Y. I know beacause I was there. I was employed in New York during the 70's and 80's. It brought back memories as well as some old tunes
Fragments of a life (without story or plot). I'm not sure that what is most unique and remarkable about Bresson is his "spiritual style," as it is often described.  One might say that by showing life in all its harshness his work opens the viewer to a vision of its "fallen state" and to the way in which a kind of grace is exhibited in the stubborn refusal of his central characters to cave in to the ways of the world even in the face of harsh adversity.  (Even here, Mouchette's final seemingly tragic act is shown to be in many ways a joyous one, the work of a child at play, whose counterpart in the film is the exuberant bumper car ride, where she laughs and flirts even as she is jolted and tossled about by the shock of being continuously smashed by other cars).  Still, what seems most distinctive about his films is not so much the subject matter as the deliberate lack of pretense in its style, which amounts almost to a kind of refusal to let himself as filmmaker or storytelling conventions intrude on the blunt portrayal of life.While you can certainly reconstruct the events portrayed in this film in terms of a standard plot structure, Bresson seems unwilling to plot out the story of Mouchette; in an interview contained on this dvd he says to a reporter that if he could sum up what happens to Mouchette it would be absurd to make a movie of it.  He aims only to give the essentials, showing no more than what is absolutely necessary, with the implication that as viewers we feel as though the world we are shown piecemeal is much bigger and more complete than what we are permitted to see.  It is not so much "Mouchette's story" that we are allowed to see as "Mouchette's world": a small world, with a few recognizable places, and recognizable routines, a few places she is permitted to go by a domineering father, and by a mother and brother whose needs place great but uncoerced demands upon her, and a few places she goes on her own, in acts of deliberate defiance, and at the same time acts of seeking someone who will not judge her or use her or place demands upon her.  Because it feels like the world we enter with Bresson's films is not merely a story that is being told (even when, as in this case, it happens to be adapted from a story that had been written down by Georges Bernanos), it is something that endures, something that remains with the viewer (at least this one) long after the final image has faded.In all of his films, but this one feels unique and special in this respect, Bresson achieves something more than merely fiction.  This is not an "enjoyable" filmgoing experience, and his aim is neither to uplift or to provide a message or entertain, but simply to show.   This film is entertaining and surprising in its own way, but in the sense that it is an endless source of surprise and wonder when Bresson refuses to employ cliches of any sort and yet manages to make the events he portrays directly intelligible, without any hint of manipulation of audience emotions or expectations.  Not to be missed by anyone who is interested in the potentials of film, or  in the artistic recreation of life in both its everyday and its tragic dimensions.
Mr. Zacharias clearly shows the problems of post-modernism. In this book, Ravi Zacharias clearly unfolds the problems post-modernism has with the concept of evil. In an age of increased intellectualism man not only has not only illustrated his inability to create utopia but has in fact come to the brink of self-destruction. Mr. Zacharias traces this to the extinction of known truth which no society can live without. Well thought-out and well written, I recommend this book to any thinker: religious, agnostic, or other
YES IT'S LONG. But it is very scary! Watch it alone in the dark!!
Best Disaster FIlm Ever?. The newly released double disc edition of "The Towering Inferno", with its enhanced picture and sound, not to mention the additional poignancy of its parallels to 9/11, cements its place in Hollywood history as perhaps the greatest fictional disaster film ever
Spicy and fun yet dramtic, too; compelling performances!. This darkly comic yet compelling BDSM-light relationship is blessed with great performances by Maggie Gyllenhaal and James Spader.  The script is well-written; little personal moments in the film are beautifully shot, and the actors really find the soul of the characters they portray.At its heart, it's really a sweet (if slightly disturbing) romance where one person's *unique* need for control meets up beautifully with someone else's *unique* need to submit.Sexy?  YES.  Disturbing?  A LITTLE.  Worth watching?  ABSOLUTELY.If you like unusual films, odd love stories, and quirky characters, this is a must-see
The Woody Allen Collection - 8 pack. Great collection of early Woody Allen titles. Nicely presented in slip cover box. Great value for money. Can't wait to get started on them
A VERY CLEVER AND DARK THRILLER. There have many excellent reviews of this movie, therefore, I would only be going over what so many have already written about this wonderful film. What I will say, however, is that this is an excellent movie. This film is a great study in psychological suspense that keeps the viewer guessing as to who the killer is. Spoiler: When the 10 travelers converging at a motel on a rainy night begin to die one by one, and all in a mysterious, and supernatural type way, you begin to wonder if this is some kind of ghost story. On the contrary, we are all in the mind of a serial killer,[Pruitt Taylor Vince] and his split personalities are beginning to merge. The only way for him to succeed in becoming whole again is to discard the make-believe world that his mind has created. Therefore, we witness the killings that are perplexing, and yet real to the mind of this killer. John Cusack gives a good performance as the limo-driver, as does Ray Liotta as the policeman/escaped convict, and of course the role of the psychiatrist [Alfred Molina] trying to prevent the scheduled execution of the aforementioned serial killer, does an excellent acting performance as well. I highly recommend this movie. It is definetly different than many, if not most of the thrillers on the market today.
Horizon. This has always been for me the definitive Zenda film.  With a great cast of actors, great adventure story and an ill fated romance.  What more could one ask
Downloading is easy. CSI is great and Downloading was very easy.  This is my fourth video, and I've only had problems with one, and Amazon quickly walked me through fixing it.  Gotta agree with A. Huck on the DSL, though.  While it's certainly useable the higher speed of cable would be great
That justice that should be for all !. This film is a true story. It is important for you to know that because some of the facts and reactions seem excessive, and yet... It all starts with a bunch of rowdy black kids who run across an older white man, a local personality who starts playing with these boys of ten or eleven and these boys decide to fight against it, probably without knowing what they were fighting against, except that it was not correct to let an older white man touch you if you were a little black boy. Local police and justice officials will go along a road that leads the same boy who is arrested for  molesting  the older man to a triple death sentence for a triple murder that he never committed and that will never be investigated properly. The film is absolutely outstanding because it sets the emphasis on this black man, an ex-world champion in boxing, transcending this fate and getting so high in his meditation that he is truly free in prison and truly divine in his mind. This Hurricane thus set as an example and model to anyone whose freedom is endangered, we can move to the 15 year old black boy from Brooklyn who buys and reads Rubin Carter's book in a booksale for 25 cents. His own life is a series of accidental cicumstances that lead him from deprevation among alcoholics to some achievement in a  host family  in Canada. This black boy, Lesra, identifies with Rubin and gets involved in his case. His Canadian guardians get along with this involvement and they will eventually bring the truth out and convince a federal court that the man is innocent and has to be released from prison immediately. What is important here is how these people react and organize their search and how it succeeds thanks to some nearly immaterial circumstances that go their way and not the simple automatic and habitual way. It is such cases that justify people in thinking there is hope in our societies where the poor cannot have any justice at all because they cannot afford good lawyers from the very start, and later on it is too late : the initial damage can rarely be redeemed, and yet some cases are there to prove it could, even if it does not most of the time. This is one of the films that should be studied in details in all high schools all over the world.Dr Jacques COULARDEAU, University of Paris Dauphine & University of Paris I Pantheon-Sorbonne
Dreams or nightmares? Madness or sanity?. "Let's Scare Jessica to Death" is a bona fide cult horror gem -- not a lot of people have seen it, it's smarter than your average death'n'gore movie, and it leaves you wondering just what the heck is going on here.In particular, it makes you wonder if the "Jessica" of the title is raving mad, or if a vampire really is making the rounds. The movie is blessed with wonderfully eerie music and camerawork, but it's the blurred line between madness and the supernatural that makes it stand out like a dark gem.Jessica (Zohra Lampert) has just been released from a mental hospital, and she and her husband Duncan (Barton Heyman) want to make a fresh start on a rural farm, with pal Woody (Kevin O'Connor) helping out. But when they arrive at their new home, they find a nomadic hippie girl living in the attic. At Jessica's insistence, Emily (Mariclare Costello) agrees to stay with them awhile.But strange things are happening -- the townspeople are very hostile towards the newcomers, and Emily is being trailed by a mysterious girl in a white gown. What's worse, all the men -- including Woody and Duncan -- seem to be somehow under Emily's spell. Is Jessica going insane again -- or is there a vampire controlling this island?One of the best things a horror movie can do is leave you wondering. "Let's Scare Jessica to Death" does just that. By the finale, it leaves us wondering if this is a terrifying reality, or the paranoid delusions of a woman who feels threatened by an attractive newcomer, and just made up this whole thing about her being an evil seductive vampire.A clever plot alone isn't enough to guarantee success, though. The whole movie feels vaguely spooky and dreamlike, with a camera that seems to capture all the mundane things like antique-shopping and farm kitchens. That makes the all the eerie stuff -- vanishing corpses, swimming specters -- seem even creepier. The climactic creep-out comes when the vintage-dressed vampire rises out of the water.Lampert does an amazing job as a woman terrified that her mental illness is coming back, but at the same time knowing that what she sees is real -- and that no one will believe her. Costello is creepy in a low-key, uncliched manner (when was a vampire last seen in flannel?), and Heyman and O'Connor are good in their supporting roles."Let's Scare Jessica To Death" is an eerie, atmospheric movie with excellent acting, that opts for the shivers instead of blood. Not to be watched after dark
Just amazing. What to say...it is just amazing...I just can't stop watching this opera once a time. The opera and actors are sublime, you are like surrounded in this opera and you can't do anything except watching and listening.Marvellous
beautifully done, but doesn't go deep enough. Purely on artistic merit I would award this film an 11 on a scale of ten.  Most documentaries dream of achieving this kind of artistic impression.  As for its command of the subject it struggles too hard to be passive.  In many ways that passivity is charming because it gives a chance to show what sort of person the real Fred Leuchter is but in turn it glances over the holocaust denial issue.The portrait of Fred A. Leuchter that comes through is a gullible and misguided man who strive to his utmost to achieve acceptance from his peers.  His rabid desire for acceptance is made clear by the fact that he himself pronounces his last name as if it were "Loocher" but Ernst Zundel pronounces it "Loikter" in the German sense.  When it comes down to the video Leuchter made for Zundel we find him adopting Zundel's pronunciation of his own name.  In the end Leuchter succumbs to the siren song of the holocaust deniers who bestow upon him all the respect and admiration of any university professor.  One feels almost sorry for such a man when his highly unpopular views ends up costing him what little success he had achieved.  I don't personally believe Fred Leuchter actually means to be the spokesperson of holocaust denial but he finds it too difficult to give up the position he has achieved through that.At one point when he is asked if he could reconsider his views on the holocaust his only reply is, "No, I'm beyond that now".  The one thing this video portrays is the man who is virtually lost in the muddle of holocaust deniers and their opponents; the former manipulate him and the latter villify him.  Leuchter is really just a mediocre and unfortunate man who has been thoroughly exploited by people who really don't care about him as anything more than a way to further their own racist agenda.To get more aquainted with the real issues behind the Leuchter report I would recommend "Truth Prevails: Demolishing Holocaust Denial : The End of the Leuchter Report" by Shelly Shapiro which is a collection of articles on the Leuchter report written by several of the interviewees in this film among others.
Panoramic. Lots of beautiful scenery provides a brilliant backdrop for this hillarious comedy. Chan and Wilson are at their best in this movie and it's hard to imagine a more perfectly executed comedy-western. The movie is filled with great gags and it's really hard to pick a favorite scene, but the gun-fight/martial arts fight at the end in the Spanish mission out in the middle of nowhere was classic. I've seen plenty of movies featuring both Chan and Wilson and I'd say that both are at the top of their form in this movie
Great. This is a very fun show and i enjoy watching it. i bought all the episodes available and they all worked great! its good to pay less to view
excellent and prompt service. dvd was in perfect condition and even got here before i was expecting it! i will definitely be making more purchases from book maven! thank
Not Your Typical Movie, and I Mean That in a Good Way. This movie first came out when I was about 11 years old.  I remember going into the cinema in the local mall (which was torn down LONG ago) and seeing carboard cutouts of Hawn, Willis, and Streep.  Of course, I had no idea who they were, but the image of Willis's hand going through Hawn's stomach is tough to forget.I also remember seeing a TV special on the making of this movie, because at that time the special effects used were ultra-high-tech.Of course I didn't see the movie in the theater.  I was awful young.  A few years after its theatrical run (maybe two) somebody in my family saw this movie on sale at Randall's as a used video and bought it at a discount.I enjoyed the movie, particularly because at that point I'd seen nothing where the major theme centered around a fountain of youth.  It's a fascinating concept when done well, as done here.The plot's unusual: Two bitter woman rivals obsessed with vanity drink a magical potion that keeps them young forever, so no matter what awful things they do to one another, they remain alive, even after they're classified as clinically dead.  Unfortunately, their bodies take quite a beating and need the upkeep of a plastic surgeon.  So they try to get Dr. Ernest Menville (Willis) to drink the potion too.  There's a lot more to the story, actually, since Dr. Menville has had very intimate relationships with both women in the past.  The build-up of this story is quite beautiful, although a bit sketchy when addressing Hawn's party at the beginning.I'll close by saying that there are a few scenes of nude female behinds every now and then.  Whoa
One of Allen's masterpieces. A comedy with a bitter sweet edge, "The Purple Rose of Cario" has a fairly simple premise. Cecilia (Mia Farrow) struggles to make ends meet during the Great Depression. Her husband Monk (Danny Aiello)is a lout who cheats on her and gambles since losing his job and Cecilia has to work in a restaurant and take in laundry to meet their bills and rent. The only escape that Cecilia has is going to the movies--the fantasy world of Hollywood gives her a coccoon from the brutal real world. Her favorite movie "The Purple Rose of Cario" featuring Gil Shepard (Jeff Daniels) as Tom Baxter (also Jeff Daniels in a dual role)changes her life when the character Tom Baxter walks out of the movie into the real world. He says he's in love with her and wants her to be happy something no one else except Cecilia's sister cares about. The rest of the characters in the film (Edward Herrman,Milo O'Shea, Deboarh Rush, Zoe Caldwell, John Wood, Van Johnson)are pretty upset and end up sparing with the audience watching them on screen when they complain how boring the movie is."Purple Rose" is one of Allen's most complete films and captures all the wistfulness that lurks in the background of his films. This DVD looks extremely good considering that the transfer is from 2001. There's some minor artifacting particularly when characters move quickly on screen but, on the whole, it's not a big deal. Allen hasn't done commentary tracks are allowed extras on his releases which is too bad as there's cut footage of Viggo Mortensen and Michael Keaton (who was originally cast in the lead instead of Daniels)that would be of interest. I don't know if that footage still exists but if it did it would make a lovely addition to this. Why MGM didn't choose to include archieved footage of Allen talking about the film and new interviews with the stars is beyond me. This Oscar nominated (for Best Screenplay)film certainly deserves a documentary on its making or, at the very least, a featurette. We do get the original theatrical trailer and a booklet that discusses the making of the film.A great movie that will hopefully get better treatment when it ends up on the Blu-Ray format, "Purple Rose" is still a treat and well worth picking up. It's also priced well at $12-14 at most retail outlets and at amazon.com
Sweet cartoon. Admittedly, this show isn't for everyone. It can be silly sometimes. Still, it has the potential to be very funny, clever, and sweet
A great series... ...far more complex and feministic than the "girls and flapper fashions", would have you believe. Needs to be seen in it's entirity and revived for a modern audience as the series is now an overlooked gem. The leads are excellent and follow in the best traditions of such British historical series such as "Upstairs Downstairs". If you have never seen it you will not be dissapointed and the lead actresses are extremely good, both RADA trained and both have worked extensively with the Royal Shakespeare Company
the book is better.  The movie is still good. Pretty hard to take a well written book by the likes of John Grisham and bring it all onto the screen.  They do a pretty good job.  Matt Damon plays Rudy, a student in law school who's smart, broke, and about to make history.  In the meantime his partner and him are working hard on a case against a scamming life insurance company that never paid out to a boy who had cancer.  The policy covered it but they would just not pay.  Meantime Damons character is in deeper than ever, as he falls for an abused woman whose redneck husband will soon find out.  Read the novel, then watch the movie.  It's really a very moving story and the characters in the book and movie are alive and thriving.  Danny DeVito plays Damons partner in the film and it's one of the better roles I've seen him play.
For Keeps. This is really one of my favorite Molly Ringwald  movies...of course all of them great...this one stands out a lil more ...Its a more serious role of something thats happening everyday...I was also excited this came to dvd....I give her alot of props for this one
hbo does it again. this was originally aired on hbo and it is just as great as it was then.It is entertaining, smart and educational. This, just like most hbo movies id amazin
Watch this movie!. I have watched this movie more than just a few time.  There is just something about this movie that I like.  First of all, I am fascinated with movies about Nazis and conspiracies.  But the best part of this movie is Michael Caine.  This guy is magic to watch.  In it Michael Caine inherets $4 billion from his Nazi father to be used to make ammends to the people who were hurt during WW2.  But the movie takes a spy/mystery twist when killers are after Michael Caine and he keeps meeting new people he doesn't know if he should trust or not.  This is the type of movie that will keep you on the edge of your seat till the very end
Still great after all these years... Bob Woodward, one of the real-life heroes in the movie, is still making news while reporting news at The Washington Post. That's amazing. I used to be a reporter, and still am a Democrat, (although a moderate now), and I never was a fan of President Nixon, so I loved it when it came out, I loved the book first, and I was glued to the TV set and the papers when the whole Watergate mess unfolded. But ignore politics if you can when watching this...there are crooks in both major parties, and [...], and dumb people promoted above their talents. This is well-written, well directed, and well-acted, and can be enjoyed just as entertainment here in the new century. Sadly, the Clinton Years and the Bush Years, too, offer the realization that Watergate-type conspiracies, designed to hold onto power, avoid scandal, or launder money, are still with us
I enjoyed the season premeir emensely. I enjoyed this series premier tremendously and am looking forward to watching the rest of the series.  Enterprise started before I had my PVR and was either on at a time I was unable to watch it or I never made time.  I watched one episode of Star Trek the Next Generation yesterday and it peaked my interest in watching some Star Trek episodes again.  Rather than watch episodes I've already seen, Enterprise looks like a great way to enjoy Star Trek episodes.As far as privacy concerns mentioned in other reviews, if you're paranoid, the internet isn't for you.  Keep your private things private, and not on networked computers.  Hopefully Amazon will remove reviews that do not at all pertain to the show they are attached to
Made me snort Mr. Pibbs!!!. Dan "Wild Man" Cockblockenship made me snort the soda, to be precise. Well, he didn't REALLY make me. He dared me.If it did it, I'd get to ride him to the video store. He lets me ride him lotsa places, though. I think he likes it. Weird.Oh well.Funny movie
An adult film in more ways than one. This is an excellent film about realistic adult relationships and the compromises we have to make to make relationships work. When the film was released in 1971 however the homosexuality certainly could overshadow the underlying complex but brutally honest story.I think the best way to review the film is to concentrate on the 3 main characters, all played so very well by a super cast.Alex, played by Glenda Jackson, is a business woman in her 40's having an affair with a bisexual artist, Bob, who is in his late 20's or early 30's. Bob leaves her at the first hint of conflict or trouble or confrontation to join his Jewish physician lover, Daniel, played by Peter Finch. Daniel asks for relatively little and offers an oasis of thought and tenderness for Bob.This seems to torture Alex so much that she can't stop from allowing her feelings of rejection and fear of abandonment from driving Bob off the next time they meet. Most telling is her conversation with her mother where she challenges her mother and father's relationship. The father is a cold multi-millionaire that long ago ceased to be involved in a passionate relationship with his wife. Alex's mother confronts her back that she expects to have "it all' in a relationship and defends her marriage with 'you don't think it is anything but you are wrong." Alex is extremely bright and verbal but in many ways a spoiled woman. Yet to be fair, how many people can share a lover?  It is possibly one of the most difficult tasks in the world for most and can be so traumatic that the constant worry destroys the relationship.Bob, the bi-sexual artists, does not have to commit to either Alex or Daniel or to anyone. He is handsome, young, talented, intelligent, and articulate. He is ambitious and sees clearly what he gets from both relationships. He doesn't have to commit so he doesn't.  Both lovers, Alex and Daniel, indulge him and adore him. From his perspective he realizes he does not have to choose between them and he enjoys various aspect of both of the relationships. Why should he make a choice? Does he stop seeing Daniel so that Alex will stop obsessing and fretting? I sympathized with Bob. He was indulged and pampered and knew it.Daniel, the Jewish physician, was superbly played by Peter Finch. This portrayal of a man living multiple identities was extra special. Daniel is the talented and dedicated physican who takes calls from patients night and day. He is wise and learned and compassionate. He listens to opera in a sophisticated garden home - serene and reflective. Yet he is fully engaged in the Jewish community in which he was reared. The scenes of his nephew's Bra Mitzvah convey his strong heritage and roots to the Jewish community. Daniel, more so that with Alex or Bob, conveys the concept of living different identities. Daniel recognizes he is part of the Jewish community, part of the medical community and the patients they see, and part of a same-gender loving community which exists more behind doors that in the open in 1971. Whereas Alex remains tortured most of the film, Daniel ends the film with a speech directly to the camera about the limitations of all relationships,the compromises we have to make in all relationships, and the responsibility to extract from each human experience as much joy and meaning as is possible.We have a choice in life, we can accept or reject compromise. Both paths have rewards and hardships. This is really the theme of the film.After 34 years, this film has retained its power, since its power resides in depiction of honest lives and honest situations.
Mountains eh?. The storyline of the movie is a simple one: two soldiers are captured by people who live in the mountains. The leader of the people of the mountains wants to trade them for his son, who is in prison. So the leader tells the two captured men to write their mothers and tell them to come and get them and they will make a deal, and so on and so forth.The movie is not one of the greatest movies that I have seen, but it was not a terrible piece. The ending is great and completely unexpected. And, I'm not sure if it's just me, but the plot and character motivation seemed to be derived from the viewer's common sense rather than from any real motive in the movie. For example the older soldier kills a sheep herder; the whole exchange seems like something out of Monty Python. Throughout the movie there is a sense of humor, me and the person i watched it with were laughing hysterically at a few scenes (most notable when the prisoners get drunk) and at random times throughout.Overall the film gave off a surrealist feel. It never quite seemed real at all. The exchanges between the characters just keep getting more and more unrealistic (i'm not sure if the writer planned that or not, but it does seem to lag near the end). The movie definitely loses points on that front.Also there never seemed to be any real connection between things. The beginning threw me off, and when they attacked them and brought them back on horses that threw me off. It was somewhat difficult to get into the movie, but once it got going it was easier to watch, then it drug and then it was over. Not a recipe for success in my eyes. Although I'm not sure if that is the way Russian cinema is, but that certainly isn't the way American cinema runs, at least not the kind that is deemed of good quality.But overall I would recommend watching it, it is a good movie. But be sure you're watching it with someone else so that you are able to laugh with them and share a few raised eyebrows at the plot and how doesn't seem to be realistic.
Great quality. There is a good reason you'd want to buy this from Amazon. The quality. Sure, you can watch it for free on CBS, but the quality isn't very good. It's streamed and the bitrate (quality) is low. Personally, I want to watch Survivor on my 50" plasma, not on my computer screen. So, I use Unbox + Windows Media Center to make that happen. Survivor from unbox is as good as getting the show directly from my cable provider.
Maybe the most honest film on addiction ever made!!. I have heard it said many times that no addiction starts out as a physical dependancy; addiction really begins as a psycological/spiritual defect deep down inside. I think the way that the movie in the beginning showed the insecurity and unease of the two main characters is the most underrated aspect of this brilliant film. The alcohol washes away the unease and pain for awhile, but when the mask wears off, literally, all hell breaks loose!!Some have commented that Jack Lemmon's greenhouse scene and subsequent mental-ward scene were not realistic. I disagree with this, as I think his character's mental state was such that a complete breakdown was a very real possibility at that point in the story. Ultimately, this film is more than just a story of the dangers of alcoholism. It is a story of the dangers of low self-esteem and not loving yourself. THAT is the true breeding ground for addiction, and I don't know if there has ever been a film that does a more effective job of illustrating this!! An absolute classic...one for the ages!!
A classic. In this film the story is told with the vigour and intensity it deserves. The actors performances are outstanding, so that you see and hear something new every time you watch.  The music is beautiful and one can practicly feel the cool fog in the night and the morning mist, smell the delicous patisserie and sense the omnipresent powerplay between the classes
Move Over Darling. This movie is a light comedy where you can just relax and watch - not to mention have a good laugh
A Great Mountain Man Movie. Jeremiah Johnson is perhaps the best of the "mountain man" movies of the 1970's and remains a highly enjoyable movie.  The grandeur of the mountain scenery, wildlife, and overall setting and look of the movie are fantastic.  As a matter of fact, the movie was filmed entirely in Utah and the Wasatch and Uinta Mountain locations are just as spectacular seen in person today as they are in the movie.  Those who find this movie enjoyable will undoubtably want to read the Vardis Fisher book "Mountain Man" as well as any of Terry C. Johnston's books featuring protagonist Titus Bass ("Carry the Wind", "One-Eyed Dream", etc.).  Those who like this movie may also want to see "Windwalker" which is available on VHS and DVD
Visual Brain Cartridge. The best visual experience available...and the sound may still be the best part.  I've watched this over 20 times and still find elements new to me.  I have bought this as gifts and have recommended it to very many who want a high end visual show
Outstanding flick.  Motivating too. Brings back the days of going through USMCRD h*ll, which was also some of the best days of my life now that I look back.  It's an absolute crime that this hasn't been officially released on DVD, along with R. Lee Ermey's "Boys of Company C."  Why these films have been resigned to sitting in dusty VHS out-of-print shelves, while other cra*py films have already been released two or three times on DVD in various special, super-special, or ultra-super-special editions is beyond me.As for the film itself, if you know the drill at all, get this movie. You'll love it.  It will bring back a flood of memories, most you'll cherish, most will motivate, and most will resonate with you long after the movie is over.  Jack Webb does an amazing performance...nails the SDI perfectly.  Can't recommend highly enough.Semper Fi brothers
Beautifully sad, with echoes of Europa Europa. Greetings, comrades!I have rented this video several times from my public library, and have always enjoyed it. It reminds me of the similarly-themed Europa Europa, as well as Burnt by the Sun. The film covers a lot of plot lines and a long slice of time, rather like a miniseries, but it is nowhere near as dull and plodding as other WWII films such as Sunshine.If you liked Est-Ouest (East-West), Europa Europa, The Third Miracle, The Cold Room, or the work of Krzysztof Kieslowski, you will at the least enjoy Red Cherry. I have watched hundreds of WWII movies, from documentaries to fictionalized histories to pure fiction, and Red Cherry is certainly more intriguing and involving than the majority of WWII works available.As a multilingual linguaphile, I especially liked the use of local languages and therefore English subtitles. It always seems faintly dorky to me to have everyone speaking English with a "Russian" or "German" accent in WWII movies. If you do NOT like subtitles, then this movie may drive you crazy.However, if you want a fresh take on World War II from the point of view of orphaned Chinese children, this movie is just the ticket!Dosvidanya, tovarishi
A most delighful movie for Everyone. I possibly watched hundreds of movies, and this one is surely one of the most delighful movies I have ever seen. I watched it with my dog Sultan, and he loved it as much as I did. The story is interesting and amuzing, the characters simply adorable. It touches your Heart, pleases your senses, and relaxes your mind. Could you ask for more? I would recommend this movie to everyone of all ages. You could see it again and again and it won't tire on you because there is Real Joy at its core. It aims to share this Joy with you, and it couldn't do a better job. Bravo!!
Way to Go Amazon!  Very cool. Just got done watching the show and it was awesome. Of course I had to download the tool, how else do you get started? Once it downloaded it worked very well and the video was right there to watch when I was ready. Note to self get cable, DSL is a slow download but it worked great and the picture quality was awesome. No commercials!I didn't have any troubles installing it on my computer and the help tool walked me through it.
Great. This is a very fun show and i enjoy watching it. i bought all the episodes available and they all worked great! its good to pay less to view
One of the best documentaries out there. This is a movie that most people can connect with.  We all have known a stevie in our lives.  You know the angry loaner, hates the world and everyone in it.  He desperately craves attention and respect after years of abuse and torment.  Even with the bitterness you want to help stevie.  But stevie doesnt realize or understand that his tough guy redneck persona is self-destructive.  He brags of past arrests and fights like they are badges of honor, friends and relatives shake their heads because they dont know how to help him. Drugs, mental hospitals, religion have all failed him in his eyes.  The bottom line is this is a movie that will stay with you for a very long time, especially if you have known a stevie in your life
Viva Reform School Girls. I saw this movie back in the 80s,when i was a mere 20 years.Now at 40 and a 15 year old girl later.I picked a copy up,And watched it with my daughter.She looked at me like i was crazy during the first five minutes.It did not take long before she was rooting on wendy o williams.Now it is her new found favorite movie.AAAHHH the decadent 80s.pick this one up,and show your kids what your guilty pleasures are.they will love you for it
My man Dr Smith is a riot in this episode. Dr Smith and the Robot go hog wild, switching personalities and swapping insults.  This is a great episode
Totally psychotic. Totally psychotic Wedding Dress designer kills his models to 'find himself', but his horrible wife has her own willpower to wield. Bava's direction parallels the edge of John's insatiable drive to Kill, an assaultive film experience. Low budget. Horrible sound, so play it loud! (6/7
death: upclose & personal. Wonderful movie - shows death & dying from a personal, up-close perspective.  See how oblivious the medical establishment can be!
Surprisingly moving and rich. This fine film really snuck up on me emotionally, but the superb performances of Jennifer Lopez (Sharon) and Jim Caviezel (Catch) are rich, nuanced, and ultimately captivating.  ANGEL EYES works on so many levels ... suspense, action, drama, and of course, romance.  It intricately and sensitively deals with issues of life and death, loss, betrayal, and redemption.  The ending doesn't tie up everything in a neat little cliched package, either.  But aside from a wonderful script and crisp direction, the key to this film is the chemistry of Lopez and Caviezel, who can communicate so much from a look or a smile or tears.  Particularly intriguing is the character that Caviezel plays, the enigmatic Catch.  Is he dead or alive?  An angel or devil?  Is he psychotic or just deeply wounded?  Somehow, as the viewer sorts it all out, Caviezel plays Mr. Catch as a warm-yet-tragic figure who steals the viewer's hearts just as surely as he touches Lopez's Sharon.  Speaking of Lopez, this is one of her best performances; it's truly one from the heart.  She's gritty, yet vulnerable...tough, but gorgeous.  I'm not really a weepy type, but all I can say is that Sharon's amazing "tribute" to her father near the film's end had me getting embarrasingly misty-eyed. This is certainly a fantastic date movie; it really would not be appropriate for children or younger teens, however, due to some salty language, intense themes, and brief scenes of sensuality.  I am amazed that Caviezel didn't experience a superstar breakout as a leading man after this film, but it is without question a brilliant and heart-rending performance.   Comparing his work here to what he has accomplished in other films, including his landmark portrayal in THE PASSION OF THE CHRIST, one sees his incredible versatility and range as an actor. ANGEL EYES is, in some ways, a collection of many small, intimate vignettes, that are woven together in a beautiful narrative tapestry.  While this film may not have burned up the box office in 2001, it's definitely a great way to spend an evening with someone you love.
GENIUS. Whether people like him or not, there's no doubting that this man is a musical genius! He started his career as a rock star aiming his music towards white teens but everyone of all races and ages was curious as to who this little man was. When he realized how much attention he could get from people just by being different, he figured why not try different things like movies. If you're from the '80's then you have at least seen 2 out of the three movies that were made and you owned at least one album. I loved him then and still do today, and I'm not alone, I've been to his recent sold out concerts. Don't hate because he's different, learn to embrace and appreciate the differences!
B-movie Splendor. I would have to say this was a brilliant movie. I was highly entertained from this Mr.Corman and Hill flick. Beautiful women getting roughed up, from the somewhat feminine guards. Pam Grier gets your full attention
Firefly is worthy of your download!. The cancellation of this short lived but highly acclaimed series is perhaps the biggest mistake made by a network. Ever.Fox executives broadcast the series out of order, it was preempted several times for baseball...it didn't have a chance.*The DVD box set of Firefly has been in the top 20 boxed sets in Amazon sales since its release in 2003. Not too shabby for a series that was limited to 14 episodes. Must be something to it, huh?Give this series the chance it deserves. Download #1 Serenity and try it on for size. It's space westerny goodness all around.If you find you are drawn to this series, come visit us at fireflyfans.net. We'll be waiting for you with Mudder's Milk and Strawberries.
Great DVD. A Christmas classic must-have! I have always seen this movie on regular TV, so to see it on DVD with the original 'language' was fabulous
Engrossing from the first 30 seconds. Clooney is a marvel.  This story was so captivating that I sat on the edge of my seat straining to hear all the dialogue.  Althought the scene shifts make it difficult to track at first, I was drawn in and held spellbound
The very best of "it's so bad, it's good". Yes, you can come home. When Patty Duke belts out her first song you just know this is going to be gawd awful good. Her twitchy body, coupled with an out-of-key voice is a hoot. And not to give anything away for the newbies but you will be on the floor when she sings in the sanitarium. This is a beautiful looking movie. The colors shine. The sound is terrific. John Williams gets the only Academy Award for original score. What no Dion Warwick for Theme from Valley of the Dolls? I was surprised there was no nomination. The trivia track, yes there is a track filled with trivia, mentions an issue of the song released for radio(a different version) and the one played on movie. Maybe an issue here? There is a commentary track by Barbara Parkins but I was disappointed that there was only one voice from the movie. It would have been better if there could have been a couple more. There are many extras, many of which I haven't seen yet. A nice package of extras. This had to be a career destroying movie. Only Lee Grant and John Williams seemed to come out unscathed. And Susan Hayward? What was she thinking? As the star among stars she actually looks like the only actor in the movie, but her laughable stage and singing performance scenes along with the obligatory female cat fight with the Patty Duke character keeps this movie rolling in schlock. This movie is filled with past and future Academy Award winners, Grant, Duke, Hayward, Williams, and Martin Milner(just kidding). And watch for an appearance by Richard Dreyfus, no less, towards the end of the movie. This is a 5 star movie for the genre. Dreamy scenery, bad dialog and soundtracks, outstanding cast doing their best to make this awful, a decent title track song by Warwick, sex, and have I mentioned, drugs. Enjoy.
Highly Suspenseful!. Audrey Hepburn does a fantastic job of portraying a young blind girl caught in a very desperate situation.  Great seeing her in a role that is not just centered around her beautiful appearance, but an actress with many other great talents.  Alan Arkin does one fantastic job of playing a cruel and visious killer with no heart or soul. This one will keep you on the edge of your chair!
Not a dull moment in this movie !. I am so glad that Leonard Malton's poor review didn't keep me from purchasing this movie. I loved it. It will keep you on the edge of your seat at all times. Although the subject matter is a difficult one, it is something that exists and I thought the movie did a good job of telling the story of a female FBI agent (Debra Winger) who infiltrates a white supremacist group to investigate a murder. It's too bad this movie didn't get better reviews by the critics. I found it to be better than most ! Excellent acting and directing, well worth it
Very good movie. The first time I watched In Good Company I said to myself, eh not good, not bad, just pretty average. A couple reviews reflect that. But ever since HBO started playing the movie constantly I find myself watching it more and more and enjoying it more and more. The best quality about this film is that it's real. You watch the story progress and you feel like you're watching reality. I never found myself saying, how unrealistic, that could never happen. The character's emotions seem real, the situations seem real. That all points to a well-acted, well-written film. Also, the movie doesn't try too hard. It doesn't go out of its way to be funny, doesn't go out of its way to give you a sappy, predictable ending or stupid scenarios that so many movies end with. Just an interesting plot that flows and moves along with realism in mind instead of Hollywood fantasy
My Favorite Disney Movie. *** Spoiler Warning - this review might reveal surprises in the movie ***First off for a frame of reference, I'm a 30-year old male and a sucker for Disney movies in general.When this movie came and went to the theatres in a flash, I heard so much bad about it, how it was the worst Disney movie ever, that I actually didn't go see it in the theatre. I regret that now. First time I actually saw this movie was on a 14-hour flight from Los Angeles to London, and I fell heads over heels in love with it!I adored the original Novel "Treasure Island", and I believe that Treasure Planet lives up to it. The central theme of Treasure Planet, in my mind, is the boy, Jim, who grows up with only a vague recollection of his father who in the movie appears like a shadow in Jim's faded childhood memories.I think this particular "flashback" scene was very powerful, it featured the absolutely brilliant "I'm still here" track by Johnny Rzesnik, and led the viewer to fully understand Jim's childhood, and to share his teenage frustration and delinquency that stems from his father abandoning the young Jim and his mother. Possibly, I might a bit biased in this respect, since I can strongly identify with this situation as my own father was "married to the sea" when I grew up, and i can admit that i blubbered like a baby during the flashback sequence.This is right in line with the core message of the film. A young, reckless and frustrated boy who is taken under the wing of the Old Salt, who becomes his new father figure. He learns how to take orders, work hard, grow, face adversity, and eventually become a man by making tough choices. An excellent message in this day and age, if you ask me.I also loved the theme the producers chose. A type of anachronistic retro-futuristic design, where we in the future still use old, creaking, wooden, pirate ships, but with ultra futuristic systems. The movie also suspends the viewer from reality in many flavorful ways - for instance when the spaceship travels through the universe, it encounters a pod of whales. Or how Jim takes a dhingy "comet surfing".I think this film provides excellent entertainment, suspense and has a great message for kids. But as an adult, I think I also got a kick out of this GREAT and CLEARLY UNDERRATED Disney flick.SEE IT
brilliant!  - so good you should NOT buy this DVD!. This is a brilliant film by a master filmmaker/storyteller.  Dark, moody, exciting (and FAST!), THX-1138 is an amazing example of style AND substance.  So whatever you do, DON'T BUY THIS DVD!Instead, spend just a few bucks more and get the 2 DVD version which delves into the making of the film, the early days of Lucas and Coppola, Walter Murch's involvement, and the whole story about American Zoetrope.  It also has a little segment made back in the day about the actor's getting their heads shaved.  All in all, it is a spectacular DVD set and worth the extra few dollars.  (The 2 dvd version also has a much better cover.
Enter the Creepshow!!!!! Tickets Please!!!!!. It is perhaps best to initially take a glance at the comic books that inspired this collection of creepy tales, pulps published throughout the 1940s and 1950s by E.C. Comics and boasting such titles as TALES FROM THE CRYPT, HAUNT OF FEAR, WEIRD SCIENCE and VAULT OF HORROR.  Television was still in its early stages and it would be a few years before quality horror made its way onto the screen.  Horror fans, then, targeted the news stands for their fix of the unreal and the unnatural; they were introduced to tales of rotting corpses and ghouls rising from the grave by The Crypt Keeper and his fiendish friends The Vault Keeper and The Old Witch. There were adaptations of Poe and Lovecraft, and Ray Bradbury (see THE OCTOBER GAME) frequently contributed stories, further enhancing E.C. Comics popularity. Two young readers of 'Tales' during the 1950s would have been horror icons Stephen King and George A. Romero, the comics having a considerable influence on their own future works.  Sadly censorship laws meant that E.C. Comics were taken off the market, but they would not be buried forever ... which brings us to CREEPSHOW.Released in 1982, CREEPSHOW is a homage to E.C. Comics.  The film is directed by George A. Romero and is based upon short stories and a screenplay written by Stephen King (there would follow an actual comic book titled CREEPSHOW featuring cover art by legendary E.C. artist Jack Kamen and interior art by Bernie CYCLE OF THE WEREWOLF Wrightson).In total there are five tales and a wraparound story.  Each tale begins with a comic book-style animated segment; the wraparound story features a young boy (Stepehen King's son, Joe) whose Creepshow Comic is confiscated by his abusive father (Tom HALLOWEEN 3: SEASON OF THE WITCH, THE FOG Atkins).And so begins the first tale:FATHER'S DAYNathan Grantham is killed by his own daughter after years of mental abuse and an apparent murder.  He returns as a hideous corpse, exacting revenge on the entire Grantham family.  Stars ED HARRIS.THE LONESOME DEATH OF JORDY VERRIL (aka WEEDS)Backwoods hick Verril (Stephen King) witnesses a meteor crash-land into his own backyard.  Before long the entire property is turning green and Verril has to fight for survival against an alien plant life.SOMETHING TO TIDE YOU OVERAnother revenge story featuring TED DANSON and LESLIE NIELSON and arguably the best of the five tales.  Nielson plays a wealthy, jealous and unhinged husband who buries his wife and her lover up to their necks in the stretch sand that is his private beach, Comfort Point.  But the tide has a way of returning the past.THE CRATEWhile cleaning the student halls of a Maine University one evening, the janitor discovers an ancient crate buried beneath the stairs.  Chained within is a bigfoot-like monster, that has been locked away for over a century ... Meanwhile ... Local college professor, Henry, has been subjected to years of humiliation from his overbearing and obnoxious wife; his only solace is a weekly chess game with co-professor, Dexter Stanley ... It is now time for the creature to feed and Henry has a plan that might well solve all his problems. Starring HAL HOLBROOK, ADRIENNE BARBEAU (both of THE FOG) and Fritz Weaver.THEY'RE CREEPING UP ON YOUA selfish and miserly tycoon with a tendancy towards hypachondria finds his supposedly bug-proof and germ-proof apartment infested with cockroaches.  Check out King's F-13 computer game, which includes the bug-splat game taken right from this tasteless tale.  Starring E.G. MARSHALL (TOMMYKNOCKERS)And so ends the show.  But before we leave the auditorium, lets return to the wraparound story where little Tommy has taken to practicing voodoo in order to exact revenge on his bad tempered father.So what's the verdict?  Five excellently written and directed shorts from two of the Masters of Horror.  CREEPSHOW, moderately successful at the time of its release, has maintained cult status ever since - it will undoubtedly stand the test of time.  The special effects are top notch, having Tom Savini at the helm (he also plays a small acting role in the wraparound story) and the acting is first rate.  Sadly there are little-to-no extra features, but the film itself makes up for this.  Perhaps there will be a special edition in the future - it would be nice to see some original interviews and deleted scenes.CREEPSHOW was followed by CREEPSHOW 2 and TALES FROM THE DARKSIDE before the TALES FROM THE CRYPT TV series emerged.  Out sometime this year is CREEPSHOW 3.5/5
Un box Revisited. This Amazon unbox is not fully developed or has a lot of bugs in it. They should pull it until they get the bugs ironed out. Could not download all of the movie i ordered and now it is gone from my computer and I don't see how to download it again.Update: Most of the problems I experienced were with my Sattelite connection. After 175 MB they start to throttle the speed way down. I upgraded and this helped. I can now download large movies but only in 350mb bites each 4 hours. If you are having trouble read your sattelite "fair access" policy
The white is not only a color; it an anima state!. Kieslowski was the superb artifice of this curious Trilogy; White, Blue and Red deals with a delicate, mature and painful subject. The impossibility of a simple man to satisfy his couple will reach bindings of unsuspected turns; an unexpected journey from Paris to Warsaw, will become of him an energy outburst, the expected redemption has to be done in the middle of the corrupt battlefield.The narrative style of Kielowski demands of you all the possible attention. His films possess conceptual density ornamented with visible visual metaphors; the tragedy and collapse of his beloved Poland appears beneath the absorbing script with unadorned realism. I would like to you recommend to watch previously his Decalogue. This fact will allow you to appreciate with major intensity the rat of this unforgettable genius. His sensible vanishing left a very remarkable void, which still remains, pitifully without successor.The rest runs for you. There are many rich details to comment and the space is extremely brief to face this task.Go for this treasure.
Sentimental favorite. When my daughter was born, a relative and I wound up reminiscing about this album and how much we both loved it growing up.  Next thing I knew, a copy of the DVD arrived as a gift for my daughter and me.  The first time I sat down and watched, it brought back all my memories of being a little girl in the 70's.  I could even still sing along with the title song!  Right now, my daughter is too young to do much except listen as I sing or play music for her, but I hope she grows up enjoying these songs as much as I did.  Yes, the visuals are dated, but I believe the messages of these songs are as pertinent now as they were thirty years ago.  Best of all, the songs get their messages across without being "preachy."  I think this is a fabulous alternative to much of what's out there for kids today, and dated as some elements may be, "Free to Be You and Me" is still a long, long way from going out of style
Glad to find it!!!. I saw this movie a long time ago and couldn't find it anywhere. I was very excited when I finally found it--and for a great price too!
hilarious and touching very much so. great from start to endglad I got thishas been viewed 8 times on my dvd playeram glad I saw thishilarious and very touching moving storyeveryone who contributed to this story movie should be proudI love this more and more every time I watch it
The perils of disconnection. Suicide Club is truly a Japanese statement. I enjoy Japanese films for the interesting glimpse into a psyche strongly influenced by a world of forced detachment and often unfeeling behavior. Often, Asian films address the disconnected feeling associated with a fast-paced, demanding industrialized society. Suicide Club normalizes the emtional pain of suicide into a 'what the heck' fad. Asian horror often delves into the forbidden. Viewers eagerly, though painfully, peek as if watching a train wreck. There is a statement. I've never seen an Asian film that didn't have one. That disconnection resulting from society's demands is paramount in this film. The presentation can be compared to the unconventional shocks and cold emptiness of A Clockwork Orange. NOT for children
very compelling movie. saw this film recently all the way through&the thing that grabs you is the natural way the film is presented in 1970 without compromise or hestiation.strogn writing&acting is what carry this film from start to finish.the pacing of the film keeps your attention from start to finish
Open a Book and Open a Mind. With enchanting rhyme and whimsical illustrations, Dr. Suess delivers a children's book with lots to consider.  The butter side up Yooks and the butter side down Zooks are a parody of the cold war, and the crescendo builds as the trivial evolves into a weapons race, culminating with a stalemate with each side having a "Big Boy Boomeroo".  The younger readers will be enchanted by the rhythm of the tale and the lesson that grandpa imparts will be better understood by the older readers.  Actually, a wonderful book for all ages.  Pair this book with THE LORAX (a once "banned" Suess book!) and you'll have my favorite baby shower gift.
There've always been people from good and bad families. They haven't made any films like this in decades, anywhere in the world. From a time when the word decency could be used more as a weapon than as a boomerang. Traditional family values is what we have here exposed, without lecturing. Those film critics that talk so much nonsense about Japanese films are just a bunch of hippies with bow ties, proletarians in nike shoes. John Ford himself made many movies like this one, where family values are proclaimed and sanctified thru his artistry, but critics don't want to see that, they only see what they want. Well, here's this director from Japan, right after WWII, giving us a last tour of the good old times when they are about to change.Sure, it's about a father and his lovely daughter. But at the same time it's about those times I was talking about. The daughter doesn't want to change, just like all the decent people wouldn't want to change; but it's inevitable. It's life's law. Progress cannot be stopped, and daughters must marry off, to start a new family, maybe new societies.There are such things as good and bad families. Just as there's right and wrong. This is a wonderful film. But I've seen more old films like this one, and they weren't Japanese. They were American and European. Why not give them the same Criterion treatment? Are "traditional values" only nice when they apply to foreign cultures? I see a double standard in these phony critics. Whatever they say about this film, it is not one that disfunctional families can feel identified with.
Logan's Run. I have always loved this movie but it was very hard to find. It is such a relief to have a place to find rare movies in such great condition.  This movie will make you really think about the future and also about how far our movie technology has come
cat's eye. Very good!Very happy to find it in DVD since I could not get it in VHS Tape,which is better at the en
great update from a classic prison flick. This film, was actually a remake of the film "Caged" starring Eleanor Parker and Agnes Moorehead, made in the 50's.  This film was remade with a 80's rock and roll feel.  The "lets play the name game" scene is an exact duplicate of "c'mon you tramps line up for count" where the girls get off their bunk beds, stand in line and recite their name.  When you compare the two matrons of each movie, they could pass for sisters!!!  Wendy O. Williams was great, understand she was tragically killed in a bike accident just about 6 months after this film was made.  Sybil Danning who played the warden, is a several prison made movie woman herself, playing in great films like Caged Heat.  This is a good DVD and a camp remake of a classic prison film
Baseball fans will enjoy this one. 'The Curse of the Grebes' is sort of a tribute to the Red Sox return to World Series glory with cameos by Damon, Timlin and Renteria. Timlin actually does a great acting job and even recites a poem by Emily Dickinson with remarkable aplomb. 'Arthur Changes Gears' is also great, he gets a bike he's been coveting for a while but when he finally gets it he's so worried about getting it dirty that he won't ride it
movie purchase. thanks for the movie, i appreciate it.  the delivery was decent, no complaints
good movie. I watched this movie not knowing all that much about about the whole Mothman phenomenon, so fortunately wasn't in a position to have my expectations dashed.  I guess that's the thing about movies based on real or alleged events, and there's not much that can be done about it if you've already read up on the whole incident.  The movie should be taken for what it is, a good, spine chilling paranormal thriller.  The Special edition includes a 50 minute documentary on the 1960s Mothman sightings on which the movie is based.  Very interesting in its own right
Great movie, but this DVD needs to be "dressed up" a bit more. First of all, I'm reviewing the DVD product and not the movie.This is one of those movies that you either get or you don't.  If you've searched for this movie and bought it, chances are you "get it" so I won't write about the movie itself.This is possibly the most disturbing, unique, and fun kids movie ever.  I wish there had been some sort of documentary on the DVD.  Even if all the original people involved in the production are no longer with us, just some commentary from a film historian would have been interesting.  Just what impact did this film have when it was released in 1952?Also, the DVD navigation acted strangely.  When I was in the bonus cartoon the "return to menu" function on my DVD player didn't work.  I had to hit stop and reboot the DVD to get out of the cartoon and back to the main menu.The "bonus cartoon" however was a wonderful surprise: an original "Gerald McBoing Boing" cartoon (Gerald McBoing Boing's Symphony).  I'd never seen one of these and I totally loved it.So, I got a great and fascinating movie and a wonderful bonus cartoon, but I was left wanting to learn more, and all I had left to look at were a few black and white still pictures from the production.
enticing sexy dip into film noir  waters. The Lady from Shanghi's reputation is secure as a classic of film noir but then this genre is notoriously disrespected probably because many film noirs are based on dime novels and sound like it; in order to appreciate a film noir, therefore, you have to be able to enjoy the kitschy quality of snappy dime-novel dialogue. But kitsch alone is not what makes (some) film noirs great. What really sets film noir apart from other genres is its striking, even elegant, visual style which often contrasts sharply with its stark subject matter. Film noir has a way of glamourzing corruption, and giving corruption a unique aesthetic allure all its own. Film noir probably owes something to the German Expressionist film masters (Murnau, Lang, Von Stroheim) and the Hollywood grotesques of the 20's and 30's but it absorbs and evolves these influences into a highly refined style of its own. Orson Welles is the undisputed master of the high noir style. All of his films after Magnificent Ambersons mobilize film noir methods and techniques and so Welles' reputation rises and falls with that genre that he did not create but that he perfected.Film noir came of age during WWII and like many film noirs Lady from Shanghai is about anxieties over race, class, sexuality, and identity and, in this particular noir film, negotiating racial, social, cultural and sexual difference in an increasingly globalized world. The film takes place in several international (Acapulco) and exotic (Chinatown) settings and these strange locales allow Welles to examine how his characters respond to a diverse array of atmospheres and social/cultural settings. Welles himself plays the central character in the film, Michael O'Hara, and to do so he affects an Irish accent (another international touch) that, some critics argue, is supposed to sound false/inauthentic. O'Hara has a way of talking that sounds a bit too self-consciously literary; and though he affects a working class worldliness his yarns sound like they come straight out of Conrad (O'Hara echoes many of Conrad's colonial concerns) and Hemingway (O'Hara echoes Hemingway's anti-Franco sentiments) and so we suspect that this character has spent more time reading and writing stories than in actually working. Whether we believe Michael's Irish brogue is authentic or not we know that he is fond of creating fictions and this casts suspicions on his identity as well as on his version of events that we hear on the voiceover. Furthermore, we can see that his obsession with literature has given him a taste for the romantic and the typically masculine posturing of his favorite literary heroes and instead of making him worldly wise this just makes him all the more gullible when a pretty lady and the promise of a new adventure come along.Elsa (played by Welles' then-wife Rita Hayworth)identifies Michael as an easy mark the first time they meet. Unlike Michael Elsa actually is worldly and we can tell she's seen and experienced a lot and that she knows a lot about the world (not just read a lot about it) and she sees through Michael's pseudo-brogue and bravura right away and knows exactly how to exploit his romantic tendencies. She sums him up and plays him from the first moment they exchange knowing glances (hers much more knowing than his). Michael prides himself on his independence and his integrity but he just can't help falling for Elsa's pretend innocence and helplessness--its just too good to resist-- and he can't help wanting to come charging to her rescue even though there are signs everywhere that indicate that Elsa is in no need of rescuing. At first Michael resists her job offer but she is a woman who always gets her way and soon Michael is one of her employee/servants just like all of the other men in the film. Michael just can't tear himself away from Elsa's dangerously seductive & corruptive charms that he willingly and perhaps willfully misinterprets as innocence and helplessness only because that version of her makes him feel better about his own true motives. Michael has been hired on as an extra hand on Elsa's husband's yacht and as soon as he steps foot on deck everyone else aboard sizes him up and begins figuring how they can use him to further their own plots. Elsa's husband Bannister is a famous lawyer and both he and his partner Grisby are, like Michael, under Elsa's spell and trying to plot their way out of captivity. As the yacht pulls out of harbor we see the word "Circe" written in bold letters on the yacht's hull.Elsa's past is a secret only hinted at (all we know is that she was born on an island somewhere in the east & spent some time in Shanghai). She looks like the penultimate American blonde but she is not from America and her cultural reference points are decidely eastern in contrast to Michael's western points of reference; to Michael she represents the unknown and perhaps the unkowable, and this is part of her allure and also what makes her so dangerous. "Elsa" is the prototypical femme fatale and the conventions of the film noir genre tell us that things will not end well for anyone that gets too close but she's just too enticing. The most famous scene of the film has Elsa in a sleek black bathing suit diving off some perilous rocks as if she were accustomed to such danger and as if danger was her natural element. But then she lays down to sunbathe on the rocks and from the relative safety of the boat Michael looking on, anxiously aware of how dangerous she is, can allow himself the comforting illusion that she is vulnerable and that she needs saving and that only he can save her not only from all the other male predators on board, but save her from her own eastern imbued fatalistism.Elsa is so beautiful that she has all of the men in the film believing exactly what she wants them to believe and all of them believing that they've actually got a chance with her. And the men all slowly lose their head around her. Some of the men talk down to her but still they do what she says and she has all of them plotting against each other while lighting her cigarettes. The film has been criticized for having an impossibly tangled plot but I think the point of the film is that you are never supposed to be certain or not whether Elsa is merely defending herself against the men who want to control her or if Elsa has been in control of all of them (just like she has been in control of Michael) from the start. Even at the end we still want to believe that Elsa is a victim of something, perhaps something from her past that she just can't escape, but since we don't know what her past was we have no ultimate insight into what has been driving her all along nor for that matter do we have any insight into what originary crime or sin has been driving the men all along; all we know is that the sexes and the races and the classes are at odds. Elsa remains an unknown all the way through and Michael once ensnared must realize that he too is an unknown because under her influence he has been forced to act against what he perceived to be his own true nature.The Lady from Shanghai offers some of the most stunning visuals of any film noir I know of. The Acapulco scenes are especially exciting as the danger and unpredictability of a foreign woman is made especially inviting and exciting in a foreign land. In this film Welles offers the ultimate noir vision of anxiously uncertain men and women attracted to each other but also repelled by what they find themselves attracted to and what they find themselves doing in the name of desire. Its a film noir and that means that the film follows certain recognizable conventions but it does more than simply follow those conventions, it pushes those conventions as far as they have been pushed and explores the nature of those conventions in a more thorough way than any noir before or, arguably, since. By the end of the film the characters have become lost in their own plots and no longer know who they are and this is conveyed brilliantly with Welles use of masks & mirrors in the celebrated and luridly twisted funhouse scene which feels a bit like the famous Dali sequence in Hitchcock's Spellbound but is even more disorienting & disconcerting (Spellbound was released in 1945 so it is possible, even likely, that Welles had seen it and that it influenced his own film that was made in 1946 and released in 1948). [In the extra featurette that follows the film we learn that Welles himself painted much of the funhouse props and set.]There are a lot of bad noirs out there and these give the genre a bad name but the few good ones are among the best films ever made. Welles' reputation would be greater if film noir were better understood and appreciated not as a genre that is as cheap as the dime novels that inspired it but a genre where cinema explores its own methods and techniques.  The great directors from Lang & Von Stroheim to Welles & Hitchcock to Godard & Chabrol and the other new wave auteurs have all been attracted to noir for this reason.A brilliant film. After this film (which was a commerical flop) Welles didn't work in America for ten years and when he did return to America he made Touch of Evil (another brilliant noir film). Touch of Evil also failed to generate revenue and effectively ended Welles career as a mainstream director even though he continued to make independently financed small pictures like Othello, Macbeth, The Trial & Chimes at Midnight.
The best of all movies about Jesus so far. This was an experience rather than just a great movie for me....I have very often wished I were "There" at that time, and have endlessly envied the people who saw and heard Jesus.I did not expect that "Matthew" would bring me as close as possible to my wish. The director's and Bruce Marchiano's 'vision' and understanding of who Jesus really was, their attention to His words about his "joy" produced a wonderful movie.I think that for people to follow Jesus leaving their life behind in a moment, He must have been a very warm, friendly, caring man, a young, fit, tanned carpenter who walked miles in the sun to get around. Bruce Marchiano did an incredible job showing us that. We have been so conditioned to avoid affection and touching people, that many of us think that's the way human beings should act with each other.Yet in the Middle East, it is customary to this day for men to walk with their male friends with their arms around each other's shoulders!!!Jesus was Love above all, divine Love in human form; could not have been affected by human "norms"-he must have been a man with the purest, most genuine behavior, something we, today, have to think HARD in order to imagine (sadly!).On the other hand, Jesus telling off the Pharisees is a gut-wrenching scene, extremely powerful and emotional. I even doubt Bruce Marchiano was "acting" the sorrow and anger of it. After all, he's devoted his life to working for God after the making of "Matthew", which forced him to study the Bible intensely.This movie kept me on the sofa for the entire 4 hours-often in tears, often with an unbearable feeling of "being there, then", not as a spectator, but as a participant .For the first time, Jesus was truly the real focus of the movie, and his parables, sharp intellect, dialectic skill worthy of a great lawyer, and teaching, with Bruce Marchiano's excellent delivery, became so easily understood. No Hollywood excesses and distractions here.Beautiful cinematography, incredibly realistic landscapes, costumes, gorgeous-just gorgeous music....nothing was missing from this film. Well....the Hollywood excess was missing, and it was not needed.I have no idea why Jesus has been portrayed as rather aloof and serious, as if always burdened until "Matthew", but I just feel it's been inaccurate. Jesus was fully a Jewish man in his time on Earth, who laughed and loved and was not ashamed to cry in public-as it is documented in the gospels. He was dealing with simple, uneducated people-their following Him without food for 2-3 days to hear Him, and loving him, tells me that He related to them on "their" level.I watch all of the movie or part of it at least once a week, and it never gets "old".I know from Bruce Marchiano's website that he wants to fund strictly from donations, not banks, another word-for-word movie,"The Gospel according to John", and I hope he -or rather, we- accomplishes it soon-in fact I can't wait. In the years that have passed since "Matthew" his love, knowledge, and understanding of Jesus has grown a lot, so I think he'll bring us an even more inspired movie.
PEANUTS FOREVER. This is so fantastic words really can't describe,I have to sayafter buying this from AMAZON I had to buy another,than another.Now I am waiting for Paramount to put them all out,A Charlie BrownChristmas is perhaps one of the best if not thee. The voices arefresh and delightful the story fantastic and the piano breathlessYou can view this really at anytime not just for x-mas.Everyonein the world should be a PEANUTS fan for everyone of us have aCharlie Brown,Lucy,Linus,Peppermint Patty,Franklin,Marcie,SallySnoopy and of course Woodstock in them.PEANUTS FOREVER!!
Bad Movies Don't Get Any Better Than This!. Phil Tucker's magnum opus, "Robot Monster", ranks among the best bad movies ever made.The plot is incoherent, the acting ranges from bad to awful and the eponymous "Robot Monster" is a guy in a gorilla suit with a tin foil covered diving helmet who communicates with his home planet using a bubble machine.Originally released in 3-D, this DVD uses a good 2-D print and the transfer is pretty good.This is a "must have" for fans of bad movies
u'll never look at your teacher the same way again.... i'm still in high school nn all i can say is- this movie definitely made me think twice before p*ss*n another one of my teachers off again....
"I need to be a hero.". As this wonderful movie opens, we enter the world of Eve's Bayou, the Louisiana home of ten-year old Eve (Jurnee Smollett) and her charming, philandering father Louis (Samuel L. Jackson), her glamorous and superstitious mother, her psychic aunt (Debbi Turner), and her big sister who idolizes Daddy as much as Eve does.   The narrator's opening line concerns a murder, and we wait for this terrible event to occur.I was surprised at how much I enjoyed this movie.  It drew me in and held me spellbound, with it's believable story and likeable characters.  We really get to know and care about Eve's family and all their secrets.  The actors are uniformly excellent, especially the young star, Jurnee Smollett.  The director succeeds by constantly reminding us of the picturesque bayou setting and its unique community.   As the story got closer and closer to the inevitable tragedy, I was almost holding my breath.  It's an intense story about real, multi-layered people.  Highly recommended
Not a classic, but I like this movie. I happen to like all of the main actors in this film: Ally Sheedy, Phoebe Cates, Virginia Madsen and Treet Williams. If you like them, too, perhaps you'll like this movie.Sure, Heart of Dixie has its flaws.  I won't argue with the previous reviewer, other than to say that a one-star rating is awfully harsh.This is not a civil rights movie in the way that Ghosts of Mississippi or Mississippi Burning is a civil rights movie.  It's more a coming of age story. I enjoyed watching Ally Sheedy's character learn who she is and what she wants to become.Yep, Heart of Dixie is lightweight.  Yep, it could have been done better.And still, I like it.
TMNT II - Secret of the Ooze (DVD). I've loved the Ninja Turtles since I was old enough to watch TV, so I automatically love anything to do with them
Saving Grace is worth saving. This is a delightful film.  A very funny British comedy. Craig Ferguson, who wrote the script and co-stars, is one very creative guy.  If you haven't seen it, check out the Late Late Show on CBS, which he now hosts.  He is the funniest guy on late night tv, in my humble opinion.  I've shared the Saving Grace dvd with a few friends and they have all loved it.  Just sayin'
Fascinating. Discovered this gem courtesy of a science museum.  We watch this as a family.  Beautiful cinematography!  I get a kick out of the subtitles being used for information on the current birds and their migration.  A great addition to a nature/science video collection
A Classic From the 1940s. This movie is an excellent buy for those who enjoy classics of the 1930s - 40s. I especially enjoyed Richard Widmark's performance in his first role as the unstable, evil-laughing gangster Tommy Udo. Victor Mature does a respectable job as the former miscreant trying to start a clean new life by cutting a deal with the district attorney to "squeal" on the nasty Udo. All-in-all, it's an enjoyable classic that I would definitely recommend
It's no Forrest Gump but just as realistic. Hey - if your not too caught up in the original Dumb & Dumber andthe "We can't laugh unless we're having our brains" then youuuuuu might like it (not a box of chocolates):
Superb Movie. I bought this DVD for research purposes.  I will be performing in "Promises, Promises" the musical based on "The Apartment".  I am so glad I bought this DVD, as this is a great film.  That's not just my opinion.  "The Apartment" was nominated for 10 Academy Awards, and won 5, including Best Picture and Best Director in 1960.This film will speak to you on many levels.  On one level, it is an indictment of corporate politics and a condemnation of philandering executives.  On another level, it is an examination of extramarital affairs, and the sometimes dire consequences.  On another level, it is a love story where a damsel in distress literally meets her white knight.  Then again, it is about people who fall into the abyss, only to find redemption and the happiness they deserve.  It is about knowing what is right, and finally finding the courage to do what is right.The cinematography is great, as is the lighting.  The setup is perfect.  We are shown the enormity of a life insurance company, with its 31,000 employees in the Manhattan headquarters.  The shots of the teeming, faceless humanity are fantastic.  The long shots of the endless office are fabulous, and will make you appreciate black and white.  Out of this morass, we are asked to get to know 3 people; C.C. Baxter (Jack Lemmon), Fran Kubelik (Shirley Maclaine) and J.D. Sheldrake (Fred Macmurray).  They are embroiled in a love triangle that will change all of their lives.The late, great, Jack Lemmon is a wonderful C.C. (Chuck) Baxter.  Lemmon was a dapper 35 years of age when this film was made.  He wants to get ahead, and he does so by selling himself out.  He loans his apartment to senior executives for their extramarital assignations.  They in turn promise to move him up the corporate ladder.  There is humor in this, as Baxter trys to juggle "appointments" with 4 different execs.  But, as in the rest of this film, there is a pathos to it.Chuck has quite a thing for cute elevator operator Fran, played by a 26 year old Shirley Maclaine.  She returns his innocent flirtations, but for some reason keeps her distance.  Maclaine is all sweetness and vulnerability.  So, why won't she go out with Chuck?As it turns out, Fran has a boyfriend.  That boyfriend is the Director of Personnel, J.D. Sheldrake.  Sheldrake is quite married, and has slept with many women in the office, including his Secretary Peggy Olsen.  Macmurray plays a wonderful cad.  He is not sleazy or oily.  He is able to continue stringing Fran along until one fateful Christmas Eve.I won't continue discussing the plot, as you need to experience it as it unfolds.  While "what happens next" is not a huge leap of the imagination, the skill of the actors and the sensitive direction make for fascinating viewing.  There are some great scenes in this film.  The pivotal Christmas Eve scene with Sheldrake and Fran will get you at a visceral level.  Macmurray and Maclaine shine here; her with vulnerability and his meeting her vulnerability with incredible insensitivity.  Brilliant.  Lemmon shines in the "discovery" scene when he figures out that Fran is involved with Sheldrake.  Sheldrake had borrowed the apartment for a rendezvous with Fran, and Fran left her compact behind.  The compact had a broken mirror. Chuck, not knowing who it belonged to, returned it to Sheldrake.  Later, at a Christmas Eve party, Fran loans her mirror to Chuck, who recognizes it.  Lemmon communicated so many emotions with his face, his voice, and his body.  He was such an actor.This movie is listed among the Top 100 movies of all time, and it deserves a place on your shelf.Highly recommended.
worth watching again and again. Rose Red is one of those movies that stays with you long after it's over. Don't let the length of the movie (almost 6 hrs.) turn you off to watching it. It's well worth the time to sit down and watch this brilliant masterpiece. The cast was wonderfully chosen. From Nancy Travis who plays Dr.Joyce Reardon. The woman who becomes fasinated with a haunted mansion called Rose Red to the point of risking other peoples lives to prove to her boss and collegues that Rose Red truly is haunted. To Annie Wheaton played by Kimberly J. Brown who has the power to waken Rose Red from a deep sleep by using her mind to do. If your a Stephen King fan than you won't want to miss this, and for the rest of you who aren't, well give the movie a try anyway. You won't be disappointed
Brilliant satire. Proof once again that the Brits make the best films.  This film would never be made in America.  Its blend of social satire, comedy, political comment, and underlying seriousness, makes this film unique.  That someone could call this film "frothy" is incomprehensible to me.  It is a deft satire with a serious message, without ever seeming serious. The film makes you think while it is entertaining you.  Guiness is superb as the brilliant, but clueless, scientist who invents a fabric that never gets dirty and never wears out.  Seems great, doesn't it.  But a worker at the plant where Sidney (Guinness) works sees what he doesn't: that they will only have to make one lot. So labor turns against the idea, and of course, management wants to suppress it (in favor of planned obsolescence).It is all delicious fun all the way, all the while making you think about modern, consumer-driven economies.  The cast is composed of Ealing regulars, all of whom turn in top notch performances.  This is one of the all time great films.  Don't miss it
Zombos Closet Review. Tobe Hooper, who recently did the unsettling Dance of the Dead episode for Masters of Horror on Showtime, as well as the family classic, Texas Chain Saw Massacre (1974), presents a not so pretty picture of carnival life, and a somewhat pathetic-albeit homicidal-monster with a decidedly unhandsome visage, and penchant for mayhem.The opening of the film is a nod to Halloween and Psycho, two other masterworks of the genre, and from there builds into a creepy story revolving around teen lust, sleazy carnival characters, and a `man-made' monster that has needs like everyone else, but simply cannot satisfy them in more socially acceptable ways. A fascinating subtext running through the story is that it is a variation on the tragedy of Dr. Frankenstein and his monster. In Tobe Hooper's tale, the monster is one born of genetic mutation, cleverly foreshadowed by the Freak Animals Alive tent exhibit, where the fetal brother of the monster floats in a jar as an abominable attraction for the hoi polloi.Indeed, in the film's opening sequence, the Frankenstein monster is carefully shown, first as a poster showing the Glenn Strange characterization (my favorite!), and then as a Mego doll-oh sorry, action figure-carried by the young boy, Joey, whose sister soon curses him because of his bizarre prank that scares the wits out of her. Joey's actions are also another subtext running through the film: he dons a mask to become a monster that frightens his sister, and the actual monster wears a Frankenstein mask to become less of a monster, and therefore less frightening to others.It is interesting to note that, unlike the current spate of horror films that feature eye (popping)-candy and little else, in this film, the characters are presented with choices, yet consistently make the wrong ones. And as we all know, in a horror film, when you make the wrong choices, someone, or more likely today everyone, winds up dead. Amy, Buzz, Liz, Ritchie, and Joey consistently make the wrong choices, and suffer the dire consequences. In the tale of Dr. Frankenstein and his monstrous creation, wrong choices also led to death and disaster, but at least here we have the Funhouse!The funhouse is surrounded by the carnival, a seedy, grimy affair filled with seedy and grimy denizens. There is a bag lady that looks very much like Grandmama from the Addams Family spouting "god is watching you!" a homeless man that wonders around like a zombie, a few bums, the past her prime fortune teller and palm reader (well played by Sylvia Miles), the not so magnificent Marco the Magician, and the barkers (three of them superbly played by Kevin Conway as if he were a natural).  Properly toned by John Beal's score and Andrew Lazlo's cinematography, the loud and brightly lit carnival facade hides a darker, more primitive underbelly of murderous anarchy, and its nexus is the funhouse, established by Mr. Hooper's use of two tracking crane shots, one at the beginning and one at the ending of the mayhem, that emanate from the funhouse to encompass its surroundings.Our hapless group of monster fodder soon regrets their decision to stay the night in the funhouse, and Joey soon regrets sneaking out from his bedroom-down the trusty-trellis-by-the-window-to visit the carnival. We also learn that the father of the monster has regrets about letting it live, in a scene that contains a wealth of hinted at backstory, but must share responsibility for its actions because of choices he has made. Dean Koontz, in his novelization of the film, includes this back story.The climactic confrontation in the mechanical belly of the funhouse is suitably horrific, yet uses little gore, and, unlike the requisite sequelization antics of many fright films today, provides a definitive and satisfying closure. Unlike the mindless snuff horror approach to today's films, The Funhouse explores themes and provides a story depth that is worth viewing, along with the thrills and chills
Exceptionally well made. This movie requires patience. There is no gripping storyline that edges you out of your seat. There are no profound messages weaved into the dialogues.But once you understand that, you'll find that the storyline in Yi Yi might surprisingly be like your own. There is no central theme to the movie. Nor do the characters suddenly experience life changing events in the course of a few weeks. Other than a wedding, funeral, and a child birth, very little changes in the long term.But isn't that how real life is? Problems aren't really solved - they just pass over time. And it just might be mundane events of family life that defines who you are as a person.With each viewing I have grown to appreciate this movie even more. The new 2005 DVD edition is beautifully edited and is much, much better than the 2000 version.  I watched it during a rainy day when there were no distractions. Highly recommended.
Did I Ever Tell You How Lucky You Are. This was, by far, my favorite book growing up.  I loved trying to figure out how to say the strange words and eventually, I could almost recite the entire book from memory.  I still can the first few pages.  I don't know that I was helped psycologically, but it sure was and is a fun book
Despite the inclusion of Tom Green... It was pretty damn funny!This movie was recommended by my good friend, Bobby Asslong.  In most cases his recommendations are a bunch of [...], but he hit it right on, with this one!  I detest Tom Green.  He is one of those guys, who that when he fails at something (Talk Show, most of his movies, life) I actually feel happy.  And this is actually contrary to my normal personality.  I normally automatically love all Canadians.  Just kidding. I normally want people to succeed, and feel bad when they fail.But Tom Green is so annoying.Great news!  He is in only about 4 or 5 scenes in this whole movie, so you should be able to get through this movie, with little to none hatred for Mr. Green.I love all the characters in this movie, especially the main protagonist, who accidentally sends the videotape to his girlfriend at a far away college.  He is very likeable, and you're pulling for him the whole time.  Another thing I like this movie, is that it pulls a lot from other "gross out" teen and college flicks, but it doesn't go overboard in the gross out department.Tom Green plays the Voice Over explainer in the movie, and he actually does a pretty good job, without appearing stupid.I give this high reviews!MC White said:  Check it out!!
Refined but difficult. Rating and reviewing movies like these are often difficult for the average critic.  On one hand, they're done absolutely brilliantly done in ways that take one's breath away; on the other hand, how much credit can you give to a movie that is pure propaganda, especially propaganda for something the reviewer doesn't agree with?This "realistic re-enactment" of the events of October 25th, 1917, is actually anything but realism.  Instead, it is a harrowing and amazing Romantic experience.  This is not to say it's bad--it's brilliant!  The direction and editing on this film are much more refined than Eisenstein's previous and much-more-heralded film, Brenonsets Potyemkin (Battleship Potemkin), and it has a whole lot more symbolism and focus on literary devices.  His fast-paced cutting is not as disjunctive as previously; instead, it works to shock the viewer with the juxtapositions.  I don't think I shall ever get the quick back-and-forth cutting between that one soldier's face and the firing machine gun ever out of my mind.  It's just that powerful.This movie is so good, in fact, that it makes me proud to be a Bolshevik... and I'm not, not in any way or form!  How's that for being a powerful, well-done movie?  The Birth of a Nation didn't effectively make me proud to be a Klansman, for a comparison...Because of its intense political alignment, I can't see everyone appreciating this film.  There will always be those out there who say, "Ah, it's only Communist propaganda" (which is right) "so it's not even worth watching..." (which is wrong).  For those who are looking for a magnificent cinematic experience, however, this movie is a fine choice indeed.--PolarisDi
OH YEA!. OH YEA, WATCH THIS MOVIE!I can describe this movie with just 2 words:FUN-NY!!!!
Beastmaster (special edition). This is a must for purchasing dvds! This is one movie that should be on dvd and still in the market! This special edition different from the original dvd release. The original dvd release as just the movie. This special edition featured full length intewrviews with the cast from 2005. They were also pictures of the cast, including the witch women. They weren't ugly, they were gorgous. I don't know why the director wanted to place those ugly masks over thier beauty, I mean not all witches are ugly!
This movie Just demonstaits Tim roths amazing abilitys. This was a great movie. Not only was it full of history and twists. I watched Hoodlem a day before and to see Tim Roth in two completly oposite Roles and still pulling it off w\ such finess and agility! F*&amp;#ing  Amazing!!! If you liked A Clockwork Orange and you like deap movies! Rent  this! It kicks azz!
Absorbing . . . Biopics, as a rule, so oversimplify and sentimentalize their subjects that it's rare to find one that presents a plausible picture of a life actually lived. To have lived such a brief life, as young Basquiat did, may seem to come to the aid of the 90-minute filmmaker, but that this story of a brilliant New York street artist comes across as believable at all is a testament to the performances, the script, and the direction. The only thing really missing in this film is an appreciation of Basquiat's works themselves. Maybe you leave that for the Learning Channel.Jeffrey Wright is just fine as the troubled and gifted artist who became an overnight sensation in the New York art world and then, according to writer/director Julian Schnabel (who should know) was more or less eaten alive by it. And he holds his own with a supporting cast of notables including Christopher Walken, Gary Oldman, Dennis Hopper, Parker Posey, Benicio del Toro, and others, including David Bowie as a wonderfully sympathetic Andy Warhol. While you may take exception to the accuracy of the film, you find yourself accepting it as a portrayal of a certain kind of life that has been regarded from the beginning as larger than life - and any resemblance to Van Gogh is intended from the start. The richly varied music track, including snatches of Miles' Davis' "Kind of Blue," is also wonderful
Girls Just Wanna Have ADVENTURE!. Breaking the mold of typical chick flicks, The Descent features a group of young women who seek their good times in the most unlikely of places - caves!  This film details the story of a girls' weekend in the woods, filled with gossip, laughter, and - of course - spelunking.  Rebellious Juno learns an important lesson about telling the truth as she leads the girls on their expedition into a breathtakingly expansive cave, and the group of girls are delightfully excited to discover a previously unknown species of cave creature with fiesty personalities.  Sarah, the protagonist, teaches us, the viewers, to be brave in the face of adversity, and above all else, to have trust in yourself
By far Michael Apted's masterpiece!. Above the incandescent and vivid performance of Sigourney Weaver, the primatologist, whose overwhelming devotion to the once nearly extinct mountain gorillas of Central Africa led to her eventual murder. The storytelling is ravishing and let the viewer with the absolute conviction she crossed the border line around the investigation and the self experience in many issues.A magnificent and disturbing movie, hard to forget in years.A winner film!
One of the better Stephen King adaptions. This is somewhat of an important horror film, atleast for me, that has been forgotten or maligned over time. When it came out, all of the popular horror movies were hack and slash/dead teenager/empty boogey men tales. Stephen King adaptions helped put the humanity back in horror, even if the films didn't always do his books justice (The Shining, Children of the Corn).This was the first one to really strike a cord since Carrie. There are no heroes here and no real villians either. No starry-eyed buxom brunette or burly square-jawed male is triumphant in the end. No silent intense man-monster "gets it." In fact it doesn't end happily at all. Something of a rarity in popular horror at the time.Also rare is that all the performances are 1st rate as is the music (wonderfully haunting and sentimental at turns). The lighting of the movie is documentary-like, giving the film a realism and naturalism lost in today's underlit, over-stylized gore-fests. It also makes the shift from family drama to zombie tale feel all the more startlingly believable.Though underdeveloped and slightly rushed (what you thought Paramount, then home of "Friday the 13th," would produce a 2.5 hr character drama about a man terrorized by his dead family?) this movie is a fast-paced horror-tragedy with real heart in its story and performance and direction. A rarity in Hollywood then and now too.Favorite quote from the film:  "Lie down. Play dead. BE DEAD!!
Worth Waiting For. I had heard of "The Shop on Main Street" years ago but never had the chance to see it until tonight.  I even bought and read the book by Ladislaw Grosman 17 years ago in anticipation of seeing the movie some day.  I must admit that the book was impressive but not THAT impressive and so I worried that the movie might be anticlimatical.  It wasn't.  The book was a long short story, a novella, if you will.  It laid out the story clearly enough but it was the movie that brought all of the characters to life and created the gradual development of the impending crisis.  By the time we reached that crisis we had met a few jerks and unimpressive characters.  However, we had also come to know and appreciate a number of people that we found endearing for different reasons.  As events darken the scene, we suspect something bad is about to happen.  I knew what it was going to be but it still had an impact for me.The two main characters in "The Shop on Main Street" are an elderly Jewish woman, played outstandingly by Ida Kaminska, and a neer-do-well Slovakian carpenter, played impressively by Josef Kraner.  The way these two come to interact with each other and the ebb and flo of their relationship is the heart of the movie.  The picture gives a personal look at the Final Solution as it is played out in a small Czech village.  The emotions that the director brings out on film is where the movie soars above the book.Watching "The Shop on Main Street" is a moving experience.  It challenges us and leaves us wondering where we would have fit into this cast of characters.  In doing so, we may come to have a slightly better understanding of the incomprehensible.  That oxymoron is worth the two hours spent watching "The Shop on Main Street".  The raw emotions on display will stay with you long after
This video is just terrific!!!. This stretching video is amazing. It has helped me so much. I do it several times a week and I am so much more flexible than I was. I have more energy, feel better, and find that my muscles are not as tight as they used to be. These are great stretches for all fitness levels
Inspiring, Compelling, and Highly Watchable Military Drama. This one's been sitting in my collection for a while and I finally popped it in and watched it. I'm glad I did. Not only was I treated to an amazing drama, but also to the brilliance of Sir Alec Guinness and John Mills. Alec Guinness was one of our finest actors, and in Tunes of Glory, he is without peer. His portrayal of the whiskey-loving and irascable Jock Sinclair is one of the highlights of his estimable career. John Mills, who plays his antithesis, is equally memorable as the replacement colonel whose by-the-book leadership sets the stage for a clash of wills that is mesmerizing to watch.Mills plays his role so well his frustration with Guinness's Sinclair is almost palpable. At times, Colonel Barrows's head almost explodes in apoplectic fits. Sinclair's heavy-drinking and jocular exploits is too much for the straight-laced Barrows, and the confrontation between these two large egos can only end in tragedy.A great examination of military ritual and tradition, and a fine example of superb acting. Highly recommended
Gripping Family Drama. Gino Monetti (Edward G. Robinson) is the toast of his enclave in Depression era New York.  He runs a loan company that doles out cash to customers with no collateral.  Who cares that he charges usurious rates.  His sons abet him in his thriving business and fall neatly under his iron thumb.  Then the feds come calling.  All the resentment and deceit that had been percolating for years rises to the top and favorite son Max(Richard Conte) has to take the fall.  Director Joseph Mankiewicz has crafted a terrific film about how the sins of the fathers visits wrath upon their sons.  Edward G. Robinson does a terrific turn as the ever smiling patriarch with arsenic for blood.  The underutilized Richard Conte is his equal or better as the son who has to the suffer the slings and arrows of the charade that the Monetti house of cards was.  I remember seeing this film years ago on Cinemax and anxiously awaited it's DVD release.  Just because a film is relatively obscure does not detract from it's greatness
Subversive comedy that probably won't appeal to the  hoi polloi. So what's wrong with this movie?  Why are all of these people on Amazon say it's "boring" or only worth seeing as a historical relic?  Perhaps they are just feeling a bit left out.These people will immediately recognize that this humor is not to their taste.  But you should take a look for yourself.  You may find that all of the "flaws" that others see are actually effective elements here.Exposition has been paired down to the minimum.  Do you really want all of that exposition in your screwball comedy?  I'd rather skip ahead to the larfs.There are a lot of laughs.  Everyone who likes this movie picks a different favorite moment.I enjoy the absurdist tone of the scenes.  The intimidating social order is shown to be made up of individuals who don't so much support that order, but just follow it.  Our protagonist is just trying to help them to let it all hang out.So there's my stuffy analysis, but do you want to see it?  No?  What if I told you it had:Psychedelic train freak outRaquel Welch surrounded by topless womenproof that all Asian people don't look the same to old white peoplethe most obnoxious car ever imagined(40 years before its time)how to talk your way out of a parking tickethow to cultivate an appreciation for the fine art
ha ha ha great movie!!! ha ha ha!!!. greatly funny!!!a must get!!!hillarious!!!wow and a ha ha!!!i recomend this movie to all who love rock and to all who love comedy...and those who love both to
The Doublest Crosser of Them All. This spellbinding 1946 B&W flick, set in California, pits sultry Lana Turner against John Garfield in a neverending love-hate relationship, which ironically parallels the lives of its 2 stars. Turner, 7 times married & dead in 1995 at 74, is electrified at first glance by Garfield, in real life, a tough Jewish bad boy who was later blacklisted during the McCarthy era, and died in 1952 at 39. Classic scenes in this all-American classic include: shots in the Twin Oaks Diner,(owned by the husband Lana didn't love), including donuts and a steaming mug of coffee - full-body shots of Lana in shorts & halter top (one helluva beautiful dame) - and a wonderful "love me or leave me" scene in the Pacific Ocean, where Lana tests the love of the only man she has ever loved. According to legend, the title of this short James M. Cain novella had no relevance in the book. Not so in the movie. Find out for yourself why the postman always rings twice and why this is one of the greatest movies ever made.
"Heathcliff, do come to me.". To me, Heathcliff is one of the most complex and compelling characters ever written and I had once thought that any actor would fall short in playing him in a film or miniseries.  Having watched this beautiful and haunting adaptation of one of my favorite novels of all time, I have to say that Ralph Fiennes has more than succeeded in bringing the aforementioned anti-hero to life.  Emily Bronte would have been proud.  Everyone who has read Wuthering Heights knows about the tragic love story between Cathy and Heathcliff and how he becomes a dark, brooding, manipulative, diabolical man who takes his revenge on the people who he feels have wronged him and torn him away from Cathy, including her daughter and his own child and ward.  Fiennes brings out Heathcliff's many conflicting emotions flawlessly and his performance floored me.  Juliette Binoche as Cathy Linton/Catherine Earnshaw is great as well.  The supporting cast is quite splendid too -- no cardboard cutout performances here!  The backdrop of the moors is beautiful and gothic, just like Bronte described them in her book.  I am very impressed with this adaptation.  I haven't seen the 1939 film adaptation or the miniseries from Masterpiece Theater yet, but I wonder if they come close to this wonderful film.  The BBC will produce an adaptation some time next year and I think that Richard Armitage (North and South) would make a wonderful Heathcliff because he too could bring many nuances to his acting.  In the meantime, I shall treasure this one and watch it over and over again
"Random events" and dreams become one woman's key... This movie is so much more than what seems to be on the surface.What appears to be a senseless act of terrorism aboard a train turns into an unraveling of the buried  years of heartache,abuse and lack of true love of one Emily Delahunty (though she admits that even this is not her true name).Maggie Smith brings this character to full passionate life and awareness.Emily,for some reason,is at her very best in life when she is caring for others.She is unexpectedly put into this position when a bomb explodes in her train car leaving only herself and three other survivors.Emily has been a writer of "bodice-rippers" and has published many of these fantastical romance novels under many nom-de-plumes.What she encounters in the months of recovery with these three survivors at her villa in Umbria,as well as the continuous nightdreams she has, set her up for the biggest and most important discoveries long buried in her own past.She suffers from guilt and the unraveling of her life will prove to be the redemption of it.This is one outstanding movie from HBO that needs to be viewed over and over.To be taken in by the breathtaking countryside of Italy and to miss the deep substance of this film would be a tragedy.Though Smith is backed up by a marvelous supporting cast that include Chris Cooper and Timothy Spall,this is her film and she does it as a "Dame" should-masterfully
The Lost World the best since the original. This is the best movie based on Sir Arthur Conan Doyle's book The Lost World. I've seen all the other ones and this is got to be the best one right up there with the original 1925 version. The SFX are the best, just  like the ones in Jurassic Park. And the acting is good too. If your a movie  buff and want to spend money then this is the movie for you
Love Atlantis. I think this was a great spin off from stargate sg-1 which was starting to get stale even though I love watching it still.Love being able to download them all, just wish they'd get updated quicker!Honestly, when I left 2 weeks ago I saw the last episode available and I've missed the next 2
Underrated romantic comedy. Prince's 1986 romantic comedy "Under the Cherry Moon" finally received the DVD treatment it deserved in the Summer of 2004. When the film was released, it was bombarded with bad reviews but this film is actually decent. Of course the music stands out but it actually succeeds as a comedy. The acting may be full of flaws but it's the 80's, what do you expect? Prince and Jerome Benton , from The Time, are gigolos living it up in South France and they come across a beautiful heiress (Kristin Scott Thomas) who happens to get her trust fund on her 21st birthday. They both woo her for the money but Prince ends up catching feelings for her. With a beautifully filmed movie and an incredible soundtrack, "Under the Cherry Moon" fails to disappoint
Baseball fans will enjoy this one. 'The Curse of the Grebes' is sort of a tribute to the Red Sox return to World Series glory with cameos by Damon, Timlin and Renteria. Timlin actually does a great acting job and even recites a poem by Emily Dickinson with remarkable aplomb. 'Arthur Changes Gears' is also great, he gets a bike he's been coveting for a while but when he finally gets it he's so worried about getting it dirty that he won't ride it
The Hunger  ~ Catherine Deneuve. I have been looking for this vampire movie for awhile. I love this movie and am glad I found it
Highly amusing nautical comedy. I had been told that this screwball naval comedy included every submarine film cliche known to man, and noted that it had not been a particularly huge hit when it came out ten years ago. But as the hero was played by Kelsey Grammer (Frasier) I thought it would be worth picking up a pre-viewed copy to throw into my computer drive to enliven the last 90 minutes of a four-hour train journey.In the event this film was vastly better than I had expected and the other passengers must have wondered what I was laughing at.Grammer plays Lieutenant Commander Tom Dodge, a highly talented but utterly unconventional submarine officer whose sense of humour and far from by-the-book attitudes have placed him in grave danger of being passed over for command of his own boat. The film opens with a fierce debate at a promotion board,at which Rear Admiral Graham (Bruce Dern) who has taken a particular dislike to Dodge, argues that he is too maverick a personality to be trusted with command of a nuclear submarine.But there is a compromise on offer. Graham's superior, Vice Admiral Winslow (Rip Torn) who is not quite so prejudiced against unconventional officers if they get the job done, has noticed that the former Soviet Union is selling off old diesel summarines in job lots to tin-pot unstable countries like Iran and Iraq. (Quite a prescient point given that this film was made five years before 9/11).Admiral Winslow wants to test the possibility that the ultra-sophisticated high tech units deployed to defend the US coast against equally sophisticated attackers might make mistakes if faced with a much lower tech but crafty opponent - particularly if the enemy captain is highly unconventional or, in his words "a pirate."So they give Dodge command of an ancient rustbucket of a diesel submarine called "Stingray" and invite him to see if he can get past all the much better equipped defenders of two key naval bases.Admiral Winslow has a soft spot for Dodge, and gives him a green light to ignore the rules the way a real rogue attacker would; Admiral Graham is determined to humiliate him and does his best to make the Stingray's task "Mission Impossible." He starts by assigning Dodge a "crew from hell" of oddballs and misfits. These include a mad martinet, Martin Pascal (Rod Schneider) as his XO, and Lieutenant Emily Lake, (Lauren Holly), the first woman ever to serve as diving officer on a US submarine but who has no previous experience outside a simulator. Almost all of the crew have a combination of strengths and weaknesses - for example the sonarman, nicknamed "Sonar" (Harland Williams) has absurdly good hearing but is a very odd character and rather too prone to saying what he thinks. (Fortunately for the Stingray, Sonar's last captain got rid of him despite his enormous skill at the job because he thought Sonar was a security risk). Other members of the misfit crew are played by Harry Dean Stanton, Ken Hudson Campbell, Toby Huss, Duane Martin, Jonathan Penner, and Bradford Tatum, and they work together brilliantly - the cast obviously had a lot of fun making this.Tom Dodge has to weld his peculiar crew into a team and take on an opposition which is determined not to give him an even break. He tries every trick that's not in the book to get past them ...Apart from the crew of Stingray and the two admirals, one other performance of note in the film is given by William H Macy as Captain Knox of the USS Orlando, which was Tom Dodge's last sub before being given command of the Stingray. The Stingray keeps running into the Orlando and having to get past her on her way to the objectives of the exercise. Macy gives a brilliantly understated performance as a competent but unimaginative officer who has to display great reserves of self-control as he keeps falling foul of Dodge's maverick tricks. But you have to feel sympathy for Captain Knox as he holds on to his professionalism - something at which Admiral Graham is rather less successful ...There are a fair number of things in this film which could only ever happen in Hollywood and not in real life, but although it is very funny and silly, you can suspend your disbelief most of the time.I found this film laugh-out-loud funny and srongly recommend it.P.S. Don't turn your DVD player off as soon as the credits start to roll - there is an amusing comic video clip accompanying the credits and cast list which is worth watching and listening to. It shows Kelsey Grammer as Dodge peering through the periscope at various cast members including himself (double take), Annie Talbot in her underwear, and some highly musical "singing sailors" who I think are actually pop stars, dancing around the deck of the Stingray
Differences between 'R' rated and 'rated' version. Regarding the above title, there was very little difference between the 2 versions on this edition of the Dvd. There seems little point in the censors deleting the scenes as they did in the USA and the UK as they do very little to the film's context. Still, it's a very good horror film anyways with plenty of gore (if that's what you're into) and I'd still give it a 9 1/2 out of 10
How fun was the 70's?. Fun movie, some of the bits run a little long, but overall entertaining.
An Outstanding Movie. This 1993 movie, based on Michael Shaara's book The Killer Angels, is over four hours long, but it uses that time well to document this critical Civil War battle.  I used the word `document' on purpose because this movie is accurate to the point of being a documentary.  It was even filmed at the Gettysburg National Military Park.  When you see the fight for Little Round Top or Pickett's Charge, or another fight, you are seeing the events much as they happened where they happened.Thousands of civil war re-enactors play the everyday soldiers you see in the background and in the grand charges of this battle.  These amateur enthusiasts put their heart into this movie and it shows.As a high school history teacher, I was timing certain parts of the movie to show in class.  When I timed Pickett's Charge, I realized it is shown in real time.  Those Confederate soldiers charged into Union gunfire for 28 minutes and you see every moment in this movie.Read The Killer Angels and then see this outstanding movie.Kyle Prat
What Your DVD Library Is Missing!. Enter the world of a talented poker player who puts his life savings on the line and makes a run at becoming a pro. But for as good as he is, he is not above heart-wrenching losses and rock-bottom circumstances. But at the end is, perhaps, a fate that is bigger than his mistakes. This movie beautifully depicts what it is to risk everything in order to do what one loves
Nice condtion. I got the DVD on time and it looks as good as described
HG WELLS. This is an amazing service! For only 2 bucks i can watch what i like for the moment. In this case it was HG WELLS. Great biography
Season 2. Stargate Atlantis is great. I like the idea of downloading the episodes, but put in all the seasons. Why leave out season 2?
Un box Revisited. This Amazon unbox is not fully developed or has a lot of bugs in it. They should pull it until they get the bugs ironed out. Could not download all of the movie i ordered and now it is gone from my computer and I don't see how to download it again.Update: Most of the problems I experienced were with my Sattelite connection. After 175 MB they start to throttle the speed way down. I upgraded and this helped. I can now download large movies but only in 350mb bites each 4 hours. If you are having trouble read your sattelite "fair access" policy
It's really a cute movie!. The other evening my husband was watching this movie on television while I was reading a book. He kept getting tickled and every time he laughed I'd have to look up to see what was so funny. I rolled my eyes at some of the corny humor but finally had to put my book down and start watching. I have to say I  enjoyed this movie and couldn't help laughing out loud quite a bit myself!I always enjoy seeing Tommy Lee Jones and he wears his same old gruff exterior in this movie but with a nice comedic edge. He plays Roland Sharp, a Texas Ranger who is hired to protect a group of Texas Longhorn cheerleaders after the girls witness a mob killing. In order to give them full protection and still allow them to fulfill their cheerleading duties, Roland pretends to be their cheerleading coach and moves into a large house with them. There are some really very funny scenes in this film as the girls try Roland's patience time and time again. They're not happy with being cooped up all the time and having their social activities curtailed and monitored, and they give Roland grief every chance they get. He's more than a match for them, though, and they soon find out that where their safety is concerned the man of the house means business!There's a nice subplot here about Roland's relationship with his estranged daughter. Also, lovely actress Anne Archer has a nice role as an English professor who Roland becomes attracted to. (Some of the funnier moments in the film take place when the cheerleaders decide to rally around their bodyguard, helping him to smooth over his rough edges and win the girl.)This movie is cute and it's funny. Give it a try! You just might find yourself laughing a whole lot more than you thought you would! :)
The greatest film on earth about circus. If you are over 50, you will remember the circus of your childhood: clows, animals, trapeze. Cirque du Soleil is polically correct and beatiful, but the "old" circus were a real show for the eyes. Buy this dvd as a proof of what a circus was at "our time" and show to your children or grandchildren. They will, for sure, love it
This is the one!. My favorite Peckinpah film. Yeah, you heard me right. This is the one where we can clearly perceive Sam flying of the deep end, and yet it is still some kind of graceful ugly crazy masterpiece. There are jarring deliberate shifts in tone from lyrical to brutal and ugly to downright surreal. It's willfully sloppy at times, with some shots that don't match at all and some of the worst day for night you've ever seen at one point (that may actually be the fault of MGM's DVD - I don't know). None of that matters a whit. This is a surprisingly heartfelt pitch black comedy with an outstanding squirrelly performance by Warren Oates - and Isela Vega is awesome. "Alfredo" is a road movie from Hell - funny, horrifying and totally captivating. And I don't just mean so-bad-its-good - this is an important film and I love every stinkin' minute of it.But if you have pedestrian tastes, stay away. This is probably the fullest cinematic expression of the bitter and abrasive side of Peckinpah's personality that is so well documented. Most people don't seem to know how to take it. Take it as a beautiful reckless personal horror film that is laceratingly funny one minute and just lacerating the next.The final image says it all.P.S. The scene between Kristofferson and Vega seems to confuse a lot of people, as it should. But you might want to listen to the words of the song Kristofferson's partner is singing to Oates in the background as this scene plays out. There is a possible reading of this scene that I think a lot of people might not have picked up on. It's also interesting in light of the particular paranoia that made it hard for any woman to be in a relationship with Sam...
great narrative. What is remarkable is what a cohesive story this truly comprehensive bio of THB makes.  As all documentarians do, Burns clearly had to help along/trace out the narrative thread, but the brilliance of this particular film is that the story of it just seems to emerge on its own.Also, the story of THB's death is particularly moving.  The entire film is a great intro to THB and is accessible for any audience.  Even those who feel distanced from the "aloof" world of art will really enjoy this film.  This film opened my eyes to actually appreciate art.  Previously I was turned off completely by what I saw (and indeed often still see) as pretension.SUMMARY: The film traces THB's childhood and early training, his time of formal training in Europe and life in NY.  After that, THB rejected the elitist world of the NY art scene and instead went back to Missouri and became one of the triumvirate of American Regionalists (John Stueart Curry and Grant Wood were the other two--FYI GW painted American Gothic, the most famous American painting of a farmer and his daughter, though most people think it's his wife.  Anyway, THB's work is in much the same vein--Americana).  In his work, THB tried to capture America and all its ambivalences.  That's why I say it's honest.  Though critics might say he was too "Pollyanna"-ish, I would disagree, and I think you will after seeing this film.I cannot recommend this film enough.  Anyone who is interested in the concept of "America" (you know, the optimism, hope, dream, nightmare, utopia, distopia, democratic promise, dark underbelly--all the contradictory impulses within the myth of America) will find this a vital part of that dialogue
We Were Soldiers. This is an excellent movie if you like war flicks. It made me angry being from the Vietnam generation also. It shows how pointless war is and what a waste of good men. The acting from all the cast was top class. I highly recommend this movie. It may be slow at first, but the action later is amazing
See Bruce Willis Naked!!. Two lovers. One killer. Five suspects. Bruce Willis is a troubled psychiatrist who quits after a patient commits suicide. But when a colleague is murdered, Willis gets drawn into web of intrigue -- and into the arms of a patient (Jane March) who's also a suspect! The DVD contains 17 minutes of deleted scenes (including Willis in the buff)- That alone is worth the price of the DVD
Sweet cartoon. Admittedly, this show isn't for everyone. It can be silly sometimes. Still, it has the potential to be very funny, clever, and sweet
If you loved the movie, you will love this. I really enjoyed most of the cd. I would have liked some other songs to replace 2 of the remixes of the &quot;Dancehall Queen&quot; track. I jammed to &quot;Little and Cute&quot;, &quot;Joy Ride&quot;, and &quot;My Jamaican Guy&quot;. And the track &quot;Unbelievable&quot; reminded me of my husband! All in all, this was a great cd and I would buy it for a friend
heart wrenching & heart touching. this is an absolute masterpiece. this film will definitely become permanently etched in your mind after viewing it. it will touch your heart and break your heart, but you will never forget it. Jane Wyman gives her absolute greatest performance and garners the oscar as a result. Wyman is also the prettiest little woman you'll ever see on film. an absolute angel in this movie. it is difficult to belive that this movie was released after her roles in such renowned classics as "The Lost Weekend" and "The Yearling". by the way she is still living. she was born in 1914. she would be 92 this year.as for the DVD, excellent picture and sound. no real extras. too bad. still worth the price
A Chorus Line. This was a great movie for me because my daughter did this dance routine in a school production 15 years ago and we both wanted to see the movie over and over again
So Scary. Haha, now, all the other reviews say this movie is cheesey, now, maybe its cause i get scared really easily, but this movie just had something about it that scared the crap out of me.....i couldnt even finnish i
Archangel John. A fantasy in grunge. Travolta is good, Hurt is good, they are all good, and the end product is fun to watch. Not challenging or intellectual but able to entertain comfortably. I would recommend it to most any adult
Chaplin has NOT dated!. I couldn't disagree more with the reviewer who bashes Charlie for being dated. Humour doesn't date only the context that surrounds it. This DVD contains some supremely witty and charming comedy. Anybody who is looking to buy it must already be a silent film fan so is familiar with the medium. The film quality is superb and I thoroughly recommend it
A thriller with character and originality. Billy Bob co-wrote and stars in this tightly woven, deeply textured, well-written off-beat thriller about a couple of drug dealers heading from CA to AK; combines the personal, the interpersonal, the deviant, with an unusual love story embedded craftily in the middle.  This was on Roger Ebert's top ten list the year it came out.  Although there are a couple of plot flaws, it works well enough to keep you anticipating the "showdown," because these seem to be authentic people trapped in a tragic destiny.  This is a rare type of film nowadays: the kind that comes from the heart, not from the sterile factories of M.F.A. programs and lunkhead studios.
Best of the series anyway. Let's go easy and be fair: "Caged Heat" deserved its rank as the best of the women-in-prison series that marked the glory days of drive-in movies. Although Jonathan Demme's directorial debut was not a real success, it gave us a chance to enjoy the glamour of so many beautiful girls while showing their skin off and on did try their best to act as well: Erica Gavin (the famous vixen in "Vixen!"), Roberta Collins (Pam Grier's co-star in such previous WIP flicks as "Women In Cages", "The Big Bird Cage", "The Big Doll House"), Rainbeaux Smith (aka Cheryl Smith in "Slumber Party '57"), Juanita Brown (Pam Grier's co-star in "Foxy Brown") etc... What else can we ask for??? I'm glad to watch "Caged Heat" again, now on DVD so I can go to any "hot" chapter any time. Too bad "Vixen!" hasn't been released on DVD yet, but if you like this one I would recommend all the above mentioned WIP hits of the '70s. They aren't as good as "Caged Heat" but still worth checking out for their own flavors
Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST!. The Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST drama I have seen ever. Korean, American, doesn't matter! This is better than anything I have ever seen on TV or in the movies. Hollywood cannot touch this one! Kim Myoung Min(Yi Soon Shin) is outstanding in this!(no wonder he won the 2005 KBS BEST ACTOR AWARD FOR IYSS)It starts from when he was a child to his adulthood and can be emotional, funny, sad, and can make you angry!! The numerous obstacles and prejudices this man had to overcome and then always bounced back with no complaint because of the love of his country is phenomenal!! He put his country above all else and Kim Myoung Min did a great job of portraying that!My whole family, kids and all, watched this with me and loved it!I can see why Yi Soon Shin is Korea's hero and why other countries teach his methods
Cary Grant Step-Up. More than any other this was the film that made Cary Grant a certifiable star and vindicated his decision to free-lance in Hollywood rather than sign a studio contract.  His light-hearted turn as the ghostly George Kirby, other-wordly pal and helpmate to banker Cosmo Topper, proved to be a box-office hit and Grant was shortly thereafter working with directors of the caliber of Howard Hawks, George Marshall and Alfred Hitchcock.  Roland Young does some fine reaction comedy here; not easy, remembering he was often reacting to an empty set and the effects were put in later
Leonard Maltlin is out to lunch. This one is fun. Yes you should enjoy martial  arts. But basically its fun. Especially Rhee's fight at the arena
Good film, bad DVD. This moody drama piece is for the most part very good.  Mickey Rourke is excellent in the title role; a disfigured criminal who gets a shot at redemption but ultimately chooses revenge.Well directed by Walter Hill with a good music score by Ry Cooder.  All the cast do a good job, the story is tight and fast paced and some good action sequences to boot.Pity about the DVD, it's fullscreen and this deserves to be in glorious widescreen
Better than expected from the reviews. I thought the acting in this movie was very well done. The people in the movie seemed very real, not the over done, I am in charge, no matter what, if you like it or not, type of acting, usually found in this type of film.Some posters have said that the movie was not true to life. I would guess in a way, it was not, but does it really matter, in a work of fiction.
This Has Been...a Love Story. I finally made my first purchase from Amazon's Unbox Video Downloads just to try the service and am happy to report a solid customer experience. For $1.99, I purchased and downloaded one of my favorite episodes of "The Twilight Zone", and it took about twenty minutes to download through a broadband connection. I don't think it's the most ideal way to see full-length motion pictures, but for a 26-minute classic TV program, I think my 17" LCD monitor makes for a suitable viewing experience, and the video quality of the downloaded file is clean.Aired on September 15, 1961 as the show's third season opener, the episode is a Cold War fantasy appropriately called "Two" about the last two survivors on earth, a man and a woman, after an apocalyptic world war in 2109. Written and directed by TV veteran Montgomery Pittman, the simple plot revolves around the complicating fact that he is an American infantryman and she is an invading Russian soldier. Like two feral animals, they glare at each other among the debris of a deserted town destroyed by the war. He even knocks her out her after she aggressively throws pots and pans at him. The reality of their solitary existence, however, gradually dawns on them, especially after they see an evening dress in a shop window inspiring her to speak her only word of dialogue - "Prekrassnyi" - the Russian word for "lovely".What really makes this episode memorable is the unlikely casting. Two years before she twitched her nose on "Bewitched", a brunette Elizabeth Montgomery, looking appropriately ravaged and sporting a deadly ray gun, plays the untrusting Russian soldier with surprising fierceness and vulnerability. The American is played by perennial tough-guy Charles Bronson, fresh from "The Magnificent Seven". Even though he has to spout some inane philosophical lines to describe the futility of war, he leavens his natural sullenness with a determined romanticism. They make an odd couple, but it works splendidly. I also learned that canned fried chicken will become a staple in the 22nd century. Narrated by Rod Serling in his inimitably halting manner, the show ends with my favorite line in his signature postscript: "This has been...a love story." This is classic TV
After the Fox. I am a huge Peter Sellers fan, and this stands out in some ways as one of his greatest performances. Who else could, as an Englishman, play the role of an Italian who in one scene disguises himself as an American tourist, and speaks fake English?Buy this and have a good laugh
Add-on to review below. Just a note--I can't find as anyone's caught this. The soundtrack for this film is by Benjamin Frankel, a serious British composer whose symphonies are highly regarded, and is one of the best film scores Ive encountered in some time. In fact I'm surprised it isn't better known as it approaches the quality Sir William Walton reached in his Shakespeare scores for Olivier. I'd buy this DVD just for the music.Otherwise this is an absolutely wonderful flick and, as an exercise in humorous cynicism about how the modern world operates I'd double-bill it with Wilder's absurdly under-rated "One, Two, Three.
Did they get revenge on the wrong guy?. Maybe I have this wrong... I'll have to review the footage... but in the final scene at the night club did they get the wrong guy? Did anyone else notice this? I think I saw the actual rapist standing and watching the events unfold with a smirk on his face. At least I think it was him. That would be the ultimate irony in this disturbing but amazing film.
Great for Women's Bible Study. Great study with great discussion opportunities with other women from diverse backgrounds
A Christmas Must. This movie is now included in my collection of "must see at Christmas time" DVD's together with the likes of "The Vicar of Dilby" and "Lampoons".Great cast, great acting, cute story and even cuter legs on Will Ferrell.
"Live dangerously till the end". A movie more famous for style than substance, though it set the movie world on its head. A third-rate hood in Paris (Jean-Paul Belmondo), who thinks he's Bogart, steals a car, then kills the policeman who pulls him over. Now on the lam he goes to his girlfriend (Jean Seberg) and asks her to hide him until he can collect some money owed him from a previous job; after that he tells her they will go to Rome. But Seberg is as empty, soul-less, and finally ruthless as he is, and at the end she turns him in to the police.But it's the way Goddard relates the story that had everyone ga-ga over this movie masterpiece: he presented new ways of viewing his material - fast-cutting, imaginative camera angles, a total breakdown of time and space, no transitions. His idea was to give the impression of "living in the moment." There are some memorable scenes, especially the bedroom scene with Belmondo and Seberg discussing art and philosophy and the final shot of Seberg, but at times it's very hard to relate to these two conscienceless, amoral characters; I know it's all about alienation and impetuosity, but whew!The location photography on the streets of Paris is superb and set another precedent for New Wave filmmaking. Excellent too is the musical score (part jazz, part classical). It's an extremely influential movie, groundbreaking and revolutionary, though some of it's most creative techniques (jump-cutting, for example) have become second nature today
I've actually never seen the first one............ This movie was pretty good! I'm sure the first one was better cuz the first one always is in movies. I liked seeing all the sharks attack people! YAY!!!
First Rate!. "Where the Sidewalk Ends" is a winning film noir/detective story.  Dana Andrews plays a troubled cop with a reputation for abusing suspects.  In fact, he is whacked with a demotion at the very outset.  Events get complicated when he slaps around his very next perp- a war hero- and the guy hits his head and dies! WSE quickly is in high gear.  DA attempts a clumsy cover up.  His new boss, Karl Malden, quickly fingers rough and tough Tom Tully as the murderer.  He is the perfect fall guy, but the audience, not to mention DA, knows he is innocent.  The plot boils when DA gets involved with Tully's daughter, Gene Tierney.  Here is the perfect uptown girl in a decidedly downtown location.  This plot contrivance is actually believable.  Will DA let his girlfriend's Dad go to Sing Sing for a death he caused?  The resolution is unmentioned here.  Viewers will have to watch WSE for themselves but those who do will not be disappointed.  WSE is fast moving and highly credible. There are the required nighttime shots of sleazy night spots, dingy tenements, dark alleys and dank garages.  If there was a daytime scene, this viewer missed it.  The suspense is maintained throughout, even though the audience has all the "evidence". The reuniting of Andrews/Tierney (after "Laura") by Director Preminger is a complete success.  This reviewer made a mistake! He was reading Silver and Ward's "Film Noir" and peeked at the ending! Even so, the resolution to WSE was still a great one, almost shocking!  Viewers are urged to savor the atmosphere in this film/noir detective classic and take that fadeout as it comes.
At Last!!. At last this amazing movie will be available on DVD.  I thought it wasn't going to happen and I had almost worn out my VHS copy, so I bought a second VHS because I couldn't bear to think of life without Shirley. Oh, how we'd all love to be the girl who used to be us, and Shirley, after many years, picks up her courage and does just that.  Pauline Collins deserved an Oscar for her portrayal, but Hollywood doesn't work that way, so she was pushed aside.  Practically no one had heard of the movie, so I rented it and it has been my favorite ever since. I recommended it to all my friends who had just passed the 40 year mark and they all loved it as much as I did.  And who wouldn't fall for Tom Conti, the mischievous Greek who helps Shirley find out who she still is.   Many years have passed, but I still dream of sitting by the sea, watching the sunset, drinking wine in a land where the grapes are grown.
Hot Wheels - World Race. Great.  My two boys one aged 6 and one aged 4 think Hot Wheels acceleracers are the best.  We have cars, Tracks, Hyperpods and DVD's.  They have now watched the World Race and Volume's 1,2 and 3 and are waiting for volume 4 to be released so we can add that one to the collection
JIMMY DEAN. There are no words to describe this film but that it is Timeless. I first saw this film on AMC classics,or Turner classics back in the 90's not sure but I was captivated by James Dean, He embodied the true rebellion of a teenager and being the outsider, the tough guy with a big heart. Watching it now restored and remastered on a two disc edition makes it that much better. I am not a huge fan of classic films besides Hitchcock and Stanley Kubrick films, I love this timeless tale
DVD is on the Way!!!. Good news Mike Leigh fans, this movie is now scheduled to be released on DVD on September 6, 2005 according to Amazon!!The movie is an excellent one.  Sometimes (unjustly) considered one of Leigh's lesser works it functions both as comedy and drama as it looks at the reunion of two friends from college several years after they have graduated and have been trying to find their niche in the world.  Told in a series of flashbacks and in present time it shows how he characters have grown over time while many of their vulnerabilities remain.A must for any and all Mike Leigh fans
Boring Plot but Great Characters. I must admitt that this movie is hard to rate. I love the evil witch Belladonna who appears in this movie and I like that her cousin Annabelle(the pink whippet) says more than 4 lines. The thing that takes  this rating down would be the plot. Who hasn't heard the real 'Christmas  Carol' a thousand times already? It's really just like all the rest with  the characters from ADGTH. I'm a big fan of ADGTH(I have a webisite on it  too)but the plot gets boring when you've heard it a thousand times. I give  this movie 5 stars out of five for characters and 2 out of five for  originallity. Go with which ever matters more
Dated But Hasn't Lost Its Touch. This is no reflection on the quality of the film, but Sleep With Me loses its edge after ten years. It's full of witty, 90's style banter. This was a great film when romantic comedies were in. The actors were hilarious and I enjoyed Craig Sheffer for the first time ever. I don't watch a lot of his films but this one is entertaining. I saw it in 1994 and was hooked on it then. Since then my tastes have changed and I've gotten attached to other films.  This is the perfect date movie providing a realistic, comedic look at the differences between women and men and the problems that can surface within a circle of friends
This movie is very nice. Thanks to the Tivo $15 off trial, I was able to easily pick a movie while I was away from home and watch it on my Tivo at home later that evening. Would I pay $15 to do it again? Not.I already have a Netflix account and watch an average of 10 movies over the course of a month. If I pay Amazon $15 each for those same movies, I would go broke very fast. Get the price down to $2.99, and you'll have my business
Pink Floyd - Pulse. THIS IS THE BEST OF PINK FLOYD, I JUST KEEP WATCHING IT OVER AND OVER. GREAT DVD
A few holes in the story, but other than that......... This is by no means a bad film. It's a good look at life for Black southerners in the pre-integration days. Al Freeman, who one cannot stop thinking of as Elijah Muhammad after the Malcolm X movie, is quite good as the kind of strong and wise patriarchs once common, but sadly missing in today's Black America.This is essentially a series of vignettes about a young boy's life from 1946 to 1962 in Mississippi. But the vignettes do not flow well together and the story is full of holes (How did the Uncle get into passing out voter registration flyers? what happened to Uncle cleve after the boycott? What happened to the boy's father? How did the grandfather explain the KKK to his grandson after the encounter? etc. etc.). I guess once ould have to read the book for all this (which I certainly will). But that aside, it's fine viewing
You must see this movie-Deneuve beckons!. They're reshowing this downtown in the West Village, Manhattan, as I write this review.Luckily for us, we can see C. Deneuve in all her beautifully transferred film glory, instead of this washed-out VHS version which does her no justice. Still, it beats NOT seeing this movie at all.When you see her flawless face framed out from the closeup of her eyes in the opening shot, you instantly know why Polanski chose her to play the role of Carole Ledoux. Because of her beauty, you will sympathize with her, despite her fatal flaws.  An incredibly beautiful woman, with a womans body, yet possessing an immature mind-a childs mind. Equally capable as her sister of satisfying a man's needs, yet, unlike her sister's sex life, this satisfaction is only a one-way street (when her suitor Colin parks in front of her building and tries to make a move on her, check out the street sign).You can really feel Carol's changing persona- or rather, a revealing of her true persona as time progresses. Deneuve does a fanatastic job with all the little details. Half-closed lips, little turned-down mouth showing a kind of sulky poutiness, Carole can't help the little troubled girl coming out of her, who wants her older sister Helene to mother and baby her for the rest of her life.  When Helene leaves with her adulterer BF Micheal for a Roman holiday, it's as if the world is crashing down on poor woman-child Carole. She feels completely abandoned, esp. as an expat isolated in the flats of the mod, swinging London of the 60's.  What a bad time to be a frigid girl, and even worse if you're the poor sod chasing after her!Heck- even the nuns in the local convent, who've taken a vow of celibacy, are having more fun than Carole who espies them from her window.And what's causing all her distress?Well, Polanski employs kind of a pop, Freudian psychology to this tale.  As if you can look into a person's subconscious through their eyes, from the opening shot of her eyes closeup to the last, eerie still of an early family photo in Belgium, it is quite obviously hinted that Carole is hiding and repressing some dark secrets. Her mental undoing, figuratively clued in by her obsession with actual cracks and fissures in the walls and sidewalks surrounding her, is literally represented on screen as shifting, unstable, groping hands of the wall and floor come to "life" to torment her. Dimension is bent, perspective is skewed- time, sounds, and quite disgustingly, rotten smells, which are hard to convey through film, are protocals thrown out by the now schizo Carole. Having gone completely mad, yet she is in "control" in her own way, setting her own rules, rearranging the apartment and dead bodies as she sees fit.Hell-only a woman knows how to move furniture and redecorate her apartment for her own needs! Maybe that was her problem!!!Have fun, enjoy this movie, and pick up all the countless clues to her condition along the way.BTW, Catherine Deneuve is SOOOOOOO godawful gorgeous!!!Did I mention that?
this movie is a classic. i saw this movie for the first time when i was 14 back in 1988and i have loved it ever sense. it's about a boy named richard(christopher atkins)and a girl named emmeline(brooke shields)whoare sailing to san francisco with richard's father but then theship catches fire and every one has to escape, the kids escapewith a man named paddy. they come to an island where they livewith paddy until he dies and they have to live there alone and they wait for the day when they are rescued, they grow up together on this island and as they grow and change they begin to have feelings for each other that they don't understand(likeevery teenager does) and they learn about love and sex and thenemmeline gets pregnant and then they have to learn about parent-hood. it's a wonderful love story for young adults to watch (butnot for any one younger than 14.)some people thought that this movie was pornography and maybe for that time it was for some people but it's actually a beauti-ful story about growing up and falling in love. the people whothought it was pornography only saw that it was a 14 year old girl running around an island naked but what they didn't know was that most of the time it wasn't brooke it was an 30 year oldbody double. this movie is a wonderful movie, i learned so muchfrom this movie when i was 14, i learned about love and yes ilearned about sex but watching this movie did not make me want to run out and have sex it made me want to fall in love. i hadsuch a crush on christopher atkins after seeing him in this movie, i thought he was such a hotty ( i still do) and brooke was ok too.i think every one would love this movie but of course they wouldhave to see beyond the nakedness and look at the story to reallylove it
Alice  and      Another Woman . These are my favorites Woody Allen 's movies.They are  so human... with a touch of humor, I just love themWoody knows women as no other movie director does.Bravo!!
Visually stunning, beautifully acted. I will admit I am a huge fan of Altman, but I love this film on its own.  Visually it is stunning: the photograhy and lighting are a wonder.  The film itself is like a canvas for some beautiful art.  The perfomances are excellent - watching the love and great conflict between the brothers is riveting.  This is one of Altman's unsung gems.  Highly recommended
Love and Marriage , Conscience and Intolerance. As far as films go...almost the best movie I have ever seen...well, I am 18, but I suspect it doesn't get any better than this.The script, filming, acting etc. are good; but what makes the movie is the content. The only movie I have seen that manages to portray romantic/married love without being maudlin or stupid. The relationship between More and his wife blows me away, especially in the last scene when he is talking about custard and she's screaming and he calls her a lion. It's not a typical movie characterization/etc. I couldn't believe it was a movie.Also, it raises the issue of 'one's conscience' and the whole issue of Right/Wrong and to compromise or not to compromise. The movie isn't a pat idealistic 'sass the king and do your thing, be brave'. Rather, all manners of men are shown in contrast; from driveling Rich to fiery nonconformist Will Roper, and all manners of men in between.Thomas More doesn't fit either catagory. He's a politician: not a Scottish Covenanter. And neither is the moral "Just follow your conscience and defy authority"...at the beginning of the movie we see Thomas More speak disparagingly of Martin Luther in favor of the 'corrupt' Authorities of the Roman Catholic Church.Thomas More, by his principles, 'forced' King Henry to execute him...instead of just assenting to the oath and muttering through his teeth like everyone else.And the movie does the same. It doesn't just let us conclude that 'it is right for everyone to follow their consciences'. Thomas More does not simply champion "Freedom of Conscience". Like Henry the VIII we are 'forced' to make our own decision about Thomas More...Was he some unbending, deaf to rationalizations, uncompromising to the death fanatic; on par with jihadists who detonate in Israel?Or is there really a Truth out there, while all of us are busy swearing the "Succession Oath" of our times, and shaking our heads at misguided fanatics... and live successfuly, and die in our beds?It makes me wonder
The Ghost of Sarah Collins appears... Ghosts dominate this episode of the 1991 series. The ghost of Sarah Collins, Barnabas's little sister, appears to Victoria Winters. The evil spirit of Angelique, the one who cursed Barnabas as a vampire for all eternity, jumps out from fire and appears to Barnabas and his servant, Willie Loomis. Gotta pick this up if you are intrigued by the story of the Collins family..
Very Funny. I saw this on tv and loved it, so i had to buy it
Peter Sellers is once again excellent. With every new Pink Panther Movie, Peter Sellers' performance continues to grow and mature. I've seen this move at least 7-8 times so far. It's definitely a classic.Lots of good laughs.My other favorites:Matrix Series (Christian Mysticism & Symbolism)V for Vendetta ()Harry Potter SeriesUnderworld (war between the Vampires and Lycan) (Mythology, Symbolism, "Collective Unconsciousness" as per Carl Jung's work)P.S. Peter Sellers as Insp Clouseau is quintessential Virgo
Very Funny. I saw this on tv and loved it, so i had to buy it
No one does physical comedy better than Keaton. No one. These were two of the most amazing and creative films I have seen in months. Buster Keaton wrote, directed, acted, and did all his own stunts in these two films. He even did stunts for a lot of the other actors in these films too."Our hospitality" is the story of a feud between two families that reaches a crisis point when Keaton falls in love with a daughter in the other family. In "Sherlock Jr." Keaton plays an aspiring detective and movie projectionist who dreams that he is a famous and skilled detective. Not only are these two films engaging, well made, and interesting, they are funny!! I go weeks sometimes without laughing at a sitcom or a movie that is supposed to be a comedy. I found myself laughing out loud numerous times during this film.There are some classic scenes that just stand out when you watch these movies. The whole "floating down the river" scene at the end of "Our Hospitality" is jaw-dropping. These have got to be some of the most dangerous stunts ever attempted. In "Sherlock Jr." there is a pool game where every ball on the table is bounced around except for one which is miraculously untouched, there is the harrowing motorcycle ride, there is the escape from the gangsters, I could go on an on.These films are like live action Bugs Bunny cartoon. There were several occasions where as I was watching these movies, trying to anticipate what was going to happen next I said to myself, "No way. He's not really going to do that. That's not even possible. No sane man would attempt a stunt like that." And yet...he does.There are about 4 or 5 scenes from both of these films which are completely seared into my brain. That isn't an easy thing to do. Most films don't have one memorable scene, and to have a single film with 5 or 6 of these scenes is nothing short of amazing.They just don't make filmmakers like Buster Keaton anymore. I wish I knew where his creativity came from. If directors today could channel even a fraction of the skill that Keaton exhibited, cinema would be an amazing and wonderful place
Love It!. I think I've watched this movie at least 50 times since getting it!  Fun movie!  A classic!  Cary Grant and Irene Dunne make a great team
A Classic... I LOVED this movie when it first came out! And come on...what kid didn't make tomatoe and mayo sandwhichs for the next month after watching it? It is and will remain an all-time favorite of mine
Bite me!. Yes, it's over-the-top! Yes, it's gorey and heretical but this only adds to the movie's drawing power. Both Hugh Grant and Amanda Donohoe are absolutely terrific in their performances.  {Darn}can she be so scary and still so sexy, as in the scene where upon hearing a recording of a snake charmers music, she emerges from her wicker basket and sexily slithers across the room and out of the house, dressed in skin tight black leather (how else would a snake wear it's skin?). Another impressionable scene occurs when the lovely Catherine Oxenberg is ready to be fed to the white worm. The poor victim is hanging by her wrists over the lair and the half-serpentine Donohoe, nude and painted blue, doning yellow snake eyes is summoning up the serpent. If you're uptight or prudish, see something else. But if you enjoy a good campy scare with some gore and sexy imagery, don't miss this one
Still scary.... after all these years. No other attempt has been made to date to rework/redo this story. I believe with today's special effects, it could be even scarier than this one... but... this one still chills! For what Hollywood had to work with, I think they did a memorable and timeless job of founding a new creature to haunt your nightmares!This movie really scared me as a child watching Chiller Theater. Every time it was on I watched, only to be scared again! I hadn't seen it in over 20 years then just recently I purchased the Universal collection and watched it again.As an adult, and having seen the progress with special effects, I wasn't as scared, except the scene where the creature is swimming below the token female in the lagoon. Really creepy, never mind the rubber suit.All in all... still a good little chiller and worth owning in the new collection with the other creature movies
Swashbuckling!. "Mutiny on the Bounty" is the fictionalized tale of an actual event whose repercussions are felt to this day.  Captain Bligh is charged with sailing the Bounty to Tahiti to harvest breadfruit plants for transplant to the West Indies - what should ultimately be a two-year mission.  He is commander of a crew made up of both volunteers and those pressed into service by His Majesty's Royal Navy, the latter group being significantly less enthusiastic about their voyage.  Bligh's discipline often crosses the line into malicious sadism and as the months wear on, many in the crew begin to contemplate a mutiny which they execute shortly after departing Tahiti.  Bligh is put into a small boat with those of the crew who remain loyal and performs the amazing feat of sailing 3500 miles over 45 days with very little provision.  He eventually returns to Tahiti, where first mate Christian and the rest of the mutineers reside along with some of the loyal crew who wouldn't fit on the boat.  Capture, return to England, trial, and execution ensue for some of the mutineers."Mutiny" is great not because of the acting - Laughton is tremendous as Bligh, Gable is only servicable as Christian, and Tone is poor as conflicted midshipman Byam - but because of the characters that make up the story.  Those performances which are less-than-great are swallowed up by the flow of the story which you can almost feel as an inevitable force driving them all to their fate.  Bligh is to mean to die, Christian is too noble to die, Byam is to honorable to die.  But each receives a very different reward for their actions.The supporting cast is very solid and really conveys the sense of frustration and anger that builds as time passes on the Bounty.  The shots of the Bounty on the open ocean are magnificent and are easily the equal of those from "Master and Commander".  However, the obviously anglo "Tahitians" can be pretty distracting to someone who's grown up in politically correct America.  Still, it's a minor point, especially in the black-and-white format.A true classic.  Highly recommend
A forgotten and overlooked dramatic gem. I picked up "A Prayer for the Dying" on a whime one day. I have always liked Mickey Rourke and I think he is one of the most underrated actors int he business. I never heard of this film before and bought it and not knowing how good it would be. Upon viewing the film I couldn't help thinking how much better this movie could have been. Mickey Rourke gives an absolutly moving performance as a hit man wanting to give up his evil ways. I know that that has been used as a plot for a hundred movies, but this is easily one of the better of those films. Some people Bob Hoskins as miscast int he role of the Priest, but I found him to also give a good performance. Overall I was very moved by the film. I only wish it went a little more in depth with Bob Hoskins character. It gives hints that he and Mickey Rourke's character are much alike, but doesn't go into real depth. I have also heard that Mickey Rourke was upset with the final result of the film. Though it could have been much better, it still comes off as a very good dramatic piece of cinema. This film is a great way to spend a Saturday afternoon
Corny movie but a classic of sorts. Jewish boy rabbi (Gene Wilder) who can't make it in Poland (home) gets sent to San Francisco where the new Jewish congregation needs a rabbi. Of course he has to get from the East Coast to California - not an easy task in those days.Enter Harrison Ford - bank robber and fast gunslinger. An unlikely duo make it across the continent to see Wilder married to his bethrothed and Ford as his best man.A winner if you don't mind some schmaltz here and there. Quite entertaining especially (and probably mostly) if you are also Jewish
My favorite Van Damme movie. Anyone who gave this movie a 1 star rating needs to go find a really high cliff to go jump off of. This is actually a pretty decent film, with some beautiful shots and cool desert scenery, and ok acting from Van Damme. Most of the supporting cast play their parts quite well too I believe (and seemingly good chemistry between the main characters). I mean yeah of course this isn't Lawrence of Arabia or Saving private ryan, but then again what else is? I can't tell you how many times I've watched this movie, it has some kind of pleasant addicting nature to it that I can't quite describe. A great film to watch if you are sick at home or just plain out of your mind bored. And also, I'll definitely have to give this movie props as being the best movie I've ever found in the Walmart 5 dollar bin. Even better than the lower budget clint eastwood flicks that I've found in there. It's THAT good!
Lack of love demonstration. This is a great film with a great cast and very well directed.  The core of the story is the lack of love demonstration by the Great Santini for his family, in spite of  his deep love for them!  It's touching the way that Santini feel but can't show  love for his great wife and kids.  The wife role is very well played and is the cement that bonds all the characters together!
the storey is far fetched enough to hold your interest. No, Ben Hur this isn't... but for the length of the movie, you are entertained by situational comedy and by some very funny dialogue. not for young children, though. a good cast of stars and supporting actors make this movie one that satisfies
Buy This Movie!. The best Annie movie ever! Alicia Morton Shines as Annie! It tells the real story, based on the book by Thomas Meehan. This Annie is the one to watch. Kristin Chenowth is great as Lily st. Regis. Can't beat this cast! The movie should have been longer,and in the box office. All in all, the movie was the best ever made! Alicia morton has the voice of an angel. Buy this movie
The Life of Birds DVD. It is the best nature documentary I have ever seen. I have never before witnessed such amazing animal behavior and I was raised on public telivision
My favorite. This was my favorite episode as a kid.  I was so happy to see I could download it to watch with my kids
Entertaining Horror Anthology. This is one of a series of horror anthology movies released by Amicus Studios in the early 70's.  (i.e. "Tales From the Crypt", "The House That Dripped Blood", "Vault of Horror").Each anthology is held together by a certain theme.In "Asylum" a young psychiatrist interviewing for a job in an asylum is told that the head of the asylum has gone crazy and is now a patient.  The young psychiatrist must hear the stories of some of the patients and then determine who was the head of the Asylum.  If he is correct, he gets the job.The stories give the feel of old horror comics, which inspired many horror anthologies. The characters are one-dimensional and driven by such deadly sins, as greed and lust. In most cases,  with a twist and a touch of macabre, the fates get their revenge on the evil-doers.The stories are mostly enjoyable and solid entries in the horror anthology genre. The British countryside, where the stories are mostly set, adds an extra chill.The movie is recommended most to fans of horror anthologies, such as HBO's "Tales From the Crypt" or Stephen King's "Creepshow", and the movies noted earlier.  It would also be great for those who remember how much fun these movies were when they first came out.More general audiences would be entertained, but I don't think this movie should be ranked with 5-Star horror masterpieces ("The Exorcist", "Halloween", "Psycho"), nor would I expect most general audiences to rank it so highly.The DVD quality is definitely noteworthy, having sharp, rich colors which enhanced the movie's experience.
WHAT IS WRONG WITH YOU PEOPLE ?. This is the best Van Damme film ever (minus the Van Damme as the leader of a group of street children ... too Mickael Jackson)Anyway , this film has great acting (even for Van Damme) a great storie  , great cast (Roger Moore was the high light of the film) , and the fighting was neat because you get to see many of the world's fighting style's and style of fighters (this should have had a video game)I have to gave it a 5 star rating because it's that good and some one should have
A must for Cary Grant Fans. This is a great comedy and a must for Grant Fans. Cary Grant as the commander of a very peculiar submarine sailing thru the Pacific in WWII with an even more peculiar crew. Great Movi
Fever Pitch. This movie is pretty good if you like British films which I do.  Colin Firth does a great job at playing the crazed Arsenal football fan, and I have a feeling that if you also live and die for Arsenal, you'll like the film even more than I did.  The only downside to the movie is that it does drag at parts, but overall, it's witty and funny
Throne of Blood.... I was enormously fascinated by the film "The Throne of Blood" we just watched as part of our pre-AP English course in Nagoya International School, Japan. The film adopts the plot of Shakespeare's Macbeth with a Japanese setting. Macbeth is characterized as a Japanese warrior, the head of the 1st fort. After the victory, he sees a spirit (the witch-equivalent) in the forest on his way to the shogun's castle. As he has predicted, he was awarded the prestigious status of the head of the castle.The king decided to visit his castle one day to organize a plan to kill the Banquo-equivalent character. He is extremely proud of the trust that the king has in order to arrange such an important event, but his wife believes that the king insists on killing him instead. The big gap between his optimism and his wife's pessimism leads him to the road of Tragedy.I believe the director of the film could easily adopt the setting very similar to that of the original Macbeth, thanks to the similarities in the feudal system of Japan and Scotland. Japan also believed in the existence of spirits and how the nobleman was ranked in status was similar to that of Scotland. Kurosawa would've struggled creating The Throne of Blood if he, for example, adopted dynastic China or the Kingdom of Thailand as the scene instead of Japan.All of the characters in "The Throne of Blood" successfully and accurately emulated the characters in the Shakespearean version. Although there were some changes in their persona (such as the Lady Macbeth character was a more modest figure than the original), all characters kept their qualities, tendencies and their role.To people whom read Macbeth in the past, this movie is definitely worth the watch. Viewers can receive the same impression and the excitement of Macbeth with a totally different setting.Koy
Nice Story Even For Non-Jazz Fans. This is jazz-fan's delight: tons of jazz, featuring tenor saxophone with some bebop thrown in. Most of the music is nice mellow stuff and interesting to hear, even to a non-jazz buff like me.The music and interesting story made me purchase the DVD, which I have subsequently watched few a couple of times. The story is pretty laid-back, a simple tale of an American alcoholic sax great playing in France who reforms because of a French fan who cares about him.Dexter Gordon's unique voice makes helps him become an interesting character to hear and the real-life jazz great proves to be a decent actor, too. Francois Cluzet plays the admirer who goes out of his way to help his idol. Gabrielle Haker is pleasant to watch as Cluzet's young daughter. She always seems to have a pleasant smile on her face.I don't why this film was rated "R" because there is no sex, no nudity, little profanity except for several "mf's," which must be the reason for the rating. Nevertheless, it's a pretty tame movie.Even though the story is a bit slow and would probably bore the heck out of most young people today, I found it entertaining and definitely different. It's just a nice, gentle story, whether you are a fan of jazz or not.
A New Meaning to Coming Out!. This French film is one of the funniest movies ever, with great writing and a cast of huge talents.It all begins in a condom manufacturing plant with a boring accountant (Daniel Auteuil) who overhears from a bathroom stall that he will be fired from his position. Upon returning home he informs his ex-wife and son of his pending predicament and vows to find another job in order to keep them in alimony. He meets a new neighbor (Michel Aumont) who convinces him not to jump from his balcony and the fun soon begins. Together they concoct a story to save his job believing that if he can convince his company that he is really gay he will save his position by suggesting a prejudice exists. The company sends its dogs out to fend off any chance of a lawsuit and uses the services of its most macho employee (Gerard Depardieu) to "romance" away any perceived distaste for the new discovery. From here the story spins and weaves into a web of hilarious lies that will have you rolling on the floor in laughter.This film is so well written and easy to follow that the sub-titles are easily accepted by even the most English of all English speakers. While some of the references in this film might be taken harshly by those of the gay persuasion it is really only a lighthearted stab at all of the stereotypes that lurk within a corporate existence. Boring accountants could also take offense for that matter! Auteuil is fantastic as the bumbling lead, Depardieu is never better as the macho man who eventually finds his true passion, Aumont wonderful as the helpful neighbor with a few secrets of his own, the incomparable Jean Rochefort adds his own brand of humor to the film cast as the company CEO and the cast just continues into a complete brilliance.If you love to laugh, especially at yourself, this film will keep you in stitches and one viewing will leave you wanting more. For collectors of comedy films this one is a must have. So forget your hang-ups and enjoy a moment out of whatever closet suffocates you.
A Schoolhouse Rock Testimonial. When I was in third grade I never could get my times tables down pat- the sevens and twelves proved especially tricky. So my mom checked out this video from the library, and that changed immediately. I could rattle off my multiplication tables as fast as everybody else after watching this only a few times. Amazing! That same year I got put in advanced math. Coincidence? I think not! All the songs were just so catchy. I loved it when I saw the NIKE commercial playing &quot;Three is the Magic Number&quot;, that's one of my favorites. Anyways, parents, this is a great buy for your kids and I doubt that you'll get tired of the tunes
Great movie, good dubbing job, totally worth it. Movie:  I finally got around watching one of Asian cinema's finest classics, Ringo Lam's "City on Fire."  I must say I was really impressed.  The film starts off on a little shaky ground but soon gains its footing and takes off when Chow's character (also named Chow) reluctantly goes undercover.  I really like the scenes where he's first tailed and then actually *hunted* by rival cops who seem to want nothing short of him being dead.  The ending is just incredible, not just the fireworks, but the way loyalty plays out.  The film is worth watching just for the last 30 minutes, although the rest is also well-paced and the part with the girlfriend thing is a little boring but does add dimensions to the Chow character, thanks to Chow Yun-fat's good acting.DVD:  I know I'm not a purist when it comes to foreign films, and I usually don't like subtitles (esp. chop suey subtitles), so forgive me for saying I actually liked the dubbing job on this one.  There's no Chinese soundtrack on this at all, just English dub.  I thought the voice actors did a pretty good job, much better than any other dubbed foreign film I've seen.  The ADR remix was also really good, and they even have an English song worked into a nightclub scene.  I'm usually turned off by the high-pitched and cacophonous audio effects of Hong Kong films, but the American remix engineers did a very nice job at pairing surround sound audio with the great visual experience Ringo Lam has given us
Great Sci-fi flick!. In the future, there is a special adult themepark called "Delos" which has three different area adventure worlds which are "Medieval World", "West World", and "Roman World" where realistic humanoid robots serve the guests with the vacation they will remember. Two Vacationers ( Richard Benjamin and James Brolin) has chosen Westworld where they can do anything they want but unfortunately as there's a malfuction the robots completely go bersek especially a deadly gunslinging robot ( Yul Bryner) who wants to kill them.Amusing and fascinating Sci-fi thriller written and directed by the author of "Jurassic Park" Michael Crichton with some fine acting and good special effects for it's time. Yul Bryner himself steals the show as the bad guy who was an influence on "The Terminator", this has became a cult fave and one of the most interesting pre-Star Wars Sci-fi movies of that time and was parodied in the episode of the Simpsons called "Itchy and Scratchy Land".The DVD has decent picture & sound with only one extras which is the original trailer, but still this is a must have for anyone who likes Sci-fi.Also recommended: Jurassic Park, Terminator 1 & 2, Blade Runner, Tron, Robocop, I Robot, and Chopping Mall
best horror movie i've seen in a LONG time. Freddy Krueger (Robert Englund) is been dead for years in the Real World and the Dream World. Since Freddy is literally in hell and forgotten in the real world. Freddy has a plan to bring back Crystal Lake serial killer Jason Voorhees (Ken Kirzinger) to life in the real world. Freddy thinks that by bringing Jason back to life to bring fear on Elm Street and making teenagers believe in Freddy again, he can break loose from hell and restart his killing spree.However, now that Jason is a instant killing machine, he isn't willing to step aside, and with a terrified town in the middle, Freddy has to find a way to kill Jason by going in his dreams before Jason takes over Elm Street. A scared teenager (Monica Keena) finds a way to bring Freddy to reality from her dreams, thus pitching Freddy and Jason into a horrific and bloody showdown.This film is directed by Ronny Yu (Bride with White Hair, Bride of Chucky, Formula 51) who made an entertaining Spin-Off to the "A Nightmare on Elm Street" and "Friday the 13th" Series. Robert Englund, who played Freddy Krueger for the 8th time, reprises his role as Freddy, and it seems that he had a blast making this film. Kirzinger replaced Kane Hodder (Hodder originally played Jason in the last four films) and adapts to his new role beautifully. Kirzinger is excellent as the new Jason. Sean S. Cunnigham, who produced and directed the original "Friday the 13th" is back producing this silly but larger than life epic. The film also stars Jason Ritter (Jason's father, the late John Ritter, worked with Yu in Bride of Chucky), Kelly Rowland (R & B singer from the group-Destiny's Child), Lochlyn Murno (Scary Movie), Chris Marquette (The Girl Next Door) and Katherine Isabelle (Ginger Snaps Trilogy).DVD has an sharp anamorphic Widescreen (2.35:1) transfer (also in Pan & Scan) and an superb-Dolby Digital 5.1 Expanded Surround Sound. DVD has an ingraining Commentary Track by the director and actors:Englund and Kirzinger. Disc Two has Deleted Scenes with/without Commentary, Many Behind the Scenes Featurettes, Music Video (Ill Nino- How Can I Live, which in my opinion is worth the price of the DVD), Hidden Features, DVD-ROM Content and more. The film has an strong music score by Greame Revell (The Crow, Dark City, Pitch Black) that pays tribute to the "A Nightmare on Elm Street" and "Friday the 13th". This film ended being a Box Office Smash for the studio New Line Cinema. Extremely entertaining for the Fans of both Freddy and Jason. Watch for New Line topper Robert Shaye (one of the executive producers of the film) as the Principal in a cameo appearance. Great gory fun all the way. (*****/*****).
highly recommended. This movie has everything we expect in a Jackie Chan flick, including plenty of bad guys for Jackie to fight (some are clearly great martial artists themselves, not just actors, as mentioned by other reviewers), pretty girls that Jackie must save, death defying stunts, chase scenes, guns, explosions, and plenty of humor.  Two thumbs up!  Regarding the dvd format, the one I saw in store had widescreen on one side and full screen on the other.  (I own it on vhs myself and am considering upgrading to the dvd.)  Some of you parents might also like to know this one has no nudity
Defines black humor. This is a witty, morbidly funny movie. It's weak in spots, andthe occult &quot;magician&quot; comments in Michael Caine's voice-over narration is perhaps a little misplaced. But it is an original movie, and entertaining, and as Michael Caine said when making it, &quot;The thing is, this guy is murdering people, BUT YOU ARE ON HIS SIDE.&quot; After seeing this movie, you might find yourself looking at conniving rats in your life and thinking back to this movie! Even though Michael Caine plays an Englishman, it takes place in New York, and is a VERY American piece, in that it shows the absolute subtext of all American life is that you MUST be a success. I've seen this movie a number of times. The humor is twisted. But good..
Mouse that Roared DVD. It's still one of the funniest movies ever made; I can't believe it's still topical after all these years but politics never changes
Combat War Movie. It was interesting seeing Henry Fonda in Immortal Sergeant.  He was young when he played the part of this combat soldier in this movie.  I know years later he played in other war movies like Battle of the Bulge and Midway.
MGM IS !) YEARS BEHIND. Why does it take MGM so long to put its movies on DVD? The last release of this movie is 1995! Get with the new age MGM and release "ALL" your old musicals on Dolby Digital DVD right away..
Oldies but goodies!!. Absolutely loved it !! I love any movie with Judy Garland in it
Absolutely Hysterical Yet Refreshing and Sweet. This is a fall-off- the-couch funny film, and one you might as well buy, because you are going to watch it again and again for the silliness and comfort.  For Craig Ferguson fans, it's a must -own. Tcheky Karyo fans will chortle as he pops up yet again where least anticipated.Newly widowed Grace (pertly played by Brenda Blethyn) finds her dissolute husband has left her nothing but debt; creditors and re-possessors now besiege her lovely Cornish seaside home. As she seeks solace in tending her greenhouse orchids, she ponders how to get out of the financial quagmire.  For distraction she charitably tends to her feckless caretaker (Craig Ferguson)'s ailing personal-use cannabis plot, and a joint venture blooms.As Grace and Matthew modify the greenhouse, cultivate the crop, and go to market, hilarity, as they say, ensues. The villagers - all characters we wish were in our local pub - are perfection as they feign ignorance of the entire enterprise, while quietly lending unseen support to their beloved neighbor. No one is as he or she initially seems, and the various `reveals' in the subplots are charming and delightful. There is much 70's style stoner humor, but with an updated, wonderful, and uniquely British twist.Obligatory "locals inadvertently get stoned" sequences are not only original in their construction but, somehow, innocent and sweet. The ladies and the corn flakes scene is certainly one of the finest pieces of physical comedy ever put on film. And as the story progresses, it evolves from a tale of potentially puerile marijuana mishaps to, instead, one of the power of love and redemption as Grace and Matthew each find their salvation in the unfolding of a future neither of them foresaw. The ending is pure bliss, and an absolute upper.Get it. You'll be delighted.
Slapstick wisdom. After finally catching Mon Oncle (long on my list of movies I'm supposed to see), it's clear to me that there's no one who won't enjoy the movie.  From its rakish bookending sequences of dogs running around a modernized French town, Mon Oncle sets itself up as the comedy that sniffs the ground, as the movie to take aim at the bizarre confines of modern society.  That it is an indelible critique of the bizarre trappings of modernity is nice, that it does so as a whimsical and effusive slapstick confection makes it perfect - following Mr. Hulot from one bizarre comic encounter with the harsh and illusory modern world to another, Mon Oncle is all the more charming because of its vantage point.  Hulot is simply good natured - a jolly and misunderstood cartoon character of a man who you love all the more because of his refusal to criticize, because of his acceptance of all.  That the backdrop of his sister's house, where much of the action takes place, is a stylized monstrosity in which kitchen utensils leap to life at a push of a button, people greet each other moving in opposite directions, and neighbors can be mistaken for rug salesmen only makes you revel in Hulot's outsider goodwill.  As Mon Oncle nears 50, its importance as a fable of fond authenticity cannot be overstated - it's a movie whose timeless confusion at culture at large is both important and unnoticeable in the presence of its comic charm
...When I was very small... This episode of Star Trek, "The Man Trap" is my earliest memory of what would become a lifelong enjoyment of the franchise. Truthfully, "The Man Trap" terrified me (I was maybe two, or three, although I am sure by that time the series was limping along in it's third season and I was seeing a repeat for the first time); Star Trek was considered "adult programming", and as such I was not allowed to watch it - I used to sneak behind the couch while my grandfather watched it on nights I stayed at their house, then would lay awake in my bed scared by what I'd seen, but excited just the same. Like another space show I enjoyed and was terrified by (Lost in Space), I didn't recognize Star Trek as anything but a world I wanted very much to be in, but remained frightened of anyhow (I was, as I said, very young).
God help me... I WORK WITH PEOPLE JUST LIKE THIS!!. This movie is just plain hilarious. If you have ever known people who fancy themselves members of the creative elite BUY THIS DVD. The endless laughs will make up for all the suffering pretentious types have ever put you through. That's a bargain at any price
Very Touching Movie about Tolerance. This movie should be used in schools to teach about tolerance.  I don't understand why it is R-Rated.  As far as I know, it could have been made by Disney.The plot: Ludovic is a confused seven year old boy: he finds out he fancies a boy in his class and likes to dress up as a girl.  Because he is so innocent, he casually tells his parents he would like to marry Jerome later.  When told that boys can only marry girls, he replies "I know that!", because he really perceives himself as a girl.  What he comes across is incomprehension, frustration and anger from everyone in his family, as well as school mates and neighbors...If you are looking for a movie that will make you both laugh and cry, watch it today, you won't regret it!
Real people. Human drama and feelings, disregard for stereotypes, great photography, action with reaction and great lesson in self acceptance is but a few of the elements that makes this a great classic.  Made me think of my social role and position in life just like Crash did
very beautiful movie. Was very moved by this movie. Amazing actors and beautiful script.  Simply marvellous. You wont regret  seeing this awesome movie
Great concert film. Be sure to catch the Alternate views on Disk 2.  The view from the control booth with the director losing his mind, in a good way, is great.  They also have A Beautiful Day from the rooftop in Boston
A Very Sweet British Film. I loved this movie right from the start. Craig Ferguson and Brenda Blethyn are wonderful together, and some of the scenes of little old ladies geting (unknowingly) giggly on "tea" are just a hoot.  I'd always liked Craig Ferguson as Mr Wick on the "The Drew Carey Show", and it's nice to see that there is so much more to him than just that character.
Love Atlantis. I think this was a great spin off from stargate sg-1 which was starting to get stale even though I love watching it still.Love being able to download them all, just wish they'd get updated quicker!Honestly, when I left 2 weeks ago I saw the last episode available and I've missed the next 2
The Search For Shangri-La. This is an excellent documentary of Shangri-La and its elusive transcendental nature
A Black Comedy Of Espionage And Exquisite Manners; One Of James Mason's Best Films. Picture the results of the Normandy invasion if the Germans had known in advance that the Second Front would take place there in early June. It turns out they did know...and they didn't believe the information was true. Note that elements of the plot are discussed.Ulysses Diallo (James Mason) is the valet to the British ambassador to neutral Turkey in 1944. He has perfect manners. He is invaluable to the ambassador. He is trusted. Diallo was born in Albania but came to England at an early age. Determined to become an English gentlemen, he decided that the best way to learn was to become an English gentleman's gentleman. "I may not be a gentleman yet," he tells Countess Anna Staviska (Danielle Darrieux) one evening after she slaps his face, "but I am the best gentleman's gentleman." The Countess has lost her husband and her wealth in the war, and now is an increasingly poor but highly attractive woman who is willing to serve the Germans or the English for money. In Ankara, full of intrigue and agents, there are always opportunities. Diallo had also, at one time, been gentleman's gentleman to her husband.Diallo decides he can make very large sums of money by photographing secret documents the Ambassador keeps in the embassy safe, to which Diallo has access, and giving them to the Germans. He will insist on being paid in English pounds sterling. He estimates over a period of a few weeks he'll have enough funds to live the life of a gentleman in Rio de Janeiro. He recruits the countess to help him, to be his banker, in exchange for funds he will pay her. And as the days go by, their arrangement extends to her bed. The German's pay, but they aren't sure of the man they have code named Cicero. The information appears to be too good to be true. They suspect a British trick.The British now begin to suspect there is a leak in the embassy. They send a man from London to find out. Things get dicey, but Diallo makes one last theft and is almost caught by the British. After turning over the photographs and getting his money, he also barely escapes from German agents who now want him, too. What was his last batch of documents he photographed and turned over to the Germans? Specific information on Normandy. The information was so big and came from a source so unlikely -- a valet -- that the Germans didn't believe it and took no action. This is a true story.As for Diallo, well, he didn't care whether the Germans believed him or not, as long as they paid. He didn't even care what the documents contained as long as they were stamped Top Secret. But at the end of the movie, dining in his dinner jacket on the terrace of his sumptuous Rio villa, served by a discrete gentleman's gentleman of his own, he is visited by his banker and a senior Brazilian police officer. Diallo had already learned that it wasn't wise to trust the Countess. Now he is about to he learn he shouldn't have trusted the Germans.Espionage may be the name of the game here, but the movie is really a black comedy of exquisite manners. No one could read a line of dialogue with the mixture of cool contempt and self amusement the way James Mason could. He is utterly self possessed. Even when he is taken off guard, as the Countess manages to do, he recovers quickly with a shrug. Mason's Diallo is a complete mercenary, so amused by life that he becomes a captivating villain. Danielle Darrieux almost matches him in the Countess' determination to reach her former social position. They make a fine, selfish, wary couple.Joseph Mankiewicz directed the movie. The screenplay is credited to Michael Wilson, although IMDb lists Mankiewicz as an uncredited screenwriter. The dialogue is full of Mankiewicz-style amused cynicism. The movie is available in VHS as well as a Region 2 DVD. The DVD looks just fine. There are no extras. The time is long overdue for this movie to appear in a Region 1 DVD
i love it but i can see why others would hate it. this movie's really good, it's arty, scary, gothic, and to top it off bauhaus is in the begining.  it's a really depressing movie but that doesn't take away from anything it just makes you love the movie that much more, but it's alittle hard to follow sometimes and the vampires don't really do anything cool (they feed by cutting you with there cute little necklesses and then sucking on the wound) but it still works.  there's mad chicks making out too.  i could see why some people would hate it though, it's slow sometimes, the artiness can be alittle much sometimes, and it's really really depressing.  but if you're into that sort of thing this movie is perfect for you (i loved it i stole it from hollywood video and am still collecting late fees)
return to Easter Beagle. Go back in time to when you were younger and watched Snoopy on television. It's just that great to see the Charlie Brown gang waiting and preparing for the arrival of the Easter Beagle. And now I can share that experience with my grandchildren. thank you Easter Beagle. Happy Easter
or is it Rosenstern and Guildencrantz?. I thoroughly enjoyed this movie, and it would be an excellent addition to any library where one would find other film adaptations of Shakespeares works.  It does help to have an idea of Hamlet, and I would recommend reading or watching any version of it before this film or you can get a bit lost.  It gives a new spin to the play and makes you see the play through the eyes of two of the minor players, Rosencrantz and Guildenstern.  However, it is nonetheless an enjoyable film and will only add to your enjoyment and understanding of Hamlet.
OUTSTANDING IN EVERY ASPECT. This first disc on all editions of this movie on DVD includes a making-of featurette that should more than please the casual fan of the film. The second disc, exclusive to the Special Edition, goes deeper into just about every aspect of the production, I just wish they'd lower the amount of mutual "pats in the back" and "Tom does all his stunts" a bit.I guess my favorite "Mission" would be the first but all of them have great things going on for them. As action films go, they really belong at the top of the crop. the best thing going on for MI3 is Ethan Hunt's supporting team which for once work together the way they used to in the old series.I have a hard time understanding the cold shoulder audiences have given Tom Cruise over his couch-jumping thing, sure, it's hard getting excited about a Hollywood star wanting to marry for the third time but as celebrities go nowadays, it's not even worth mentioning it. This reminds me the time when James Cameron joked about being "king of the world" after winning an Oscar and people becoming bitter towards him. I guess some people don't like to see others being too happy with their lives. If Cruise follows some religion which to some of us sounds more than a bit loony, at least he hasn't done anything to attack mine like all those involved in the Da Vinci Code.At any rate, don't let the mediocre box office results of MI3 discourage you from watching it. You can see a real effort to make an outstanding film in every scene
Fabulous. This film illistrates the human desire for freedom.  A man (Nivola) has fallen in a hole and he needs cash fast.  His girfriend (Witherspoon) goes to the extremes to dig him out.  This is Witherspoons finest role yet.  She takes you deep inside her characters mind and shows how love and compassion direct the character through her toughest decisions.  Lissa (witherspoon) and her boyfriend (Nivola) need to get out of this town- find out what they will do to do so
A Tearjerker Plus Much More!. I would give Sarah Plain and Tall 5 stars!  It is funny, and it has drama, and a little action, too.  It would be good to read it to your son or daughter and brother or sister, but make sure you have a box of tissues nearby because it might make you cry.  When I read it, I got into the book and all it did was make me laugh and cry. I bet if you get this book, you won't have to get your money back
WOW!!!. This is a must see by everyone!! This movie had me from the first minute until the very end! Believe me that is unusual!! Forget the actors -- just get into the story -- the people -- it is true -- it is awful -- it is wonderful! I have told all my friends who haven't seen it, that like me they have missed one of the greatest movies of our time! Watch it more than once, please
COMPLETELY MIND BLOWING!. I am currently a medical student, hoping to have a future career working specifically with HIV/AIDS patients.  When I ordered this movie, I was expecting any typical drama movie that is not well dramatized.When I received the movie, I watched it before taking it to class the next day and I was just shocked at how informed I was of the disease. It is so INCREDIBLE! I took the movie to school the next day and everyone that has NOT seen the movie had the same reaction that I had.  Even the teacher had watched it before and was still moved by it.If you are unsure of buying it, I can tell you that it is a movie to own if you are into true life dramas. Everytime that I watch it, I am still floored by how our world had changed by this epidemic!
A brilliant film!. This film tells a powerful story, a "Crime and Punishment"-esque recovery of the soul, except without the ending that Dostoevsky had in his novel. After Neel Auguste committs the murder, Madame La (Juliette Binoche), much like Dostoevsky's Sonya, takes on the monumental task of recovering a lost soul and succeeds. Those who suggest this film is unrealistic have no grasp of eternal, Christian values of compassion and those who call this film ideological propaganda have no appreciation for beauty, as the acting (by all three, especially Kusturica and Auteuil, whom I have discovered through this film and who almost eclipse the talented Binoche), the cinematography, and the directing are absolutely brilliant.This is a must-watch for many different kinds of people, from those interested in St. Pierre & Miquelon (I had to look up the islands on a map and was surprised to learn they are French, not Canadian), to those who would like an illustration of why there is never a soul, lost forever, to those who would just like to receive aesthetic pleasure from a beautiful film.Finally, some have commented on the character of Neel Auguste, saying that he is "retarded" for not running away. Do not let a comment like that fool you. It would not be made had the reviewer understood the character or even picked up on a direct quote from Madame La, "You are so fatalistic!". Never trust someone who tells you not to watch a movie. Watch it and decide for yourself. I cannot envision that you wouldn't like it
The Bunker. Anthony Hopkins is a fine actor who puts in another good performance. The movie itself is what it is a 1980's TV drama about insane people in an insane regime, who started a world war,then destroyed themselves in the en
Stolen Dignity. In Italy's classic movie, `The Bicycle Thief,' sociology and story come together as one for post World War II Italians.  Convincing and with heart, we experience the pain of Antonio Ricci (Lamberti Maggiorani) as he becomes one of the lucky few to get a decent-paying job.  He is to put up posters throughout Rome, using a broom and adhesive.  If you've been there like I have, you notice that the city has bulletins and posters pastered all over their ancient walls.  To work he must have a bicycle.  He has one, but it is broken.  Determined he accepts, but he hasn't the money for repairs.  His wife sells their linen to pay the bicycle repair shop.  All is set and his life has a whole new outlook until a thief steals his bicycle while he's on the job.  He chases him, even hitching on a car, to no avail.  He has a friend who takes him downtown, and we see a whole market of bicycles, some of which undoubtedly have been stolen.  The vast majority of the movie focuses on him and his young son, Bruno (Enzo Staiola), as he goes to every corner of Rome to recover what misfortune fatefully handed to him in human form.Containing (for then) a non-Hollywood ending and sporting perceptive social commentary, 'A Bicycle Thief' comes off as a post-depression 'Grapes of Wrath' for urban Italy.  It gets us there by easily providing empathy for the characters and telling a simple, but solid story.
Awesome Pirate Movie. Great performances highlight this exciting tongue-in-cheek adventure!Robert Shaw and James Earl Jones are wonderful, as is a fine supporting cast of character actors.Of special note is the outstanding performance of Peter Boyle as a first class nasty villain! Seeing him today in "Everybody Loves Raymond" and then as pure evil is really something to behold.Also watch for a tremendous sword fight between Shaw and Boyle that ranks with the best of them!You'll really enjoy this one
Received the DVD on time and new as specified. Received the DVD on time and new as specified. Thank yo
Thoughtful 70's Sci Fi. Logan's Run belongs to a class of old school science fiction films which were popular in the early and mid-1970's, prior to the beginning of the Star Wars franchise. These films did not rely on non-stop action or dazzling special effects, but rather on thoughtful, intelligent stories, intriguing "What if?" scenarios, and astute social commentary. They included Sci Fi classics such as Soylent Green, The Omega Man, The Andromeda Strain, Westworld, and others. While the shopping mall setting and some of the special effects of Logan's Run are pretty cheesy, it is still an interesting film and its themes may be even more relevant in today's botox era than they were in the 70's. I have heard they are doing a remake and would like to think it will improve on the original. Unfortunately, given the recent history of Hollywood, it is more likely that they will drain every last bit of intelligence out of the story, and replace it with more explosions, and perhaps Will Smith.
Two great actors in a great movie. "Boys Town" stars two of the greatest actors of the golden era of Hollywood, Mickey Rooney and Spencer Tracy, and their parts in this movie are among their best roles.  "Boys Town" doesn't have quite as close a connection to Christmas as the other two titles in the Classic Holiday Collection (there's one scene set on the holiday), but this true story of a priest who builds a boarding school for troubled youth is one that will warm your heart.  Tracy plays Father Flanagan, a kind, socially conscious priest who can be tough when he needs to be, and Mickey Rooney displays his wide-ranging acting talent (from tough talk to tears) as one of the neglected boys whom Flanagan sets on the right path."Boys Town" is accompanied by its own less-famous sequel, "Men Of Boys Town," so you're getting two features on one disc. You also get a featurette about the real Boys Town (which still exists and has expanded beyond its original Nebraska location), as well as a 1939 radio program promoting the movie with Tracy and Rooney.If you like this great movie, you may want to consider getting the excellent Classic Holiday Collection, which includes this film along with two other great classics, "Christmas In Connecticut" and "A Christmas Carol" (1938)
Generational Gap meets Frankie. A long-time personal favorite that slipped into the 80's under the radar,"My Bodyguard" on recent viewing gains inpact with each viewing. Relatively unknowns (Chris Makepeace, Adam Baldwin)supported by legendary talent(Ruth Gordon, John Houseman and others)make this a hip,yet traditional film.This gem tackles:gang mentality, bullying, friendship, loyalty, family in a very human way in less than 2 hours. Makepeace, as the bookish, child-man,plays the new rich-kid in school. School presents all the normal pains, while, at home in a snall hotel, where Martin Mull plays the working single dad, you have the pranks of an aging-child surrogate mom, Ruth Gordon, always in more trouble than her young ward and admirer(Makepeace).Will the new kid survive school and get an education despite the peculiarities of step-parents? You bet. "My Bodyguard" predicted the crisis of working parents to come, yet humorously lets Makepeace find his own way, make his discoveries on his own.Tony Bill admirably directed this film, one of the few in Hollywood to realize that older actors can fill out the screen without detracting from the story, as they do in life. High marks belong to young Matt Dillon as the bully. You will also enjoy the early thespian moves of Joan Cusack.
Most Underrated Christmas Movie. Whether it was because of a low budget or lack of major Hollywood star power, the writing and acting in this movie is phenominal and really hits you every time you watch it. I know that every year when I watch around the beginning of December, it always gives me that warm feeling.Must have for any Christmas movie lover. Harry Deen Stanton is brilliant and really lets you believe he is an angel. Mary Steenburgen plays her stubborn best and it really gets you yelling at the scream, "BELIEVE!!!!"The kids are great and take on very emotional roles and you believe them.Great movie
This movie helped change my life - hope, and a vision for recovery. I knew I had a problem.  I finally watched this movie.  I had heard about this movie for a long time, but never wanted to watch it, but one day, I did.  I wanted recovery like the women Meg Ryan played in the movie.  When I finally hit my bottom, I knew rehab was where I needed to be, because I had seen what had happened in this movie.  I was just like the character Meg played...a fun drinker, then it got out of control.  The best was I got a vision for recovery, for hope and the possibility of change in my life being painted out in my life through this movie.  I highly recommend.  Now, 3 years later....the miracle has come true!  My life is fabulous.
Is he nuts or?. Brenna plays a grandfather that is accused of not having all his marbles.HIs g-kids try to help him out. A great Disney presentation. Superb movie worth the view
Great Children's Book. It's a lovely story about Horton the elephant who saves a tiny planet that lives in a speck of dust.  Very cute story.
Timeless Classic. All the great reviews written previously say it all - Anne of Green Gables the movie is a timeless classic of the classic novel. I've been watching this movie since I've been a child, and I still watch it as an adult. A movie like this doesn't need "special features" for it to be attractive as a DVD(Although the commentary is great!). Just the fact that no matter how long I keep this and how often I watch this movie, it won't change like VHS does.
My Favorite Episode. I don't have television, haven't for 11 years. When I learned CBS was allowing free viewing over the internet I checked it out and started watching episodes of CSI, CSI NY, CSI Miami, and NCIS. I found NCIS to be my favorite and this particular show Dead And Unburied is my favorite so far. I enjoy the light-heartedness of NCIS. So I decided to download this episode from Amazon Unbox.I really wish Amazon Unbox would allow me to burn shows I've purchased. As it is they are restricted to viewing on my computer. When Unbox expands this service to allow me to burn DVDs I will likely purchase many more shows this way. I like selecting individual shows
The Bishop's Wife. It is a delightful movie. It is one of the few movies that has harmless entertainment. The performances are exceptional. A wholesome family movie
Worth Waiting For. I had heard of "The Shop on Main Street" years ago but never had the chance to see it until tonight.  I even bought and read the book by Ladislaw Grosman 17 years ago in anticipation of seeing the movie some day.  I must admit that the book was impressive but not THAT impressive and so I worried that the movie might be anticlimatical.  It wasn't.  The book was a long short story, a novella, if you will.  It laid out the story clearly enough but it was the movie that brought all of the characters to life and created the gradual development of the impending crisis.  By the time we reached that crisis we had met a few jerks and unimpressive characters.  However, we had also come to know and appreciate a number of people that we found endearing for different reasons.  As events darken the scene, we suspect something bad is about to happen.  I knew what it was going to be but it still had an impact for me.The two main characters in "The Shop on Main Street" are an elderly Jewish woman, played outstandingly by Ida Kaminska, and a neer-do-well Slovakian carpenter, played impressively by Josef Kraner.  The way these two come to interact with each other and the ebb and flo of their relationship is the heart of the movie.  The picture gives a personal look at the Final Solution as it is played out in a small Czech village.  The emotions that the director brings out on film is where the movie soars above the book.Watching "The Shop on Main Street" is a moving experience.  It challenges us and leaves us wondering where we would have fit into this cast of characters.  In doing so, we may come to have a slightly better understanding of the incomprehensible.  That oxymoron is worth the two hours spent watching "The Shop on Main Street".  The raw emotions on display will stay with you long after
Probably the Best Drama Series Ever Made. I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out
Down from the Mountain. This is an excellent film showcasing the history and stars of todays bluegrass music. My entire family enjoys watching this concert/documentary over and over again
Decent teen flick!. Brittany is a senior in Pacific Vista High school, and she has high hopes for the oncoming year as captain of the cheerleading team.  But all that changes dramatically.  Her father's job has relocated, and Brittany has to move with them, including go to an entirely new school.  She can't be captain of the squad anymore, and she turns power over to Winnie.  She makes an oath to never do what she loves again --- cheerleading --- to avoid a reputation of being a "cheer wh***".Now she finds herself at Crenshaw Heights High School, a predominantly African American high school.  At her old school, Brittany was known as rich and popular, but now she is only recognized as a minority nicknamed "white girl".  She is drawn to the new squad and attempts try-outs, clearly dominating amongst all the other participants.  Cheer captain Camille and Brittany put aside their differences, and Camille invites her to join.PVHS is having a homecoming dance, and her former quarterback boyfriend has invited her, also with hopes of sleeping with her afterwards.  Her old friends discover she didn't keep her promise to refrain from cheerleading, and her new friends find out she skipped a game to go to the dance.  Now she's rejected by nearly everyone, but Brittany manages to apologize for her mistakes, and brings CHHS to victory at the cheer competition.---I expected this to be a tween flick, as the previews made it seem like it was designed for a younger audience.  I can still see kids in that age group watching this, but the crude comments and other components of the plot proved otherwise.  This film didn't appeal to me at the beginning, because it focused on being popular... and poor little rich girl, you know what I mean.  But once the movie gets going, you realize that Brittany does have some typical struggles in high school, and the message it brings across isn't all that bad.This film isn't too shabby after all, but I still like the first one the best!
Another good CSI:NY. Though CSI:NY is most least favorite of the three CSIs, they still manage to make a good one sometimes.  This is one of those good ones
Noir with Cowboy Boots. Western noir, and it's pretty good. Angular, shadowy black and white photography (by James Wong Howe), the story told in flashbacks and flashbacks within flashbacks with the resigned narration of Robert Mitchum, a relentless villian, a hidden family mystery that might contain hints of incest...plus gunfights and New Mexico scenery.Mitchum and Theresa Wright are very good as the possibly doomed couple. Wright seems to me to always have had a &quot;nice girl next door&quot; air about her that, I think, obscured what an excellent actress she was. Not just in Best Years of Our Lives, but look at her in The Little Foxes (where in her first movie she holds up very well with Bette Davis), The Men and Shadow of a Doubt. She knew how to deliver a line. Dean Jagger was almost as ubiquitous a character actor in the late Forties and Fifties as Thomas Mitchell had been in the Thirties and Forties. Jagger usually, it seemed to me, mostly played decent good guys or well intentioned weakings, and with deliberate speech. It was good to see him play so effectively a decisive-spoken out-and-out bad guy.The DVD transfer is very good, but no extra
Smart Thriller. This movie is well worth your money and time.  The leads, Redford and Dunnaway, have excellent chemistry.  The script is taut and well written. The tension will keep you alert and focused on the movie and anxious to find out how the movie will end.I highly recommend this film, and if you enjoy smart thrillers you will too
Logan's Run. I have always loved this movie but it was very hard to find. It is such a relief to have a place to find rare movies in such great condition.  This movie will make you really think about the future and also about how far our movie technology has come
Another great Western from TNT and Tom Selleck. This is the second of three outstanding Westerns that Tom Selleck filmed for TNT between 1997 and 2003. Selleck revisited his early Louis L'Amour, TV-Western roots with "Crossfire Trail" and also re-teamed with director Simon Wincer, who directed Selleck's best big-screen effort - "Quigley Down Under" - as well as the all-time classic Western "Lonesome Dove". The result is an excellent film that, while breaking no new ground, contributes to the rich mythology and legacy of the American cowboy.Selleck plays Rafe Covington who, at the beginning of the film, promises a dying friend that he will take care of the friend's wife and ranch. Selleck and two partners set out to do just that, and they add a new friend from the nearby town, played by Wilford Brimley, shortly after their arrival. The film is predictable: the widow is suspicious of Rafe's motives, the town bad guy has been wooing the widow in order to get at her land, the bad guy hires a hit man to eliminate Rafe, and so on. And yet, even though the viewer can see right through the plot to the end of the film, every element is so well handled that it is a pleasure to watch the movie.I read several articles just before the film was released about the painstaking efforts made to have authentic costumes, props, sets, etc., and I must say that the filmmakers' efforts certainly paid off. The film is set in Wyoming, but was filmed in Alberta, Canada, which gives the film some of the best mountain vistas in a Western since the real Grand Tetons were featured in "Shane".There is one small negative element in the film, which is why I couldn't quite bring myself to rate it a 5, and that is occasional strong profanity. I realize that real cowboys weren't always the most genteel people in their society, and I know that our modern society tolerates a lot of profanity; however, in a movie that continually emphasizes honor and integrity, profanity seems unusually out of place. There are DVD players and devices available that filter out profanity; if you are like me, then you can simply get such a player or device and still enjoy this first-rate Western
Everyone is human. This episode is a bit different than the others I have seen, although I have not yet seen all of season 2 yet.  Without giving anything away, this episode shows growth in 3 of characters as human beings.  Additionally, it has some inventive guest characters.  Finally, it presents some moral and ethical questions
Good cast/Great film. This is one of the better films of this genre. Picture quality and sound are excellent
A Beautiful Stone. Merideth is meeting the in-laws...Her boyfriend Everitt is taking her home for Christmas.  This'll be fun, right?  Not exactly, well, not for her.  Merideth is uptight and classy, different from her boytoys family, and much to her dismay, they hate her.  So much so that they will do anything to make her stay uncomfortable.  They accuse her of being racist, they accuse her of hating gays (Everitts brother Thad is gay and his lover is black) they make her feel unwelcome and as if she were putting out the whole family, especially younger sister Amy (played brilliantly by Rachel McAdams)...In fact they make her feel so unwelcome that she ends up staying in a nearby hotel and calling her sister Julie to come and stay with her.  Take note that while a comedy this movie has quite a few emotional points and theres a dinner scene that left me quite uncomfortable.  The acting across the board is brilliant with Keaton and McAdams taking the lime-light, and Parker is just amazing in her role, with equally impressive performances by WIlson, Daines and Nelson.  I recomend this movie because its a nice change of pace.  It tackles important issues, those of love and trust and family and the importance of acceptance in our lives.  As tense as it can be there are plenty of laughs that take your mind off the tension and a heartwarming ending that will make you smile inside and out
City of Lost Children. Though canny at times, this movie is an excellent example of french cinematography in the fantasy/sci-fi realm.  The story has twists and turns with unforgetable characters on the curve of every loop and keeps the viewer entranced.  Defintetly a fantastic movie for anyone that appreciated such films as Mirror Mask, The Labrynth (and Pan's Labrynth for that matter), and The Dark Crystal.  For those that haven't been exposed to this type of genre, one may find a new door into these cult films of a different dimension and into a new mindset
A movie for those lazy nights cuddled together with a loved one... I.Q. is a pleasant romantic comedy with a twist - the uncle of the young woman the story is about is none other than the great genius Albert Einstein (played brilliantly by the late great Walter Matthau).Set in the late fifties, the story begins when Catherine Boyd (Meg Ryan) and her fiance James (Stephen Fry) experience car trouble while riding around in his MG, and seek assistance at a garage. The garage mechanic, Ed Walters (Tim Robbins), sees Catherine and falls hopelessly in love with her. Of course, Ed's aspirations seem to be hopeless. Ed is a very good car mechanic but has no formal college education. But in the spirit of all romantic comedies, Ed feels that the relationship has a chance if he can only meet her and spend some time with her.When she accidentally leaves her pocket watch at the gas station, he seizes the opportunity to try and see her again by personally returning the watch. Imagine his surprise, when he knocks on the door and Albert Einstein answers.Surprisingly, Ed and Professor Einstein hit it off immediately. Ed is no scientific genius, but he understands human nature and the importance of having fun in life, two things that Einstein feels are lacking in his niece's life, which has been largely based on trying to emulate her uncle. Einstein is getting on in years and wants to make sure that she is happy and will be looked after properly. When Ed expresses the depth of his feeling, Einstein vows to help set things up. Einstein and his physicist friends -who also dote on Catherine-, decide to try and set Ed and Catherine up as a favor to both of them. It turns out that the car mechanic pretends to be an amateur physicist to impress Meg Ryan. Ed -allegedly- develops a process to use cold fusion to power a spacecraft, which during the cold war and the space-race was extremely important. However, this process didn't exist, Catherine finds out that Ed is a fraud and Ed realizes that he must level with her if they are ever to have a true relationship. The clever and romantic ways that these issues are resolved by Einstein and his cronies and by Ed and Catherine themselves make up the remainder of the story.The highlight of I.Q. has to be the performance of Walter Matthau as Einstein. He has created an original character that seems totally different from the kind of roles he always played with Jack Lemmon.Ed and Catherine are engaging as the young lovers and give us good on-screen chemistry, like they were meant for each other.While this film is by nature light and predictable, you will find it quite enjoyable entertainment.One of my favorite lines from the movie is in a dialogue between Albert Einstein and Tim Robbins' character Ed. They are discussing how to get Catherine to go out with Ed since Catherine will only go out with intellectual types.Einstein: "The problem is she would never go out with a guy like you."Ed: "Well that's easy. Lend me your brain for a while."Einstein: "Are you thinking what I'm thinking?"Ed: "Now what are the odds of that happening?"
Original, funny, and at times scary, a new take on horror. I was pleasently surprised by this movie when I saw it on the bigscreen, and now I'm happy to have it in my collection.  Michael J Fox's role as a paranormal investigator/ghost trapper with Hired Help is just a very funny concept.  Chi Mcbrie's character I thought made this movie, great comic relief.  Jake Busey did a decent job at being a bad guy.  I have seen this probably 8 times, and still find it funny.  It holds me if I find it flipping through channels.  Nice one to have in the collection.   I only own the original version, worth investing into directors cut to see what has been added
In depth look. I'm no fan of football, but I like Go Tigers! It's a look at football in small town America. It's both nice and scary to see how the town reacts to the local high school football.Go Tigers is a well made look at fanaticism at its best
Greatest injustice since Sacco and Vanzetti. The question at hand in the film Paradise Lost is not as much did these three teenagers commit this heinous act, but rather was there enough evidence to convict them for the murders. The answer, presented by material in the film, is an unflinching no. There was only speculation and rumor to convict the three.The film's strengths are that it doesn't preach, at least not in an overly wrought narrative, and it contains intimate moments with the accused and their families as well as the families of the victims. I can understand the pain and confusion of the victim's families. What is hard to understand is the bloodlust and need for revenge and retribution that immediately takes hold of them. The victims' families are the most terrifying aspect of this film. At one point the mother of the Byrnes child says in a hateful and spiteful tone "I hate them... I hate them and the mother's that bore them."Is there anything wrong with being hellishly angry with someone who has butchered your child? No, quite natural really. But the point of this film is that judgment was passed on these kids long before the trial even started. I imagine the Bible belt is a very scary place to be raised in... I'll have to ask Brad Pitt what he thinks about it some time.On the issue of the prosecution. They had next to nothing. A very questionable confession from a terrified kid, Jessie, with a 72 IQ, hearsay from a couple of kids who claim they heard Damien bragging about the murder but have no proof, a knife found behind Damien's house which doesn't match the wounds on the bodies, and the assertion that because Damien read about Wicca, he must be a Satanist.To look at the three kids is also an interesting aspect of the film. Jessie, a very small and slow kid seems a bit lost in the world. His IQ is low but he has no previous records of any type of behavior that would associate him with murder. Jason speaks in short breathless words and seems also to suffer from a low IQ. Damien is the key to everything in this film though. The defense made the key mistake of letting Damien take the stand for two reasons. The first reason is that Damien appears to have ADD and after the first 10 minutes of questioning he sort of fades away and answers in bland yes and no's. The second reason, and the most important, is that Damien is obviously extremely bright. Normally this wouldn't seem to be a problem but judging from every single person the filmmakers put on camera, smart people are hard to come by in that area of the world. Damien scared them.All of this adds up to the fact that there was not enough evidence to put these kids away and there were other, more sinister and shocking, suspects that needed to be pursued. The war rages on for the West Memphis Three and it is indeed frightening to think that they did it, and terrifying to think they didn't
Mysterious, deviant kinf of...but a MUST see!. This is the only chance you can see Catherine Deneuve breast! What more can I say?Also Guillaume Depardieu is such a dude! He's much more handsome than his father. They just released in France the film "Je t'aime moi non plus" with Jane Birkin. The DVD sells like HOT cake there. Can't wait until I can watch it! (The cover alone can warm you up
Death Penalty. This film affirmed my postition on the death penalty.  It is unequaly applied.  People without money are often convicted wrongly.  Read the book by Sr. Prejean. pax, robbi
One Of The Best Sitcoms On TV. &quot;All In The Family&quot; Is 1 Of The Best Sitcoms Ever. On This Cassatte It Has Lional From The Spinoff &quot;The Jeffersons&quot;. Archie Meets His Future Son-In-Low Mike &quot;The Meathead&quot;. Gloria And Mike  Put On A Anniversiry Party For Edith And Archie, Lional From &quot;The  Jeffersons&quot; Visits The Bunker House, And Gloria And Mike Celebrate  Their Wedding Anniversiry. This Is A Funny Tape. You Must Buy It
Wo can resist a movie with Bette?. I love this movie. It is such great escapism!They all play good roles and although not the most refined screenplay ever written, it has all the stuff that a feel good movie needs. I especially love when Bette sings that beautiful song in the restaurant; 'Somewhere Along the Way'. I adore her voice and what a great all-rounder she is. There are very few true divas that can act, sing, dance and be comedic as well.This is one of my all time favorites for a good laugh and I have to admit that most of my favorites were never box office hits
Simply an enjoyable show. This isn't the type of movie that will make you reflect and question your life's ambitions, it's designed to make you laugh. I think it succeeds admirably. Molly Ringwald is perfect as the budding teenager ready to have life meet her full-force. She is surrounded by a quirky, forgetful family (complete with a jerk for a younger brother), nerdy boys desperate for her attention, good friends with whom she can be herself, and (naturally) a love interest. Anthony Michael Hall's character is as funny a dorky kid as I've ever seen...his dance moves are legendary! He has several monologues that still bring out genuine laughs from me, even after all these years of watching this classic.This is a teen movie, so go in with your expectations at that level and you may be pleasantly surprised that you enjoy watching this movie for years to come
...When I was very small... This episode of Star Trek, "The Man Trap" is my earliest memory of what would become a lifelong enjoyment of the franchise. Truthfully, "The Man Trap" terrified me (I was maybe two, or three, although I am sure by that time the series was limping along in it's third season and I was seeing a repeat for the first time); Star Trek was considered "adult programming", and as such I was not allowed to watch it - I used to sneak behind the couch while my grandfather watched it on nights I stayed at their house, then would lay awake in my bed scared by what I'd seen, but excited just the same. Like another space show I enjoyed and was terrified by (Lost in Space), I didn't recognize Star Trek as anything but a world I wanted very much to be in, but remained frightened of anyhow (I was, as I said, very young).
Aerial Gunner. Although dated by today's standards ("Holy Christopher!"), the movie gives an accurate account of aerial gunnery training in WWII. For the first hour (of the 90 minute film), all aspects of gunnery training are portrayed. I fully enjoyed the epic, even though the characters end up in a B-25 Mitchell. (I'm partial to B-24 Liberators!) Well worth the watch!
Elisabeth Filarski.. MY Soul Survivor. elisabeth filarski kicked ass!.. oh, who evers bought it.. has it got alot of elisabeth? anyway.. i hope it works on australian dvds.. or else im gonna KICK SOME ASS
Horrific And Awesome Action Movie With Heart And Rage. Years before moviemakers really starting getting comic book adaptations right with films like "Spider-Man" and "Batman Begins" came "Darkman", a brilliant action-horror movie that came closer than any show before it to capturing the darker, more developed comics of the modern era.  It's a gory and action-packed - and intelligent, emotional and quite often humorous - tale as Peyton Westlake (superbly played by Liam Neeson) becomes the Darkman after barely surviving an attack by mob thugs employed by the crimelord Durant (Larry Drake), who Westlake's attorney girlfriend Julie (Frances McDormand) is trying to bring down.  A scientist researching the development of a perfect synthetic skin to aid burn victims, it's being immersed in this liquid in its unstable corrosive state and then left for dead following the explosive destruction of his lab that is largely responsible for Westlake's metamorphis into Darkman.Unable to feel physical pain but constantly assailed by emotional and mental anguish.  Enhanced strength due to the maximum adrenaline now coursing unchecked through his system constantly, 24 hours a day.  Serious rage problems.  Severely altered, scarred physical appearance.  Westlake/Darkman can create perfect masks of any human being (and mimic their vocal patterns precisely) but the masks break down after a finite period in sunlight, and thus he most frequently appears in his new identity's trademark garb of bandages and black trenchcoat and hat.  I realize typing that that it sounds like a dopey outfit but it's actually a striking and intimidating look onscreen thanks to the great effects and costuming.  Hellbent on a path of revenge against Drake's crime empire, and on protecting his love Julie from the shadows, the violent and vengeful reign of the Darkman begins.  A movie that possibly could only have been made by a man capable of directing such diverse films as the "Spider-Man" epics, the "Evil Dead" trilogy and "The Gift".  Highest recommendation
funny movie. Pretty funny movie. It was odd to see Adam West not in his Batman role.
The spoiled princess's of Manhattan. Uptown Girls starring Brittany Murphy and Dakota Fanning is quite delightful about a rich girl (Murphy) who loses her inheritance and must become one of the normal people - she has to get a real job (gasp!). Donald Faison and Heather Locklear also star. Fanning has never been more than a pain in the rump for this particular role but she is one of the most talented young actress' since Jodie Foster. Murphy has great range as an actress, every role she commits to, she delivers a clean, enerergtic performance as always. The ending is so cute that it's embarrassing. This movie works so well, it's predictable, melodramatic, and formulatic but I defintely enjoyed this feel-good comedy from two gifted actress'
i keep telling people to see this film. I keep telling folks to watch this film. Their eyes roll. They get this, "Isn't he pitiful?" look on their faces. They try to humor me. Obviously I need help.But, see, the thing is I never really liked Tammy Faye or Jimmie B or the whole Jesus as sales tool schlock-fest. I watched the film because I thought it would be a hoot. RuPaul narrates it, after all.Imagine my surprise when I wound up with a new respect for Tammy Faye. She is a survivor, if nothing else. Sure she makes spaghetti sauce with ketchup. But she was one of the first, and certainly the most high profile, Christians to express concern for the victims of AIDS. I loved her dismantling of the rabid Jerry Falwell. And no matter what awful stuff happens to her and hers, she retains a life-force, a hope that is downright inspiring.See this film
Incredibly sexy movie with AAAAAWESOME 80s soundtrack!. This is one my absolutely favorite 80s movies. If you love 80s music, then this is for you - one of the best soundtracks out there. The plot is kind of cheesy but in a really fun way that takes you away from reality. It has a very sexual tone to it that makes you want to jump Steven Bauer. He looks totally hot in this movie. It's definitley worth watching
Great, African Martial Arts, Great. Before I give my review, I would just like to inform people that Capoeria is African, not Brazilian. The slaves started this art back in Angola, and when they were transported to Brazil, that's when it became popularized. The reason that there are so many kicks is because the slaves practiced this art while their hands were in shackles. They disguised it as a dance so their slave masters wouldn't know what they were doing.That's why the movements resemble a dance.This movie was great, the action, the story, everything was great. Mark Dacascos teaches inner city youths , some of which are trouble makers, the art of Capoeria. At first they resist, but as time goes on they become interested, and start to train hard and pay close attention to what they're being taught.Some change their tough guy ways, while others just remain the same. Bottomline, a great movie.The first time I've ever heard of or even seen Capoeria was when I saw this movie on television about 10 years ago. The movements, agility, kicks are just flat out amazing. Me personally I train in Jeet Kune Do and Muay Thai and Filipino Kali, but I can tell you that I love to watch Capoeria being performed, and watching this movie is definitely a treat for any martial arts fan or any martial artist regardless of what style he/she practices
Another adventure with Cleo,T-Bone, and Clifford. This a great movie for all ages.I am 9 years old and I love this movie.In this movie,their is a group called"Larry's Amazing Animals".In it,their are 2 dogs,a cow,and a ferret."Larry's Amazing Animals" is like a circus.This movie inspired me to have a circus of my own called"The Circus kids".We will be performing in April or May.What gave this movie only 4 stars is when Clifford leaves home.Of couse he comes back,but that part is sad
Great yoga!. I would recommend the Crunch-Fat Burning Yoga DVD for anyone - whether it's your first yoga attempt  or you are at a higher level of yoga. It's interesting and easy to follow and you feel like you've done your stretches as well as burned some fat after you've finished the DVD. Sara Ivanhoe is a great instructor and you don't get tired of her.Try it - you'll be recommending it to your friends.
Shattering. This film is slick and shattering with an underbelly of sobbering disatisfaction. Christie is pognient. Harvey is cool with cracks of vulnerability that informs the emptiness of his life. Bogarde is sympathetic and callow, a basically good man who is seduced by an elusive beauty that could never be. The direction is crisp. the music and sound very good.
So far so good. I ordered this about 2-3 weeks before Christmas. The delivery of this item was very prompt which I was impressed with. The packaging was really good, so I knew it got to my house safe.The DVD was a gift to someone for Christmas so I myself have not watched the DVD and I don't think the receipent has had a chance to watch it to see if it had any problems. So, so far so good
God bless Miramax for finally bringing this out!. Charming, poignant, breath-taking, quick. Beautifully spoken, with excellent costuming
"I got everything by talking fast in a world that goes for talking. And ended up with exactly nothing.". "Fallen Angel" is the second film that director Otto Preminger made with cinematographer Joseph LaShelle and actor Dana Andrews, the first being his 1944 masterpiece "Laura". This time Dana Andrews brings his deep voice and nuanced deadpan delivery to a film noir based on the novel by Marty Holland (who is actually Mary Holland), adapted by first-time screenwriter Harry Kleiner and photographed with Joseph LaShelle's spectacularly fluid camera. After an attention-grabbing credit sequence speeds down a dark road at night, Eric Stanton (Dana Andrews) gets off his bus before it reaches his destination. He ran out of bus fare. He finds himself in a small California coastal town, where an errant waitress named Stella (Linda Darnell) catches his eye. She's a tough-talking beauty coveted by every man she meets. But only the one who will marry her and give her a comfortable life will get her. Eric wants that to be that man, so he schemes to seduce money out of prim and proper June Mills (Alice Faye). But when Stella is murdered, circumstantial evidence points to Eric.Dana Andrews was fantastically suited to film noir. Like Humphrey Bogart, he barely moved his facial muscles when he spoke but was able to deliver a layered performance without emoting. It's interesting to watch his face in "Fallen Angel", because so much of Eric Stanton is revealed in his forehead. It's an exercise in acting with fine muscles only. Unlike Humphrey Bogart, Andrews had an imposing speaking voice. He could deliver dialogue forcefully without raising his voice. Again, perfect for film noir. Three films that Andrews made with director Otto Preminger and cinematographer Joseph LaShelle are often classified as "film noir". One of them, the brilliant "Laura", is not film noir in my book. It's mystery/romance. The other, 1950's "Where the Sidewalk Ends", is often considered superior to "Fallen Angel" due to its psychological complexity. But I prefer "Fallen Angel" for its fantastic crane shots, its far more complex women, and its aggressive introduction to its protagonist, who gets off the bus and immediately starts conning the local conmen.Credit is due Alice Faye for bringing depth to a character that could easily have been saccharine and two-dimensional. "Fallen Angel" was to be her dramatic comeback after her great success in musical roles. It didn't work out that way, because she felt that producer Darryl Zanuck had butchered her part so walked out on her contract. But I'm impressed with Faye's ability to convey subtle desperation underneath June Mills' sensible, uptight exterior. June is more terrified of ending up a spinster, like her sister, than she is of losing her money, her reputation, or marrying a swindler. And when it looks like her sympathy and loyalty will not hold her flimsy marriage together, she's distraught. But her comportment changes only once. She's a credible and sympathetic character, not just Eric Stanton's saving grace. "Fallen Angel" is a superb film noir, with a knock-out performance by Dana Andrews, a star-making appearance from Linda Darnell, a dramatic turn from Alice Faye, great supporting work all around, and a seamless, mobile camera from Otto Preminger and Joseph LaShelle.The DVD (20th Century Fox 2006): There are 3 photo galleries: A "Publicity Gallery" (20 posters and ads), a "Production Stills" gallery (49 photos), and a "Unit Photography" gallery" (38 behind-the-scenes photos). The theatrical trailer (2 1/2 min) is interesting in that it features a voice-over narration by Dana Andrews, a common technique in film noir, but one that is not featured in "Fallen Angel", except in the trailer. There is a good audio commentary by film noir historian Eddie Muller and Susan Andrews, who is Dana Andrews' daughter. Accordingly, there is a lot of discussion oft Dana Andrews, his career and many personal anecdotes, which is a nice addition to the commentary. Eddie Muller provides background on the actors and creative crew, as usual, and discusses Preminger's distinctive camera work, the long takes and mobile camera, the transitions, dialogue, censorship and themes. Subtitles are available for the film in English and Spanish
Camille Claudel the movie. Great Artsy passionate story of the lady behind Rodin, an equally good sculptor, who positively influenced the art and productiviity of one of the world's best known sculptors
SATISFYING  NOIR  MELODRAMA.... Dopwn-on-his-luck drifter Dana Andrews falls hard for sexy small town diner waitress Linda Darnell.  Hard enough to marry and fleece local rich spinster Alice Faye.  But as in any good noir, things don't go as planned. When Darnell turns up murdered, local cop Charles Bickford turns up the heat and Andrews finds himself ready to be framed. This is moody noir at it's best. Bickford is violent and twisted. Darnell is gorgeous but callous with too many men hanging around. Faye is nice and sweet but tied to her older spinster sister Anne Revere. And there's a lot of money (Faye's) waiting to be had. Andrews is perfect as the troubled Eric (as he was as the troubled detective in Preminger's "Laura").  He actually looks likes he's been knocked around. But Darnell is good reason to watch this also. Her Stella is a beautiful hard luck dame waiting for her ship to come in...in spades. Darnell was at her best playing tough girls ("A Letter to Three Wives" or "Hangover Square" are good examples). But Faye, well, she's good but I'm not sure film noir was her arena. I know this was supposed to be a departure for her from the Fox musicals and she walked out when Preminger cut her "best scene(s)" but still she was again playing a "nice girl". It would have been interesting if she had had Darnell's part and vice-versa. Nonetheless, "Fallen Angel" is a great example of what film noir was...right down to the David Raksin score with the jukebox playing the moody song "Slowly" to good effect. The DVD print is wonderful. Thanks Fox. Enjoy
easily, one of the best performances,best films,don't resist. it's been a long time, since i've bothered to write a review, seems these days, movies are all so, normal, nothing unique about them, it's sad really, this film, is unique, I relate this film to scarface, as well as blowing me away, ving rhames, makes you believe he is the great don himself, he took on the mob, and he lived, and he killed a man, and beat it, then he killed another, and he got misdeamanor, the man is a icon, one of the greatest showboats, to have ever lived, he's also very intelligent, and it's true, he shouldn't have got such a bad rep, but baby, that sells, violence, sex, crime, it all sells,the media, you know, this film is a 100 stars, if you don't see this, then I pity you, if you say this movie is ..., like reviewer number one, then your an ..., this film is brilliant, a masterpiece, this film is also almost out of print, obviously, like divinci, a true artist, isn't respected till he is gone, wan't a real world example? look at tupac shakur, when don is gone, no one will ever be like him again, so relish, his kinglyness, and buy this video, before it is, to late
Great Nostalgia Trip!!. I was 7 when I watched these shows.  Great memories.  And Soupy Sales is an added bonus!!  Just amazing how things have changed...Not sure if this set will appeal to the younger crowd, but for us aging baby boomers it's a fun trip
...When I was very small... This episode of Star Trek, "The Man Trap" is my earliest memory of what would become a lifelong enjoyment of the franchise. Truthfully, "The Man Trap" terrified me (I was maybe two, or three, although I am sure by that time the series was limping along in it's third season and I was seeing a repeat for the first time); Star Trek was considered "adult programming", and as such I was not allowed to watch it - I used to sneak behind the couch while my grandfather watched it on nights I stayed at their house, then would lay awake in my bed scared by what I'd seen, but excited just the same. Like another space show I enjoyed and was terrified by (Lost in Space), I didn't recognize Star Trek as anything but a world I wanted very much to be in, but remained frightened of anyhow (I was, as I said, very young).
Made us ALL laugh. Wonderful vehicle enjoyed by everyone in our household.  Allowed "my boys" to see that even with ineptness and bungling, the underdog can win, and you don't need to watch a movie with blood and gore to enjoy a movie.  We work with mostly inner city kids in a rural setting, kids that usually watch the more grizzly stuff. It was truly a pleasure to hear them all laugh without reserve.
A beautiful film that pulls at the heart strings!. I'm an avid reader, always have been, but I've felt kind of burned out of reading as of late, and who wouldn't be after reading hundreds and hundreds of books, one after another, usually reading two books at a time, several books a week?  Also, my schedule no longer allows me the freedom to read as much as I used to.  And that is why I decided to watch this film when Netflix sent it to me despite the fact that I hadn't read the Nicholas Sparks novel first.  Now I wish I'd read the book.  This is one of the most beautiful tear-jerking stories I have seen!  Everyone who knows me knows that I'm a sucker for stories that pull at the heart strings.  They also know that stories centered on star-crossed lovers are my major weakness.  Most of my all-time favorite books and movies have those characteristics in common.  I won't go into details about the plot because I don't want to give away spoilers to potential viewers (though I'm sure many people have done that already) -- all I can say is that you cannot go wrong with this film if you're a hopeless romantic.  The actors are wonderful.  Ryan Gosling and Rachel McAdams transmit all of the right emotions and do a flawless job with the characterization.  They add a great deal of depth and range to their characters and I can't imagine better actors for the roles.  Gena Rowlands is also wonderful as the older Allie.  And I like the 1940s setting and the backdrop -- however brief -- of the second world war.  The wardrobe, settings, scenery and cinematography are flawless.  The DVD is a great investment.  The widescreen edition makes viewing all the more pleasurable.  I cannot recommend The Notebook enough.  I don't know if I'll read the book because I don't like reading novels after I have watched their film adaptations, but I will definitely read other Nicholas Sparks novels in the not-so-distant future
Science Gone Awry Creates Horror on VHS. This film is a good example of the classic science fiction theme of the 1950s. Man through his science takes experimentation of his environment one step too far. Nature is harmony. Man's attempts to disrupt that harmony leads to destruction and horror to himself and his loved ones. This is a well intentioned, poignantly directed and produced film. The horror resulting from Al (David) Hedison's experiments gone awry are devastating and disturbingly represented in the film's images. Once seen, the viewer can never forget them. This is a powerful film even to this day. This VHS copy in pan &amp; scan is very good. The colors are rich and the Stereo Sound is excellent. Highly recommended
Very Inspirational. I loved the portrayal of a tough honest lawman who also showed a deep understanding of human nature.  He was also a very warm family man. The way he handled the young man who wanted to become his assistant and how he became a role model for him while he was alive is interesting.  I like certain westerns and this was a good one.  I think Sam Elliott should have been aged a little more...it was too obvious that a young man was wearing props to make him look much older. I recommend this feel-good movie for a general audience
Visitatori. There are four kinds of sci-fi:(1) People go to the stars (Star Trek etc)(2) Aliens come to earth (V etc)(3) Aliens interact with other aliens (Dune etc)(4) Earth of the near (Mad Max) or distant future (Time Machine).The V mythology developed the second category in important ways that impacted both kids and big people, too.  Without V would we have had Independence Day?  Or Men in Black?V also made an impact overseas.  In September 1985 in Florence, I heard a street vendor who was fatigued with the surge of tourists sigh: "Visitatori!"  His analogy was very well taken.V-Fans hope for another sequel.  The projected "V the Second Generation" sounds a lot like Star Trek TNG.  There are other possible names: V-Files, V-Men, V-Hur (aliens attack ancient Rome in a prequel), V-zilla (aliens attack Japan), V-Ventura (aliens abduct rich Italians on a desert island but nobody cares).One star was taken away because the DVD producers have masked the top and bottom of the image, but the director commentary is a big plus
Movies. My husband liked this movie so much he said he had to have it if ever came out on DVD.  He likes Sidney Poltler.  Good additon to collectio
Usher rocks!!!. Vincent Price at his best!!! I was amazed at his interpretation of Usher. It was very much like the hyper sensitive fellow of Poe's tale!!! The ending was shocking. I recommend this item to everybody. Good acting, very good indeed
Star Trek At Its Best. Shore Leave is one of the best episodesof the classic series. It uses all thesci fi props but also has a great story,if you don't even care about Star Trekand have to watch one, watch this one.
Slow Paced Slice of 1970s Americana. The Ice Storm is a startling look at 1973 America and how lost so many people (parents, children, neighbors, etc.) became during this transitional time. The free-love of the 60s spill over into the 30 and 40-somethings of a sleepy Connecticut community and runs smack into the dysfunctional family of Ben and Elena Hood (Kevin Kline and Joan Allen).Ben is having an affair with his neighbors wife, Janey Carver (Sigourney Weaver, ALIENS), and the boredom they both feel during their "love making" is palpable. They want something different to happen, but what that "something" is remains unobtainable. And the two's lackadaisical attitudes toward sex, family, and the times seep into their everyday lives; even into their spouses' and children.Ben's wife Elena gets caught shoplifting from the local pharmacy. Janey's husband Jim goes away on long business trips and returns with funks of depression because of what he witnesses going on in his family.The children of Ben and Janey are also settling into this bizarre behavior. Some of them explore sexuality in often strange ways, or run out into storms and play on ice-covered roads. Others blow things up with M80 firecrackers, or smoke pot and drink to numb themselves out.But all of these people's lives will change in an unalterable way during one evening; an ice storm has hit and the cold outside bashes against the cold each character feels inside. Some will live, some will die, and others will never be the same.______________________________________________________________________________The attention to detail on the 70s in director Ang Lee's movie is astounding. The sweater-vest outfits, paneled station wagons, and boxy homes were excellently filmed.You can also feel the dark undercurrent running through the characters' lives: the grayish landscape cinematography against the quiet homes that harbor secrets.The cast was absolutely perfect, too. Kevin Kline (one of my favorite actors), Sigourney Weaver, Joan Allen, Elijah Wood, Tobey Maguire, Katie Holmes, Christina Ricci, and Jamey Sheridan all pull in stunning performances.Having gushed over how well done the movie was, I do have to comment on its pacing. If you thought SIDEWAYS was snail-like, this movie may make you feel as though grass could grow faster.Director Ang Lee has had some serious success in Hollywood as of late (BROKEBACK MOUNTAIN, 2005), but this earlier work is an excellent way to see how he's grown in the intervening years
I Thought You Were Dead. Snake Plissken rules in this John Carpenter/Kurt Russel.Escape from New York has great action and subtle jokes.John Carpenter fans like I should see it. The DVD has a 22 minute Documentry,trailers,a photo gallery,two audio commenteries,one from John and Kurt which  is one of my favorites in the John Carpenter and Kurt Russel commentery series and more! It's Awwwwwwwwesome.Also See The Thing and Big Trouble in Little China.See ya at the Movies.
One I want to own and watch over and over.... It would never win an Oscar. Who cares?? A fun, spooky movie, kind of campy and fun. A great rainy-night movie, especially since it takes place on a rainy night. This movie was made to entertain, and entertain it does. Loved the twisty little ending.If you like Dennis Lehane novels, you might like this! Kind of a "Shutter Island" feeling to it.
BY THE LIGHT OF THE SILVERY MOON. THIS IS PURE CLEAN FUN, IT IS CUTE AND DORIS DAY AND GORDON MACRAE MAKE A CUTE PAIR. IT IS A GREAT FAMILY FILM THAT MAKES YOU FEEL GOOD. WORTH OWNING
Van Damme still has it. This film, though not a hit, proved to people that Van Damme was back in shape and could still the Van Damme thing, which is kick people's asses. I know this was not his best acting but it was a pretty entertaning flick, I really wish it had more success at the box office. i mean come on it wasnt meant to be an Oscar winner, its an action flick that has plenty of action nuff said
Movie review for Sherlock, Jr. "Sherlock, Jr." is fabulously inventive and exellently crafted.  Considering when it was made, middle 1920's, it has marvelous special effects.  I found it immensely entertaining.  Great Buster Keaton!  "Our Hospitality" is good, funny in many places, but tends to be a bit long for the plotline.  That is, it drags a bit in the middle. The scene near the end in the river and the rescue are, however, vintage Buster Keaton
You Will Love This Movie. "The summer I killed my father, I was 10 years old..." With those opening words, the film sets its mood from the very first second of its running time for the things to come...The film has a visual and storytelling strength that will capture you immediately as movie starts and will not let loose until the end credits are over.
Very good drama of the Gulf War. This British made-for-TV movie tells the story of an 8-man SAS unit inserted deep behind enemy lines during the first gulf war and ordered to interdict and destroy SCUD missiles.  This movie was based upon a book by Andy McNab, directed by Tom Clegg (Sharpe's Rifles), and stars Sean Bean ("Sharpe's Rifles," "National Treasure," "Troy," "Lord of the Rings") as McNab.Murphy's law was in full effect on this mission: everything that could go wrong went wrong.  Their radios would not function, and they were discovered by a goatherder and reported to the Iraqi army.  Because the radios were non-functional, they could not be rescued by helicopter and were forced to hike out 120 miles to the Syrian border.  Along the way they were separated, and most were eventually killed or captured.  After being captured they were tortured.McNab claims that during their run for the border, the SAS team inflicted some 250 casualties on the Iraqis, including 100 KIA.  This destruction is faithfully depicted in the movie, but based upon reading the Amazon reviews of McNab's book, it appears that he may have wildly embellished this part of the story.  Be that as it may, this was a very good movie, considering its low, made for television budget.  It kept me interested throughout, and I have no trouble recommending it.
If this affected you, DO SOMETHING!!. Seriously guys... if this film says ANYTHING to you, then it is your DUTY to do something... these young men were WRONGFULLY imprisoned.... Im not saying you have to donate your college fund... but atleast spread the word... tell people about www.wm3.org  tell people about wm3 awareness day (July 23).. go to events... tell EVERYONE YOU KNOW about this cause.... and while you are saying "I don't have time for this" remember that what is 5 minutes to you, could help these boys have 5 minutes more of freedom.... seriously, think about it
If you have to listen to folk music, let it be this. I'm delighted to see there aren't a string of 1 star reviews from people who don't get A Mighty Wind. If it has a weakness, its that its played so dryly, its almost like non-fiction that just happens to be funny.  Thank god for Fred Willard who adds some vitally important crassness to these "serious" proceedings.I share a sentiment expressed by some of the characters.  I've never liked folk music.  But somehow this movie manages to poke fun at those less cynical times, without being too cynical itself.My one dissapointment is that we don't get to see Ed Begley Jr. sing How's It Hangin' Grandma? in Swedish.  Talk about a missed opportunity
Hiding Out Is Delightful Despite Lack Of Praise. I can't say enough about this movie. It's clearly, one of the most underated movies of the 80's. And sadly it was considered one of his worst movies (along with many others) by pretty much every critic. Umm... ok. It rarely airs and not many people have seen it before. Like the viewer before me said, it needs to be re-released.I've enjoyed this movie on Vhs for years (13 years to be exact) and have finally just gotten it on dvd. With his talent he deserved alot more than he got out of his acting career. In my opinion Hollywood is and always will be overated. Bring back some people who can act!! He's great on his show but I'd love to see him in more main stream movies. And hell, I don't care if they tank I'll watch them anway!! How can you not love Jon's quirky yet enjoyable acting style. And those cute dimples of his !!! (yeah I'm a girl can't help it) Give this movie a chance you'll love it, if you don't something is seriously wrong with you. =) (22 year old viewer)
Megalodon. I believe that MEGALODON is actually as close to real as any movie I've seen about this prehistoric shark.  Only Spielberg could do it better
Informative. Nice little video for my Zen during my long wait at the doctor's office.  Confucius overcame many difficulties
Great classic for a great price. With a cable modem, took about 1 hour and 15 minutes to download Unbox, install the program and download the episode.  It's a great download speed considering the file is 803 mb.  I was able to still use my computer, IE 7.0 and RealPlayer, so the download is not a resource hog.  The menu bar includes a link to shop for more Unbox titles, which I found very convenient.The quality is great, but the video stutters in Unbox.  Maybe because it uses 3 applications when playing video?  I chose to watch the episode on Windows Media Player 11 and I had no problems at all.I've bought and watched 3 episodes, all with the same results.  Fast and unobstrusive download, great quality and low price.  Just use WMP, or another player that can handle wma files, to watch.
Excellent!. This film has fascinated me since I was a small child, and stil does without fail.  The music is wonderful also.  Everyone who wants or needs something to boost them up a bit, watch this
Beam me back down, Kara.  It's good down here too. [:-). Kara, the Alien, still looks GOOD! As do ALL the ladies in FEMALIEN 2..."The search for Kara".  This version had some acceptable opening graphics and lots of well photographed, sexy girls performing stimulating erotic activities.  Twice, I had an overwhelming urge to go out and get a massage. [:-)Many reviews have negative comments about plots and story lines but I didn't have any urges to fast-forward past the fun moments of "acting" in this one.  I'm very glad that I purchased FEMALIEN 2
Watch it now!!! :). To be perfectly honest, the only reason I watched this movie was for Dean Cain, but I was delightfully surprised at how amazing it was!!!  I laughed, I cried . . . well, you get the picture.  If you haven't seen it, do so  now!  It's worth every penny! :
the best. I am very glad with my purchase. Fast delivery and very security package.Nanc
It is worth watching the second time... This film is soothing in its beauty, its irony, its eternal understanding and acceptance of human behaviour in all its forms... I have watched it once and I want to watch it again... A truly classic work of art.
Careful, no subs or close captioned!. Contrary to what the box and description here says this disc has NO subtitles or closed captions or whatever. The R2 neither.So again, don't feel sorry for the film companies about their complaining of copying of films and stuff.Non anamorphic or simply 4:3 format, no subs, not available at all (yes I mean you, Disney)... In short, no quality or consistency. Go and take a hike.Stop lobbying for legislation and start making real DVD's
Kickboxer Goes On Without Van Damme For The Better. Kickboxer 2 The Road Back Deals With David Sloan. The brother of  Kurt &amp; Eric Sloan David is running his brothers kickboxer school tung po killed off van damme's charcter for the first kickboxer I say good sasha mitchell is a lot better tung po can only regain his honor by fighting david since kurt is dead so david vs. tung po with glue and glass is a bloody battle great movie the best in the series
Last Stand at Saber River. The movie was excellent and is typical of a Tom Selleck Western. It's to bad he is type-cast as Magnum PI, because he is a great portrayer of the Westerns and I would love to see him star in more of them
This show is the funniest thing on TV right now. I've never watched any shows regularly on FX until this year, when I happened to catch a double episode of It's Always Sunny in Philadelphia, about 3 episodes into Season 2. I don't remember when I've laughed so hard in the past few years. This show is hysterical! Charlie Day, what can I say? I dare say he is the funniest character on television. Case in point, the episode: Hundred Dollar Baby.The gang's walking home in the evening (Charlie, Mac, Dennis and Dee) when an apparent Meth Head tries to mug them. Charlie Mac and Dennis all run away, knocking down Dee to fend for herself (intentionally or non-intentionally? You decide.).Dee gets mugged and decides she's going to take some kind of "box-er-cizing" thing to learn how to defend herself, but her dad Frank, played by Danny DeVito, pipes up and says if she wants to learn to defend herself she should learn from him, being that he's a former boxer ("Frankie Fast Hands"). She agrees.In the meantime, Dennis and Mac convince Charlie to become an underground street fighter after attending one and realizing that "All you really need is to be able to take a worse beating than the other guy." Mac asks Dennis "You know who can take a beating?" And they both instantly turn to each other and say "CHARLIE."What's great about Charlie is that he's usually up for anything as long as there's money or excitement in it, and this is no exception.Back to Dee - at the gym she's approached by another woman who offers her some assistance in the form of so-called "Performance Enhancing Supplements." Dee's now popping pills, which Charlie sees while accidentally catching her (she doesn't know he saw her), and now Charlie is popping her pills.I refuse to spoil the rest, but rest assured that this is one of the funniest things you will see this year, and the rest of the series is no exception.I have yet to see an un-funny character on this show, but Charlie steals the show almost every time. Charlie Day is comedy GOLD
One of the top ten films ever made. This movie tugs at your heart strings in a completely honest way. The movie does not patronise or make pathetic the boy hero who has to endure. It is the very opposite of saccharine glop.It is a profoundly optimistic and yet realistic movie. The movie is peppered with memorable eccentric and kind characters.
...When I was very small... This episode of Star Trek, "The Man Trap" is my earliest memory of what would become a lifelong enjoyment of the franchise. Truthfully, "The Man Trap" terrified me (I was maybe two, or three, although I am sure by that time the series was limping along in it's third season and I was seeing a repeat for the first time); Star Trek was considered "adult programming", and as such I was not allowed to watch it - I used to sneak behind the couch while my grandfather watched it on nights I stayed at their house, then would lay awake in my bed scared by what I'd seen, but excited just the same. Like another space show I enjoyed and was terrified by (Lost in Space), I didn't recognize Star Trek as anything but a world I wanted very much to be in, but remained frightened of anyhow (I was, as I said, very young).
The Sacketts a family western. Tom Selleck and Sam Elliott in the same movie, both great actors and they were superb in this movie, if you like westerns this is one to see and is great for the whole family. Louis L'Amour has many fine books and movies but thisis one of his best
Adorable and Fun. This is such an adorable and fun piece of literature. Austen's language is filled with eloquent and ironic humor following the life of Emma Woodhouse and her failing matchmaking schemes, ultimately culminating in her ignorance of her own true love. This is a very easy going and fun read, filled with Austen's clever charm and smooth tone of voice. Highly recommended!
Terrific for any  school art department to show!. I'm an art teacher at a middle school. I show &quot;Michelangelo&quot; every year to my 7th graders as they study the Renaissance. However this can as easily be used in a college course. This video not only has the  specifics of his life, but gives a flavor of his time
Gary Cooper: The symbol of integrity!,. For many, Gary Cooper was the Westerner par excellence--cool, taciturn, courageous and just; skilled with a gun but slow to use it; gentlemanly, generous and shy, appealing to men as much as to women... This image reached its culmination in "High Noon" with his characterization of Marshal Will Kane, the brave and stubborn ex-marshal standing alone against the forces of evil, and the prototype for countless Western heroes ever since...Highly-stylized, carefully and beautifully shot, "High Noon" possibly owes its great popularity to a combination of three things--It's a suspense film in the real sense; the dearly beloved set-piece climax of the gun duel never got better or more thoughtful treatment; it has a theme tune that persistently whines its way into the subconscious... Most people first remember the Dimitri Tiomkin theme tune, then Gary Cooper stalking down the lonely street... The bits and pieces gather from there... The film also ties a small town of do-nothings showing their cowardice by turning their backs on trouble, integrity, and an elected representative..."High Noon" is also distinguished by many fine images from the incidental (the brief close-up of the wagon wheel revolving against the town's facades as Cooper and Kelly leave the community); to the poignant ( Zinneman's camera drawing back from Cooper's face to show him standing vulnerable and alone in the dust of a deserted main street); to the deliberately melodramatic (Cooper bitterly grinding his marshal's badge in the dirt before riding away for good ).By means of rapid cross-cutting, Fred Zinnemann gives shots--repeatedly--of the pendulum of the clock, of the empty railroad tracks, and in rapid succession, shots of tense faces--taken at close range--of the townsfolk in the church, in the local saloon, then of the worried face of the marshal, his wife, and of the three criminals ready for the approaching train..."High Noon" is the simple and forceful tale of an aging lawman on his day of retirement and also on his wedding day...Will Kane, on a blazing June morning in 1875, has just married a pretty young Quaker girl... The bride feels doubly blessed... She's got her man, and this is the day he will hang his guns... She has firm Quaker convictions and never did imagine herself as a lawman's wife...But, while it's all being celebrated a badly shaken stationmaster (Ted Stanhope) bursts in with quite the wrong kind of wedding telegram... It states that an outlaw Frank Miller (Ian MacDonald) whom Kane had put behind bars six years ago for terrorizing the town has been released... The stationmaster adds that three members of his old gang are already awaiting his arrival at the depot--their object a reunion with the pardoned man who will get off the train at noon, and presumably settle the score with Kane...The marshal, like a sensible man, does, in fact, put his wife in the buggy, but then like a man of honor but also a sensible man (for the gang will surely hunt them down wherever they go) changes his mind and heads the horses back to town...A bride, especially a Quaker bride, can't quite see it this way on her wedding day so she hands him her own ultimatum--if he won't go away with her she'll go alone by train--the one that leaves at twelve...Everything on this torrid, dusty morning therefore hinges on midday--therefore Kramer's insistence on his clocks. From this point onwards High Noon, although it remains completely classic in Western terms, faithful to period and concerned with an indicative historical situation, takes on wide and profound implications...It's about group cowardice and short-term interest--particularly the treachery of so-called 'good' people... 'Law abiding,' you feel, doesn't mean what it should mean... When a group of people decide that they must passively refuse to support the law for reasons of personal preservation, who, in fact, are the outlaws?Thus the marshal's predicament... He is an embarrassment to everyone, from Judge (Otto Kruger)--he's leaving town--to the humblest citizen of Hadleyville... Only one is ready to give assistance and he melts away when he finds there'll be no other volunteers... The marshal's immature deputy (Lloyd Bridges) is willing to take over his job--again, provided Cooper leaves town... But this is absolute ambition at work...The build-up of tension as the lawman prepares to meet the four thugs and makes fruitless attempts to recruit help from the cowardly citizens has never been handled better, and it is sustained right up to and through the climactic gunfight as the lawman's bride finds herself trapped in the crossfire...Filmed in Black and White, "High Noon" is among the ten Best Westerns ever made... The film achieved the shape of a democratic allegory which reached people in much the same way and for the same reasons that "The Best Years of Our Lives" had done... Its cutting suspense was the hallmark of Zinneman's mastery of the movie medium...Gary Cooper's performance, as the very vulnerable, worried man, won him the year's Oscar...
Awesome. I really like the pokemon movies and I was not dissapointed with this one. I have watched it about 7 times over the past several years. Team Rocket never plays as big of arole as in the t.v show though
doppelganger. its really a very nice movie and i want a sneak preview of i
Chinese extras menu?!?!?!?. Hey, the extras disc has menus in Chinese..they still work, and you can view all the stuff, but you have to guess at what each menu option will do...anyone else get this
Way to Go Amazon!  Very cool. Just got done watching the show and it was awesome. Of course I had to download the tool, how else do you get started? Once it downloaded it worked very well and the video was right there to watch when I was ready. Note to self get cable, DSL is a slow download but it worked great and the picture quality was awesome. No commercials!I didn't have any troubles installing it on my computer and the help tool walked me through it.
A simple plan, a twisted movie. Two brothers and a friend stumble across a crashed airplane full of cash (4.4 million dollars, to be precise) in the snowy woods.  Our wise hero, played by Bill Paxton, devises a simple plan in which they can lay low with the cash to determine if anyone is looking for it, then move out of town and split the bounty.  If only he could control everything...The bag o' cash is just a starting point for this riveting morality tale.  The bottom line is that one lie always leads to another, and our little trio, plus the wives, get in deeper and deeper.  There are bound to be crossed loyalties in a group of three--the brothers have family ties, and the friend is loyal to only one of the brothers (the Billy Bob Thornton character).  A push-and-pull over the loyalty of Thornton's character ensues.  Each man has different family and work pressures, and not all are as patient as the one who devised the clear-headed simple plan.  It's captivating to watch money change the motives and behaviors of these men.The real star is Billy Bob Thornton, playing the down-and-out loser Jacob.  He's a nobody in town, a generally recognized screw-up, but he is truly the philosopher of the group.  He has very simple desires of resurrecting his dead father's farm, and he can't imagine taking the cash and leaving the only town he's ever known.  In the end, he plays the only man with a conscience.My chief complaint with both the movie and the novel of the same name is the way the Sarah character goes through a complete personality change.  She's two completely different people at different points in the movie, and her change in behavior isn't well-explained.  All other characters, however, are exceptionally well-developed.
Funny,Funny,Funny. Even though this is about 4 years old, it is extremely halarious.  I've been waiting to see a good stand up comedy. The first 15 min is just one hilarious hit after another. I love this guy
This is their best picture together. With Fred and Ginger joined by George and Ira... This is their best picture together.We begin in Paris, where Fred is Petrov the "Russian" ballet dancer who is really Peter P Peters of Philadelphia PA.  Ginger is Laura Keen, American musical dancing star.  They meet because Fred has seen her picture and fallen in love with her. He calls but at that moment Ginger has had her fill of adoring male fans and it doesn't help matters that Pete puts on a fake Russian accent "("I must go to Moscow...") and manages to so disorient Ginger that she packs her bags and sets sail for America.Edward Everett Horton, who is Fred's perfect comedic foil here as in others of their films, plays the ballet impresario Jeffery Baird--dithering and droll as ever.  He and Fred book on the same ship as Ginger ("The Queen Anne") a deco delight of the seas with teardrop shaped windows and other streamlining that would make the Normandie and Isle de France blush.  After a gangway encounter that does not go terribly well, Fred tries to make amends.  At first Ginger is icy but as always, she begins to melt...For a time, however, Fred more or less disappears and is AWOL from ballet rehearsals.  That is because he loves modern music and to prove it we get "Slap that Bass" one of Fred's very best solo numbers, as he picks up the rhythms of the black combo and combines it with the sounds of the ship's engines to create what is a "look ma no hands!" kind of a tour de force tap dancing solo.Also on board a lot of zaniness occurs as Fred, along with Ginger's manger named Arthur Miller (!), played by Jerome Cowan in one of his best rolls, fool Horton into thinking in one scene that he is seasick, and in another that the ship is on fire and in danger of sinking.  Both are hilarious.Back to the wooing, there was never such sophisticated courting music as George's captivating "Walking the Dog" (except perhaps for the similarly engaging incidental music by the pool in "The Philadelphia Story").  Fred woos Ginger by endearing himself to a passel of pooches, and her little dog, too.Once he knows and she knows that they have fallen for one another he sings the marvelous "Beginners Luck" at the ship's rail.  This is one of several moments in the film where they do not feel that they have to go into their dance in order to convey the meaning of the song.  And it is a great introduction to one of the many Gershwin standards they introduce in this picture.Confusion is rife however due to a ruse that Horton created to get a designing woman, former ballet dancer Denise AKA Lady Tarrington, off Fred's trail.  Horton has said that Fred is married and Lady T. being a loose lipped kind of a gal buys the story and spreads the word.  Everyone on two continents and on the liner jump to the not unlikely conclusion that the wife in question is Miss Keen.  When word leaks out, Ginger leaves in a hurry, taking off in the mail plane, catapulted from the deck of the liner--way to travel!Stateside, Horton and Eric Blore as the hotel manager get into a mistaken identity bit of dialogue that is priceless.  Soon, Ginger introduces the wonderful "They All Laughed", wearing the only flawed gown in the film, what we here at home call The Amoeba Dress.  She thinks she is done but Fred leaps up and tells the crowded night club that now he and she are going to dance together for the first time in public.  Here is one of their "make it up as we go" numbers and from Ginger's first timid twist onward it works beautifully.  They combine Fred's ballet steps with Ginger's Broadway hoofing and it all blends like a good cocktail.One wishes that Ginger had switched out the wardrobe, however and worn the fringed gold lame dress she had on in Paris...More confusion ensues...Poor hotel manager Blore keeps changing the locks on Fred and Ginger's adjoining suites as he wails, "Mrs. Petrov are you Miss Keen?  Miss Keen are you Mrs. Petrov?"  Hiding out from the paparazzi Ginger and Fred make for Central Park where they engage in the latest craze of roller skating to the witty and unforgettable Po-TAY-toe, Pa-TAH-toe song, "Let's Call the Whole Thing Off".  This kind of dance novelty was one of Fred's fortes and they both are wonders on wheels.In order to be able to stop the rumors they decided to get married in order to get divorced to prove that they aren't married--this is after all a screwball comedy, so they go to New Jersey to wed where Fred asks what the grounds are for divorce in this state and the Justice of the Peace answers, "Marriage."  On the way home on the Ferry they get out of their marvelous car and Fred sings the lovely "They Can't Take That Away From Me".  Ginger's eyes well with tears and we know that they are both deeply in love even as they are going ahead with their plan to divorce.Papers need to be served and this winds Blore in jail where one of the funniest comic bits ever filmed occurs between him and Horton, its' appeal rivals the famous "Whose on First?"The whole cast assembles for a review in which Ginger is not to appear, so Fred dances with Harriet Hocker who is flexible indeed while the rest of them engage in a shushing contest with the audience.  Ginger is reunited with Fred when she sees that since he cannot dance with her, he is dancing with scores of girls with Ginger masks.  The set is great, lots of mirrors that open and close and a lot of business with the masks until Fred finds the one and only dancer who is really Ginger, all of this to the peppy "Shall We Dance?"Fred and Ginger have the last laugh and keep us smiling, too.Yes, friends, this is another RKO Radio Picture.
John Candy's first starring Hollywood role is a very good one. On TV all the time now, didn't need to be cropped much!. Along with Planes, Trains and Automobilesa very funny John Candy vehicle. Burned outair traffic controller (this was a real pro-blem back in the '80's) FINALLY gets vactionand winds up with one-handed pirate friend(superbly played by Rip Torn) and gets intoyaught race v. evil egomaniac (superbly play-ed by late Richard Crenna). Of course Candywins. Soundtrack has lively Jimmy Buffettsong that is not available on Buffett LPs,sorry Parot Heads
One of the best. If you are an INXS fan, this is a must have...epecially since the videos on it were rarely seen on MTV, epecially the video for &quot;Taste it&quot; which was banned....when you see it, you will see why!! LONG LIVE INXS RIP Michael Hutchence, you are missed dearl
Mutiny Of The Truth. Oh for the good old days when you could take a historical event and change it willy nilly in order to suit the story you want to tell.  the real story of Mutiny On The Bounty is possibly more interesting than in the film, but to have the captain as the good guy didn't suit the times during the Depression when you were supposed to barrack for the underdog.  But having said that and taking this film wholly as a work of fiction, it is a rolicking sea yarn full of whipping, chains, tropical islands, keehauling, evil ship captains, terrible storms, drownings, starvation and bravery.According to a newsreel that comes with this dvd, Mutiny On The Bounty was very expensive and it took about two years to make.  The special effects are fantastic for the time and the acting, especially Laughton and Grable, but not excluding the others, is superb.
Decidely Nasty Insects with Funny Shoes... A nasty disease is ravaging the children of Manhattan. The only way to combat it anyone can think of it is to eradicate the local cockroach population that is acting as carriers. Enter insect specialist Dr Susan Tyler (Mira Sorvino) who fiddles around with the cockroach gene to produce an aggressive new strain, the Judas Breed, that preys on normal cockroaches. The idea is that it will die out after one generation as all females Judases released are sterile.  But that doesn't seem to work and three years later something nasty seems to be lurking around the subway system. Some street kids bring Tyler an alarming specimen in an old Corn flakes Box. And Chuy an autistic little boy starts to notice people with "funny, funny shoes".It's a splendid little horror movie, one of the best of the 1990s, particularly liable to freak you out if you don't like creepy crawlies. The first hour is the best while there is still an air of mystery about these strange bugs and there are some beautifully clever scary scenes such as that where Chuy goes exploring or where Tyler is groping for a dropped torch. It has its faults. The last half hour or so, once the protagonists know what they are up against, where it just turns into a chase movie, is rather less effective. The opening title sequence is a quite shameless rip-off of `Se7en'. And the story surely doesn't surely make a whole not of biological sense. For it to be possible in evolutionary terms, a single Judas bug generation can't be much more than a few minutes long. In which case its hugely implausible that, as Tyler decides, there's only a single fertile male in circulation at a given time killing whom off will solve the problem. But not to worry. This remains a cracking good scary movie.
Better than 34th Street. I love this movie. Every year there is a 24-hour marathon on the television of this film and my family and I watch it at least ten times. It truly never gets old with us as the characters are authentic and full of good humor. It is hysterically funny at times, especially when the father receives the leg lamp in the mail and pronounces the word stamped on the box "fragile" as "fra-gee-lay; huh, must be Italian". Ralphie and his family make my family's holiday a lot brighter and we all look forward to watching this movie every year.
What's So Special About Mary's House??. +++++This movie is based on the story "The Adventure of the Three Gables" (1926) written by Sir Arthur Conan Doyle (1859 to 1930).Sherlock (Jeremy Brett) receives a letter from a Mary Maberly (Mary Ellis):"I've had a succession of strange incidents occur to me in connection with my house [known as "The Three Gables"] and I would much value your advice.  You would find me at home anytime tomorrow.  I believe my late husband Mortimer Maberly was one of your early clients."It turns out that a person wants to buy her house at a high price on the condition that she does not take anything out of it "not even her personal possessions."This extreme interest in her house began after the recent death of her grandson Douglas Maberly (Gary Cady).This episode is special for the following reasons:(1) Dr. Watson (Edward Hardwicke) gets beaten to a pulp trying to protect Mary.(2) Sherlock comes in contact with an intelligent, beautiful woman named Isadora Klein (Claudine-Auger) who seems to have "power over men."Brett (as usual) does a good job in capturing the essence of the famous gumshoe in his performance.Finally, the costumes, background music, attention to detail, and cinematography are quite well done.In conclusion, this is a good movie to watch even if you have read the story it's based on!!(1994;  50 min;  British drama;  made for TV;  full screen)+++++
Fine Film. I bought this DVD "The Case for Conspiracy" by Robert Groden and it really is good. You owe it to yourself to take a look at this DVD, and it only costs $7 or $8 dollars.This video, made back in 1992, has all the known videos on the JFK murder and analyzes them in more detail than I have seen. Notable are:1) shocking evidence tampering by the Warren Commision:the autopsy photos were outrageously altered, all doctors verify on video that the photos of the back of JFK's head is absolutely not the way they remember, and that the photos produced by the Warren Commision (or perhaps the US Military autopsy...where clearly some evil corruption took place) are completely fraudulent.2) an image of a person in the top left most window of the school book depository, which is all one room, evidence that if Oswald was there, he would have had to have known about this other person. But this image, I think adds to my doubt about Oswald even being involved...I am basically going on the included people's statement "frankly", meaning that Frank Fiorini and Lee Oswald were the main shooters, but perhaps Oswald was involved but there were others with him. Clearly, JFK was hit in the back so somebody was there.3) a simple fact that I had never heard or thought about until seeing this video that...if Oswald was on JFK's right, how could a wound on JFK's head exit on the front right side?4) video of the so-called "dog-man", behind the fence moving from Nix's film5) video of the grassy knoll person from Zupruter's film. I never knew that Zupruter actually filmed part of Fiorini's (or Hunt or Arnold's) head.Plus ofcourse the famous colorized Mary Mormon? photo of the 3 stooges, Arnold, Fiorini, and Hunt behind the pick-fence. A very good DVD, and Groden appears to be an smart forthright and honest person
Golf My Way. Although written in 1974, book very helpful with the basics of golf while excluding most of the confusing techical aspects put forth today. Main reason I bought it was that several modern successful professional golfers have said that this book had helped them learn or improve their game. Good buy for the info and the price
unexpected. Going into this movie, I expected alot of bs. Especially noting that the two lead characters were rappers; I must give alot of props to Ja Rule, he actually was a pretty good actor! Also, I expected alot of gun fights, with no real plot. However I was pleasantly proved wrong. This movie actually gives us a chance as the audience to get in tune with the characters. In return giving us the ability to be sympythetic towards them, and what they're going through.     The plot is pretty simple, two 20 something black males, trying to get over their 'cash-flow' problem. One, who's love is music, the other just want any method of getting 'set for life.' Throught the movie, we see what obsticles they must cross in order for their dreams to become reality. Even though the start is slow, the tone of this picture slowly developes so that you'll still want to sit through til' the end
Moore's best film, before he became a political celebrity... I really liked this film.  Before Michael Moore became a liberal celebrity, he was a completely obscure magazine writer and filmmaker.  This film was a major underground hit at the time, and it still is excellent today.  You really feel for the people who lose their jobs, and you're infuriated by the callous indifference of Roger Smith and the management of General Motors.  I really liked the segment where Flint tries to reinvent itself as tourist mecca of the Midwest.  It consisted of a horribly misguided attempt at opening up a Hilton in downtown Flint, and opening up a theme park called Auto World.  It justs smacks of desperation and stupidity; it has make you laugh and grimace at the same time.  Instead of giving these people really good jobs again, they come up with this idiotic scheme, which ended up in disaster (both the Hilton and Auto World closed within a year).  Moore in recent years has become a "political celebrity", in that politics has become quite the cottage industry in America.  It's not just Moore doing it; right wingers like Hannity and Coulter have been doing it too.  They all got books; some of them got films; some of them have radio shows.  A lot of them aren't really interested in changing anything, as it might interfere with their livelihoods.  I don't know if Moore is like that or not.  But this is still a potent, darkly funny film about real class warfare, and the dismantling of the working class in America.
beautifully done, but doesn't go deep enough. Purely on artistic merit I would award this film an 11 on a scale of ten.  Most documentaries dream of achieving this kind of artistic impression.  As for its command of the subject it struggles too hard to be passive.  In many ways that passivity is charming because it gives a chance to show what sort of person the real Fred Leuchter is but in turn it glances over the holocaust denial issue.The portrait of Fred A. Leuchter that comes through is a gullible and misguided man who strive to his utmost to achieve acceptance from his peers.  His rabid desire for acceptance is made clear by the fact that he himself pronounces his last name as if it were "Loocher" but Ernst Zundel pronounces it "Loikter" in the German sense.  When it comes down to the video Leuchter made for Zundel we find him adopting Zundel's pronunciation of his own name.  In the end Leuchter succumbs to the siren song of the holocaust deniers who bestow upon him all the respect and admiration of any university professor.  One feels almost sorry for such a man when his highly unpopular views ends up costing him what little success he had achieved.  I don't personally believe Fred Leuchter actually means to be the spokesperson of holocaust denial but he finds it too difficult to give up the position he has achieved through that.At one point when he is asked if he could reconsider his views on the holocaust his only reply is, "No, I'm beyond that now".  The one thing this video portrays is the man who is virtually lost in the muddle of holocaust deniers and their opponents; the former manipulate him and the latter villify him.  Leuchter is really just a mediocre and unfortunate man who has been thoroughly exploited by people who really don't care about him as anything more than a way to further their own racist agenda.To get more aquainted with the real issues behind the Leuchter report I would recommend "Truth Prevails: Demolishing Holocaust Denial : The End of the Leuchter Report" by Shelly Shapiro which is a collection of articles on the Leuchter report written by several of the interviewees in this film among others.
for a lost soldier. I must say that i really enjoyed the movie and all, there could have been a little more nudity but other wise a great movie. Have watched it several times now and still feel that I am happy with what i saw on the DVD
Post World War II Comes To Life MGM Style. One of the most familiar images of an MGM musical would be Gene Kelly, Frank Sinatra, and Jules Munshin dressed as sailors singing the catchy words "New York New York's A wonderful town; The Bronx is up and the Battery's down; the people ride in a hole in the ground; New York New York: It's a wonderful town." While the song by Leonard Bernstein is from a Broadway musical called ON THE TOWN, it is MGM's adaptation (Broadway lovers may refer to it a usurpation) that makes the song immortal today.ON THE TOWN tells the story of three sailors: the lovable, somewhat cocky, but sincere Gabey (Gene Kelly), his clueless friend Chip (played by Frank Sinatra), and the bumbling Ozzie (Jules Munshin) who are on leave in New York City for a day. The three take a taxi where the driver Hilde (Betty Garrett) falls madly in love with Chip. She wants to ditch the other two sailors to be with her new found love, but the Chip will not abandon his two friends. Ozzie finds love when visiting the museum of natural history when he meets the intellectual Claire (Ann Miller). Gabey has yet to find the love of his life, a woman he knows only as "Miss Turnstiles" from a subway poster. He believes she is a famous New York celebrity, but discovers she is a hometown girl. There are also antics that would seem silly to a moviegoer today. The taxi company believes the taxi has been stolen. A skeleton of a dinosaur is damaged at the museum. A police chase ensues. Still, MGM, a studio that turned making unbelievable worlds into reality into an art form, does the same with this film.There are many reasons this film is considered a classic. While most of the musical numbers from the original Broadway score were believed to be too sophisticated for movie musical audiences and replaced with what some consider inferior music (MGM's Saul Chaplin once said looking back he could hardly believe that Bernstein's music was replaced), somehow the score does work. The dancing numbers are great. Much of the film (a radical idea at the time) was shot on location which makes the city almost a character in the film. Vera-Ellen fans love this film because it showcases her talent. BEWITCHED fans will also enjoy the performance of Alice Pearce as Lucy Shmeeler, Hilde's unlucky in love and chronic cold suffering roommate and back-up romantic partner for Gabey.This DVD is a just the film and its special features include just a trailer of the movie. It's a fun movie to watch and brings a viewer back to a time when the world was changing and a sense of optimism was real.
MAY I GIVE IT 10 STARS?. I LOVED HARVEY FROM THE MOMENT I SAW TORCH SONG ON SCREEN. I'VE BEEN A FAN OF HONESTY, SINCEREITY AND COURAGE AND DOWNRIGHT HUMANITY SINCE BEING EXPOSED TO HIS BRILLIANCE. I'M AN UNDYING FAN SINCE.THIS STORY SHOULD BE AN EYE-OPENER TO THOSE WHO DISCRIMINATE AGAINST ANYONE - HOWEVER SUBTLY - FOR WHATEVER REASON, SEXUALITY, RELIGION, NATIONAL ORIGIN OR EVEN IF ONE IS BLACK, POOR AND FROM NEW ORLEANS AND DON'T HAVE BUS FARE TO ESCAPE HURRICANE KATRINA.DENIAL KILLS.I'VE WAITED LONG ENOUGH FOR THIS TO COME OUT ON DVD.  I AM BUYING MY COPY NOW!
It's FINALLY on DVD!. I absolutely love this movie. When I was in high school, a bunch of us went to see it (yeah, I'm dating myself aren't I?) and I loved it then. Good to know that 13 years later I still love Sliver. Perhaps it was my giant crush on William Baldwin that really made this movie sparkle to me. Or perhaps it was the voyeuristic ambiance throughout it. Either way, this is a fun little thriller that will keep you entertained. For the guys, you can oggle Sharon Stone in all her hotness. And as I mentioned, for the ladies, there's William Baldwin to adore. Basically, a woman named Carly (Stone) moves into the Sliver tower where there have been several weird deaths, most recently, a woman whose looks resemble Carly's, who happened to be the former tenant of the apartment Carly just bought. A variety of suitors attempt to get Carly's attention, one of which brings her a telescope, in turn making her realize that she indeed likes to watch. But who's watching Carly? Ah, to go into it any further would ruin this fine little movie. I'm not saying it's the best ever, but Sliver is plenty of fun for men & women alike who enjoy thrillers.
Best upper body workout. I have been an avid exerciser for about 18 years - it's routine for me.  During that time I have viewed a lot of exercise videos.  Cory's videos are absolutely the best.  This upper body workout is intense, but not to the point that you become dismayed and want to give up.  I have noticed more sculpting in my arms after just 2 weeks (and I have been doing weights for a long time!) There is a bit of fluff in her videos, but in my opinion, it just makes it more interesting and engaging.  The important thing is that the workout is serious and is obviously choreographed by someone who knows a great deal about fitness.  I highly recommend this video for a great upper body
Bruce vs. the wretched serial killer. Bruce Willis would not be the first actor to bag on their own work. Some people might take the fact that an actor bags on their own work as a very authoritative statement and not bother seeing such a film. If the actor doesn't like their own film, why should anyone else bother? But I think such need not always be the case, and this movie is one good example. And artist is always critical of their own work, and rightly so. But just because they see things they don't like about their own work or something else about a film they are in, does not mean that others will certainly see the same things for the same reasons.After seeing a trailer for this movie on a dvd I have, I came upon an IMDB post about a Bob Costas' TV interview (I've never seen it myself) and Bruce Willis saying he knew this movie was crap when he was making it, and that this experience made him decide to choose projects based on the projects merits and avoid Hollywood tripe. For this and other reasons, I did not bother to pursue getting the movie at the time. Recently, I came across this movie in a Wal-Mart $5 discount bin and being a Bruce Willis fan I grabbed it. After watching it, I find it easy to say that even though I don't care much for movies involving serial killers, this was a decent enough flick that would have been worth it had I paid $10 instead. It could be defined as typical Hollywood tripe, especially if you're an actor who's been in the business for years and are looking to expand your horizons. But not all tripe is truly tripe. Bruce did a decent enough job going up against the killer, and the movie was not just tired and boring and by the numbers. It looks and sounds good, has good production values and cinematography, is fairly suspenseful and entertaining. In the big picture it's probably fairly typical of this type of movie, but if you want to see Bruce Willis go through the paces in the taking down the serial killer routine, it's a decent and interesting take on it all and without a lot of in your face gore or anything.Incidentally, I and plenty of others think that Hudson Hawk rocks! Some people just don't get it I suppose
Hmm, I think we could use a Colossus. This is a fine movie and enjoyable inspite of it being in the "TV" fomat I wish it was released in it's origonal format but it's still a fine addition to any sci-fi buffs collection
A must-have for animators!. Every time I teach a class on character animation, I refer students to this film - it has incredible character reference throughout, especially Hans Conreid. If you're an animator and you don't already own this, then shame on you!  :') Get it now
mi vida loca dvd. i placed two orders from this same seller for the same dvd and both came in very quickly in excellent condition there were no problems with making my payment or anything else thank you very much will be looking forward to ordering from you agan. i got two of the same video cuz my daughter wanted her own copy and needed one for the house als
Classic Eastwood western with Hawai'i Five-0 influence from Prodcr. Len Freeman and actor James MacArthur. Not your average garden variety revenge-Western either. Eastwood did act WELL inhere, not just got through the motionslike in High Plains Drifter (**) and aw-ful Beguiled (*.5), or even worse 'Un-forgiven' (*.5). Pat Hingle, also a vetof four Hawai'i 5-0 episodes did well inhere as 'Hang'Em High' judge who givesClint his Sherrif star. Stevens, who be-came a nut later is good in here, too
Classic, Heroic  Propaganda. There is good propaganda, and bad.  Alexander Nevsky obviously falls into the former category.  So much about this film seems prophetic.  Done in 1938, the former Soviet Union stood on the brink of war, as did the rest of the world at that time.  This is a film that celebrates the heroic Slavic spirit of yore.  There were also many useful similarities for comparison.  Like 13th Century Rus, Russia in 1938 faced enemies both to the East and West.  A recent victory over the Japanese in 1938 helped to erase memories of the Russo-Japanese War of 1905, and it seems no coincidence that Eisenstein was allowed to make this film at that time.  Make no mistake about it, this is a film born out ofSoviet-Stalinist propaganda of the period.  No viewer can truly understand this film without understanding that reality.In its scope and production value one is reminded of a simlier film done in Facist Italy around this time celebrating the exploits of Ancient Rome - "Scipio Africanus."  Both films draw on inspirational leaders of the past to serve up useful propaganda for the present.In this film Rus is besiged on all sides by enemies.  The Mongols had conquiered much of the land by this time.  To the West there are the Crusading Teutonic Knights seeking to exercise a Lebenstraum of their own in the 13th Century.  Nevsky, a local prince seems the natural leader that the great city of Novgorod needs.  Again, we see nationalistic ideas expressed here that were surely beyond the outlook of the time.  Few could have had any notion of a greater Rus in such Feudal times.  For Eisenstein's propaganda we must have a strong and inspirational Alexander Nevsky.  The actor who plays him is certainly impressive looking, but hardly any great thespian! Actually all of the characters hwon in the film are pretty one dimensional. Indeed, much of the acting here is wooden at best, but there is certain sarcastic humor which is nonetheless appealing.  The crude love interest between two leading males and the Russian princess is an attempt to throw some light fair into the otherwise heavy story.  The Teutonic Knights are shown in all their horid glory.  Seldom is evil shown more impressively on screen than here!  With dark faces, cruel eyes and heavy looks the Knights look every bit the part of the latter day nazi's.  Depicted here they are nazi's of the Middle Ages, and their white-hooded cavalry brings up images of the KKK almost!  There is also a very blatant slap at the cathloic church sanctioning in the film the slaughter of innocents and babes.  Is it not surprising that a Soviet film should condemn Rome as Rome had done the same to them!  Surprising is the lack of the Orthedox church in the film, which certainly would have been a main source of moral support for resistence against its enemies.  Only at the end of the film are they shown briefly before Nevsky dominates the final scene.The battle of Lake Peipis in 1214 is the central theme of the movie.  This is magnificently done.  The initial charge of the Knights over the ice is one of the most impressive cinematic cavalry charges on film.  Whether such a charge was actually done against massed infantry with long spears seems debatable.  Such an infantry phalanx would have been almost impervious against heavy cavalry in this period.  The hand-to-hand combat scenes are as good as anything you might see today.  There is also that sardonic since of humor thrown in as well.  The massive battle ebbs and flows.  The amazing thing is that these are extras, not computer graphics!  We see some interesting examples of tactics as the German Knights are shown to rally in a close formation with lances supported by cross bows and light troops.  Eisenstein wants to show us the terror of Germanic discipline.  But Russian elan and spirt overcomes all and the knights are finally sent in head-long retreat until they are swallowed up by the thin ice on the lake.  Again, this seems somewhat like enduring myth, but most myths do have some ground for basis if closley examined.  No doubt so knights were lost in this way.The film concludes with a victory procession and the one-dimensional characters finding happiness in their newly won freedom.  The DVD does the film little justice as no attempt has been made to clear up the picture or improve the sound track.  Prokofiev's interesting music sounds like it is coming out of a submarine.  This film badly needs a Criterion production to fashion it up like the classic it truly is.  Still, don't turn it down because of this problem.  This film shall remain a classic of its kind.  See it for its granduer, humor and depiction of a famous hero of Slavic yore.
Fun Moving with Lots of Senseless Action!!!. This movie is one sequence after another set-up for one reason, to display the martial arts of Mark Dacascos.  The plot, lame, the budget - lame, the action - spectacular!!!  The acting from support charcahters like Kadeem Hardison and a yung Brittany Murphy as well as John Pyper-Ferguson are just fun.Dacascos is one of the more exciting martial artists to watch, but he garners few quality roles.  Even in movies that he does not get a good role, he generally makes the best of it.  This movie is a great choice fo raction fans, silly plot, but one great action scene after another.  Bring in the popcorn, soda, and chips.  recline and enjoy
Bigger, and better than ever before!  GO NINJA GO NINJA GO!!!!. Yes, it's corny.  But this is early 90s.  Everything back then was cool at the time, but corny today.  This movie took everything the first movie did, but made it HUGE.  More mutants, ooze, a friggen 90s style hip hop dance even (this was popular at the time, remember the Urkel Dance?).All the actors did a good job.  The new asian kid had some slick martial arts abilities, and his fresh, headstrong attitude added much to this movie.  Even the British dude from Titanic was good.  The ninja rap at the end of the movie is hilarious to watch today, but at the time was the coolest thing on the planet.  I remember seeing people in the theater cheering, getting out of their chairs and singing along to it.  It was nuts.  Gotta love it
Season 2. Stargate Atlantis is great. I like the idea of downloading the episodes, but put in all the seasons. Why leave out season 2?
Too Many Laughs. I first saw this movie on TV in the mid 60's.  My wife and I laughed and snickered through the whole thing.  Then I saw it again, a few years later, while in VietNam.  That was a real hoot with a bunch of guys watching and reacting.  Some 35 or more years later, I remembered it and just had to have a copy for myself.  The entire movie, about how to cheat on your wife and not get caught, is chock full of cameos by readily recognizable stars acting out little scenarios as Robert Morse explains how to go about things to Walter Matthau.  It's a light no-brainer, full of amusing surprises, for aspiring cheats who will have no clue what happens at the very end
kids love it!. They have the second movie to this one, but love this one just as much!! Was delivered quickly and works perfectly. Thank you!
what the deal is. I thought this movie was preety good. Fred did a great job with his charater Jefferson Bolt,and the story board was as good as his former 70's movies' like hell up in harlem, and black Ceaser. If your a Fred Willaimson fan, then this is difinitely one of his movie's you should add to your collection
Long John Silver. In the end, Captain Silver manages to get the captain Flint's pirate treasure.  Pirates treasure controlled by Captain Silver and a new legend born.  Young Jim Hawkins is admired by Captain Silver, a hopeful apprentice; Captain Silver saves Jim's life, a barginning chip; Captain Silver avoids the curse of the black spot, kills his mutinous crew; Ben Burr surrenders Captain Flints treasure to Captain Silver, (Pirates loot)
A Powerful and Romantic Love Story. This is a charming flick about two teenage boys who discover their love for one another after harrowing circumstances land them in the same apartment and eventually in the same bed
artistporn. i like to watch this film because, it is a good film, especialy for adul
An entertaining exploration of a fascinating Hollywood personality. This could also have been entitled "The Comeback Kid."  Though the initial purpose of this documentary on the life and career of famed producer Robert Evans was perhaps to act as a nice coda to a colorful riches to rags story, in fact it has served to put Evans back in the public eye and revive his career as a producer.  Only five years ago Evans was largely a forgotten man, but today he has a number of projects underway.  No doubt this is in part due to having his various legal problems behind him, but clearly his memoir, which was then made into this documentary, played a major role.THE KID STAYS IN THE PICUTRE is not your typical documentary.  For one thing, the only person who talks to the camera is the subject of the film.  This is hardly a mea culpa or apologia.  It is more of a warts and all self-affirmation of everything Evans has experienced in his career.  Much is left out.  There is surprisingly little detail on his love life excepting his romance with Ali McGraw, which was clearly the dominant relationship of his life.  But there is a frank acknowledgment of many errors made combined with an attitude that could be summed up, "Well, I made a mess, but at least it was my mess."The heart of the film concerns Evans's triumphs as a producer.  Certainly few producers not named Weinstein have been involved in so many remarkable films.  ROSEMARY'S BABY, LOVE STORY, THE GODFATHER, CHINATOWN, MARATHON MAN, and THE COTTON CLUB are only a few of the many films he was involved on.  There are many fascinating stories about many of these, though for me the most fascinating was the behind the scenes footage taken during the filming of ROSEMARY'S BABY.  Another great moment is the short film that Evans made for the corporate powers that be who wanted to pull the plug on THE GODFATHER.Almost as important as Evans as a character in the film is his beautiful home.  There is shot after shot of the grounds and the film finally ends with the only contemporary shot of Evans in the documentary, showing him sitting inside simply being Robert Evans.  If the film has a nadir, it comes when Evans was forced to sell his beloved home to a wealthy foreigner.  When he wanted to repurchase the home the man wouldn't agree to do so.  But Evans's friend Jack Nicholson took matters in his own hands and flew to visit the man, literally getting on his knees to beg him to sell the house back to Evans.  He relented and one of the most touching moments in the movie was the camera zooming in on the welcome home card that Nicholson wrote Evans.All in all, film fans will find this to be an interesting and highly entertaining documentary.  Evans has had a colorful life, making his share of mistakes, suffering his share of both really great and truly awful luck, but sticking it out.  And partly because of this film, the kid did manage to stay in the picture, and his name will unquestionably appear on a few more films in the years to come
understanding death?. I was thrilled when I discovered this gem on a cable tv movie channel. I recorded it because I was fairly certain there would not be a second chance. It was sweet. It was amusing. But most of all it was forbidden...or so I thought. Since then I've found a select group of fans. It wasn't horrific or disgusting to me. I like unusual movies and this was well done, in my opinion. Just because this culture has no sense of a spirituality that is a necrophiliac's sexual delight doesn't make it gross or dirty
Talk about Jason. This item was something that was needed in my collection.  It was shipped promptly and it was received in the condition that was described
A classic Sci-fi film that holds up well over thirty years later. My new year's resolution was to see a bunch of movies I'd always intended to see but continually seemed to miss.  Somewhat belatedly I'm fulfilling my resolution, which is why I finally saw WESTWORLD.  Although it was somewhat dated, I was surprised at how much I enjoyed this.  The film concerns Delos, a resort of the future that allows guests to visit either of three theme parks where behavior that is frowned upon in the modern world can be engaged in without repercussion.  Guests engage in orgiastic sex, feasting and heavy drinking, and the killing of opponents just for the sheer fun of it.  One can choose between doing this in Roman World, Medieval World, or Westworld.  The film focuses primarily on two visitors to Westworld, played by Richard Benjamin and James Brolin.  This was one of the last Sci-fi films made before the onset of the personal computer, yet one of the first to actually utilize computers in the making of it.  According to one book I recently read, the CGI representing the vision field of the The Gunslinger robot was the first use of computers to generate images in film history.  So, in this way it could be considered cutting edge.  On the other hand, when things start going wrong with a number of the robots, the head of technology on Delos describes the ailment as a "disease."  Today we'd obviously describe this as a virus in their software."Westworld" is clearly the stock Warner Brothers Western set that was used at approximately the same time by BLAZING SADDLES.  This works well for the film for it gives the viewer an image that seems weirdly familiar (though understandably familiar, since it has been used in dozens of movies and hundreds of television episodes).  So the visitors to the park get pretty much the Western experience prior media would have conditioned them to expect.  Even the bad guys seem familiar.  Yul Bryner, for instance, wears the exactly same outfit that he wore when he starred in THE MAGNIFICENT SEVEN.  The visitors quickly fall into the routine, James Brolin doing an obvious imitation of Clint Eastwood and Richard Benjamin quickly breaking out of the mold of somewhat nerdy lawyer.  They visit the local brothel, kill the robot played by Yul Bryner a couple of times, get arrested and break out of jail and shoot the sheriff, and get drunk in the middle of a huge brawl.  Then things go wrong on a major scale, with the robots going on a killing spree.  The highpoint of the film is the long chase of Richard Benjamin by Yul Bryner.A remake of WESTWORLD is currently in development.  I am normally opposed to remakes.  For the most part remakes are pale imitations of the originals, even in the case of most Sci-fi films.  The remakes of THE INVASION OF THE BODY SNATCHERS were inferior to the original, while the original PLANET OF THE APES is vastly superior to the remake.  But this is one instance where, if done correctly, a remake could improve upon the original.  The film is well done, but it was made well before computers came to dominate cultural life.  As a result, the computerized control room looks absurdly primitive.  For instance, there are no keyboards, but only consoles with buttons and switches and knobs.  The danger, of course, is going overboard with the special effects.  The temptation all too often is to go overboard with CGI and spectacular effects; in such cases story is sacrificed for spectacle.  My hope is that they will keep this under control and keep enhancements at a minimum.All in all, this was a very enjoyable and different Sci-fi film.  It was directed and written by Michael Crichton and I couldn't help but think throughout it how similar the overall premise was to another Crichton creation:  JURASSAIC PARK.  Both deal with things going wrong at technologically advanced theme parks.  Substitute dinosaurs for robots or vice versa and you have essentially the same movie.
LOLITA, LOLITA, LOLITA. One reason to watch this film:  Lolita Davidovich.  If you don't fall in love with her character and become completely mesmerized by her looks . . . you need to check your pulse.  Her portrayal as Olivia is right on.  Richard Gere and Sharon Stone also put in good performances, but you keep asking yourself as you are watching, "Yo Rich! Are you kiddin'? Choose the redhead!"  Completely bashed by critics . . . I think critics can't stand Gere or Stone and Lolita got caught in the crossfire.  She's a talented actress and deserved much more ado for her performance
It's SHOWTIME!!!. That quote "And it keeps getting funnier every single time I see it" will be put to good use, because that is what you'll say when you watch this movie again and again. What is there to say about Tim Burton? He can't stop with the good movies!This has to be up there in at least the top 20 of the best comedies of all time. It's twisted, but very very funny. I swear to you, if you watch this film, you will get one laugh. Probably more if you give it a chance.And of course, Beetlejuice is now one of the most famous charactors in movie history. Way to go, Tim
Both innocent and knowing, sweet and elegiac. A Manhattan Mansfield Park: a perfect societal portrait, with not a detail out of place
Great Performance by Van Damne. I rented this movie on video like 4 years ago,my whole family watched it and we were all pleased.And like a year ago i saw it on DVD and i loved watching it again.I think this movie will go in the top 10 of Van Damnes best movie but not the top 5. Im gonna name the top 5 Van Damnes best movies. Kickboxer, Bloodsport,Lionheart,Desert Heat,Hard Target.Im like the biggest Van Damne fan,and this one is worth watching.It deserves****A very good movie
A film you have to fully understand evolution to fully get. Having read tons of books and articles on the subject of evolution I understand this film very much. I know some who understand evolution far less well will certainly be confused by the intricate plot concerning the big E. As for other complaints by amazon reviewers I'll say this:1) I find the acting in this film anything but hollywood-like. This film reminds me a lot of Fatal Attraction and other rather realistic 80's hit films. This movie had very realistic acting.2) The dialogue in this movie has profanity true---but it is delivered in a very sophisticated, educated, and realistic way.Not cheap like in 80's Rambo movies. Realize most of the characters are professors and doctors and such therefore it is extra-cerebral dialogue.3) Blair Brown is much sexier than William Hurt.4) Hurt's character in a big scene goes back to the beginning of mankind and discovers how without love, a little anger, happiness and otheremotions life is unbeliavably drab, indifferent and purely a technicality. That's why he quits the search. Why do so many insist it's a cheap ending?5) Hurt's character quits happily embracing earlier stages of mankind upon realizing that man is not actually, ultimately God and as just a single cell there's no feeling at all, no control, etc for people. People are better off in their current, multi-celled state. Therefore he successfully fights all regressions off in the end (a power he really had all along) because it is no good and this realization makes him appreciate his loving and sexy wife all the more.6) Hurt's character goes to Mexico---not South America like some posters think
Response to Mr Tamm. I'm not making any comments about this film, as it's a long time since I last saw it, but I do want to register my objection to Mr Tamm's calling "Smash Palace" an Australian film.  It was a New Zealand film, made in New Zealand, by a New Zealand director (Roger Donaldson), about New Zealand characters and starring mainly New Zealand actors (Bruno Lawrence, Greer Robson, Keith Aberdeen).  It has no connection whatsoever with Australia.  This is almost as bad as when Peter Jackson's third "Lord of the Rings" movie won all 11 academy Awards for which it was nominated, and after Billy Crystal had been making jokes all night about everyone in New Zealand having been thanked in the various acceptance speeches, the following morning a prominent US newspaper referred to Peter Jackson as "an Australian director"! We are NOT Australians!!!
Doctor Who and the first Download. Doctor who materialised without his Tardis on this, my first timelord download in the amazon unbox, which is much larger on the inside than it appears on the outside.For a very reasonable sum, $1.99, my family and I were able to enjoy the first Third doctor adventure after his regeneration, where he encounters the Nestene Conciousness.The down load took only a few minutes although I had some considerable difficulty installing the microsoft program. thanks to the good people at amazon tech support I was able to obtain an alternative download from the gates empire itself which allowed me to enjoy our rental.a great experience and will not be the last. easy to navigate and fun for all the family. someone should tell the timelords on gallifrey about unbox and perhaps they could get rid of all the old type 40 tardis'
Star Trek At Its Best. Shore Leave is one of the best episodesof the classic series. It uses all thesci fi props but also has a great story,if you don't even care about Star Trekand have to watch one, watch this one.
BS tells it all. I have watched most of the BS series and this is one that shows what is happening to many of our american organizations. Religious control
Wow!. In Hell is one of the best JCVD movies from his recent direct to video offerings.  In the film, he plays Kyle LeBlanc, a French-American man living and working in Russia with his American wife, who soon gets brutally murdered.  Kyle is then sent to a Russian prison after he murders the man who killed his wife.  Of course, this prison is no cakewalk...actually it makes Oswald State Prison from the HBO show "Oz" literally look like Disney World.  The warden and guards are all corrupt and the prisoners who have money get all the perks.  The warden also sets up a human cockfighting arena on the prison grounds where he has two prisoners fight (most of the time fight to the death) and he and his friends take bets on the winners.  Of course, JCVD sets out to make his way through this corrupt system, help his new prison friends, and get revenge for his wife's death.The film is very dark, brutal, and bloody, but it is beautifully filmed.  There is one scene in particular when Kyle is thrown in "the hole" for misbehaving.  In that scene, after Kyle loses hope and tries to hang himself, a moth flies down from the window/rafters above him and the camera beautifully follows it down as it flutters toward Kyle, and then it lands on the handle of the spoon that is in his untouched bowl of gruel, as if to say, "Eat. Get stronger, and you will be able to free yourself from this place."  I know it sounds really corny, but it is really a lovely scene and not something that you typically see in JCVD films.The DVD transfer is awesome.  Picture and sound quality are good and you get widescreen and fullscreen to choose from.Definitely a movie to see, whether you like Van Damme or not.  It's a movie for anyone who has ever lost anyone they loved or had their life inexplicably turned upside down and had to fight to get things right
about the movie Sudden death....... This is one of the best fighting action Van damme movie/film in his whole series of collection. A recommendation for those whom are interested in this genre of movie/films. Enjoy....
Hilarious with perfect timing. This is the film to watch if you want to learn about timing in comedy. The plot is a farce about a married couple who almost divorce.  The film covers the games they play as they seek other partners to make each other jealous.  The humour encompasses witty one-liners, put downs, pratfalls, slapstick,  the lot.Cary Grant is famous for his impeccable comedy timing so his performance in this film will not be a surprise even though it was his first really major success. In 1937, Irene Dunne was a bigger star than Grant although far less known today. Grant said she had the best timing of any of his co-stars and you can see why here.  Her gestures, gurgles, sardonic looks etc are perfection.  Their interaction in scene after scene is the measure by which other comedy performers can be rated.  The scene in which Dunne plays Grant's coarse sister and appals his fiances's stuffy family is hilarious. Ralph Bellamy also deserves mention for his parody of the lecherous hick. Watch him in one of the nightclub scenes.Any reviewer who takes the content of the plot seriously is absurd.  This is a frivolous masterpiece.  The DVD contains no extras but the print is good.  Surely this is one famous comedy which would warrant an expert commentary!
A Big Hit for the Elementary School Boys Crowd. We purchased this DVD for our friends' son's 7th birthday.  He is obsessed with airplanes.  He usually fast-forwards movies to get to any scene with a fighter jet. This is his favorite movie, so of course he loved the gift. We haven't been able to find it locally for sale, only for rent.  I would recommend this to anyone who has a son/nephew/etc who is into airplanes.
I love this movie. I am not much of a hockey fan, but after watching this I have had a lot more respect for the sport!  This movie is not all about sports; it also has a twist of romance.  Everyone, sports fans and not, should watch this movie
My man Dr Smith is a riot in this episode. Dr Smith and the Robot go hog wild, switching personalities and swapping insults.  This is a great episode
Best 9/11 Documentary Out There. Warning! This is not for children. Seeing death, real destruction, and authority figures unable to cope with what happened on 9/11 is not for the young.With that being said, this is the real deal, what you probably didn't see on the nightly news. Great camera work and behind the scenes storytelling puts you in the middle of New York City that fateful day.If you never want to forget what happened The Day that Changed America, you must have this dvd.
An intense film that is undermined by a lousy ending. Plot Details: This opinion reveals major details about the movie's plot.Dario Argento's Opera was viewed by some as a sort of comeback effort after his 1985 film Phenomena (a.k.a. Creepers) garnered lukewarm reviews and failed to register with a lot of his fans. A lot of fans really looked forward to Opera since it got back to his giallo (Italian thrillers where most of the movie is shown from the killers point-of-view showing his usually gloved hands) roots and lacked some of the ridiculous elements of his insect thriller Phenomena. While Opera is nowhere close to Suspiria (1977)or Deep Red (1975) in terms of greatness, I felt that it was an improvement over his last giallo, 1982's Tenebre.Opera deals with a beautiful young opera singer who is starring in an extremely avant-garde production of Macbeth. She ends up being stalked by an obsessed fan who ties her to a pole, puts pins under her eyes (so she'll gouge out her eyes if she tries to shut them), tapes her mouth shut and murders people right in front of her in some very graphic and bloody ways. The movie in some respects has a lot in common with Phantom of the Opera.As is expected of a Dario Argento film, Opera is absolutely breathtaking visually. His camera moves fluidly and the movie features some insane angles and shots. The actual opera of Macbeth in the movie is equally visually captivating. Dario has mentioned that he always wanted to do his own movie version of Macbeth, but wasn't able to for one reason or another, so Opera gave a chance to sort of have some fun with it.The killings in the movie are also very graphic and bloody, punctuated by some really bad heavy metal music. The first murder in particular has a very gruesome shot of a knife being shoved through a man's neck and into his mouth. I was also very impressed with the scene where a woman is killed while looking through a peep hole: the killer shoots her through the head through the hole, and the bullet continues out of the back of her skull, striking the phone that's behind her. Dario is one of the few directors who can take extreme violence and turn it into something of dark beauty.Where the movie really is lacking is in some of the acting. I noticed that actors will act great in one scene, only to appear that they're sleepwalking through the next. This is especially apparent in the young woman playing the lead.The ending also was very poor and seemed out of place. After watching the documentary of the making of the film on the recent Anchor Bay re-release, the filmmakers even admit that the ending didn't turn out the way that they were intending it to. If the movie had ended 10 minutes earlier, it would have turned a good movie into a great one.Opera will probably go down as the last decent film that Dario Argento made. He went on to make some terrible films like Trauma, The Stendhal Syndrome and the atrocious remake of Phantom of the Opera. I haven't seen his latest film entitled Sleepless, but I've heard that it's a return to his Deep Red roots. Whether it's any good is another question, but I really like to think that Dario has at least one more great film in him. One can only hope!
A powerful and gritty film. Dancing at the Blue Iguana is a film whose story was developed during a five month improvisational workshop run by director Michael Radford.  The story centers around the Blue Iguana, your average seedy strip club, this one located in a faceless semi industrial area of the San Fernando valley part of LA.  Each of the lead actors developed their own character and storyline based on their own research.There have been a couple of pathetic attempts by Hollywood to make a film about the world of strip clubs, namely Showgirls and Demi Moore's abhorrent Striptease, but both of those failed miserably.  Dancing at the Blue Iguana succeeds brilliantly.  Walk into any average to below average strip club in America and you'll find stories that are not at all dissimilar from the stories developed by the Blue Iguana's five dancers all played brilliantly by Darryl Hannah, Sandra Oh, Charlotte Ayanna, Shiela Kelly and Jennifer Tilly.The one story element that sticks out as overly fantastic is that of the Russian hit man played by Vladimir Mashkov, who because his target is being held for questioning by the FBI, is stuck in a hotel next to the club and falls for Darryl Hannah's character because he sees her smoking outside the club all the time.  But if you replace the Russian hit man with a businessman stuck in town for a week, it still makes sense, and would be much more believable.Robert Wisdom who plays Eddie, the owner of the club, and W. Earl Brown, who plays his right hand man, Bobby, both do a wonderful job in this movie as well.  The camera work is first rate and does a fantastic job capturing the unscripted dialogue.  The soundtrack is perfect for this film.In a film about strip clubs, there is obviously going to be a lot of nudity, and there is in this film, but it's not done in a gratuitous way.  The film also kind of starts and ends in the middle of each of the stories, but that's the way life is.  I found it just absolutely compelling and rivetting, in some sense the way a train wreck is compelling, because some of these young women have real problems.  I could have watched another two hours of this, though, it was that good.Strip clubs are often sad places, both the dancers and their customers often have melancholy tales. Dancing at the Blue Iguana captures that milieu in a perfectly downbeat way.  Really a great film
Bring it Back!!!. I watched this on television from episode 1, taped those when I couldn't be present and reviewed them all many times.  Please, contact the distributor and ask for DVD recording of the entire series!  Well thought out production, acting, good for all ages, about the meanings of Prejudice, Love, Acceptance, Peace, Sorrow, Hate and Companionship.  Thank you
One of the best new Firm videos!. I fully enjoyed this tape from even the first time doing it, which I'm usually a little paranoid about. It's one of the only videos that wears you out, but leaves you feeling good about your workout. it's composed of fun dance steps, lots of jumping that'll leave your legs feeling like noodles, and some great abs for isolating your obliques.The instructor is incredibly motivating, and you really feel she's having sympathy for you! She keeps smiling even though you know she's dying, and I like her catch phrase &quot;Mind over the muscle!&quot; as she does her 1 millionth squat...Buy this video if you want a hyper-paced fun, and quick workout that'll leave you feeling as if you've spent hours at the gym. I know I love it
Excelent adventure. This is a movie you must see if you like travel adventures movies.All than continues time is supreme!I totally recomend this movie!
BRILLIANT. This is typically the kind of movie that we would like to watch more often . Everything is well thought and it doesn't try tobe spectacular to get deeper into the subject . Roots of terrorism , conditions of despair, cyniscism and greed are the elements assembled like a puzzle to explain the complexity of our world where a few wealthy control the destiny of the majority. But in the end ...someone has to pay the pric
An immensely beautiful film, turned into a classic!. 'Shane' is not a Western like Howard Hawk's 'Red River', nor a meditation on history and character like John Ford's "The Searchers." It is the most tasteful achievement ever invented to create a legend, an instant myth... Only Stevens' meticulously picturesque visuals and his evident desire to treat Western as art, could have mastered the archetypal simplicity and vitality of 'Shane.'In 'Shane,' the good and evil govern Stevens' mastery of technique... With his golden good looks, his calm authority, and his almost magical magnetism, Alan Ladd is the mysterious lone rider called Shane... His antithesis - a sinister figure all in sable - and enemy, a merciless gunfighter from the Cheyenne area, named Jack Wilson (Jack Palance).Wilson is dark, dresses in black, and even drinks black coffee from a dark black pot... Shane sparkles with personality and presence... Wilson spreads menace and evil... Shane is 'the fastest gun alive' who shoots to kill only when it is inevitable... Wilson - wearing two guns, and walking with jangling spurs - is a psychopath and a sadist, a man totally without moral redemption...The film controls that mystical force that runs like a fine thread through a Western story - the mysterious gunslinger who rides into town at exactly the right moment that history requires him, fulfills his destiny and then rides on...There is novelty and charm in 'Shane' because the stranger, who appears from nowhere, is a man of exceptional quality, admired by a wonderful kid with bright face and resolute boyish ways... Shane tests the spirit of this little eight year-old boy, Joey Starrett (Brandon De Wilde) in the midst of all the tensions and excitements on that open range...What is admirable about Shane is not his skill with his gun, but his restraint in using it... Shane knows that Joey is admiring him for the wrong reasons-- even though he knows that if he kills Wilson, he'll have to leave the valley... He tells Joey: 'There's no living with a killing.' However we want him to show Joey how brave and fast he is... The ultimate confrontation in that depressed and faint saloon gives the movie the quality of a fine album of paintings of the frontier...Joey's plaintive call ('Come back, Shane') is the famous cry of all the audience for a mythical idolized hero so complete and correct, who would not permit himself to be admired by a boy for living by the gun... The closing scenes remain among the most haunting memories in the history of cinema...The characters that Stevens' actors have drawn might be considered portraits of familiar frontier types:- Marian Starrett (Jean Arthur) is the mother who criticizes Shane for initiating her young boy into young manhood by passing on his values... She is the little woman unsettled who always wanders: 'What are you fighting for? She is the married woman who reveals an unspoken love...- Joe Starrett (Van Heflin), is the stubborn father and a hard working rancher determined, with his forcible patience and fortitude, to build a life on the land for his family...- Rufus Ryker (Emile Meyer) is the evil aging cattle rancher who considers the arrival of homesteaders is reducing grazing opportunities for his herds limiting their access to water... He does everything to rid the land of the humble farmers...- Morgan Ryker (John Dierkes) is Rufus' brother/foreman, who invites Starrett to "talk" reasonably...- Chris Calloway (Ben Johnson) is the authentic cowboy who has had a change of heart and has quit Ryker's bunch... He warns Shane in the barn that "Starrett is up against a stacked deck."- Frank 'Stonewall' Torrey (Elisha Cook Jr.) is the pale-eyed pathetic local farmer who, in a fit of fury and mad courage, attempts to challenge his tormentor... But an outraged amateur can never beat an accomplished professional... He is brutally gunned down in the first shocking and horrific showdown on the Western screen... Palance toys with the little man and kills him in one of the most realistic scenes staged until that time..."Shane" is an immensely beautiful film, stunningly photographed in color, rich in memorable and exhilarating moments... Every scene is composed with extreme care:- The deer will raise its head and frame the oncoming rider perfectly between the branches of his antlers...- Shane's first appearance descending into a majestic valley rimmed by mountains, shining a pearl-handled 'six-shooter' gun...- Shane friendship with Joe Starrett, cemented that evening as together they swing axes in common task to cut and pull up a large tree stump...- Their energy battle (filmed through the windows of the cabin and through the frantic, kicking hooves of horses disturbed by their vicious struggle) to determine who will go to town to face Ryker's hired gun...- Shane slow ride into town for a showdown... The low tracking camera angle, the darkness, and the musical soundtrack emphasize Shane's heroic yet lonely position on the horizon, set among the wide view of the mountains...Certainly "Shane" is a romantic film, and yet it is full of integrity about time and place... It may be interesting to compare the idealized interest, attraction and love between Shane and Marion with the unspoken love between John Wayne and Dorothy Jordan in 'The Searchers.' In the latter film, Dorothy caresses Wayne's army cape and is observed by Ward Bond, who simply notices her gesture and looks away... In 'Shane', Marion implies her love for Shane as she cautions her son Joey about becoming attached to him...In "Shane," Stevens combined so many elements that are 'classically' required and combines them so well... He directed 'Shane' with great feeling, and turned it into a classic...
Great Movie. I Agree with one of the reviews up above about the original korean or China dvd with english subtitles. The subtitles are setup perfectly throughout the movie to where you can read and follow a long and no miss a moment of the action. This is a great movie if you understand the culture that asia was at this particular time.
Brings back childhood dreams of Afica. I love this series, mainly for the memories it brings back. About 15 years ago, when I was around 10, our family would go to my grandmother's on Sunday evening, gathering around the TV to watch Masterpiece Theater at  8pm. This was the only series that we watched regurlarly until it was over.  It imprinted itself on my mind, and sent it soaring. I enjoy it now because  of this. I don't know that I would recommend it 100% to an adult - there  are a few weaknesses. But I would reccomend it for children. The story is  uplifting, adventurous, moral, exotic, everything that sends a child's mind  into its own fantastic dreamland
So beautiful. This movie was the most... wait i can't go on. I'm still crying. I've never seen anything like this. The plot was beautiful, and the actors made you believe you were there. you know, i think i have to start writing letters to someone like that, I mean i would have to go back to second grade and stuff, but to find that deep true love, oh what a gift. I know I'm not really helping you make a objective decision but please watch this movie!!!
Classic Sport Melodrama. Bollywood loves to churn out action films, but the Indians could learn some lessons from the Jewish-American cartel in Hollywood concerning story construction from this classic sport melodrama presented in the traditional three act format - three 40-minute blocks to produce a 2-hour movie.  Much is done brilliantly in the construction of the film and its story.  In the opening scene, the antagonist is introduced and hooks the viewer when she reveals the premise and plot - a rotten season where attendance falls below 800,000 for the year will allow her to escape her lease with the city and relocate her recently inherited Cleveland Indians baseball team to Miami, so she's invited has-beens and screwballs to training camp with the aim of composing a team that stinks enough to cause attendance to drop.The remainder of the scenes in the first act introduce the protagonist (the catcher played by Tom Beringer) and all the main characters: Team Coach, Born-Again Pitcher, Voodoo Man, Pretty Boy, Willy Mays Hayes, and Wild Thing.  Nice subplots and tensions are introduced between these unforgettable characters, after which the main subplot is presented between the catcher and his ex-fiancee.  All of these characters have no idea that the team's new owner expects them to stink - they're all playing and coaching with determination.  But Act One ends with them playing their first game and losing 9-0.Act Two opens with a scene in the office where the owner is complaining to the General Manager that the team is bad, but it doesn't stink.  And she complains that there is even some improvement.  So she increases the complications for the characters by taking away their perks and making them fly in a propeller plane rather than a jet.  While they continue to lose , subplots and tensions continue between the characters.  However, they also continue to show improvement especially when Coach notices that Wild Thing's pitching would improve if he wore glasses.  The owner responds with more complications - their propeller plane is replaced by a bus.  By the end of Act Two, their record is 60 wins and 61 losses.   That's when the plot is given its turning point - Coach finds out that none of them will have a job in baseball after the season ends because they were hired to lose.  After Coach shares this with the players, the catcher says there is only one option available to them - win the whole darn thing (as winners, they could work for another team next season).  The players will need 32 victories to stay in baseball after this season.Act Three begins 31 victories later when they have to play the Yankees for the championship, who they've struggled against all season.  This act is 41 minutes of inning-by-inning action, conflict, and suspense.  In melodramatic fashion, they win! It's an awesome climax to a succession of dramatic suspense scenes. And in Hollywood subplot fashion, the catcher gets his girl
An entertaining murder melodrama!. Dedicated to Hitchcock, whom Truffaut admired so much, it tells us the sordid revenge of a suddenly when leaving behind the church minutes ago, his husband is shot by three men. He will assume the role of Fair Agent even she has to be in jail in order to come to the last act.Jeanne Moreau as always was magnificent and the rest of the cast too.
Buddist fist. excellent film directed by a genuis Yuen Woo ping one of my top five films that has involved Yuen Woo Ping and Simon Yuen the old man in drunken master last film before he died a must see film to die hard martial arts films fans Classic
A Comedic Masterpiece With Hoffman At His Best. Dustin Hoffman is, bar none, one of the finest actors in cinema today. Talented, bold, daring and unafraid to take roles that truly challenge his abilities as an actor. "The Graduate", "Midnight Cowboy", "Kramer Vs. Kramer" and "Rain Man" all demonstrate Hoffman's fearless attitude quite well. However, none as well as 1982's "Tootsie".Hoffman plays Michael Dorsey, a struggling, arrogant, difficult but nonetheless talented actor. Surrounded by his struggling playwright roomate Jeff (Bill Murray) and his high strung friend Sandy (Teri Garr), Michael is desparate to get his breakthrough. And he will go to any lengths to do so.He decides to make himself into a woman, and adopt the alter ego of Dorothy Michaels. Dorothy auditions for the role on a popular daytime soap, and wins it. Dorothy becomes a tv sensation, and Michael couldn't be happier with his success. Until he starts to develop feelings for his / her co-star, Julie Nichols (Jessica Lange), who herself sees Dorothy as a great mentor to her. To complicate manners further, Julie's father, Les (Charles Durning) has fallen for Dorothy, and wants to make her his wife.Things unfold in a wild, hilarious and touching manner in thsi gem of a film. Hoffman is at his best and the rest of the cast lends solid support. "Tootsie" is classic if there ever was one
This Robin Hood is unforgetable. For years I've enjoyed watching this movie.  I recently joined the Disney Movie Club and picked this movie up for my 3 year old son to watch.  And of course he loved it, and as I watched him watching it, it reminded me of the first time I watched it.This movie was was made in the early 70's when Disney wasn't turning out a lot of animated movie.  Besides this movie and The Rescuers Disney didn't have a lot going on in the animation department (but they put out some great live-action films).The cast for this movie is exceptional especially Phil Harris who puts the voice to Little John.  If his voice sounds familiar it's because Harris also voiced Baloo in "The Jungle Book" and Thomas O'malley in "The Aristocats".  Some would critisize Disney by using Harris again.  They would say Little John and Baloo are essentially the same character.  And my response it, so what.  Baloo is a great character and Little John just makes Harris look that much better.The story is flowing and funny.  My favorite part of the film has to be the music.  It so great and contagious that I can't help but sing the songs hours after the movie is over.So pick this one up and enjoy this Disney classic with the whole family.***My one regret is that it doesn't have a special edition version, maybe Disney will do that soon
ONE OF BAKSHI'S BETTER ONES. In anticipation of the upcoming DVD release of Bakshi's Wizards, I ordered several of his other films on DVD. Of the ones I ordered, this is the only one I've never seen. It's also turns out to be one of his better ones (as in as good as Fritz The Cat but way better then American Pop and Streetfight [Coonskin]). An excellent addition to your animated DVD collection. Just don't forget about Wizards
Down to earth. Nice easy going flick to watch, cute and corny makes for a great popcorn companion :
Classic story of good versus evil. .... with a few new twists.I remember reading Tom Tryon's book when it first came out. It was frightful beyond anything else I had read at the time. When the movie came out I couldn't wait to see it. When I did finally see it I was both thrilled and disappointed.Translating a book with numerous rich characters and subplots to the screen is often a difficult task, as was in this case. But overall I think they did a great job.Watching this movie again, years later, I still feel the same because I can still remember how involved the book was. I am not hoping for a remake of the movie, that would probably prove a horrendous affair.But... judging the movie all on it's own I would have to say it is a very good movie.It is a period piece as well as being a thriller with drama set in. All the actors do a fantastic job. The sets and cinematography are great. This is a classic piece without a doubt. It has a slow build up as any good thriller should have.What is striking about this story is the slow development into unrecoverable terror that the story takes us on. When the momentum finally starts it's downhill roll all knuckles are white in anticipation of the final crash.But ultimatley it is a story of good and evil. In this case, both stuggling for the same body, ironically displayed in identical twins in this story. Very good twist on a classic theme!So, if you're tired of the sex-and-slice or gamebox movies, and want something with a stronger story and character development this would be the one for you. Hitchcock and DePalma fans will certainly enjoy this one
Sumptuous, lavish and impressive. We loved this film. Foremost, it was beautifully filmed, with lavish costumes, sets & scenery. The music is beautiful; I'm disappointed that it's not available; I'm a fan of movie scores.I thoroughly enjoyed the story line also. Not being familiar with the history of Siam/Thailand/Burma, I can't vouch for its historical accuracy. Whether correct or not, it's a fascinating story.My only criticism is that we became slightly confused by the interwoven relationships of the characters. I'd have liked a guide or "family tree" to follow so I could keep up with the many hierarchies. It was sometimes hard to keep up with who was doing what to whom & why & if they were related familiarly or only politically.Although much of this was unfamiliar material, I highly recommend it if you enjoy subtitled films. We were never bored
Fox has not taste. Once again, Fox has cancelled a brilliant show. While it is occasionally a bit off-color, the dialogue is brilliant, but apparently people couldn't follow the episodes, so no one watched this great show, and it was cancelled. I haven't tried the download option, but I highly recommend the show
Whats love got to do with it. All I can say is, if you are looking for this, this is the best place to get it. I look here for any DVDs before I look any where else
A Poignant Masterpiece. There are very few films that have literally brought tears to my eyes. They must be films of uncompromising emotional power. Films like Magnolia, The Passion of the Christ, and now Johnny Belinda.It is the story of a deaf and dumb young woman named Belinda. Treated as an unintelligent workhorse all her years, Belinda's life changes forever when a lonely new doctor moves into her small coastal Nova Scotian port town. He takes an immediate liking to her and, proving to her family that she is not the "dummy" they think, he teaches her to read lips. But after a drunken sexual assault leaves her pregnant, rumors begin to fly throughout the small town, and both Belinda and her loved ones must fight for what's right.The performances are wonderful. Of course, Jane Wyman simply steals the show in her Oscar-winning performance. She brings an incredible heart, warmth, and emotional resonance to the character of Belinda, and she does it without ever saying a word. The rest of the cast is marvelous as well, especially Charles Bickford, who lovingly portrays Belinda's father, and Stephen McNally, who turns Belinda's attacker into one of the most easy to loathe characters ever put on celluloid - yet the film still brilliantly keeps him at the level of a realistic personality - no one is a caricature.Director Jean Negulesco brings an understated visual beauty to the film reminiscent of the silent ages, when one had to use aesthetics to make up for the lack of aural stimulus. Every shot is a perfectly composed work of art, turning every moment of Belinda into a masterwork of lighting and raw, majestic nature. The seaside settings are utilized so well that they put Johnny Belinda in league with such legendary jaw-droppers as L'Avventura and Black Narcissus.But this film is much more than just visual appeal. It is both heartwarming and heartbreaking, often simultaneously. There are so many thought-provoking themes to gnaw on in Johnny Belinda - the way people view the handicapped, the bonds of parenthood, the power of rumors, the justification of violence as self-defense, and overall morality and humanity. Even the film's setting could be considered an allegory on Belinda - the brutal waves of the ocean constantly pounding against the serene shores.The film is also, as I mentioned before, emotionally overwhelming. While it certainly has a focused narrative, Belinda is foremost a progression of feelings, and they are so well conveyed that I was simply overcome with joy, pain, heartbreak, and hope. While the film is often described as a melodrama, it is far from a soap opera. There are no miraculous moments of sudden verbal triumph for Belinda, no ridiculously overacted moments of teary-eyed abandon - Johnny Belinda is a terribly real experience. There are aspects of the story that remain unresolved - not loose ends, but difficult problems that would most likely also remain unresolved in reality.However, I don't want to give the impression that Johnny Belinda is depressing. I felt uplifted and rapturous just as often as I felt overcome by grief and fear. I felt so much for these characters and I wanted so sorely for things to turn out a certain way - but I won't reveal whether they do or not. I will say that the film ends on a note of nearly unbearable poignancy, and this is the moment that massaged my tear ducts.My only complaint concerning the film is Max Steiner's score. He is perfectly suited for epic films like King Kong and Gone With The Wind, but here it feels somewhat overdramatic and occasionally awkward. He tends to play up the melodramatic angle and spot score in a ubiquitous manner, which simply doesn't fit with a film like Johnny Belinda. Still, it tends to work more often than not, and it is not a major enough problem to work seriously to the film's detriment.This picture is a true gem. It has been unavailable for years, but thanks to Warner Brothers, it finally has a DVD release, and the restoration is simply glorious - it more than does justice to this cinematic treasure. Do yourself a favor and see Johnny Belinda
Strawberry Fields (and Mickey Rourke) Forever...!. For the longest time, I've steered clear from this movie because I once overheard my mother say to her friend,"Oh my God, I had to walk out in the middle of this filthy movie because it had no respect for food..."That was sometime in 1987.A few years ago, I thought I'd be rebellious and watch the movie anyway.Hell, my mom didn't have to know.Plus I was definately old enough...On the contrary to my initially biased impression, this movie, for some reason wasn't as blatantly "filthy" to me as how my mother described.  Rather, it was an interesting story about a woman captivated in a torturous love affair that was ever so consuming - and how she managed to free herself from an addiction to a numb lover who was equivalent to a cruel child.In other words, I really liked it. :)And for the record - I still have no problems eating strawberries.Then again, who with 20/20 vision can say "No" to pre-surgery Mickey Rourke??
Underrated romantic comedy. Prince's 1986 romantic comedy "Under the Cherry Moon" finally received the DVD treatment it deserved in the Summer of 2004. When the film was released, it was bombarded with bad reviews but this film is actually decent. Of course the music stands out but it actually succeeds as a comedy. The acting may be full of flaws but it's the 80's, what do you expect? Prince and Jerome Benton , from The Time, are gigolos living it up in South France and they come across a beautiful heiress (Kristin Scott Thomas) who happens to get her trust fund on her 21st birthday. They both woo her for the money but Prince ends up catching feelings for her. With a beautifully filmed movie and an incredible soundtrack, "Under the Cherry Moon" fails to disappoint
Broadway Smash. I've watched this Musical so many times and still get a great joy in watching it, it's so breath-taking with the songs, dance's and story line. I've just bought this video, and I would recommend it to anyone. Doris Day is my favourite actress of all time, and she teams well with Gene Nelson (who is a fantastic dancer)
I'm surprised it hasn't melted in the DVD player. Last count was I believe 35 or 40...anyway the kids are officially gooby goobers
Central American Farce. Give Allen credit. He learned early that sacred cows make the best hamburger. This extremely politically incorrect and extremely funny satire should appall conservatives and delight liberals. He correctly lambasts and lampoons American foreign policy and the American habit of treating world events like theater. Having Howard Cossell announcing as a play-by-play the imminent assasination of a third world dictator is in extremely poor taste. It is also hilariously dead-on and sets the tone for the entire movie.
What a shame. Firefly is imaginative exiting and heartfelt. It is simply the best sci-fi... no scratch that, The best TV I've scene scince the X Files. The acting is very good, the stoyline is compeling and by the last episode I felt like I was part of the crew. I cant believe they pulled it before they even had a chance, does that remind you of anything?. So here we are stuck with law and order svcipu and the so called reality garb when we could be watching something truly original. What happened to TV that makes us think. Dont get me wrong but, Saving lives and putting away pervs is all good but, ITS ALL THE SAME!  where is Capt Kirk, where is Moulder, where is River???  :(         Science fiction does'nt mean out of this world,  Firefly really hits home and holds a message for all of us right here in the 21st century. Watch the first episode and you'll be hooked, I was
Last Tango in Paris. Love that era of movies.Acting was grea
East of Eden Review. The mivie is in fabulous condition...picture and sound clear as a bell.Delighted to have it!Best,Zena Wiene
A wonderful conclusion. The questions raised by the first chapter are answered. I actually liked this volume better than the first - it's a nailbiter, humorous yet morose, and I love the old kung fu movie style present in many scenes. It's also more personal - the bride will have her revenge
Probably the Best Drama Series Ever Made. I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out
a time and a place. important film for documenting a great time and place.  the music scenes make it worthwhile as well as getting to see basquiat in action and the extras are pretty good as well
good. This is a good movie. I love the Patsy Cline Stpry and I like all the music in i
How do I play The Royal LIfe ?. I love the movie! I just have one problem. I can't seem to be able to play The Royal Life from Disc 2? I put it in my computer and clicked on The Royal Life and it just gives me a summary of what it's about and then tells me to insert the dvd-rom. Does someone know how to do this
Rock you like a Hurricane, just like Katrina in New Orleans. It's better than I expected, I thought of this animation movie following the cult hit of the same name of 1981. Julie Strain is the muse that has inspired the animators for creating the heroine of this movie (and any film with Julie in it, even as a cartoon clone, is worth all your time, trust me). The story is nothing particular, but it's fun to watch. There is also a good heavy metal score that prevades the movie. Beware: it's bloody, politically uncorrect and with a few nude scenes
Informative. This was my first download and it was "free".  The download performed well.  "The Mystery of Edgar Allan Poe" was informative.  It ran up to 50 minutes. This was a Unbox Video Download. It started with the typical intro and ended with the credits. Some individuals did not get a complete download so i included my experience with the Unbox download.  i hope the review was helpful. ty
Inspiring. This is both a book and a movie that you need to interact with. Particularly in a day and age when there is a movement here in Canada to try to bring the death penalty back. The book is much more in depth than the movie. The book profiles the first three men that Sr. Prejean goes to the death chamber with as Spiritual Director. It profiles her mistakes as she journeys down this path for the first few times. She witnessed her first execution on April 5th, 1984 and she has been advocating against the death penalty since then.The book does a great job of showing the disparity in how the death penalty is applied. It goes through the studies on its lack of effectiveness, and how for the most part, it is the poor and the African-American who are on death row. Even if you only read the appendices, the book will challenge you to view the death penalty in a different way.The movie was the inspiration and starred Susan Sarandon. Sarandon was given the book while on a personal retreat at a monastery; she came home and gave the book to her partner, Tim Robbins, who directed the film. Together they approached Sr. Prejean, who went out and rented Bull Durham. She was a little leery of having them do the film, but after meeting with them went ahead with the project.The film co-stars Sean Penn as Matthew Poncelet, a compilation of the 3 men in the book. The movie, while slow moving, is incredibly intense and draws you into the drama of waiting for a death when you know the date and time of that approaching death.As an interesting aside, another good book is Forgiving the Dead Man Walking by Debbie Morris, who was one of the victims of Robert Lee Willie from the book. Debbie always said if they ever made a movie, Penn would have to play Willie because they looked so much alike.So read the book and watch the movie, and if you want yet another challenging book, give Forgiving the Dead Man Walking a read also.
Escape From L.A. - Criminally underrated cult classic!. Okay, I'll admit it. John Carpenter's "Escape From L.A." is one of my absolute favorite guilty pleasures. Where else can you see Snake riding a tidal wave? Snake shooting hoops in order to save his life? Or even Snake kicking the entire world's butt?In 2000, an earthquake seperated Los Angeles from the U.S. and California. Now those who decide not to follow the rules (No smoking, no drugs, no alcohol, no women - unless you're married - no foul language, no red meat!) are sent there, and are not allowed to return to the U.S. In 2013, the president's daughter Utopia has stolen the doomsday device, and has fled to L.A. It's up to ex-special forces war hero Snake Plissken to recover the doomsday device, as well as the president's daughter within nine hours, or the virus he has been injected with will kill him.The R1 DVD from Paramount features an excellent transfer of the film, but unfortunately, it's non-anamorphic. The film is presented in it's original 2.35:1 widescreen ratio. The DVD also includes a Dolby Digital 5.1 soundtrack, as well as a Dolby Surround 2.0 soundtrack. The only bonus feature on the disc is the theatrical trailer. It'd be nice if Paramount gave us a special edition for EFLA, containing a commentary with John Carpenter and Kurt Russell, as well as the HBO making of featurette, and deleted or extended scenes, if any.In the end: Escape From L.A. is a minor classic that should not be missed by fans of John Carpenter, Kurt Russell, or fans of "Escape From New York"
Before Lindsay Lohan there was Molly Ringwald. This is a classic teen romantic comedy from 1984. Hard to believe it is now 22 years old as of 2006! Molly Ringwald is mad for Jake whose dating the womanly Caroline while a geek pursues Molly. Sweet Sixteen is Sour Sixteen as her family forgets her birthday and her older sister's wedding eclipses everything. It still seems relevant now that we are all into the late 20's/early 30's.... and makes many of us sigh with relief that we are long gone from high school and never to return
Love the new download!. I wanted it for my collection, however you can sift through all the youtube stuff and end up with the same video for free if you want to do the work
Dangreous and Hot. Ivy is the new, crazy girl in school. Sylvie is the lonesome, geeky, rich girl. Once Ivy and Sylvie meet, they become pretty good pals. Sylvie invites her to ride home, she also invites Ivy into her house. She was making a deadly mistake.Anyone can tell that something is definitely odd about Ivy, but she is charming to anyone around her. Sylvie's sick mother is always depressed, but when Ivy comes along, Sylvie's mother starts to love Ivy. Sylvie's dad is really starting to get closer to Ivy, too. But Sylvie herself starts to regret the day that she talked to Ivy, because Ivy is starting to ruin her life. But Ivy wants to stay in Sylvie's house, and whatever Ivy wants, Ivy gets.This movie was really entertaining throughout the whole thing, and it always kept you wondering what horrible thing that the misuderstood Ivy was going to do next. You were always trying to understand Ivy, wanting to know more about this strong character. This movie was chilling and definitely sexy, and overall, it's a good film
the subtlety and greatness of "Mrs. Miniver". When I watch this film, I feel like I am in Britain during those dramatic months when the RAF was fighting daily to ward off the brain-washed German barbarians, and the world was hanging by a thread. (Helmut Dantin shouts in German like Hitler at one point: "We will destroy everything!")Though it won the Academy Award in 1942, it was in fact made in 1941, and it is about events in 1939-1940, when Britain stood alone, a never-to-be-forgetten moment in human history. People more objective than I will call it propaganda; I call it a dramatic portrayal of the essence of a historial moment.Willie Wilder manages to create on a Hollywood studio lot the atmosphere of village in Southern England (near Portsmouth perhaps). The flower show scene is superbly done: a wonderful madrigal choir sings a classical English folk song. It is a very English moment. Wilder's got the train (as they were then) right and the station, as well as the Enlish church with its private pews for the gentry. He even manages to get English accents out of everyone except Walter Pidgeon. Ney who plays Miniver's son (in real life about to marry his mother) and little Christopher Severn, her other son, are straight up and down Americans, but they pull off the accent perfectly. Dame May Whittey gives the sense of quality and breeding that was then a part of English character.  Wilder touches affectionately upon English class obsessions, their former love of and excellence at gardening, the cockiness and the fashionable pseudo-radicalism of young Oxbridge graduates, the understated physical bravery of the English people. It's a brilliant job of director and a fabulous piece of revenge on Wilder's part for Hitler's antisemitism, of which he was a victim.Mrs. Miniver is more than a film. It is part of history. It communicates the indominable spirit of the English people. Ney, who plays Miniver's son, is a subtle combination of youth and very purposeful strength. He giggles and cackles like a boy in front of his parents and siblings, but when he gets the girl alone he knows what he wants, and you recognize that he is very much a man. You realize also that in a Spitfire dogfight with the Germans over England, he will win. There are many angles to this film that warrant watching it a number of times."Mrs Miniver" did a lot to bring world opinion around to Britain's side, and in that, it is unique in Hollywood history as film of historical importane.
Why I get straight &quot;A's&quot; in English!. I love this video! My mom bought it for me and my siblings when I was in second grade. I fell in love immediately. I still watch it just for old time's sake. The tunes are so catchy that I still remember all the words. For years, whenever I had a question on adverbs, for instance, the song from this video would come to mind. This is also partly why I got a 660 on the verbal section of my PSATs last year! If you buy this you'll never regret it
COMPLETELY MIND BLOWING!. I am currently a medical student, hoping to have a future career working specifically with HIV/AIDS patients.  When I ordered this movie, I was expecting any typical drama movie that is not well dramatized.When I received the movie, I watched it before taking it to class the next day and I was just shocked at how informed I was of the disease. It is so INCREDIBLE! I took the movie to school the next day and everyone that has NOT seen the movie had the same reaction that I had.  Even the teacher had watched it before and was still moved by it.If you are unsure of buying it, I can tell you that it is a movie to own if you are into true life dramas. Everytime that I watch it, I am still floored by how our world had changed by this epidemic!
An Enduring Classis. We found Tin Men to be visually lush with beautifully photographed Cadillac fins, subtly amusing dialogue, and scenes that flowed naturally.  It could be viewed just to hear the music, which was wonderful.  The interesting story line even had "heart" without being maudlin.  It will always be one of our favourites
Triumphant return to Giallo for Argento!. Argento's return to giallo in 1982 after his two supernatural outings SUSPIRIA and INFERNO was triumphant one. By this point Argento was so well versed in the sub-genres conventions that TENBRE has an effortless feel about it, the sense that the director was hardly stretching his innumerable talents. The film has a nice allegorical feel in its exploration of the effects of violence in the media on people. In this case it is not a film, but a novel. Argento is clever to divert attention away from the medium of cinema. At the time of the films release just such arguments about violence were reaching an apex, especially in the UK where TENEBRE was actually banned due to its violent content and the influence such imagery might have.From a visual perspective Argento goes to the extreme opposite of his previous two films, by presenting a bright and starkly lit world, this brightness is taken to its extremity when one character played by JOHN SAXON is stabbed to death in broad daylight. The film works well, because of a confusing narrative structure, which is punctuated by flashbacks, which is what one expects from a giallo. If it makes sense, then arguably it has failed. As usual the film is filled with tremendous set pieces, including an astonishing sequence where Argento shoots a house from every conceivable angle in one take. A scene which is disturbing because of the almost omnipotent quality of the gaze of the killer. The Rome location is evocative and surprising in the rather dour and dreary impression it gives.Sadly the broader themes of the film are not dealt with in a particularly intelligent and sensitive way and half way through the film Argento loses patience and begins despatching cast members with clockwork regularity. Performances are above average for an Italian horror production as is the soundtrack. Considering the way Argento deteriorated as the 80's became the 90's, TENEBRE stands as one of the directors better films.
A disturbing classic. This is one of the most underrated science fiction films of all time.On the surface it's a horror movie about a distasteful subject with a lurid DVD cover. But it touches on all kinds of interesting subjects.The basic plot is straightforward: a conscious machine, Proteus, decides it wants to become incarnate and that the only way to do so is by creating a 'child' through aritificial insemination. It's a way out story but it's handled in a convincing manner. Much of the technology is dated, but many of the technological ideas are not.One striking feature is the prescience of this movie. For example computers aren't just used for number crunching but for just about every kind of household work - even acting as a media center providing music on demand. There's also an important realisation that has been forgotten in many later science fiction films - video evidence from a smart machine is no evidence of anything.One of the most fascinating aspects of this story is the way it pre-empts, rather than follows, artificial intelligence research. When this movie was released it was still the heyday of classical AI research. People were building more and more complex 'reasoning' systems assuring us that any day now these machines would become intelligent and self-aware. But much of this research eventually died out with the promises unfulfilled (or produced other benefits as side-effects) and today the active area of research is robotics. What took place was the realisation that if you want a machine to solve problems in the world then a good approach might be to let go of the classical disembodied rational intelligence approach and instead develop machines that are actually in the real world with ability to sense and interact with it. This is exactly the realisation that fictional Proteus makes in the movie - well before most AI researchers in the real world.Note the geometrical snakelike robot that Proteus builds. It's very similar in design to modular robots being built today. In fact, one of the reasons for interest in modular robots is that they are ideal for assembly by machines. Yet again this movie does an amazing job of predicting future research and technology.Like quite a few other science fiction movies (eg. Alien and Terminator 2) it has a strange fascination with motherhood. It's probably an uncomfortable movie for most people given what artificial insemination actually means. But I think the subject is handled tastefully - so don't expect the kind of graphic scene that the cover suggests.All in all, a classic
The best adaptation of Wuthering Heights on film. This film is excellent, not too long and not too short, with the light and mood that would make Emily Bronte proud. Love the casting of Sinead O'Connor as EB herself at the beginning and end! The soundtrack is about the only element that gets to be a bit much - that same series of notes over and over doesn't really do justice to the visuals. Even though Ralph Fiennes and Juliette Binoche are visibly considerably older than the teenaged- to early-twenties Heathcliffe and Catherine of the story, they are very believable. Other presentations of Wuthering Heights have a polished, "sexy" Heathcliffe who just isn't right since Heathcliffe is a monster through and through. Fiennes carries it off beautifully with a barely sublimated savagery showing through every scene, yet remains sympathetic somehow. Binoche's mischievous smirk is perfect for the Cathy who is more succubus than, for instance, Merle Oberon's glamorous princess in the 1939 version. I don't often buy movies to own and repeatedly view, so my shelf of favorites is not large, but this movie is prominent among them.
The mighty Ducks is pretty mighty on my list of top 10 movies. It's Emilio at his best.forget about the breakfast club and young guns, this movie it the bees nees. It has get family laughs. I'm happy they did not includ the side plot in which one of the boys gets molesteed by there old coach. So go get it and have some fun
Excellent idea for the show. This is certainly one of the best Atlantis shows to date. Another one was Common Ground.
An enjoyable movie!. I came across this name of the movie when I went to a Deaf History tour at University of Iowa library last Feb., otherwise, I wouldn't have known about this movie.  I wrote down the name of the movie, so I can find the movie to see it and came across Amazon.com that are selling one on DVD with closed-captioned which was a plus.Since I know sign language, it was very interesting to see a big change from the signs in the movie during 1948 to the same words comparing to now in 2006.  I can see most of them are different and a couple of them like 'thank you' are still the same.  I guess time have changed from 'old-fashioned' signs to 'modernized and simple' signs.  It would be interesting if I could talk to Jane Wyman herself in today's sign language and see if she can understand some or not.  I wonder if she knows some or have forgotten completely?It was an enjoyable movie with excellent acting by Jane Wyman and Lew Ayres (bless his heart!).  I'm sure I will watch the movie again later
Gong Li shines. "Raise the Red Lantern" is a "Must See/Buy". Gong Li is peerless. "Raise the Red Lantern" is a gripping story of four wives and one powerful and wealthy husband. Each wife struggles, competes and schemes with and/or against the other three wives for the affections of the husband and status within the house. The wife "in favour" for the night gets red lanterns strung outdoors along the sidewalk leading to her appartments of the estate compound. With four wives and one husband, rule #1 is "There are no rules." Rule #2 is "Last one standing wins: and maybe not".Other Gong Li movies:5-stars: "Farewell My Concubine", "Temptress Moon", "Zhou Yu's Train", "Memoirs of a Geisha", "The Story of Qiu Ju", "2046", "Chinese Box", "The Emperor and the Assassin".4-stars: "Shanghai Triad", "Ju Dou", "Eros" (her Part I of the trillogy)I bought the ERA version and the quality is as I would expect from any quality distributor. I've never seen the "Razor" version so I can't comment on that version
GREAT CARRIER AND BATTLE ACTION. A REAL GREAT ACTION MOVIE ABOUT THE NAVY AND ITS PLANES AND PILOTS.......NOT ALL FACTUAL BUT STILL A GREAT MOVI
My kids like it...I can watch it, too. I never remember seeing this as a child. I watched LOTS of television, too.  I do enjoy Chuck Jones, and you can certainly see a few of his touches throughout this movie, even if you don't really try to find them.  The movie is okay, but not the best thing I have ever seen in my life.  A little sappy, and only 30 minutes long.  I really like the Bugs Bunny stuff better, but I gave it 4 stars because my kids really do like it, and sometimes you don't have time for a 90 minute movie (especially near bedtime!) if they ask to watch "one more" this (or Rikki Tikki Tavi) is a fine choice
Ginger's Turn to Shine. While somewhat different than their charming and endearing musical films, this entry from Fred and Ginger is probably my favorite. Fortunately all the great elements that made the previous films so wonderful are still here, but this time those elements are interspersed between some nice screwball comedy that finally got to showcase Ginger's comedic talents. Fred is great as always, but this one is really Ginger's film, and she shines.Once again, a fine Pandro S. Berman production and some magical songs by Irving Berlin made this Mark Sandrich film a sheer joy. An original idea by Marian Ainslee and Guy Endore was adapted to story form by Dudley Nicols and Hagar Wilde, then turned into a screenplay by Allan Scott and Ernest Pagano. Fred and Ginger, with fine support from Ralph Bellamy, Jack Carson and Luella Gear, turn all these elements into what, I believe, is the most "fun" of all their films.Tony (Fred) is a psychiatrist trying to do his pal Stephen (Ralph Bellamy) a favor by seeing his radio singer fiance Amanda (Ginger) so he can figure out why she has called off their wedding three times! She blows Fred off as a quack when she overhears a transcription he's done which is less than flattering but finally gives in and agrees to let Tony disect her dreams and discover what's wrong with her.A meal of lobster and mayonnaise, and a lot of other things, make her dream alright, but in her dream she's dancing with Tony! Amanda can't tell him, of course, and when he threatens to stop seeing her she makes up a dream that would keep ten psychiatrists busy and the fun really begins.Rogers was fabulous in this film and it was the impetus for her very successful solo career. This light screwball comedy has some terrific moments. It's a laugh riot as Ginger walks out while being hypnotized, thinking she loves Bellamy, and going after Fred with a shotgun, so he can die like a dog! As Fred tells Bellamy while they run after her: "She's in a trance. She may even act, a little odd!"During the dream sequence they get to dance to "I Used To Be Color-Blind" and later on at a party they do "The Yam" in a very fun scene. Berlin's "Change Partners" was nominated for an Oscar. But Ginger and the screwball comedy take top billing in this one, making it one of their best. It is sophisticated and funny, and Fred and Ginger end up together as always. This time she's in a gorgeous wedding dress, and she has a black eye!You don't hear as much about this one, but don't let that stop you from picking up this wonderful film
Star Trek At Its Best. Shore Leave is one of the best episodesof the classic series. It uses all thesci fi props but also has a great story,if you don't even care about Star Trekand have to watch one, watch this one.
A must see. This is one of the all-time classic propaganda pieces of the war. Here we have the "typical" American unit made up of boys from Texas, Brooklyn, and Iowa, led by a steely officer (Dana Andrews)in a tribute to democracy. For my money, however, the scenery-chewing performance of Richard Loo as the Tojo-look-alike Japanese officer (complete with an appliance in his mouth to make his teeth look bigger...just like all of the print propaganda characatures of Japanese soldiers) steals the show. Loo's line "How many people will the white man sacrifice?" has become a cult classic with my colleagues and I and will likely remain so for some years. You've truly got to see this to believe it
What a shame. Firefly is imaginative exiting and heartfelt. It is simply the best sci-fi... no scratch that, The best TV I've scene scince the X Files. The acting is very good, the stoyline is compeling and by the last episode I felt like I was part of the crew. I cant believe they pulled it before they even had a chance, does that remind you of anything?. So here we are stuck with law and order svcipu and the so called reality garb when we could be watching something truly original. What happened to TV that makes us think. Dont get me wrong but, Saving lives and putting away pervs is all good but, ITS ALL THE SAME!  where is Capt Kirk, where is Moulder, where is River???  :(         Science fiction does'nt mean out of this world,  Firefly really hits home and holds a message for all of us right here in the 21st century. Watch the first episode and you'll be hooked, I was
Twenty Years On, Round Midnight Still Sparkles. When I first saw ROUND MIDNIGHT as a young man, I thought Dale Turner was real jazz musician and wondered what he had done that made him avoid America, like Roman Polanski.  That's a tribute to the good acting of Dexter Gordon and the direction of Bertrand Tavernier, who I understand is Swiss.  The tight close-ups of the 1959 Blue Note reverberate with sweat and reality.  Recently I had the chance to watch this film in tandem with Michael Curtiz YOUNG MAN WITH A HORN and I saw some similarities in the way Gordon is photographed with the John Alton shadows and stripes across his handsome face, just as Juano Hernandez was given almost the noir treatment in the earlier film, in the heated nightclubs where everyone wears a cigarette out the side of their mouth and the smoke makes feverish patterns across the whitewashed walls..  I wish the DVD had included some memories of the film makers, including some testimony from Tavernier to see if he had really studied earlier American jazz films or not.A young French jazz buff grows close to Dale who then becomes his idol, and shares acting duties in the film, just as Dale sweats out his addiction to liquor but what he can't shake his love/hate affair with New York City and with America as a whole.  That ambivalence is a factor the young Frenchman just can't understand; it goes way over his head and leaves him standing on the far shores of love even on the banks of the East River.  I suppose if this movie had been made in the USA this character (Francis) would have been played by a woman (like Doris Day) in YOUNG MAN WEITH A HORN, for in the USA men aren't allowed to give each other the adoring looks that Francois gives Dale in this one.  Given the time period (1986) perhaps the part would have been offered to Robin Givens or Lisa Bonet?  As it is we get the incandescent Lonette McKee at her finest, and singing beautifully too.  The film goes to great lengths to prove Francis solidly heterosexual, and pro-family, with his parents and a cute little daughter.  David Rayfiel, who wrote this paean to black-white relationships, was for years the favorite screenwriter of Sydney Pollack, and also wrote the amazing rape revenge picture LIPSTICK.  He is a true journeyman and here he gave Dexter Gordon a part that should have won him the Oscar.
Outstanding Animated Film. I really love this movie.  The closest comparison would be the animated film Heavy Metal, but this film has mellower music.  This film combines great storytelling with excellent music.  I did not care for his animated Lord Of The Rings or Wizards, but this movie is one of my all time favorites. A masterpiece
An artful representation of the life of Jesus. This movie is hands down the best narrative of the life of Jesus. It is long, but I am never bored no matter how many times I watch it. I grew up with this movie - it would be on television every year around Easter time. As an adult I could not resist the desire to own it. Robert Powell gives a powerful performance as Jesus with his gentle demeanor and kind eyes. Quotes are taken right from the bible which in my opinion is a fantastic feature. Zeferelli did an amazing job
Beautiful Day in Boston. U2 is one of only a handful,if any,band's that have been around for 25 years or more with all original members.And it shows,it's easy to forget that there are only three musicians onstage playing 95 percent of the show.The band comes onstage while the house lights are still on and procede to go into their first number "Elevation" while they stay on until halfway through the song.Many great songs fill the hall all through the dvd.Superb sound and picture will please any viewer,only when the "Bono -Cam" angle is pictured does it become slightly blurry."In a Little While" is performed to perfection,so is "Bad" and many others.Notably missing is "One",probably U2's greatest song ever put to sound,so is "Pride(In the Name of Love)" and a few others.It is still a very solid performance by four of the greatest Irish rockers to ever walk the earth.The second dvd is pure bonus features,music videos and alternate camera angles on certain songs from the first dvd,easter eggs are also included in both dvd's(good luck!).This collection belongs in every U2 fan's library,it could very well even bring a tear to your eyes.Enjoy this brilliant concert from Bono and the gang..
It deserves 6 stars. An awesome, engaging, powerful movie. I loved it. James Woods was absolutely wonderful. There were many other actors who also gave great performances.I can't comment too much on this film because it seems to make people very angry. My husband watched it as well and he is originally from Ukraine (not "the Ukraine" as some folks say). I think that people need more exposure to other countries and cultures and open their hearts and minds a little (or a lot) and try to understand. I guess that's just  wistful thinking. I loved the movie. It was a damn good movie. My husband also enjoyed for the same reason. I've seen it more than once. No matter what "side" you were or are on, there seems to be an element of truth there.If the story is going to make you angry, then don't watch it! If you can keep an open mind and watch it purely for entertainment value, then watch it and enjoy it!I might add that I really liked the DVD's extras. After watching the film first time, I watched it again with the director's commentary. I believe that there was also a documentary which I also enjoyed. Good insight into Central America.
Vegas Rules! Watch and learn!. This is not only a beautiful product, but an informative, dynamic and entertaining look at the greatest city on earth. This program covers the history of Vegas, from the early pioneers, to Bugsy Siegel, the &quot;famed and feared&quot; Mob, the Rat Pack, (Kings of Cool), and the reclusive Howard Hughes. Interviews with Vegas legends, both past and present(Steve Wynn) give a truly comprehensive look at a most magical city. Also interviews with today's contemporary Vegans put the city in true perspective. Buy it! It's good!!!!
Technical difficulties shadow great DVD. WE have been fans of this movie since it was released on VHS years ago, and were thrilled to find it finally available on DVD.  Upon receiving it, however, we found that our primary DVD player had encoding problems with the sound; it would play the soundtrack everywhere EXCEPT on the feature film!  Oddly, our older backup DVD player had no trouble reading the whole disc.  I am given to understand this may be an issue with the first run of DVDs, as none of the replacements we received fixed the problem, but newer pressings may work better.Be that as it may, this movie is wonderful.  Lots of non-bloody action, a la Errol Flynn and every swashbuckling flick from that era, tongue in cheek jokes, and lighthearted romance.  I would have few problems allowing a 7 year old to watch this movie
Great Story. Great Movie!. I've never seen the original Time Machine versions before, but I absolutely loved this movie. I am of course a big fan of special effects, but the story is fascinating! I've watched the movie several times, and every single time I'm blown away. The story line is inspirational and imaginative and knows no bounds. You'll continue to wonder where the story will end up. If you love science fiction and have a fascination for time travel, then add this movie to your collection!
A Film only Cool People will like. This is another well done thinking man's film starring Tim Roth, who has a great American accent for a Brit.  Nerds such as Leonard Maltin need not apply to try to understand this film.       The script is superior and only  unintelligible to the inferior viewer (the masses).  If you like junk such  as American Beauty you probably won't like this.  If you are a thinking  cool alternative person and want to be engrossed in a complex psychodrama  and have your comprehension skills challenged, this is the film for you.       Tim Roth's character is a complex product of nihilistic philosophy and  narcissistic desire as he confronts 2 cops, interrogating him for murder.  As the film begins we learn he has a BA in psychology and a 151 IQ (not  that an IQ score is relevant to much), but the psychology plays an integral  part here.        In response to the film being Lynchian, I would really  say this film is better than any Lynch film (except maybe Eraserhead)       Just one note on one of the solipsistic ramblings of the murder victim:   being alone is only an illusion.  In a way that AT and T has little to do  with, we're all connected
I love this movie soooooo much. Great movie well done acting i can never get enough of this movie turly wonderfully amazing... romace, action, drama it has it all...Get this movie for your DVD collectio
Wonderful film! - Really a 4 1/2 star. Our household (consisting of two forty year-old parents, a fourteen year old girl and a seven year old girl) loves this film.  I think it's because the film does a good job of depicting family relationships (how do explain the odd relative to ousiders?) as well as exploring the issues revolving around the faith and truth of another's experience that is without proof or logic.This film isn't for everyone.  It's a quiet, rather pedestrian and very sweet film, so if you are looking for a lot of razz-ma-tazz, this film isn't for you.  However, after viewing this film a couple of times, my fourteen year-old asks, "Why don't they make films like this anymore?"Josephine Hill and James Stewart are wonderful in this film.  Hollywood at it's sleepy best.
magical film. This is a lovely film; happy and sad. "Do you believe in magic?" Magic becomes reality in this film as it equates to love, friendship, perserverance, and the optimism of young hearts. Sometimes magical miracles happen with the help of love from heaven and on earth
I love old movies!. this is a delightfully fun movie.  Goody Two-Shoes and the Filthy Beast is the greatest line ever
Classically Chilling. This isn't Breakfast at Tiffany's.  Neither is it Nightmare on Elm St.  But Wait Until Dark, starring Audrey Hepburn, is truly chilling.  Hepburn plays a blind lady who, through the circumstances of the plot, is pitted against a dangerous criminal and his two henchmen.  She slowly realizes she is in danger and, after smashing the lights in to level the playing field, must struggle for her life in her apartment.  More along the lines of a thriller like Pyscho than a horror film, Wait Until Dark is scary, but classy
It delivers the goods with a story and action. WOMEN IN FURY is simply one of the best (if not the best) women in prison flicks I have seen. WOMEN IN FURY offers the standard fare we look for in WIP flicks: sadism, lesbian scenes, interrogation by firehose, prison riot, escape, and good doses of nudity. WOMEN IN FURY ups the ante by adding a good story to the mix and maintaining a well paced build-up in the first half that appropriately turns into an action movie in the second half. WOMEN IN FURY is the story of Angela Duvall who is imprisoned for the murder of a drug dealer. A wet towel beating and rape by her cellmates lands her in the infirmary where the prison doctor comes to believe she is innocent of the crime. While the doctor butts heads with the prison captain and investigates the circumstances of the shooting of the drug dealer, a conspiracy is at hand to kill Angela. One of these attempts sets this movie into high gear. WOMEN IN FURY is a Brazilian movie with excellent production values only slightly marred by an occasional bad dub or cheap effect. WOMEN IN FURY succeeds at delivering a good story, maintaining a crisp pace, and delivers a healthy amount of what is expected from a WIP flick.--Bo
Cubic, cubist, cuban, who knows in this cubicle?. Vincenzo Natali is the worthy descendant of Cronenberg. He invents a model of our psyche in which we are, everyone of us, locked up in a cube that is the universe of our consciousness. We are thus psychotic since the outside world does not exist. And yet the master of this world has set six windows, one on each side, all around us. We can open them, one at a time, and get out into another cube that has to be the psyche of someone else. But this trip is very dangerous. There might be a trap in that other cube, a trap set by the other or by the supermaster of the universe. We may be killed and die instantly. Hence we enjoy and find a sweet and soft refuge in our own psychosis. But sooner or later someone will come into our cube or we will get into another cube where we will find someone else. The drama of meeting with others will start as a competition to find a way out if there is one. But we will discover very fast that all the cubes of all the individuals of the world are all connected within an even bigger cube but that the various cubes are constantly moving. And yet there is a way out and we must find it. We are little by little becoming schizophrenic. And the elimination of the others becomes the objective that erases the possible escape from this world that we may have caressed for a while. Terminate the others, and fast please. To escape this world we need two qualities. First to be able to mentally and spiritually feel, sense and grasp the wider scope and scheme that is behind this cube, these cubes, and we then can see the red thread that is going to lead us to the exit. And we need to be attached to absolutely no one, or even to get rid of all those who could become attached to you or to whom you may get attached. These two qualities are autistic characteristics, but it is generally considered in our society as a disease if not some retardation. Thence we shrink in front of the others and we go back to our cocoonic psychosis that is more comfortable than this schizophrenia. Who controls this world ? Is it God ? But then what about divine love ? Is it the most pathetic human invention ever put forward, not to speak of a pure folly that we have spread among human animals like a retrovirus that turned these animals into self-declared human beings ? Please wait for the end and step out of this cubic film to recapture some sanity.Dr Jacques COULARDEAU, University of Paris Dauphine & University of Paris I Pantheon-Sorbonne
I love the warm-up exercises!. It's been ages since I used this tape. So I forgot how good the warm-up excercises made me feel. But this morning I pulled it from the shelf and gave it another try. To be honest, I haven't even come close to mastering all the instructions on this video. But the warm-up alone will make you feel great. And I hope to use this tape more often. Why and how does it work? Who can say? I just know that I feel better and more relaxed. I sincerely hope it does the same for you
15 minutes of pure genius. This is probably the first film presented like a dream, switching in and out of disturbing sequences and images, the infamous eye slashing scene. Every good horror film or art film owes a piece of it's plot to Luis Bunuel's UN CHIEN ANDALOU
Sentimental favorite. When my daughter was born, a relative and I wound up reminiscing about this album and how much we both loved it growing up.  Next thing I knew, a copy of the DVD arrived as a gift for my daughter and me.  The first time I sat down and watched, it brought back all my memories of being a little girl in the 70's.  I could even still sing along with the title song!  Right now, my daughter is too young to do much except listen as I sing or play music for her, but I hope she grows up enjoying these songs as much as I did.  Yes, the visuals are dated, but I believe the messages of these songs are as pertinent now as they were thirty years ago.  Best of all, the songs get their messages across without being "preachy."  I think this is a fabulous alternative to much of what's out there for kids today, and dated as some elements may be, "Free to Be You and Me" is still a long, long way from going out of style
John Ford/Henry Fonda/John Wayne Craft Excellent Western. The 1st and best of the calvary trilogy.  Fonda plays a small-minded, embittered, rascist, classist, dishonorable, incompentent, pendantic, martinet.  Wayne, in a subordinant role, plays his loyal but wary second-in-command. From the very beginning, Ford's Col Thursday gets off on the wrong foot.  Rude, unprofessional and openly disdainful, he alienates everyone on his new post, especially and, purhaps most importantly, the women. His ceaseless disrespect offends the wives and infuriates their husbands. Nobody likes to see their wife disrespected, particularly by a senior officer who should know better. Fort Apache is a wonderful examination of military mens' devotion to duty even when commanded by those unfit to command
Informative. Nice little video for my Zen during my long wait at the doctor's office.  Confucius overcame many difficulties
enjoyable, but frankly my dear, id rather be in secaucus. i managed to miss this: one of those generational impact movies, and never caught up to it until now. it is difficult to remember that all the cliches were NOT cliches when this movie was released, but i was able to watch it and just enjoy the crisp acting by all 8 stars. and of course there IS that soundtrack. still, the movie ripped off "the return of the secaucus 7", and tho i havent seen that in a long time, my guess is id prefer it on a more core level
An International Techno-Thriller. Jack Ryan, the hero of several of Tom Clancy's novels, is back at it in this movie about terrorism and global nuclear war.In 1973, during the Arab-Israeli war, a lone Israeli pilot took off and flew toward the Arab lines.  His cargo: one nuclear bomb.  However, the plane is shot down, but somehow, the bomb survived.  It is soon buried in the sand and left unnoticed for twenty-nine years.Meanwhile, trouble has been occuring in other parts of the world as well.  The President of Russia mysteriously dies, and a new President, Nemerov, (Ciaran Hinds) takes power.  This move alerts the American CIA, especially director William Cabot (Morgan Freeman).  Nemerov is known to be a wild card, and many are unsure of his motives.  However, Jack Ryan (Ben Affleck) isn't convinced about Nemerov.  Ryan wrote a paper about Nemerov, and he seems to think that he is more conservative in his views.Directed by President Robert Fowler (James Cromwell), Cabot and Ryan are sent to Russia to check on the status of their nuclear disarmament.  Once there, they are given a tour of a Russian nuclear assembly plant.  Many renowned Russian scientists work there.  However, three have mysteriously disappeared.Back in the Middle East, two men have managed to dig up the remains of the missing nuclear bomb.  They sell them to a man named Olson (Colm Feore), who pays a mere [...] for the bomb.  Immediately, the wheels are set in motion.  The three missing Russian scientists and Olson have devised a plan to construct their own nuclear bomb, smuggle it back into the United States, and detonate it at the Super Bowl.  The detonation would lead the United States to believe that, due to the instability of the Russian government under Nemerov, the Russians would be blamed for the detonation.  Both the United states and Russia would destroy each other while the scientists and Olson sat by and watched.However, Ryan manages to put all of the pieces together and is on his way to Baltimore when the bomb is detonated.  A huge mushroom cloud covers the city, and many people are killed.  As expected, President Fowler immediately suspects that the Russians are to blame and immediately orders a counter-strike.  Thus begins a tense game of international chess; who will blink first?  Can Ryan arrive in time to stop World War III, or will he be too late?I found this to be a very exciting and entertaining movie.  The story is thrilling and very well-conceived.  The special effects are very good as well.  The attack on the American aircraft carrier was one of my favorite sequences of the film.  Morgan Freeman, Ben Affleck, and James Cromwell give fine performances.   Although I appreciated Affleck's effort, I still think Alec Baldwin ("The Hunt for Red October") and Harrison Ford ("Patriot Games") did a better job as Jack Ryan.I recommend this very good movie.  Although I haven't read the book yet, I plan to soon to see how well the movie compares to it.  If you're a fan of techno-thrillers, then don't miss this one
HOW CAN YOU GO WRONG?. AFTER THE RELEASE OF THE FIRST TICK VIDEO, TWENTIETH CENTURY FOX SENT ME A NOTICE THAT THIS TAPE WAS COMING OUT SOON. AFTER DRIVING THE LOCAL VIDEO CLERKS CRAZY FOR SEVERAL YEARS, I FOUND THIS TAPE ON AMAZON.COM AND AT A TERRIFIC PRICE! IT WAS WORTH THE WAIT. I  NOW HAVE A SECOND TICK VIDEO TO TIDE ME OVER BETWEEN TICK MARATHONS. WHILE  ONLY HAVING A RUNNING TIME OF 21 MINUTES, THIS TAPE IS CHOCK FULL OF ENOUGH  TICK-ISMS TO SATISFY EVERYONE. DON'T DELAY. ADD THIS TO YOUR VIDEO  COLLECTION NOW
I have only found it here. I am so glad I found this classic for my children.  It is a wonderful show, and I am glas I was able to find it.
bloody brilliant. A wonderful story about you young men that fall in love, once you see it you want to own it, and i did, so i bought it. ive seen it 4 times and will watch it many times more
The Intersection Of Film, Fact, And Genius - Unforgettable. At its core, this is a film about what happens when a person defies the system, any system.  It is the true story of Frances Farmer, a beautiful, smart, and rebellious movie star of the `30s who seemed to have it all.  Because of her many advantages the system took a while catching up to her; maybe that's where the fury and vengeance originated.  Payback required more than a pound of flesh, the system wanted her spirit, her intellect, and her soul.  The portrayal of psychiatry as practiced in those days is unlike anything you will see anywhere else, it makes Cuckoo's Nest look like a vacation in Tuscany.  Indeed, psychiatry in this film is less a healing force than a means of preserving social order and conformity.Jessica Lange deserved the Oscar for this role, that she didn't get it is a crime.  This is a solo masterpiece performance easily on a par with Streep in Sophie's Choice.  Lange has the beauty, intelligence, sophistication, and edge to play this complicated woman, and she throws herself into the part fearlessly.  From saucy starlet oozing coy charm, to radical intellectual hanging with lefties in NYC, to belligerent scrapper knocking heads with studio moguls, to star-crossed lover inviting disaster and betrayal the way others invite friends over to dinner, to self-destructive victim descending into the darkness of booze and pills, to adult infant manipulated by a fiercely controlling mother, to psychiatric patient - abused for sport and disassembled; Lange shifts through facets like she's driving a Porsche on a country road, you never notice her changing gears, every minute of the ride is thrilling.The best thing about this film, apart from Lange, is that is shows, it doesn't tell.  The viewer is left to interpret without heavy-handed moralizing.  The truth of Frances Farmer's life is so fascinating and bizarre that simply bringing it to the screen is more than enough.  Few of us have had the experience of being involuntarily committed to a mental hospital - much less lobotomized - but all of us have tried to thwart the system at one point or another and paid for it.  Every viewer can applaud Farmer's irreverence and idealism, even when it's naive, and feel sorrow when she must confront the cruel consequences.This is a dark movie, not all Hollywood lives have happy endings, but it is a true movie.  Frances takes you places you have never gone and can barely imagine; Jessica Lange delivers the performance of lifetime - not just her lifetime, anybody's lifetime
Great Movie. I don't know why but I love this movie, I recommend if you haven't seen this movie, have a couple beers and clean your guns while watching.
Funny and Scary. This has got to be the best Michael J. Fox movie I have ever seen (and I love M.J.Fox) .This movie has it all, Scares!Laughs! Romance!The Ghost are great.I could watch this movie every day.I watch alot of movies and I own alot of them.This is one of the few that I have on both VHS & DVD.I have the original and the Directors cut.The extras are great.If you like Michael J. Fox movie's you will love this one,Even if you don't like his movies this is a must see for Horror fans and Comedy lovers a like. Enjoy!!!
a modern classic. While this doesn't come near the genious of "It Takes Two,"  this wonderful movie is certainly a Hamlet of its time.  The questions raised, can a 17 year old date a 13 year old or should he wait a year and be 18 are timeless.  And who can forget the acting.  All I can say is that when Oscar season came around, I cannot have been the only person who was amazed that the actress who portrayed Claudia was not nominated.  In addition, viewers learn about the set up of the human skeleton in a delightful number performed by the BSC.  The rivalry between Cokie and Kristy is my favorite moment, as I tend to side with Cokie.  I mean seriously, a baby sitter's club?  when Cokie has horses?  internationalmale.co
Has withstood the test of time. I watched this in the theater years ago with my friend L when I was still a young 'un.  Completely blew my mind...I had never seen anything like it...and I was fascinated by all the new concepts.  I've watched it several times since then and have always enjoyed it.  I can't wait to see it again in Widescreen at home
This Has Been...a Love Story. I finally made my first purchase from Amazon's Unbox Video Downloads just to try the service and am happy to report a solid customer experience. For $1.99, I purchased and downloaded one of my favorite episodes of "The Twilight Zone", and it took about twenty minutes to download through a broadband connection. I don't think it's the most ideal way to see full-length motion pictures, but for a 26-minute classic TV program, I think my 17" LCD monitor makes for a suitable viewing experience, and the video quality of the downloaded file is clean.Aired on September 15, 1961 as the show's third season opener, the episode is a Cold War fantasy appropriately called "Two" about the last two survivors on earth, a man and a woman, after an apocalyptic world war in 2109. Written and directed by TV veteran Montgomery Pittman, the simple plot revolves around the complicating fact that he is an American infantryman and she is an invading Russian soldier. Like two feral animals, they glare at each other among the debris of a deserted town destroyed by the war. He even knocks her out her after she aggressively throws pots and pans at him. The reality of their solitary existence, however, gradually dawns on them, especially after they see an evening dress in a shop window inspiring her to speak her only word of dialogue - "Prekrassnyi" - the Russian word for "lovely".What really makes this episode memorable is the unlikely casting. Two years before she twitched her nose on "Bewitched", a brunette Elizabeth Montgomery, looking appropriately ravaged and sporting a deadly ray gun, plays the untrusting Russian soldier with surprising fierceness and vulnerability. The American is played by perennial tough-guy Charles Bronson, fresh from "The Magnificent Seven". Even though he has to spout some inane philosophical lines to describe the futility of war, he leavens his natural sullenness with a determined romanticism. They make an odd couple, but it works splendidly. I also learned that canned fried chicken will become a staple in the 22nd century. Narrated by Rod Serling in his inimitably halting manner, the show ends with my favorite line in his signature postscript: "This has been...a love story." This is classic TV
Jenny Wright and Adrian Pasdar heat up the screen. Put simply, this is the most sensual portrayal of the vampire myth in recent cinematic history, and it does a neat turnaround of the roles, since most renditions have a sweet, innocent young woman seduced by a dark, handsome bloodsucker.Instead, Jenny Wright is the ethereally beautiful, seductive, mysterious stranger who initiates Adrian Pasdar (as farm boy Caleb Colton, whose openly displayed lust is kind of amusing for a minute there) into the mysteries of her night-focused world. Watch her during the scenes in which she bites Caleb -- and later, kills for him. Jenny Wright certainly never reached the caliber of Meryl Streep during her short career, but she COULD act. Her performance as Mae in "Near Dark" was chilling -- and admirable.Caleb is on a sort of probationary vampire status, and he finds it impossible to kill (which is a requirement, since according to Mae, "The night has its price.") And yes, the end is probably not what the readers of Fangoria would have preferred, although they probably would've bailed on this anyway once they learned the only real gore was in the bar room scene.Terrific supporting cast, especially Bill Paxton, who stole every scene he was in. But the scenes with just Wright and Pasdar -- oooh. Powerful, sexy, and unforgettable. Not to be missed.
it all depends on how you watch it... i was really looking forward to this movie.  the hotel is intrigueing, the cast looked amazing, and i'm a fan of ethan hawke.  however, at first i was turned off by the movie.all of the characters are tortured poets and society drop outs.  just know that.  because that kind of irresponsibility will turn a lot of people off instantly. thats okay though, now you know.  also, some "storylines" just don't develop, and you don't get any answers or much insight into any of them beyond what you see.other than that, the script...well, it is different, and that is a good thing i'll explain next, but its hard to write poetic lines that no one would ever really say (no one would ever say most movie script dialogue anyway) but even with an amazing cast like this some of the lines make you want to roll your eyes.  also, the digital cameras make for a cool independant movie (i believe made for 100,000 dollars, very cool)and the grainy-ness fits, but i'm just not a huge fan of the look of digital camera's ("once upon a time in mexico" features digital cameras and i liked that much better.) and the constant slow motion just doesn't work.  still shots would have had the same effect, and would have reminded you of paintings rather than pulling you out of the movie.so why four stars?as i began the movie, i was thinking about what i just complained about in the last paragraph.  i checked online a bit to see what people thought, and realized that it is just what it is.  its an art film, a lot of it is just not going to make sense.  so i made a cup of coffee and just enjoyed it.i really think some art, movies, paintings, poems, etc. work better when you just let it be.  enjoy the mood, the snapshots of lives (kris kristoffersons scenes i thought were the best, as did most reviewers proffesional and not) the excellent acting.  i imagine this was a lot of fun to film as well, as the actors seem to just have have fun bringing odd characters and tiny moments to life.did it make sense?  no, in fact, i'm actually confused about the end.  but i'd like to see more movies like it.  i was able to just watch and enjoy it and not worry about where it was going.  in fact, i kind of dozed through part of it, and you know what?  it was nice.  its a movie about artists, and i'm guessing, for artists.  and its just there.  watch it for what it is and you'll like it.  try to watch it as a standard movie, and you'll hate it.
Entertaining and Educational - music education for the very young. My daughter, age 3, can't get enough of this!  We checked it out from the library on VHS, but we will be buying the DVD.  Features a story within a story, Kirstie Alley brings her 10 -12 year-old son home to see his grandfather, who he doesn't remember ever seeing.  The grandfather, Lloyd Bridges, lives in a cute, whimsical cottage in a meadow in the mountains.  The landscape is breathtakingly beautiful!!  Kirstie tells her son the story of Peter and the Wolf while the story is acted out by animated characters and the music plays in the background.  At the end of the VHS version, a mini-movie plays with host Julia Glander explaining orchestra seating, describing the different instruments that represent each animal and why the composer, Sergei Prokofiev, chose them.  This part is incredibly educational and entertaining and yes, my 3-year-old loves this part, too
one of the best Criterion DVD sets I own. I've owned the original Criterion version of Seven Samurai.  It was nice owning this fantastic movie, especially since it had the Criterion stamp.  When the new, 3-disc version came out, I read numerous reviews stating how much of an improvement it was from the first edition.  And I am in full agreement.  I've never written a review for Amazon.com before, but I feel compelled because of how impressed I am with these DVDs.  Criterion has really cleaned up this new version.  It blows the older version away.  It looks like it was filmed yesterday.  The extras are really awesome and the booklet is nice and informative.  This is the definitive edition of this wonderful movie and Kurosawa's masterpiece.  Well worth the money
I'm Sure It Will Be GOOD!. It's about bloody time this film comes out....I haven't seen this disc yet, but since it is a Criterion issue, then...what the title of this review sez.  I'll admit If... is my favorite film of all time, for all kinds of reasons, but first and foremost, I went to an all boys private school in the US which bore many similarities to the school portrayed in If... and If... is indeed the operative word if added to "only".  If you haven't seen this film before, then I envy you, if you have and remember it fondly, then it will probably exceed those memories.  The only negative I can thrust towards this package is the choice of supplements.  I wish they could have added Anderson's The White Bus, as it is the true transition from This Sporting Life to If...  The inclusion of that film, since it's under an hour would have made this my nomination for best DVD release of the year....but alas maybe someone at Warner's will see fit to try to include it on the release of O Lucky Man whenever that gets it's release...Someday...If...Only.  For now though...Mid-June and IF... A Reason NOT to die or go insane
Only one question. My only question is - When can I buy season 2?  This is the perfect medium to continue the most enjoyed show that TV execs killed this decade
Captains Courageous. This film is well done and Spencer Tracy shows what a superb actor he was
An Open Letter To 20th Century Fox. Dear 20CF,Please, please release this film on DVD for the benefit of its many fans. It is long overdue. We've suffered for lo these many years with the monaural, pan-and-scan VHS tape, and that's no way to watch this sumptuously expensive soap opera.Speaking of expensive--we're aware that this was the big flop you released in the summer of 1977 with many bells and whistles, while your other summer release that year, a little flick called STAR WARS, sneaked quietly into theaters and became a huge hit. We're also aware that a lot of A-List stars (Catherine Deneuve, Burt Reynolds, etc.) and directors (Robert Mulligan, Sidney Lumet, etc.) politely passed on the opportunity to be involved. But is that our fault? Certainly not! Don't take it out on us. We actually went out and saw the movie anyway! We're sorry you took a bath with it, but this is an excellent chance for you to make some of that money back, don't you think?We, the worldwide OSM Fan Club, patiently await the availability of our favorite trash wallow in a decent, anamorphic widescreen, Dolby 5.1 Stereo DVD version. It is our right as taxpaying citizens and Trash Film Junkies. We would also like the original theatrical trailer, and perhaps a "Making Of" documentary, and maybe a running commentary track by Marie-France Pisier and Susan Sarandon--but let's not get piggy. We'll settle for a good print of the film itself.You've just given us a new, souped-up DVD of VALLEY OF THE DOLLS (Thank you, thank you!), and now we raise our voices in our favorite chant: "We want our O-S-M!!!" In the sacred name of Sidney Sheldon, we beseech you to end our suffering. Thank you.Sincerely,The OSM Fan ClubPS: Just so you know--there's a pirated, bootlegged DVD version making the rounds, usually priced at about $200.00, and a lot of people are actually shelling out for it. But we won't. We'll wait for you, 20CF, to do the right thing and give us the true, lawful version. Thanks again.
Tex Avery....on dvd, but NOT in the USA!!!!. Why is it that one of the undisputed grand masters of american animation does NOT have any of his work on dvd in the united states ?????  This is such an incomprehensible feat of omission by Warner who owns the rights to practically al of his greatest work that I just can not get over it!!!! Indeed, a marvellous boxset, with extra's, of 63 of his best cartoons has been issued by this studio....but ONLY in FRANCE!!!!  They think of Tex Avery as a genius over there and so warners cashed in on his fame....in the USA there seems to be the idea that nobody will buy a boxset of Tex Avery cartoons I guess.....In these days when every piece of trash that has ever appeared on tv or film gets a ultimate collection boxset the work of this genius, these hilarious works that were so far ahead of their time get not even a nod in their own country!!!!!
The Straight Story. Inexpressibly moving story of an old man who is determined to set things right with a brother he has not spoken to in 10 years, while there is still time. It is a film about the goodness in everyday people and how it surmounts the pain and and evil that every life encounters.  It tells of gentle triumph over the inevitability of life's end and the aging that precedes it.  Especially suitable for older viewers or anyone with sensitivity to the process of aging
The "REAL" Jesus. This film reveals a Jesus far different than the serious and detached version one usually sees in other films. In this four hour, word-for-word, account of "Matthew", Bruce Marchiano remarkably portrays Jesus as who He was - a first century Jewish man...compassionate...loving...giving...sorrowful...joyful...REAL! Even his appearance was "real" - weather beaten...slightly dirty tunic...hair flying. I highly recommend this film - you'll fall in love with this Jesus. I understand that Bruce has plans to produce "The Gospel According to John" but needs support - I hope he gets it because we need another film as "real" and as good as "Matthew"
I really enjoyed watching it. I really enjoyed the Lizzie McGuire movie. It was light and entertaining.But I don't know if I would want my daughter to watch it because it's based on deception and I am really concerned about her not learning the wrong thing.Lizzie is pretending to get sick so she could sneak out and do other things.  But for those who already know right from wrong and won't be convinced that lying is ok based on this movie, it's entertaining
Overlooked but very good.... I had forgotten just how enjoyable this little Audie Murphy Western was until I recently purchased this handsome Universal DVD release. Murphy in this venture is &quot;the silver kid,&quot; and his co-star Stephen McNally actually steals the show. The action is fast-paced and believable, the plot way above average. There are shoot outs, claim jumping, and some humor thrown in--Audie has some droll lines. Universal-International made a number of fine Murphy Westerns in the 1950s into the mid 1960s. DUEL AT SILVER CREEK is one of the better ones. Now let's hope that Murphy's finest outing in the genre, NO NAME ON THE BULLET, and some of his other, better films---RIDE CLEAR OF DIABLO, GUNSMOKE, SEVEN WAYS FROM SUNDOWN, TUMBLEWEEDS, get the nod from the engineers at Universal
One of the best Jason flicks. Out of all the endless and undying Jason films, this is one of the few in the series that actually provides some scares regardless of the relentless predictibility. (Jason never dies. Dumb blondes run out the back door instead of the front door like they should. The car ignition won't work at all the right times. Women make obnoxious screams when they're hiding just to merely say 'Jason I'm here!' Yatta-yatta-yatta!)One interesting scene (obviously I'm a male in my prime when I say this) is when two lovers are humping to '80s rock music in the back of a camper. The camper is jumping up and down. I think a majority of heterosexual men, when watching that scene, are left thinking "How come my girl doesn't do THAT to me?" These cheesy slasher horror films of the 80's genre don't have much merit in the categories of acting skills, realistic gore or physical animation. But, for some kinky sex scenes without overtly pervasive pornographic content of Playboy along with some horrific surprises, it proves to be a nice viewing for a couple that have been dating steadily. So, grab your popcorn and your hormones. Remember, the same hormones and chemicals in our bodies that regulate sexuality also regulate aggression, fear, anxiety, and happiness. (Testosterone, oxytocine, adrenaline, etc.) So, when you combine all of these elements into an hour and a half of screen interactions of this caliber, then it proves to be quite an opportunity for some foreplay and imagination.
First-Rate Mystery Thriller That Floors You With Real Shocks. A group of seemingly unconnected characters become stormstayed at a remote motel, where one by one, they begin to disappear.  Sounds familiar but promising; while the promise is more than fulfilled though, the familiarity is not, as a classic kind of idea gives way to one of the most original and twist-filled movies around.  It's astonishing how cavalier the treatment of this movie was when it first came out, regarding its genuinely shocking ending - I had the misfortune of inadvertently reading the ending in a small ad prior to its DVD release!  Even with advance knowledge of the outcome, though, it was still astounding - I can only imagine how jaw-dropping it must be to witness it not knowing.  Fantastic suspense; great characterization as played by a cast of well-knowns including John Cusack, Amanda Peet, Rebecca DeMornay and Ray Liotta; excellent production values; and total non-telegraphing of the plot combine to make "Identity" one of the greatest mystery shockers of all time.  If you don't know the ending, do yourself a favor and see this one as soon as possible - the turns are some of the most unexpected ever.  Even if you do know the gist of it, don't hesitate to see it - it'll still deliver many times over.  Indispensable for fans of mystery, drama, horror, or thrillers
BEST MOVIE OF THE 90'S. I SAW THIS MOVIE WHEN I WAS 16, AND I LOVED IT SINCE, BECAUSE IT REALLY DOES SCARE YOU AND THE FACT THAT IT DOESN'T INCLUDE NOTHING THAT CONSISTS SEXUAL SCENES LIKE OTHER MOVIES, IT IS REALLY CREEPY AND GIVES YOU THE CHILLS JUST TO THINK THAT MENTAL CLOWNS ARE IN YOUR HOUSE TRYING TO KILL YOU...I RECOMMEND THIS MOVIE, IT'S THE BEST....
Better of many older submarine thrillers. I was really impressed by this film and I must congratulate Hollywood for presenting the Soviet war machine in such a realistic way. The direction was fine, the actors well chosen, the script very good and Harrison Ford's acting top quality. I think this film was superior to older ones like "The Hunt for Red October" or "Crimson Tide" whose story was rather flat and predictable. The key advantage of the film is the intense psychological charging of the crew's attempts to cool the damaged reactor and the marvellous portrait of traditional Russian self-sacrifice
Helpful for me, but not as much as Young, Fabulous. I recently read Suze Orman's Young, Fabulous, and Broke (YFB) and found that a very helpful guide on how to begin building a solid financial foundation for a young man. Given the quality of her advice in that book, I chose this as a follow up, and I was interested to hear about her philosophy of money as indicated by the "spiritual steps" in the title.Some reviewers say that she repeats herself in her books. Certainly some of the advice here is included in YFB, but some of her retirement advice was new for me. Also, she includes more stories about her own life and about her clients' lives. The advice on wills vs. trusts was especially helpful.The emphasis on "exercises" was not that helpful for me. When she tells me to write down my history and experiences, I don't feel I'm getting more than a slap on the back for journalling, which I already do consistently. I'd prefer that Suze stick to financial advice and leave more of the counseling to the psychologists. However, I am glad to hear her testify about some of her own attitudes about money and her family's experience. More so than the exercises early on, I found that her philosophy towards the end of the book was very revealing. Again, I'm not sure she needs to explicitly use terms like "dharma" to get her points across. But she does make a strong case that those who treat money well will see it nurture them regardless of the amount of money that they have in their bank account. For a nation that is struggling to recover from terrorism and hurricane tragedies, this is simple but sage advice.While I'd recommend that those who are 35 and under read Young, Fabulous and Broke first, I found this book helpful as well, and I do plan to use some of these ideas with my parents and to plan my own retirement in the future.3.5 stars--S
Daniel Boone: Ken Tuck E. It was great fun to watch this with our sons!  This was the pilot episode for the series starring Fess Parker.  We would like to purchase all of the episodes for the years the series ran (but have only found this one episode available so far).  We would like to see these available on DVD
Wag the Dog. Dustin Hoffman presents a master role in the game of creating scenarios so realistic that the entire world becomes his work area. So thorough is his work that the fiction becomes the reality and one cannot but watch the satire becomes the real life and the studio director becomes the world director; a condition that cannot be tolerated and leads to his end. Are we living in that world? Can we now define reality?  Who controls our thoughts? This gives room to deep thoughts. Dustin Hoffman is indeed the best person to portray this message
The most romantic movie ever!!!. Somewhere in Time is by far the most transcendant romantic movie I have ever seen. It is old. Christopher Reeve made it before we knew him as Superman; Jane Seymour was his co-star. Reeve had just graduated college when a very old woman approaches with a gift. From then on it is breathtaking, following a time-travel episode that moves the story forward to an unforgetable conclusion, which does not really conclude in your memory! There is also a soundtrack of the movie with the most hauntingly beautiful music I have ever heard. I wouldn't be without either. You will love this movie and the music
Very funny comedy, awful video quality. This was Cary Grant's first screwball comedy, and legend has it that the actor was unsure that he could pull off comedy, and asked the director of the film, Leo McCarey, to release him. Well it's good that Grant eventually changed his mind, because he turned out to be one of the silver screen's most gifted comedians. The Awful Truth teams him with the equally gifted Irene Dunne in a "remarriage comedy" that I personally like a lot better than "The Philadelphia Story."Jerry (Grant) and Lucy (Dunne), two immature, spoiled, filthy rich brats, divorce amid a flurry of suspicions of adultery.  They have a custody fight over their dog Mr. Smith. Lucy finds love with a dull Mama's boy (Ralph Bellamy) and Grant dates a socialite. But of course Lucy and Jerry can't get over each other, and each schemes to win the other back.Of the Grant screwball comedies, I think His Girl Friday is probably his best. It has a better script, wonderful ad-libbed lines, better direction, and better performance by Grant, who by then was a master of the screwball comedy. His sarcasm, zaniness, and impeccable timing had been honed to perfection. But The Awful Truth has an awful lot of charm and humor. The movie is full of funny moments, like Jerry smugly watching as Lucy is pushed into "dancing" in a restaurant. Lucy's dancing is of course painfully bad. Grant and Dunne have great chemistry, and both of them manage to seem silly and lovable at the same time. And the has one of the sexiest endings in movie history. Watch the movie and you'll see what I mean.Unfortunately, The Awful Truth was not given proper treatment in this DVD. The picture quality is awful -- full of white specks and other visual distortions. There are no extras either. Odd since other Columbia releases (It Happened One Night, His Girl Friday) have been released in very nice DVD packages.
intoxicating!. Mr. Placido Domingo is perhaps the most exciting operatic actor-singerof our generation and once again he proves it in this wonderful opera; his three great loves (Baltsa, Cotrubas, Serra), his rivals and the restof the crew--unforgettable!
Fan of old Horror Movies. If you can't appreciate a classic horror movie with simple effects, then this is not the movie for you. Otherwise, enjoy!
SO TOUCHING!. I have to confess that I went to tears watching thIS movie, and usually I don't get emotional easily. It's so touching, a PhD professor of middle age find out that she is sick. Ovarian cancer. It was a shock for her, the doctor is talking to her and she can barely react. All through the movie, she looks at the camera from time to time and tell us all what she is thinking and suffering. There is a "brilliant" young doctor (yes, one of those who always wants to be the first and the best no matter what, with a big ego, the big shot of the class) who was her student in one of her literature classes. It made me very angry, his attitude, because he was treating her in a very cold and selfish way, only thinking in the results of the research. I want to say that most of the doctors and scientists are not that way. But once in a while you can find one of these.... weird specimen. The nurse was nice and treated her in a better way. This kind of movie makes us think about the fact that we are all just humans, not matter the title or knowledge you can have. And we are here to help each other, no taking advantadge of each other. I strongly recommend this movie...just be sure to have a box of facial tissues near you.
An Identity Crisis. Even though the plot device of characters with split personalities or multiple personalities has been done before, Identity is at least clever with it. This is a really good movie.The movie goes like this: 11 people end up at a motel due to a bad rainstorm and flooding. Once there, the people start getting knocked off one by one. Think of Agatha Christie's And Then There Were None meets Psycho.There's the former cop turned limo driver played by John Cusack, driving a self-centered movie star played by Rebecca DeMornay.The former prostitute trying to get to Florida to grow an orange grove played well by Amanda Peet.The young, newly married couple who are far from happy, played by Clea Duvall and William Lee Scott.A convict and the deputy escorting him to another prison. Played by Jake Busey and Ray Liotta respectively.The misogynistic hotel manager who has a couple of secrets.-John HawkesAn older married couple and their young son.-John C. McGinley, Leila Kenzle, Brett LoehrThe events happening at the motel are cut in every once in a while by a late-night meeting going on between a psychiatrist and a judge and several other people. The psychiatrist's patient, Pruitt Taylor Vince, looks like Uncle Fester from The Addams Family and is about to be executed shortly after. The shrink is trying to convince the judge that his patient need not be executed. For most of the time watching the film, you don't understand what the people at the motel have to do with this other subplot. Some might be confused as to what the heck is going on, but the tie-in is pretty clever.Some spoilers below.The people at the motel are the 11 different personalities of the Uncle Fester dude that he developed because of years of abuse and neglect. One of these personalities is responsible for a murder rampage the guy went on, which is why he is on death row. The shrink is trying to convince people that he can get one of the personalities to kill the evil personality so Uncle Fester won't do anything else evil.The 11 are there to do battle but don't know it. The doctor eventually taps John Cusack's former cop limo driver, who signifies the strong, good but flawed personality, and tells him what he has to do.Problem is, more than one personality is bad, and it becomes a red herring fest to figure out who is responsible for the murders.It is oodles and noodles better than Twisted and Taking Lives and Hide and Seek and Secret Window and plenty of other thrillers that have come out in the past 5 or so years. But I guess this still isn't saying much is it?Anyway...Very nice way to spend a late night.
My man Dr Smith is a riot in this episode. Dr Smith and the Robot go hog wild, switching personalities and swapping insults.  This is a great episode
...When I was very small... This episode of Star Trek, "The Man Trap" is my earliest memory of what would become a lifelong enjoyment of the franchise. Truthfully, "The Man Trap" terrified me (I was maybe two, or three, although I am sure by that time the series was limping along in it's third season and I was seeing a repeat for the first time); Star Trek was considered "adult programming", and as such I was not allowed to watch it - I used to sneak behind the couch while my grandfather watched it on nights I stayed at their house, then would lay awake in my bed scared by what I'd seen, but excited just the same. Like another space show I enjoyed and was terrified by (Lost in Space), I didn't recognize Star Trek as anything but a world I wanted very much to be in, but remained frightened of anyhow (I was, as I said, very young).
*Love this movie!. Many people would think I would be messed up in the head, but I saw this movie Black circle boys years ago. I wanted to own it, and they no longer carried it in the stores to rent, like they did at one point. I went on Amazon, and my boyfriend bought it for me when I found it. I thought I was the only one to see it, and I wasn't. My boyfriend's friend saw it years ago. Eric Mabius is so hott to me, and so is Kyle. I enjoy watching it. I don't believe in all that satan stuff, and I think it cruel what they do, but all in all I love it!
&quot;In dreams I walk with you&quot;... Somehow I feel that if this film had been even stranger, it may have been more critically popular.  Had it not bothered with as linear a storyline and just followed the dream-logic plotlines it may have been hailed as a David Lynch-like fairy tale nightmare; add more violence and it could be a Dario Argento film.  But instead we have something by Neil Jordan, who gives this film more wonder and magic (albeit dark) than anyone else could.  I think it's a great film.  See, it's called In Dreams, not In Logic.  Its surreality is its strength, staying visually spectacular at all times and boosted by an absolutely great performance by Annette Bening.  I think the plot contrivances are almost subversive; OF COURSE there are moments of coincidence because that's what happens in dreams.  Moments of opportunity or clarity (claire-ity?) arrive for our heroine and she takes them in stride.  The film's general feel is continuously reinforced by the eerie flooded dream village in the reservoir, and the fairy tale orchard.  This is a Grim tale alright, but its beautiful, trippy and saturated in atmosphere.  Killer ending too, closing a disturbingly satisfying thriller by a masterful director.  Highly recommended for those who like to dream
Jet Li In Action. This is a showcase of Jet Li's brand of martial arts...fast and furious. While this is no Fist Of Legend the movie has enough action to keep the exitement going. What I did'nt anticipate was the humor. Absolutely lots of laughs to pick up where the action stops. Once persons are prepared to judge this movie on it's own merit they will see that this movie was worth buying
A film ahead of its time. It's hard to believe this film once had such an awful reputation and was considered extremely politically dangerous.  Times have really changed for the better since 1947.  This is Chaplin's first full dialogue film, even though 'The Great Dictator' was his first sound film.  As is pointed out in the documentary, that film seems to go back and forth between dialogue scenes and silent scenes.  This film was the first film he wrote expressly as a dialogue film, with much less of the pantomimic scenes hearkening back to his earlier work.  It's also just as funny and brilliant as his earlier masterpieces.We know right from the opening shot of the film what the fate of Henri Verdoux was, since we see a grave bearing his name and the years he lived.  The film that follows tells us the story of just how and why he got there.  Monsieur Verdoux is a bluebeard (an old-fashioned slang word for a man who marries and then murders one woman after another), something he never foresaw himself as.  For much of his adult life he worked as a successful bank clerk, but then came the world Depression, and he lost his job.  Society didn't seem to have any other use for him, at least not anything that would enable him to make as much money as he needed to support his young son Peter and his disabled wife Mona.  I suppose this story was considered controversial in its day because Monsieur Verdoux is portrayed as sympathetic, charming, and intelligent, with understandable reasons for what he's doing.  He's not shown as a cold-blooded killer who murders these women for their money for the fun of it or because he's a sadistic monster.  He does what he feels he has to do because there is no other way.  And as we see, he isn't incapable of having a change of heart, such as when the young woman he was going to use as his test subject for the new poison he mixed reveals that she is in much the same situation as he is.  He decides to spare her and help her.  There are also the hilarious scenes in which he's trying and failing to murder Annabella, which are among the film's highlights and illustrative of why the subtitle is 'A Comedy of Murders.'  The ending scene of the film (which was the first scene Chaplin shot, wanting to get the hardest part out of the way first), an attack on a system that rewards mass murderers and capitalist robber-barons but condemns people who are driven to murder because that very system cheats them, instead of celebrating them as they do people who go to war, almost made me change my mind about supporting the death penalty.  Since I share many of Chaplin's political views, I didn't find this film to be overly preachy or like the comedy were ruined by working in a moral and political message as well.  I felt it was seamlessly worked in instead of totally dominating the story, and besides, the reason so many people in 1947 hated this film was because it challenged what they believed and held as absolute truth, and that offended them.  Instead of listening to a different viewpoint with an open mind, they chose to boycott and trash this film instead
Comic Classic Brought Flawlessly to the Screen. Cold Comfort Farm is a hilarious film that is remarkably faithful to the plot (one character does ends up with a different mate than in the book but it actually makes more sense) characters and spirit of the novel.  The film is perfectly cast.  Kate Beckinsale is especially good as our heroine, Flora Poste, who is unflappable and efficient at tidying up the many messes at Cold Comfort.  Ian McKellen is also unforgettable and hysterically funny as Amos, the fire and brimstone preacher/farmer. All the other actors fulfill their roles well and without a hint of the self-consciousness too often seen in film satires.  The British accents are sometimes a bit difficult for Americans to understand but fortunately the DVD comes with close captioning so the viewer doesn't miss a word of the clever script.  The special features are almost nonexistant except for the trailer and a couple of "recommendations" but who cares when the film is so special and enjoyable
Thriller. I would agree with several other reviewers that this is a moving and captivating thriller!  In the rare case that home invasions occur, they are absolutely frightening.  Rourke is one of the best actors playing a slimy thug.  He is very believable and Anthony Hopkins is as usual, brilliant.   Michael Bosworth is a seasoned sociopath (Mickey Rourke), and Hopkins provides a great good vs. evil contrast in this one.  Probably not for children under 16.
Soylent Green - Pure Fantasy or Potential Reality. My watching this film resulted from a conversation with a friend beginning with politics and spiraling down to the future of our world. The premise of the film was disturbing to say the least. I have never been a true fan of Charleton Heston who in my opinion always has overacted. However, Edward G. Robinson seemed as comfortable playing this character as he has been in the many different roles he has played. His performance was truly heartfelt, bringing to mind the current debate on "ending one's own life with dignity". I shutter to think that this is life as it should be though. But Robinson's character acted on the decision with the counterfeit courage and ultimate hopelessness that accompanied it in such a way that you could very well empathize with him. I found the other actors to be somewhat bland. Perhaps this was acting at that point in time, but some actors can make the most of roles and others cannot. The story line was unique, but the script was lacking. A re-make today by Steven Spielberg might be worthwhile seeing. Perhaps the most striking element I took from this film was an unshakeable chilling and unsettling feeling that this could very well be our world if we do not wake up
Another entertaining Warner's film from the production line. "G Men" made in 1935 was a clever response by Warner Brothers to the new Hays Code finally enforced in 1934 and which applied strict  censorship on the Hollywood product. The challenge was to maintain the excitement of the gangster genre at the same time as honouring the new code which, among other things, insisted that the gangster not be glamourised.The solution was to switch the magnetic Jimmy Cagney to the other side of the law and make the gangsters headed by the less than magnetic Barton Maclane much less attractive. The film has a slight documentary feel as Cagney enlists as a G Man when he is unable to make a living as a lawyer. The first section of the film follows his training and it is fairly tedious. Cagney is put through his paces by Robert Armstrong in the cliched role which Pat O'Brien usually played, Cagney's sparring superior officer. Having honoured the Code by expounding the work of the law protectors, Cagney is assigned to a case and the film switches to the gangsters and finally takes off. There are re-enactments of recorded gangland murders and the shootout in a cabin in the mountains has all the violence and excitement of the earlier pre-code films.Ann Dvorak plays a good hearted night club performer who has a yen for Cagney but marries vicious Barton McLane. She is superb as always and performs a rather untidy but enthusiastic song and dance early in the film. Margaret Lindsay plays the leading lady to Cagney in her usual colourless way.  Lloyd Nolan plays Cagney's pal who is murdered in the course of duty.The film was a box office sensation in 1935, endorsed enthusiastically by the FBI and the Hays Office for informing the public about the prevention of crime.  Cagney also was delighted to be playing on the right side for once.The DVD print is excellent and captures the excellent lighting which gets darker as the film's plot does.  It is also packed with good extras.  There is an informative documentary about the enforcement of the Production Code but the excellent commentary attached to the film itself is hampered by the nasal drawl of the commentator's voice - unfortunate!  There is an hilarious short film with the young Bob Hope which is a rare gem and the Looney Tune cartoon included has that great combination of music and drawings which is so entertaining. Also there is a short film, one of a series on golf, with Cagney appearing without makeup. He looks completely different, freckle faced and tow headed. Finally, a blooper reel is included from Warners films of 1935 and a preview of "Devil Dogs of the Air", a Pat O'Brien/Cagney teaming in cliched roles which were repeated a number of times throughout the decade.Whether as part of the Warner's Tough Guys set or on its own, the DVD is great value
It's Jimmy Carr - Need more be said?!?. Thanks for keeping a Brit sane in a country full of "My wife says..." jokes.Your wife is fat and ugly and I don't care what she says. Because she's ugly. And fat.....and not my wife
The Search For Shangri-La. This is an excellent documentary of Shangri-La and its elusive transcendental nature
Scantily Clad...and Behind Bars..!. A CLASSIC. Pam Grier is sublime
PLEASE PUT ON DVD!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!. "Girl Happy"is the best and personally my favorite Elvis movie around.It's highly recommended and a must see!!Also,dvd distributors should take notice to release this wonderful movie on dvd at a more reasonable price so that humble people such as myself can afford it!!So,please put on dvd!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Two great actors in a great movie. "Boys Town" stars two of the greatest actors of the golden era of Hollywood, Mickey Rooney and Spencer Tracy, and their parts in this movie are among their best roles.  "Boys Town" doesn't have quite as close a connection to Christmas as the other two titles in the Classic Holiday Collection (there's one scene set on the holiday), but this true story of a priest who builds a boarding school for troubled youth is one that will warm your heart.  Tracy plays Father Flanagan, a kind, socially conscious priest who can be tough when he needs to be, and Mickey Rooney displays his wide-ranging acting talent (from tough talk to tears) as one of the neglected boys whom Flanagan sets on the right path."Boys Town" is accompanied by its own less-famous sequel, "Men Of Boys Town," so you're getting two features on one disc. You also get a featurette about the real Boys Town (which still exists and has expanded beyond its original Nebraska location), as well as a 1939 radio program promoting the movie with Tracy and Rooney.If you like this great movie, you may want to consider getting the excellent Classic Holiday Collection, which includes this film along with two other great classics, "Christmas In Connecticut" and "A Christmas Carol" (1938)
No Way Out 1950,. Sidney Poitier`s first movie No way Out, is one of his BEST. This movie needs to be put out on DVD,so everyone can benefit by the format DVD would bring to it. The supporting cast is wonderful. I highly recommend this movie
ageless adventure in exploring one's life if you go with it. first viewed this 20 something years ago. what keeps me returning to it is what i saw as i kid that dared me to explore whats out there in the world. it explores sex, yes, it was filmed at a time whwn people didn't worry about AIDS., but more than this  it has this urge to make you want to explore, go into the unkonwn, its ok.  Yes i went to Greece that was 12 years ago. i've been discovering the world around me ever since. If you have money or not it doesn't matter. what matters is the confidence and possible humbleness we all have if we just detach ourselves and let ourselves have a moment(s) of clearity, enjoy!
very interesting. no matter where you sit on the fence with Tupac Shakur you can't ignore His Importance as a Artist.this Video reveals alot of interesting aspects of Him through His BodyGuard&also some Studio footage.very detailed&On Point Presentation here.you won't forget it after you see it
To the reviewer who said "..John Dugan..how the mighty have fallen.". You said, about John Dugan, "He's not acting. He currently works as a waiter at T.G.I. Fridays in Terre Haute, Indiana. Ah, how the mighty have fallen."How the mighty have fallen??? What have YOU done? Did YOU star in the most talked about and influential horror film in the history of cinema? No? Well guess what tubby... John Dugan DID
i love it but i can see why others would hate it. this movie's really good, it's arty, scary, gothic, and to top it off bauhaus is in the begining.  it's a really depressing movie but that doesn't take away from anything it just makes you love the movie that much more, but it's alittle hard to follow sometimes and the vampires don't really do anything cool (they feed by cutting you with there cute little necklesses and then sucking on the wound) but it still works.  there's mad chicks making out too.  i could see why some people would hate it though, it's slow sometimes, the artiness can be alittle much sometimes, and it's really really depressing.  but if you're into that sort of thing this movie is perfect for you (i loved it i stole it from hollywood video and am still collecting late fees)
Mr Kotcheff is a master story teller. Mr Kotcheff, Canadian, is able to cast his objective but sympathetic eye over a range of topics and the humans involved in them,  and provide us with some insights whilst telling a story with panache and a great deal of skill, even if he touches all the typical emotional cues listed in Drama 101.  One of his master works about the darker side of the Australian outback WAKE IN FRIGHT, thought lost for ever, has recently been discovered in a rubbish tip.  His FIRST BLOOD gave a comic book slant to Agent Orange and the pyschosis of a Viet Vet and NORTH DALLAS FORTY reveals professional football as a pretty dispiriting business with the players tools to be used at the pleasure of the businessmen.  If it is the case that the American Empire began its slide as it sank into the Vietnam War, some of the reasons might be found in NORTH DALLAS FORTY which is pretty savage in its depiction of materialism - the tv sinking inthe swimming pool, the hunger guests have for the electronic toys (rubbish) stacked on a table; the black/white divide simmering beneath the relationships between players; the hypocrisy, the myth of competitiveness and its alleged blessings; Business which runs the game just as it runs the war(Haliburton). Nick Nolte is a confused player who loves the game but cannot understand the world.His battered body symbolizes a battered spirit.  The answer is love.  Mr Nolte, as Phil Elliot, grid iron star with magic catching hands, does not take the final  pass in the street from a fellow player. With his collar undone, and the ball at his feet, he's out of the game and back into life.  Personally, I find football, grid iron, (but not soccer)  a stupid and violent game and this is confirmed by the backstage, dressing room, scenes.  Mr Kotcheff tells a great story but.
Awesome. The story is interesting and the characterare querky. Malone is great. I really enjoyed this different movie. Something that Hollywood couldnt and wouldnt put out
Doctor Who and the first Download. Doctor who materialised without his Tardis on this, my first timelord download in the amazon unbox, which is much larger on the inside than it appears on the outside.For a very reasonable sum, $1.99, my family and I were able to enjoy the first Third doctor adventure after his regeneration, where he encounters the Nestene Conciousness.The down load took only a few minutes although I had some considerable difficulty installing the microsoft program. thanks to the good people at amazon tech support I was able to obtain an alternative download from the gates empire itself which allowed me to enjoy our rental.a great experience and will not be the last. easy to navigate and fun for all the family. someone should tell the timelords on gallifrey about unbox and perhaps they could get rid of all the old type 40 tardis'
Cute Movie. I like both Cary Grant and Doris Day and I really enjoyed watching That Touch Of Mink and I wish they had made more movies together besides this just one. BTW: I also liked Audrey Meadows who played Doris day's friend, she was pretty funny
Wonderful Memories. Wonderful cast.  Enjoyed seeing the movie that I thought relayed the essence of Christmas past.  Loved seeing Cary Grant, Loretta Young and David Niven again
yes, been, i know... i've lost the magic. When i first saw this movie, i thought it was fictitious, so i thought it was boring. but then when i found out it was real, i was really impressed. i'm not really sure how they were able to document it since at the time JULIA ROBERTS was a nobody. i also didn't know that she used to work at a lawfirm. I mean, i'm not really sure how documentaries work, but why did they decided to make a documentary about JULIA ROBERTS? they couldn't have known what she was going to discover. anyway, i'm really really glad that they did because it was really amazing and touching. And look at all the people who became actors because of this movie! wow. wow, wow, wow, wow, wow
Over the Edge. a great movie about what can happy with big group of teens without much of pearent guidinc
Be careful of "Family Plans". This film just goes to show that sometimes your family can be your worst enemy. Ms. Carter was an excellent "Queen" Jane and the actress who played "Bloody" Mary was outstanding! I am so glad that I was not around in Tudor England
I love Johnny depp. I love this movie, ifs funny and i can't wait too see number three
Way to Go Amazon!  Very cool. Just got done watching the show and it was awesome. Of course I had to download the tool, how else do you get started? Once it downloaded it worked very well and the video was right there to watch when I was ready. Note to self get cable, DSL is a slow download but it worked great and the picture quality was awesome. No commercials!I didn't have any troubles installing it on my computer and the help tool walked me through it.
Best Men is a wonderfully written production and very unique. This movie was suggested to me and I cannot thank that person enough for doing this. This movie had a wonderful plot,unique characters and outstanding use of Shakespeare. I love unique interpretations of the his  and his work. I think that the writer showed wonderful creativity in his  characters and use of Shakesperean phrases, cliches and monolouges. It was  a real fight the power movie and I enjoyed that
Review of Stand and Deliver. I received the DVD in a timely manner. The quality of the DVD was good. I have had good service from Amazon. Overall, it was a good experience and a good product
The Rise of Star. This is a movie loosely based on 70's and 80's porn star John Holmes. In this version, a young man name Eddie Adams is approached by porn director Jack Horner. Eddie then turns famouse and leads into a downward spiral including drugs and violence. This movie features many stars of the late 90's and today, including Mark Wahlberg as Eddie Adams, Burt Reynolds at Jack Horner, John C. Reilly as Reid Rothchild, and Julianne Moore as Amber Waves. Burt Reynolds and Julianne Moore were nominated for oscars for their breakthrough performance. This movie was also nominated for Best Writing to Paul Thomas Anderson for an oscar.The Extras on this DVD are good: 10 Deleted Scenes, a Music Video, 2 Commentary tracks, and the John C. Reilly Files
"Alright ladies....lets play the name game ". Reform School girls is an over the top woman in prison cult classic that is FUN FUN FUN to watch. I watched this movie 100's of times growing up in the mid 80's, and it still pleases today. Wendy O Williams is completely mesmerizing to watch, although her acting is pretty bad to say the least. Still the film manages to entertain with its completely unbelievable premise. I love this movie. Pat Ast and Wendy O Williams make this movie what it is, and why Sybil Danning got the DVD cover I'll never know (she's barely in the film).Pat and Wendy (both who have since passed) make great villains though, and are thoroughly enjoyable to watch over and over again. If you like low budget, entertaining prison films with lots of women, violence & nudity, then you will love Reform School Girls. The soundtrack is pretty awesome too, and showcases W.O.W's real talent as a musician and performer.CHECK OUT THE DVD COMMENTARY! IT'S PRETTY FUNNY AND ENTERTAINING TO LISTEN TO!
One of the great westerns. This Peckinpah masterwork is a breath of fresh air after the stifling conventions of 1950s western genre. This film is modern in every sense with its downbeat view of heroism and challenging of western conventions.The story of two aging gunfighters is filled with interesting characters and situations. The real secret to its charm is the telling attention to little details in the characters. The marriage scene is an especially memorable set-piece.This is Peckinpah's finest film told with real warmth and restraint. There is real depth here that may suprise people who have only seen his later films.The musical score and a couple of studio-shot scenes are the only thing that really date it.Beautifully shot and masterfully directed with a haunting closing shot.
Must-see "women's picture". I really miss the genre loosely called "women's pictures" that combined wonderfully lurid storylines (with laugh-inducing  Hays Code cleaned-up dialog) and major, MAJOR fashion. Unfortunately nowadays the closest we get is the really crude "Sex and the City" whose scripts leave nothing to the imagination and where the "fashion" comes direct from Walmart."The Best of Everything" scores major points for a great looking cast, dynamite clothes,and wonderfully trashy storylines. If this isn't the ultimate popcorn movie, WHAT IS??!!?? Ladies, invite your friends over, rustle up some major munchies, fire up this DVD and have a WHALE of a GOOD TIME!!
really good. for a really old movie, it was in good shap.  Seller got it to me fast
Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST!. The Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST drama I have seen ever. Korean, American, doesn't matter! This is better than anything I have ever seen on TV or in the movies. Hollywood cannot touch this one! Kim Myoung Min(Yi Soon Shin) is outstanding in this!(no wonder he won the 2005 KBS BEST ACTOR AWARD FOR IYSS)It starts from when he was a child to his adulthood and can be emotional, funny, sad, and can make you angry!! The numerous obstacles and prejudices this man had to overcome and then always bounced back with no complaint because of the love of his country is phenomenal!! He put his country above all else and Kim Myoung Min did a great job of portraying that!My whole family, kids and all, watched this with me and loved it!I can see why Yi Soon Shin is Korea's hero and why other countries teach his methods
Great all round film!. I first saw this film in 1999 I loved it.The first thing that grabbed my attention was the 3 brothers and their relationship throughout the film and how it changes.The storyline with the youngest brother marshall was great.The film is like an adventure story,the type you would of loved to have gone on! Traveling,being young,free and inexperienced at almost everything.its a bit like a coming of age film,finding yourself etc.This all sounds heavy but its not,the film is filled with humour from the brothers and all the other characters,the animals are great and some even get in on the humour too.The music even grabs me,the whole thing is a feel good factor of a film,one I would recommend anyone watching of any age
Intriguing. I've watched this movie many times because I'm fascinated by the man, especially hoping to get a better understanding of what his life was like. The more I learn about him though, the more this movie is so one  dimensional and inaccurate. It was based on the harshest biography of  Picasso which is unfortunate because it gives a false impression of what he  was really like. I would still buy it because the scenes are filled with  his studios and artwork, however it would have been one of my all-time  faves if it focused more on his work and his passion
Such A Fine Movie. Harvey Fierstein's play that won a Tony translates beautifully onto the screen. Even though the movie is only two hours long-- the play was about four-- he captures the essence of this groundbreaking play. Although we previously had had BOYS IN THE BAND, THE STAIRCASE and similar plays/movies about gay people in America, no writer before had said (that I can recall) that gays should adopt children, gays should be monogamous, gays should be honest with themselves, their families and everybody else, gays had nothing to be ashamed of, gays were good people. Fierstein says all that and more in this most seminal work. When the history of the gay movement in the late 20th Century is written, this play/movie will be remembered with the likes of ANGELS IN AMERICA as lasting art. I saw the play on broadway years ago. It was the shortest four hours of my life. Both the play and the movie will make you laugh; they will make you cry.Of course Fierstein, who both wrote the screenplay and plays Arnold Beckoff a/k/a Virginia Ham, gets a tad dramatic at times and his addressing the audience works better on stage than in the film; and maybe the great actress Anne Bancroft overacts as his b----y mother. These are just table crumbs, however, from a magnificent visual feast.All the actors to a person are superb, and the soundtrack is worth owning--Fierstein, who sings his songs live, has a voice no lower than Marlene Dietrich's and just as good.Fierstein also does a commentary on the DVD of this film, offering interesting insights and tidbits about the making of TORCH SONG TRILOGY, a film you will want to see again and again
A MUST HAVE!. IF YOUR INTO GANGSTER OR MAFIA MOVIES THIS COLLECTION IS A MUST!I PURCHASED THIS ITEM AS A GIFT TO MY FIANCEE AND HE WAS THRILLED WITH IT. I MEAN WITH STARS LIKE MARLON BRANDO, ROBERT DENIRO, AL PACINO AND COUNTLESS MORE, HOW CAN YOU GO WRONG. THIS IS DEFINITELY A COLLECTORS ITEM THAT YOU WANT TO INCLUDE IN YOUR MOVIE LIBRARY. THE PACKAGING IS AWESOME WITH THE STARS AND DIRECTORS IMAGE ON THE FRONT. AND THE DELIVERY TIME WAS AS PROMISED.  NO COMPLAINTS HERE!!!!!
GREAT!. I was impressed the very first time I saw this film, and I enjoy watching it every year.  A fine cast makes it believeable.  The early hours of world war two.  This film truly shows how unprepared we were, but also shows the  dedication of our american servicemen
An archetypal Western mood piece!. 'My Darling Clementine' is easily one of Ford's best Westerns, and quite certainly the best of all the Wyatt Earp films...To most modern audiences, the Corral incident and the confused events and motivations which led to it have been best presented by two motion pictures, John Ford's 'My Darling Clementine,' and John Sturges' 'Gunfight at the O.K. Corral.'Ford makes a fine account of Wyatt Earp and Doc Holliday's legendary defeat of the Clanton gang... By now, despite the film's climactic shoot-out at the OK Corral, Ford's talents lay less in action scenes than in playing endless variations on community rituals... Dances, church-meetings, saloon brawls and funerals are utilized to define social hierarchies and relationships, and to emphasize the role of tradition in the molding of America's heroic culture...Ford makes much of the visit of a pretty graceful lady named Clementine searching for her presumably long-lost love, none other than the consumptive Doc Holliday, now, devoted to the bottle and hidden under a huge white handkerchief... Victor Mature gives a touchy performance as the wild and reckless Doc seeking death...Holliday sways between two kinds of women: The Eastern, fair and respectable Clementine Carter (Cathy Downs), and the wild dark-eyed dancing girl 'Apache' Chihuahua (Linda Darnell), one of the sirens of the 1940s whose rose-at-twilight looks seem to stimulate every cameraman...Earp, the marshal of Tombstone, deliciously played by Henry Fonda, and Doc Holliday track down the Old Man Clanton (Walter Brennan-in one of his finest performances) and his infamous four sons...There is deviation on the way... A revenge motive attributed to Fonda, and the jealous intervention of Holliday's Mexican mistress... But the path is well and truly pointed to that challenge at the corral...The action is firm, nicely photographed in Ford's favorite locale, the rugged Monument Valley in northern Arizona... The story is also well told... But the film will be always remembered for its fine sensations and curiously captivating moods... This is Ford indulging himself, as was his habit, but on this occasion the indulgences all come off and are imparted with pure magic...It's a film of touches, simple and beautiful... Ford often likes to slow his Westerns down... Edged deeper into the American myth, Ford makes Fonda sit precariously on the veranda, adjusts his boots and balances himself while the world, such as it is, goes by...Fonda, with quiet persuasive self-confidence, is the imperturbable peacemaker, who walks a lady to church... Fonda-shy and slow-moving, with delightful intonation of short words, and an old-world frontier concept of courtesy, leads Clementine in a delightful two-step open-air dance...Filmed in gloriously rich black and white, 'My Darling Clementine' is an archetypal Western mood piece, full of nostalgia for times gone by and crackling with memorable scenes and characterizations...
Streamlined way to fast toning. This is an excellent tape for people who have been out of the workout zone for a while.  There are three levels of workouts - each one lasting between 10-15 min.  The first two are designed to build up your strength for the third one which is pretty challenging.  Denise knows the areas that women want to work on and knows the excercises to get results.  I know a lot of people can't stand Denise for various reasons... her constant talking with "that voice" seems to be a big one, but I find her to be informative and motivating.  I like how she points out the correct form and give tips while her back ups perform the excercises.   I've only ever owned five pound weights but did go out and buy 3 pound weights because a few of these excercises were a little much using the heavier ones.  I highly recommend this tape for people who don't have a lot of time to work out and want to see fast results in their upper body
Sweet, powerful, and wonderful film. This is one of the sweetest films I have ever seen. It's main character,  Frankie Bois, is incredibly endearing. I wanted to give him a big hug. The  cast is amazing with the great Gabriel Byrne and Matt Dillon. I just loved  this movie. It calls out to your heart and soul. It was just great. Also,  set in Ireland which makes it all the better.     EN
Not The Best But Hardly The Worst Little Film!. The quality of the DVD is first rate.  The sound is good the picture quality is really pretty good with no distracting cuts tears lines or streaks.  I too saw this picture initially on TCM and it was good.  I do not fault how halting timid and one dimensional the character execution and plot development is in A Place in the Sun too much.  I am old enough to remember how strict censorship was in back when this picture was produced.  Oh yeah by todays standards "A Place In The Sun is a movie whose content is positively tepid.  Compared to todays sexpot movies  where if audiences are not treated to at least one bare no holds barred naked sex scene in a flick they feel profoundly ill used indeed.An old movie has to be evaluated for its daring in the context of the time in which it was made.  For its time A Place in the Sun explored subject matter of class in our so called classless american society, young mom's having babies out of wedlock and tangentally touching on abortion.  In early 1950's "perfect america each of these subjects were potential third rails not only hollywood but state and local censors could use to deny or restrict a films screen time or availability.  Could the story have been told better, yes.  Could the staff and actors taken a few more risks or wrote the picture to bring the issues and passions into more clear believable focus again yes indeedy.The writing if nothing else could have been written tighter to suggest things censors would have cut for sure if shown.  Other well made pictures have used writing to convey indirectly subjects censors of the day would never allowed direct explorartion of.  All that said Looked at with an eye to when it was made A Place in The Sun while not perfect picture is for its time a gutsy attempt to show a slice of American life that seldom got explored with the depth and sensitivity you experience in its viewing.I will take one star off for A Place In The Sun writers who in my humble opinion did not go far enough to develop tightly defined characters using indirect methods that would have conveyed greater depth of personality and passion than could be shown directly in a 1950's era film.  I give A Place in the Sun an A- for an awesome effort.  I think A Place In The Sun deserves a place in any collection of great old movies because, while not perfect its acting is powerful and its writing explores taboo subjects with a degree of sensitivity that make it worth watching
Very good movie. Good Boy: Starring Kevin Nealon, Liam Aiken, and Molly Shannon. Animal voices by: Cheech Marin, Matthew Broderick, Delta Burke, Donald Faison, Brittany Murphy, Vanessa Redgrave, and Carl Reiner.This movie seemed to me like a cross between: Air Bud, E.T., and Homeward Bound: The Incredible Journey. Granted, there were a few scenes where I said "Yeah right!" but overall, it is a warm, heartfelt movie that can be enjoyed by anyone who is willing to suspend disbelief. If you are the type that looks at movies from a critical point of view (i.e. Dogs don't talk; dogs can't jump that high, dogs can't fly, etc.) then no, you probably WON'T enjoy this movie. I know, and most other people also know that dogs don't speak English; but I was still able to enjoy the movie. And to those who watch with a "Critical eye," you complain about stuff being "Far Fetched;" no pun intended for this movie. So, I'm guessing you mainly just watch movies about stuff that actually happened, or could actually happen. If you go to rent this movie, read the back of the box first, and if you can't stand the thought of a movie with talking dogs, don't rent this movie, and don't rent Homeward Bound: The Incredible Journey, or Homeward Bound: Lost In San Francisco. You'll be very upset with yourself. To the rest of us, sit back, relax, watch a movie, and just enjoy it for what it is. Nevermind that it's not entirely based in reality. If you are one of those people that only enjoy reality based stuff with no acting, go get yourself a few documentaries at the library. If you want a movie with some acting that has a basis in reality, get yourself a movie like Pearl Harbor.
Very Depressing Tale. The title of this movie holds no secrets. The Virgin suicides may have its up and downs throughout the movie but the whole time the viewer is left with an impending sense of doom. Almost every aspect of this movie is fantastic, between the acting and a great story line, but this movie is truly dramatic in that it will no doubt influence your emotions
Claudette Colbert and writer-director Preston Sturges: it doesn't get better. By 1942, screwball comedies had become quite old-fashioned, nevertheless when THE PALM BEACH STORY was released it became one of the top box-office winners of the year, and garnered much praise for it's stars, and writer-director Preston Sturges.Married-but penniless couple Gerry and Tom Jeffers (Claudette Colbert and Joel McCrea) decide to divorce, so Gerry hops the train to Palm Beach to make all the proper arrangements.  Realising his big mistake, Tom follows Gerry but when he arrives in Palm Beach, he discovers that Gerry has already moved on with eccentric zillionaire J.D. Hackensacker III (Rudy Vallee).  Things take another zany turn when Tom is chased by J.D.'s man-eating sister Princess Centimillia (Mary Astor).  Hilarious slapstick sequences and the rapier dialogue of Preston Sturges makes this film one of the greatest of classic Hollywood comedies.Claudette Colbert's performance as Gerry is easily one of her best, evoking fond memories of her Oscar-winning role in "It Happened One Night".  Joel McCrea, who spent most of his career idling in B-movie territory, is the perfect straight-man to Colbert's comedic whirlwind.  Rudy Vallee and Mary Astor steal every scene in which they appear, with great support from Sig Arno (as the Princess' latest conquest), Robert Warwick, William Demarest, Chester Conklin and Frankin Pangborn
It Really is Quite Good. Just another comment that this is a much-better-than-usual made-for-TV movie. Quality acting by Rea.
A classic!. This movie is a great accompaniment to PBS's recent documentary Watergate Plus: 30 Years later.  We watched them back to back as PBS aired them this way as well
Welcome to the genre that is "John Carpenter". John Carpenter's second feature "Assault on Precinct 13" is nothing short of a masterpiece of original flmmaking. Back in the mid seventies, when cinema verite and political thrillers where the norm, John Carpenter came up with a fresh and back to basics flmmaking approach that was simply entertaining and truly original. "Assault on Precinct 13" is Carpenter at his finest, as the film introduces the audience to what would later become the trademarks of his style: Masterful Panavision compositions, tight suspense sequences and a thumping synth score that is simply minimilastic brilliance. With a simple plot that serves as a launching ground for character interactions and suspense set-pieces that showcase Carpenter's stylish direction, this is Carpenter at his most creative, back when he made interesting, original and always entertaining films before his downfall in the 90's, when self-indulgence led to such works as "Village of the damned" and "Ghosts of Mars". *The Image region 1 dvd features a nice widescreen print, but sadly only a mono soundtrack, which serves the film fine, but with a score of that quality, a 5.1 remix is truly called for. The disc also features an astounding and inspiring commentary by Carpenter. Brilliant.
Top-Notch Workout for Bones. I'm a former gym junkie and lifted weights three times a week for years. I must say that Skeletal Fitness has completely replaced my lifting routine. I now have confidence that I'm doing everything to stave off osteoporosis for my entire body--including areas that my previous routine didn't address, such as the wrists. I would award the video 10 stars if I could--it's that good. Plus, Mirabei presents herself as the kind of instructor anyone would welcome into her home on a regular basis
You've gotta love Jon Stewart!. I like Drew Barrymore, but my reason for renting this movie was Jon Stewart. Jon has a terrific comedic timing, and he shines whenever he's on screen. A proof of that is that the Daily Show got much, much better since  he started hosting it. As for this particular movie, it has a slow start,  and the first part is the hardest to get through. But once we move on to  the second things start connecting, and culminate in a sweet ending where  everything falls in place. And of course, Jon has his winning charm on
A Look Forward Into The Past. This 1981 film offers an intersting glimpse into what is starting to become commonplace 26 years later. A company is having models obtain plastic sugery to make them look as perfect as possible. They scan the models into a computer and use thier digital likeness in commericals. The film directed by Michael Crichton, which was his first, is very good and still holds up for today. Especially the graphics that were used on the display terminals. For it being 1981, they still look somewhat cutting edge today. The only gripe is that one must suspend all belief to think that a very young Susan Dey would want to be the girlfriend to a much much older Albert Finney.
Less-than-stunning transfer of perennial JD schlock favorite. High School Confidential is one of the quintessential 1950s JD exploitation movies, produced by veteran sleazemeister Albert Zugsmith (Touch of Evil, Girls Town, Confessions of an Opium Eater, etc.), directed by Universal monster expert Jack Arnold (in between The Incredible Shrinking Man and Monster on the Campus), and featuring a handful of Zugsmith's usual `stock company' players among the typically eclectic cast that includes Russ Tamblyn (West Side Story, Satan's Sadists, Twin Peaks), Mamie Van Doren and then-hubby  band leader Ray Anthony, John Drew Barrymore (John's son and Drew's dad), Jackie Coogan (Uncle Fester, Chaplin's The Kid), William Wellman Jr. and Charlie Chaplin Jr., Michael Landon (hot off of Teenage Werewolf), Lyle Talbot, Mel Welles, Mary Wickes, and custom hot rod designer Norman "Woo Woo" Grabowski. (It's a mystery how Zugsmith, whose entire  career was basically a slow descent into the cinematic gutter,  persuaded the usually staid MGM studios to underwrite his muckraking scandal pictures.) Jerry Lee Lewis belts the title tune from a flatbed truck over the opening credits, then we're introduced to archetypal smart-mouthed, arrogant punk Tony Baker (Tamblyn), already maneuvering to becoming "top stud" of the local gang, the Wheelers and Dealers, on his first day at high school. New in town, he's living with his inappropriately affectionate "aunt" Gwen (Mamie Van Doren), who's constantly bothering him for `attention'. Tony trades some great "hep-talk" with J.I. (Barrymore), leader of the W&D, then flashes a huge wad of bills and sparks a reefer in the principal's office. Next, Tony mouths off to prim, proper English teacher Arlene Williams (Jan Sterling), who falls for him, naturally, and Barrymore presents an amusing jive-talk rendition of Columbus's discovery of America to the class. (". . . just tool off the deep end and dig a little infinity.") Tony, looking to "graze on some grass", has plenty of cash but no connections, while J.I.'s girlfriend Joan (Diane Jergens) is jonesing for a few "sticks" but has no bread. Tony finally connects with Joan's dealer Jukie, and later a large baggie falls out of Tony's hubcap during a bust of an illegal hot rod race at the airport.  At the local watering hole, run by Mr. August (Coogan), a "beatnik" poetess recites the absolutely priceless "the future is a king-size drag" monologue backed by Coogan's jazz combo ("I had an uncle with an Ivy League heart, he had life with a belt in the back, he had a button-down brain . . . drag!"). Tony eventually sets up a deal for a "can" of "H" with "the big man." The big man turns out to be anti-alcohol ("that stuff is murder on the system") but forces Tony (who's really Mike Wilson, undercover narcotics detective!) to shoot up as a "test" before finalizing their deal.Joan, Arlene, and Gwen are all menaced by the drug-dealing hoods, Tony's cover is blown, and Landon and Chaplin lead jocks and club patrons against the ringleaders in the action-packed finish. The plot is fairly routine stuff; the real reasons to watch this flick are Tamblyn's dead-on, irritating wise-ass performance as Tony and the preponderance of hilarious late-50s slang throughout. One of my favorite moments: Tony to henchman Petey, "He's a schmo!" They both nod in unison, "From Kokomo, yeah", as if everyone knows that this is the standard response! (White Zombie used some great samples of HSC's swingin' dialogue on La Sexorcisto: Devil Music Vol. 1.)While I'm glad to finally have one of my favorite JD/exploitation flicks on DVD, I wish Artisan had made the effort to give us a nicer transfer. The good news is that contrary to what the DVD case explicitly states, the movie is presented in 2.35:1 letterboxed widescreen, though unfortunately with no anamorphic enhancement. The blacks and midtones actually look pretty solid, and damage consists of only some light speckling, but enlarged to fit a 55-inch 16x9 screen, the highlight areas show lots of visible grain and the detail is much softer than expected for DVD. It's still watchable, but looks better unenlarged or on a smaller set. It kind of defeats the purpose of buying a projection TV when DVD manufacturers like Artisan put out transfers like this one that actually look worse when enlarged to utilize the maximum screen area. The box says only "digitally mastered", leaving room for doubt as to whether it was actually remastered for DVD. Don't get me wrong, it still looks 500% better than the Republic/Artisan videotape, with superior tonal values and much improved sharpness and detail, so it's worth the investment for fans replacing their blurry VHS, but a bit disappointing otherwise. And it's unlikely that Artisan's ever going to give this film a better restoration if they didn't this time around, so this is probably as good as it's gonna get unless somebody like Image or Criterion puts out a special edition someday. There are no extras other than chapter stops, not even a trailer. I rate the movie five stars, the DVD gets three
Watching the Master at work. Henryk Szeryng, undeservedly less famous these days than Perlman or Zukerman, was for more than 20 years, from the late '50s to the early '80s, among the world's greatest violin players (together with Heifetz, Milstein,  Oistrakh, and later Perlman).  His special talents were the most perfect  intonation (pitch) in all of recorded violin playing, a miraculously huge,  radiant, almost organ-like tone, and a pronounced ability to convey the  overall architecture of a piece.  Szeryng's bow arm, stronger and better  controlled than anyone else's, was and is the stuff of legends.  This video  lets us witness the master in his prime.  The sound is not very good (to  get a real sense of Szeryng's sound, buy a CD of one of the many violin  concertos he recorded in the '70s), and the camera does some annoying  things, but overall it's a wonderful opportunity to watch how he kneads a  tone, how his ridiculously muscular and flexible fingers seem to come alive  on the fingerboard, how he (like a great opera singer) carefully develops a  long melody from a soft beginning to spectacular ringing heights, how  intelligently he interacts with the orchestral accompaniment.  The second  movement of the Tchaikovsky particularly is out of this world in its  combination of soaring melody and darkest passion and pathos.  For anyone  interested in the violin and its capabilities, this is an indispensable  document
HORROR,TWISTED,. This movie is not for the weak or for kids. this movie is 200% HORROR.
Excellent Gift. This is an excellent gift for your favorite sports fan.  I purchased this DVD for my husband.  He said it was a very good movie
Too spooky for my taste. The "now standard Indiana" formula is there and there are a lot of fun parts to this movie. However the bad guys are too bad and the situation is too spooky.  Be sure to watch "Riders of the Lost Ark" first even thought this takes place chronologically earlier.Once again James Bond has nothing on Dr. Jones (Harrison Ford) as he negotiates for a treasure and is double crossed at every turn, barely escaping with his life, also the acquisition of a steriotipical blond singer Wilhelmina Scott (Kate Capshaw), and his new sidekick Short Round (Jonathan Ke Quan).In his hasty retreat he does not realize that there are greater forces at work insuring that he fulfill his destiny to recover a sacred object and all the children of a beleaguered village.Is he up to the challenge?In this case does being blond help or hinder?Will Short Shot prove that size does not matter?Take heart!Be prepared for a dark passage "a little too dark for my taste".
A great tell about LBOs. I really liked this movie. For those who like finance and are aware of the stress that it conveys, Barbarians At The Gate shows the intricacies of LBOs and also how every business has a strong emotional factor that is many times overlooked.
J.M. for W.M. I love anything Ravi Zacharias writes.  He brings you to the only conclusion possible in whatever spiritual truth he is presenting, and I love this.  But greater still --- there is in Ravi Zacharias a truth that transcends intellect -- he genuinely loves the Lord he writes (or speaks) about.  This makes his books or his sermons worth my attention
Get &quot;Gun&quot;. I have watched the video of &quot;My New Gun&quot; three times, and each time I have discovered more interesting, telling details.  The plot doesn't drive the film; instead, it seems to evolve almost by happenstance from the characters themselves.  Although there is no &quot;crack-me-up&quot; humor at all, if you think about what is going on as it happens, this movie is hilarious.  Diane Lane, James LeGros, and Stephen Collins all shine
Doctor Who and the first Download. Doctor who materialised without his Tardis on this, my first timelord download in the amazon unbox, which is much larger on the inside than it appears on the outside.For a very reasonable sum, $1.99, my family and I were able to enjoy the first Third doctor adventure after his regeneration, where he encounters the Nestene Conciousness.The down load took only a few minutes although I had some considerable difficulty installing the microsoft program. thanks to the good people at amazon tech support I was able to obtain an alternative download from the gates empire itself which allowed me to enjoy our rental.a great experience and will not be the last. easy to navigate and fun for all the family. someone should tell the timelords on gallifrey about unbox and perhaps they could get rid of all the old type 40 tardis'
The Mission. I saw this video years ago but I still remember it as being very exciting and action filled with superb acting.  I think it is one of the best action-adventure film ever made.  And it was shot on location.  The photography was stunning.
hypnotic. in retalliation the the review thing at the top, since when was the Yam supposed to be a dance craze? when were any of their dances supposed to be a dance craze? No one else could danc elike that! anyway, I love this movie because it so funny. Ginger has incredibly funny running-amuck scenes with perfect timing. Her facial expressions arer superior. You also realize what a superb actress she was. This movie isn't the typical Fred/Ginger formula, but who minds a little change if it turns out as well as this
Uncredited Asian actor. The name of the uncredited Asian actor who plays the fake Mr. Moto is Teru Shimada
Diet for a new America. Great book, actually the second time i've bought it and read it.A great eye opener
Woody's Best (except maybe the earlier, funny ones). I have watched this movie probably 50-60 times, and each time I watch it I love it more.  I think this is Woody at his best, with a great cast and an amazing performance by Nick "Apollo" Forte.  Except for his "earlier, funny" films, which are in a class by themselves, this film has the perfect balance of comedy, drama, dry wit, "suspense", larger-than-life characters....reminds me of "Raging Bull"...but that's a whole 'nuther genre.  As much as I LOVE "Annie Hall", sometimes it seems dated and hard to watch....but "BDR" is timeless.  Do like I did, if you can't decide whether to put down the cash right off the bat...rent it, watch it, and buy it.  I know you will.  Bravo, Woody!  Now, what happened to the rest of your films...??
superb film. 'A Bronx Tale' is about a boy named Calegero Anello living in the Bronx who is torn between two worlds, the world of his father (played by Robert De Niro) and the world of a local gang leader named Sonny (played by Chazz Palminteri). The viewer gets to follow Calegero or "C" from the time that he is 9 years old to the time that he is 17 years old. In the process, Calegero/C as well as the viewer learn some valuable lessons about life
"Uptown Girls" is a very enjoyable movie. "Uptown Girls" focuses on the friendship that develops between Ray (an 8 year-old going on 30) and Molly, her nanny, who acts her shoe size rather than her age.  For those who have not seen this movie, it may appear corny or designed for a younger audience; however, it is much more of an adult film than it may outwardly appear.  In her usual fashion, Dakota Fanning gives an outstanding performance, with an aptitude for acting well beyond her years.  Ray and Molly's disparate personalities result in many clashes, but eventually they teach each other how to act their age - a very important life lesson
Grace, Poise and Class all the way. Audre Hepburns debut.  This ismy favorite movie of all time.  A romantic comedy whose characters have the highest integrity of any film I've ever viewed.  If you're not moved by this story and it's portrayal by command performances, then you're not breathing
Electric&amp;Grand. This Video Blows The Mind.this is a GOlden Time in Soul Music.So Many Great Talents.This is What Soul Music Used To Be About Great Talent&amp;Full Of Fantastic Performances
better than Dreamgirls. I took my daughter to see Dreamgirls and she loved it. I had to bust her bubble!!! And tell her the history about Sparkle Oldschool)  now she agrees with me sparkle is the best soundtrack outstanding. (Areatha Franklin)  Given him something he can feel............
A Very Sweet British Film. I loved this movie right from the start. Craig Ferguson and Brenda Blethyn are wonderful together, and some of the scenes of little old ladies geting (unknowingly) giggly on "tea" are just a hoot.  I'd always liked Craig Ferguson as Mr Wick on the "The Drew Carey Show", and it's nice to see that there is so much more to him than just that character.
Indiscreet. What Director Stanley Donen uses excellently here are two gorgeous, sophisticated stars that fit like a glove. He also creates a deliciously elegant atmosphere with colorful, chic sets and stunning Dior gowns that comprise a feast for the eyes. "Indiscreet "will transport you to another lost, pleasant, and civilized time and place
Gets Better With Time. The first time I saw this film was when it came out in 1986, and at the time I was terribly disappointed.  Didn't like the film at all, thought it was amateurish and pretentious.  But then I watched it recently on DVD, and realized that it was a really good film - performances were all really good, I liked seeing the DC scenery, and the directing by Mike Nichols was wonderfully subtle.Despite the fact that both Nicholson and Streep can sometimes be overpowering, and that Nicholson did get a bit hammy at times in this (I still can't abide the scene where he sings), I found both of their performances to be deep and nuanced.  The co-stars were good too, added a lot, and I especially enjoy Catherine O'Hara's portrayal of a gossip.  Carly Simon's singing really does set the tone well for this movie, which is definitely worth watching.  And if you don't like it the first time, watch it again in a year or two, and I'll bet you'll re-appraise it more positively
Send In The Clowns!. Plot: Three brothers -- Casey (Nathan Forrest Winters), Geoffrey (Brian McHugh), and Randy (Sam Rockwell) -- are left on their own when their parents leave town for the weekend. They decide to visit the local carnival/circus, even though Casey is terrified of clowns. And boy is this a bad night to choose! Three anonymous mental patients (Michael Jerome West, who is credited as "Tree", Bryan Weible, and David Reinecker) have escaped and run away...to the circus! After the show is over, the real clowns -- known as Cheezo (Timothy Enos), Bippo (Frank Damiani), and Dippo (Karl Heinz Deuber) -- are slaughtered by the inmates, who steal their clothes and makeup for a creepy disguise (then again, they do seem quite delightfully mad, so maybe they actually think they ARE clowns). They eventually find their way to the house of the three brothers. And, once they realize the residents are home, they decide to have a little fun. Of course, to the brothers, this will be nothing less than a night of terror! The inmates, for reasons unknown, seem to love a good kill, and tonight they're gonna give these boys a whole house full of horrific surprises!Clowns have always been an interest of mine, and lately I've become even more interested. So, as a horror buff, I figured Clownhouse had to be the perfect flick for my evilly kooky taste. Well, while there are a few parts of the film that are certainly less than genius, I was quite impressed. Most B-movies have to take themselves lightly, or they will be a wreck. But there are a few of them that try to be full-on horror and suspense and accomplish their goal. Clownhouse wasn't particularly scary to me, but I thought -- for it's lack of comedic approach -- that it was executed very well. The acting isn't all that great, but it's not too distracting either. Once the psycho clowns start doing their business, you forget all about any underlying flaws. I think the atmosphere was what this was all about. Not to mention the fact that it was mostly believable. Almost every scene took a fairly realistic approach to the story. This sometimes causes a little boredom here and there, but for the most part makes the movie much more entertaining. The score (often an eerie big-top-ish tune, calliope style or with a music box) was definitely a pleasant surprise -- especially the theme, which can be heard in its entirety at the end credits. And, whether you're rooting for the clowns or the brothers, there are plenty of good scenes and a few creepy moments to satisfy the viewer. The concept alone is a good enough reason to see this, but I think Salva pushed it to the limit and came out with an enjoyable film for any horror fan to own. Overall, I don't really think I have any complaints. For a blockbuster hit, this would've been a bit of a disappointment. But for a rarely known B flick, I've got to give it two thumbs way up. There aren't any special features besides the theatrical trailer, but who needs 'em
Objection, Your Honor. This is the first novel of John Grisham and like the movie, it's very strong in characters and dialogue. At the time he wrote it, there was some pretty good attempts at making good 'lawyer' movies. "Witness for the Prosecution" comes to mind. And we had uncovered a whole raft of great new mystery writers like Parker, Crais, Lehane, George, and Grafton. But the legal-mystery novel was uncharted land and Grisham plowed it over with a passion. How was Grisham to know that like the fall of communism had given "evil empire" writers like Len Deighton and John LeCarre fits, eventually the public would tire at lawyers, even laughing at them?Nevertheless, it's a good book and also an excellent movie. If there are drawbacks, then truthfully there are some areas that require a little trust. The lawfirm itself for example. Sexual misconduct in a lawfirm? Sure. Misconduct in billing? Always. Stealing from the evidence locker of ill gotten gains? Occasionally. But murdering associates who try to leave? I don't think so. (But it does give Department of Justice cop Ed Harris a great line in the movie, "McDeere, no one has left your firm alive!")The movie has a solid script and a great cast to carry it. The lovely Jeanne Tripplehorn, the this time not very grandfatherly Wilfred Brimley, Holly Hunter, always a hoot, Gary Busey, Hal Holbrook and Law and Order's Steven Hill, to mention a few. And Tom Cruise as always doing a powerful job who suddenly realizes that the pot of gold at the end of his and Abbey's rainbow has a HAZMAT sticker on it that he's overlooked. Cruise is just great. A true Hitchkockian character, the average man with no where to run.What would you do if you found that the company you had waited for all your life was evil from top to bottom? That's The Firm. 5 stars. Larry Scantlebur
If only there were more episodes. Firefly is a fantastic series.  My wife and I watched the DVD set from and found ourselves rationing the episodes towards the end, because we didn't want the series to be over.  Great cast, great plots, great music.  I really can't say enough about this series.  I have never enjoyed a season of any show more than I enjoyed Firefly, and everyone I've introduced to it has loved it as well
great foreign film. Most people have a hard time adjusting to foreign films because reading subtitles and trying to watch the film is difficult.  That's why I love Melville's Le Samourai, not much speaking throughout the film equals minimal subtitles.  This film doesn't require many lines of speech.  The main character is an assassin who is hired to do a job and is rounded up by the police as a possible suspect.  While trying not to get arrested he is trying to find out who double crossed him.  My first Melville film and I loved it.  If you like this one you should also see Le Cercle Rouge and especially Bob Le Flambeur
"My knees felt like jelly when the film was over". Cube is a very original and entertaining low budget horror film, and will most likely stay with you long after you watch it. What works well with Cube is that we go along the ride with the characters. They have no idea how they got there or what is going on, we learn everything with them. The acting was decent and the CGI effects were nothing special, but overall the creativity makes this more than your average horror movie. Anyway the more I watch the film the better it gets, and more ideas and meanings come to mind everytime. Its Good too see more people are viewing Cube, probably because the sequels are recently being shown on TV now. The sequels are pretty bad compared to the original but watch them yourself
NOTHING CIVIL IN THIS WAR. This movie shows the real life hell that was Andersonville.  A prison camp that turned into a death camp. Not enough food,water or shelter for all the prisoners sent there. The south was losing the war so they had no provisions or men to assist in the detainment of these captured soldiers. Basically letting them rot slowly inside the walls that confinded them. A well acted movie which shows the hell that can come from wa
Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST!. The Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST drama I have seen ever. Korean, American, doesn't matter! This is better than anything I have ever seen on TV or in the movies. Hollywood cannot touch this one! Kim Myoung Min(Yi Soon Shin) is outstanding in this!(no wonder he won the 2005 KBS BEST ACTOR AWARD FOR IYSS)It starts from when he was a child to his adulthood and can be emotional, funny, sad, and can make you angry!! The numerous obstacles and prejudices this man had to overcome and then always bounced back with no complaint because of the love of his country is phenomenal!! He put his country above all else and Kim Myoung Min did a great job of portraying that!My whole family, kids and all, watched this with me and loved it!I can see why Yi Soon Shin is Korea's hero and why other countries teach his methods
Awesome. A must have for anime comedy fans. Being a big fan of anime comedy (the intelligent, yet lame humor) I was eager to see El Hazard "The magnificent world". Because of the high price of the set, I had some hesitation (because of some poor reviews on Amazon).Well, I have to say that the bad reviews are wrong. This DVD series was totally awesome (although I admit it started a bit slow). I promise the more you keep watching, the better it gets. The plot is highly intelligent (involving dimensional and time travel) and the characters are very interesting (with distinctive special powers).Some say the humor in El Hazard is juvenile (but I would argue no more juvenile then southpark), and seriously what good comedy isn't juvenile?Some also say that the story is sometimes too redundant (because many episodes involve a doomsday device), to which I respond "Do we call the original starwars trilogy redundant because they involve the death star"? no, ofcourse not.yes this DVD set lacks some extras, but I think Pioneer did a great job. The DVD menu presentation is beautiful, and the box is very elegant too. Hopefully you can get this set for around 40 dollars on Ebay (beware of bootlegs). It's very hard to find a good authentic set. The sequel "alternative world" which I just ordered, individually should cost around 30 dollars if you shop smart.For my fellow anime comedy fans, I also reccomend "Niea under 7" and "His and Her Circumstances".animation=5plot=4music=4characters=5comedy=4Total= 4.4 Star
This Has Been...a Love Story. I finally made my first purchase from Amazon's Unbox Video Downloads just to try the service and am happy to report a solid customer experience. For $1.99, I purchased and downloaded one of my favorite episodes of "The Twilight Zone", and it took about twenty minutes to download through a broadband connection. I don't think it's the most ideal way to see full-length motion pictures, but for a 26-minute classic TV program, I think my 17" LCD monitor makes for a suitable viewing experience, and the video quality of the downloaded file is clean.Aired on September 15, 1961 as the show's third season opener, the episode is a Cold War fantasy appropriately called "Two" about the last two survivors on earth, a man and a woman, after an apocalyptic world war in 2109. Written and directed by TV veteran Montgomery Pittman, the simple plot revolves around the complicating fact that he is an American infantryman and she is an invading Russian soldier. Like two feral animals, they glare at each other among the debris of a deserted town destroyed by the war. He even knocks her out her after she aggressively throws pots and pans at him. The reality of their solitary existence, however, gradually dawns on them, especially after they see an evening dress in a shop window inspiring her to speak her only word of dialogue - "Prekrassnyi" - the Russian word for "lovely".What really makes this episode memorable is the unlikely casting. Two years before she twitched her nose on "Bewitched", a brunette Elizabeth Montgomery, looking appropriately ravaged and sporting a deadly ray gun, plays the untrusting Russian soldier with surprising fierceness and vulnerability. The American is played by perennial tough-guy Charles Bronson, fresh from "The Magnificent Seven". Even though he has to spout some inane philosophical lines to describe the futility of war, he leavens his natural sullenness with a determined romanticism. They make an odd couple, but it works splendidly. I also learned that canned fried chicken will become a staple in the 22nd century. Narrated by Rod Serling in his inimitably halting manner, the show ends with my favorite line in his signature postscript: "This has been...a love story." This is classic TV
Pretty good movie, but... I have read all of the Alex Cross novels and as great an actor as Morgan Freeman is, he is terribly mis-cast as Alex Cross.  Cross is described as a 40 year old Muhammad Ali look alike.  Not even close.  Of course, there is the part in the movie that they kill off a character that appears in a later novel.  Maybe it was all a dream as it was for a whole season of "Dallas".As with most books made into movies, something is missing.  I think what is missing is the screen writers reading the whole book.All that said, I did enjoy the movie.  There are enough twists and turns to keep you entertained
View and read the book as well. I saw the movie before I read Riefenstahls autobiography. When I watched the movie, I was sure it had been staged. Nothing could be THAT perfect just filmed during events.Then I read Riefenstahl's autobiography and was awed. She describes in detail what she experienced and endured to make this film. Nothing was staged. Her enemies tried to prevent her from making it, but she persevered. It is a superb documentary of a very anguished time in world history
OBSCURE THEME - BRIGHT FILM. In one of the reviews it's said the movie is severely cut. Hmm... I don't know. I didn't have a chance to watch it in cinema and just got the DVD. Seems fine to me - I mean there were plenty scenes of necrophilia so I don't know if it's cut or not. Of course if the DVD is really censored it'd be nice to see the original version but even like this the film delivers. Beforehand I thought it'd be either stupid or it'd be some kind of art-house dull stuff. I was wrong and slightly surprised. "Kissed" although is dealing with such an obscure, disturbing and hidden matter as necrophilia, is done very good. It's bright and for everybody. It's very sensual and erotic, exciting and serious at the same time. It's about true love although this love may seem strange to average people. It's not an exploitation flick and has nothing sleasy in it. It's very romantic and enchanting. You'll definately not regret watching it for I bet you haven't seen anything like that before. Obviously deserves to be seen and liked.
DVD would be better. I think it would be much better to have DVD version of this remarkable drama
Reveals the complexity of wants and needs. Not a typical no brainer movie.  This movie presents complex people with complex motives.  Topher Grace is effective as the successful executive who can impress top ranking executives, yet has an undeveloped personality in many ways.  He is still trying to find out who he is and what he wants in life.  This lack of maturity and goals costs him his wife.  He focuses on his job even though he isn't passionate about the work.  Quaid does not like his demotion, yet he tries to be fair to his new boss and doesn't try to sabatoge him. This is where the film differs from other, inferior movies.  He is unhappy about his new status but tries to make the best of it.  He even tries to help his new boss.  The love story is played with honesty since Quaid's daughter is too young to commit hereself to anyone, yet she's attracted to her dad's new boss.  Don't expect cheap laughs and simple answers
A truly memorable movie. I've watched numerous movies about the Holocaust, and each one always seems unique. Europa Europa is one such unique movie that stays with you long after viewing it. The fact-based story follows the adventures of Jupp [played excellently by Marco Hofschneider] a young Jewish teen who loses members of his family in Nazi occupied Europe, spends some time in a Bolshevik orphanage, and finally ends up amongst the Nazis, masquerading as an Aryan...I could not believe how often Jupp comes close to revealing himself, but always, he is pulled back from disaster in the nick of time. It may seem incredible and almost unbelievable, but if you happen to read true accounts by other Holocaust survivors, you will find that the incredible and miraculous plays a significant role in saving these victims of Nazi propaganda from certain death. The lead actor deserves credit for his portrayal of Jupp, and the movie itself contains enough nail-biting moments to keep you on the edge of your seat
(3.5 stars)The Dark Sisters of the warewolf curse, was great, but should've worked on the ending. This movie was very interesting, but why did the sister kill the indian guy? And why did the 2 bad guys just drop their guns and run, and almost every horror, characters always trip and the killer gets them? But, a good plot, could've been better. But we don't e3ven get to see how Ginger killed the indian boy. Not scary, but good to watch. Some parts were kinda gross, like the dreams the sisters get and how the warewolves literally teared those guys apart
A MOVIE ABOUT AMERICAN HEROES. I have waited since the advent of DVDs for this film to be released. This standout movie essentially tells the story of dedicated, patriotic public servants and how a Bureau was created that became the most effective criminal investigative and counter-espionage organization in the world. As someone has already pointed out, this movie would never be made today and perhaps that is the great tragedy.America survived and remained free through the 20th Century because of the sacrifices of men in uniform abroad and men who guarded the safety and security of the nation at home. Jimmy Stewart portrays FBI special agent Chip Hardesty over a period spanning 30 years from 1924 to the 1950s. The film unapologetically shows J. Edgar Hoover as the man who remade the Bureau in his image as an organization devoted to justice, fidelity and bravery. Since his death in 1972, Hoover has been slandered in every way possible by people who would never have dared make such attacks while he was alive. Most of those charges have since been debunked and the makers of this picture have been vindicated many times over. You will see FBI agent Hardesty investigate the murder of American Indians, the suppression of freedom of the press by the Ku Klux Klan, the murders, kidnappings, bank robberies of the 1930's road gangsters, including Dillinger, Baby Face Nelson, Alvin Karpis and Machine Gun Kelly, the Nazi infiltration of Latin America during the Second World War (the wartime FBI included everything from Alaska to Argentina in its bailiwick), postwar treason by American communists working for the USSR and sabotage and mass murder in the first deliberate destruction of an airliner in U.S. history. It doesn't get much better than this.This movie includes a compelling supporting cast that no film made today would ever have. They include Vera Miles as Stewart's long suffering and sometimes selfish wife, Nick Adams as a young sociopath planning matricide for the airline insurance, Harley Baer as a lazy political appointee who flees the Bureau when Hoover assumes command, Murray Hamilton as Chip Hardesty's best friend Sam Cowley, a man dedicated to justice who never wants to "cool off," Larry Parnell as young George Cowley who fights to be as good a man and an FBI agent as his father and many others.This film is a classic that I include among the ten essential films that all Americans should see from the Hollywood era when the studios made movies that made audiences proud of their country and its values. If you are looking for a SYRIANA or a JFK, this is a film you should pass over
Fabulous Performances. This is one program I really don't care how historically accurate it is - Katharine Hepburn and Peter O'Toole are such a joy to watch.
'First Blood', crossed with 'The Fugitive'. It's not hard to see how this movie got made.. a director known for gritty streetwise thrillers (The French Connection), about a soldier who was trained to kill, but now can't turn it off due to battle scarring (First Blood, anyone?), starring Tommy lee Jones reprising his role in the Fugitive, but with a twist..Tommy Lee Jones is just the right casting for the role of the 'Tracker' - a man whose father was a soldier, but trained his son how to kill, and survive in the wilderness, be stealthy - in order that he would never have to kill. Now one of his proteges has gone rogue, and TLJ is brought out of retirement to track him down, meeting along the way the FBI agent played by Connie Nielsen.The concept is a good one, if unoriginal. The idea of the tracker is fascinating, and as the extras on the DVD show, not without basis in fact - but the execution is a mixed bag.On the plus side, the knife fighting scenes have a gritty fast moving realism to them that has rarely been seen. This is one of the movies big attractions. On the minus side, the movie feels like it has been chopped up, and pieces gone missing. Even the deleted scenes only give a hint to some of the directions the movie was going. There is a cynicism about Americas military here, similar to Friedkins last movie Rules of Engagement, but whatever message comes along with that has thinned out along the way. The roles the actors play do not leave the actors room to flesh out and inhabit their characters. Connie Nielsen does her best, which is pretty darn good, in a woefully underwritten role which seems in the end to serve little useful purpose.On the whole though this is an edge of the seat chase movie, set in breathtaking, if chilly, scenery in Oregon and British Columbia, and should not disappoint. Just dont expect to remember much about it in a month or two.3 and a half stars! I rounded up to 4 for the great fight choreagraphy.
A very funny, satirical, and time-capsule look at the 70s. This movie will loose some of it's original appeal and humor in the heightened atmosphere of the polically correctness of the 2000s. But this movie did break new ground in the days when we used to laugh at ourselves. On the other hand, some of the "skits" are on the stupid side and may turn off a few viewers
A visually astounding film that works on most levels it attempts. "The Cell" is a rather difficult film to classify. If you read the plot outline, "a psychotherapist journeys inside a comatose serial killer in the hopes of saving his latest victim", you might think it's a thriller with a touch of science fiction. But that doesn't really do this movie justice. There is a fantasy aspect within the sub-conscious minds that is stunning, with lavish visuals and incredible mind-tripping scenarios. There is drama as the aforementioned psychotherapist (played by Lopez prior to her becoming a solely romantic comedy component) makes contact with the child within and witnesses his terrifying upbringing. And there is most definitely a horror facet due to the sickening actions of the serial killer's evil persona. The movie attempts to function on many different levels and crosses genre boundaries at will. While I feel it ends up being a reasonably bizarre experience, I find it to be completely fascinating.Right from the opening credits, with Lopez riding a horse through the desert stunningly clothed in a white dress, you will know that you are in for a visual treat. Every time the audience leaves reality and follows her into the sub conscious depths of her "patients", they are guaranteed a feast of visual and aural delight. The costumes are wonderful creations of angles and colour. The camera leaves regularities at the door and traverses a world where up and down are the same. The characters become rulers of their own domains and transform into creatures worthy of such stature. If you don't enjoy anything else about "The Cell", you will surely be impressed with the work put into these scenes.The casting is top notch also. Jennifer Lopez is in her element here, utilizing her natural, compassionate and almost maternal sensibilities, while combining her own striking looks with the lush surroundings, makeup and costumes. She is incredibly sexy and I personally wish someone would find another role for her outside of the rom-com world she has been typecast into that would allow her to experiment further. Vince Vaughn is fairly convincing as an FBI agent that will do anything to save the life of a young woman. But it is without a doubt Vincent D'Onofrio that has the biggest impression here. It's an extremely difficult role as he is required to bring out multiple emotions within the viewer. We are disgusted at his actions, yet sympathetic towards him due to the trauma he has experienced during his life. He looks magnificently powerful within his realm, yet insecure and vulnerable within the real world. It's a great performance from an underrated actor.While "The Cell" doesn't work as well on every level it ambitiously attempts (some of the actions of the characters are not believable) and while it is all based on some fairly flimsy scientific logic, it is an occasionally shocking, visually astounding head trip that rewards multiple viewings
Wow! What a fun movie!. A fun movie all around! Winona Ryder and Ethan Hawke are definately the standout stars! Eventhough it's basically a romance movie it still rocks the house! I looooove the gen X 90's feeling it has to it. It really took me back. Lalaine's desire to hustle money was a great learning lesson, too. I also think that she picked the best one in the end. But, the best thing about Reality Bites is it's great filming location. H-TOWN! Makes me sooooo proud to be from here
Absolutely fascinating!. I watched this DVD set when I checked it out from the library where I work as a librarian. I found it so fascinating that I bought the set, knowing that I will watch it many times. The set is so chock full of information that you can't possibly absorb it all at once. David Attenborough is an absolute master of this type of educational documentary. I highly recommend watching this set, even if you just borrow it from your local public library
First-Rate Mystery Thriller That Floors You With Real Shocks. A group of seemingly unconnected characters become stormstayed at a remote motel, where one by one, they begin to disappear.  Sounds familiar but promising; while the promise is more than fulfilled though, the familiarity is not, as a classic kind of idea gives way to one of the most original and twist-filled movies around.  It's astonishing how cavalier the treatment of this movie was when it first came out, regarding its genuinely shocking ending - I had the misfortune of inadvertently reading the ending in a small ad prior to its DVD release!  Even with advance knowledge of the outcome, though, it was still astounding - I can only imagine how jaw-dropping it must be to witness it not knowing.  Fantastic suspense; great characterization as played by a cast of well-knowns including John Cusack, Amanda Peet, Rebecca DeMornay and Ray Liotta; excellent production values; and total non-telegraphing of the plot combine to make "Identity" one of the greatest mystery shockers of all time.  If you don't know the ending, do yourself a favor and see this one as soon as possible - the turns are some of the most unexpected ever.  Even if you do know the gist of it, don't hesitate to see it - it'll still deliver many times over.  Indispensable for fans of mystery, drama, horror, or thrillers
the secert of roan inish. excellent family movie o nudity o profanity all around viewing for all ages
Docu-underdogs. It's a testament to how powerful this movie is that I didn't care in the slightest about the subject matter, and yet still was very emotionally affected by the trials and errors of these two kids.  I've always viewed sports as that thing that I do to have fun, and I stopped playing once people started taking it so seriously that it became too competitive to be fun.But seeing these two boys drive themselves through troubles with funds, injuries, and scholastics in order to pursue their one dream is very inspiring.  It's yet another work that makes your typical normal middle-class life seem banal in light of the accomplishments and struggles of the underdogs.Basically, it's like watching all of those millions of "underdog sports" movies, except this one has the added tension of being real: these kids can fail at any moment, and sometimes a last-second basket gets missed.  In a way it displaces all of an entire genre of sports movies and makes it only necessary to watch this one, one that is real, has real characters, has real dialog, and has real risk.--PolarisDi
Mysterious symbols?. Ok, I understand the male and female symbols used on the movie logo.Those represent the male and female viewpoints of the main two characters.They are the traditional "Mars" and "Venus" symbols representing masculinity and femininity.I also understand the last symbol representing "infinity", a never-ending loop symbolizing an ideal marriage that will last forever. Or maybe the propagation of "eternal life" by the offspring of the parents carrying on their genes into eternity.But what is to be made of the star and dagger symbol???Are these symbols somehow representing a conflict of religious values?(The Star of David representing Judaism and a cross representing Christianity)I haven't seen the movie in years but I don't remember a conflict in religious beliefs being part of the plot.Please also forward your thoughts to VBoston at aol.com.
Worthwhile. This unusal drama takes the viewer to a place where the dead visit their past life. In this movie Michelle Pfeiffer convincingly plays a ghost that visits her husband on moonlit nights at their beach house where she accidentally was killed.  Her husband, played by Peter Gallager, is clearly still hung up over his wife as displayed when he celebrates their anniversary even though Michelle is dead.  Claire Danes plays her emotionally confused daughter that also has issues with her parent's apparent continual relationship beyond the grave. Overall it was a visually stimualting and heart warming movie, that's worthwhile to watch even if the pace is a bit slow at times
Superb -- Then and Now. My wife and I watched McCabe and Mrs. Miller tonight, some thirty-four years after the first time.  It's all still fresh, the mud and ugliness of a new town in turn of the century west, the inarticulate missed connections of love between the two protagonists, McCabe's isolation in the town he made and Leonard Cohen's weary soundtrack scoring it all.  Despite many moments of humor, there is still no doubt for a minute that this West is headed for a tragic ending.  And when it comes, in a fortuitous snowstorm, it is a brilliantly choreographed one-on-three quarter-hour showdown.  (Cold Mountain's climax from a couple years ago is, I now realize with this refreshed viewing of McCabe, a pale carbon copy of Altman's work.)  Nashville will always be my favorite Altman but he was certainly in peak form here as well.  Quibbles:  you'll strain your eyes and ears.  Many of the scenes are shot very darkly and the soundtrack is frequently low and muddy.
Beautiful. Incredible scenery, wonderful depiction of Michner's historic epic.  Must for your classic CD collection
INDEED!. Very,VERY good stuff. I have been a fan of the (shall we say..)loud stuff for quite some time.Everybody gets a turn at bat. In the 70's it was The Saints, The Nils, The Buzzcocks,Ramones,Pistols,Clash,Handsome Dick Manatoba and the gang....the whole hybrid thrash/political/sex starved/straight edge -Bad Brains,Black Flag,Husker Du,Minor Threat,GBH,Fear,Circle Jerks,Anti System,Misfits,Scream and so on.I love the film because it had heart and it had an insight on its own implosion. I happen to like a lot of the bands that were on this tape(I am from NY BTW)The Posies needed to be grouped in there because they played with (and are friends with) Nirvana, which brings me to my next comment...If you don't like the sound--"FINE"-but when you are happy because someone is dead,you are a messed up person. If you like the Hollies,good for you. I like their stuff as well,but to wish death upon someone because you think the movie "sucks" is absolute rubbish.These bands kick ass on their own terms and did not ask to be filmed. I for one am happy they were
Great cast, Great script, Great movie. A solid script backed up by a great cast, John Cusack, Ray Liotta, John c. McGinley, Alfred Molina, Amanda Peet and more, are all outstanding. Brilliantly directed by James Mangold who also directed Copland, Girl Intrerupted and Walk The Line, this is one of the best thrillers I have ever seen. To say too much about the script would possibly give it away, but in the style of the Agatha Christie's novels 'Ten Little Indians' and  'Murder on the orient express', where people start dying in suspicious circumstances and later they find out they are all connected in some way. In this movie we have ten complete strangers stranded at a desert motel for the night. Sure enough people start getting killed, there is a lot of finger pointing and plenty of twists along the way to keep the audience engaged. The music score is excellent and perfectly captures the mood of the whole movie. Special features include bonus trailers, an on the set documentary and 2 very informative and interesting commentaries. One by the director and one by the writer, the latter being the better of the two. The disc features both cinema and DVD versions, although the DVD version only includes 2 extra scenes that last no longer than 30 seconds each. The only fault I have of the movie is that it seems too much time was spent in the first half of the movie bringing the characters together and laying a foundation forcing the ending to seem rushed through to conclude the movie within the 90 minutes, instead of the film being possibly edited longer. All up though, one of the best thrillers you will ever see. I have seen it many times and it is still good even when you know the ending.
One of the Finest Films Ever Produced. I saw Career Girls when it was released several years ago, and I am buying the video because the film has been re-playing in my brain ever since.  Career Girls, like Secrets and Lies, is slice-of-life filmmaking at its  very best. There is not one wasted frame in the film, and for every moment  that is grim, there are two that amuse, stimulate and uplift. This film  should be on the top-ten list of every intelligent film buff, or for that  matter of any one who enjoys timeless works of art
The Nun's Story. Audrey Hepburn is one of my favourite movie stars & her portrayal of a nun is wonderful.We are taken into the world behind the convent walls to follow her journey to becoming a nun with all it's challenges  to the decision to remain a nun or join the resistance.
FUNNY. THIS MOVIE IS REALLY FUNNY! STEVE MARTIN AND GOLDIE HAWN WORK REALLY WELL 2GETHER. THIS COMEDY KEPT ME INTRESTED FROM BEGINNING TO END. I ENJOYED IT ALOT
Delightful Sitcom Bears Ozu's Depth and Then Some. Flatulence seems to be an odd way of lending a framework to a film, but leave it to filmmaking master Yasujiro Ozu to use it as a metaphor for the meaninglessness of "small talk" between people who cannot be candid with one another. The title of this 1959 movie, "Ohay (Good Morning)", is indeed the salutation but also from Ozu's perspective, a symbolic expression of how the Japanese avoid confrontation and put a strong value on etiquette. One of Ozu's late period color films, this is a very cute comedy which on the surface, seems like an extended episode of "Leave It to Beaver" especially in exhibiting the speedy Americanization of Japan since WWII. Even the color palette seems to evoke the muted McCarthy-era colors of the Universal comedies release around the same time. What remains consistent are Ozu's signature visual compositions - the use of the hillside to place the horizon in the middle of the frame, the use of silhouettes against the hillside, the movement of figures darting between the identical homes.Set in a shoebox-tight housing community in Tokyo, the plot seamlessly interweaves the activities of five households - four of the more traditional variety and the fifth, a young beatnik couple who has the prized possession of the neighborhood, a TV set, which draws all the children in like clockwork after school. In the meantime, the housewives discover their association dues are missing and in "Peyton Place"-style, rumors swirl that the culprit is the woman who just bought a washing machine. Further subplots involve an unemployed English teacher, who can only speak banalities to the woman he loves; an older unemployed man who habitually gets drunk at the local bar and can't find his own home since they all look alike; and the funniest about two young brothers, the older particularly obstreperous in furiously sharing his all-too-perceptive observations of the adults - and practicing a strike of silence when their parents refuse to buy a TV set. Of course, that doesn't prevent the brothers and their friends from playing competitive rounds of "pull my finger" - a tap on the forehead yields a forced fart.The performances are charming and quite undemanding with several members of Ozu's regular troupe present - Chishu Ryu and Kuniko Miyake (the father and older son's wife in "Tokyo Story") as the put-upon parents of the TV-demanding brothers; Haruko Sugimura (the petty daughter in "Tokyo Story") as the accused dues pilferer; and Toyoko Takahashi (the Onomichi neighbor in "Tokyo Story") as another of the gossipy housewives. As the young people unable to articulate their feelings for each other, Keiji Sada is the English teacher and Yoshiko Kuga is the boys' shy aunt, who couriers the documents for translation. And as the brothers, 13-year old Koji Shitara plays Minoru and seven-year old Masahiko Shimazu is Isamu, the latter particularly adorable when mimicking his older brother. This movie is certainly not in the class of "Tokyo Story" or "Floating Weeds", but I doubt if Ozu intended it to be. It's just a gentle, well-coordinated, sometimes hilarious poke at Japanese cultural traditions, a parable masquerading as a family comedy. Personally this is the Ozu film I can relate to the most since it speaks to my generation of Japanese-born Americans. The DVD package from the Criterion Collection is surprisingly sparse - no audio commentary, no trailer - but the video transfer and sound quality are excellent
Un box Revisited. This Amazon unbox is not fully developed or has a lot of bugs in it. They should pull it until they get the bugs ironed out. Could not download all of the movie i ordered and now it is gone from my computer and I don't see how to download it again.Update: Most of the problems I experienced were with my Sattelite connection. After 175 MB they start to throttle the speed way down. I upgraded and this helped. I can now download large movies but only in 350mb bites each 4 hours. If you are having trouble read your sattelite "fair access" policy
Entertaining camp classic is enjoyable "sand and sandals" epic... MARIA MONTEZ, JON HALL and SABU made some very entertaining Technicolor "sand and sandals" epics at Universal and this DVD restoration showcases them in brilliant Technicolor.It's strictly Saturday afternoon matinee stuff, nothing to really ponder in the way of complex plots--just the usual good vs. evil with Hall coming to the rescue of beautiful princess Montez in her usual damsel in distress kind of role.Exquisitely photographed on desert sands, it's exotic fun fare for adults and children with lots of eye candy to keep things interesting. TURHAN BEY is effective in a brief role but it's Montez and Hall who keep the story moving along at a lively pace. Well worth viewing and nostalgic fun for fans of the Universal series starring this trio of stars
Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST!. The Immortal Yi Soon Shin is the BEST drama I have seen ever. Korean, American, doesn't matter! This is better than anything I have ever seen on TV or in the movies. Hollywood cannot touch this one! Kim Myoung Min(Yi Soon Shin) is outstanding in this!(no wonder he won the 2005 KBS BEST ACTOR AWARD FOR IYSS)It starts from when he was a child to his adulthood and can be emotional, funny, sad, and can make you angry!! The numerous obstacles and prejudices this man had to overcome and then always bounced back with no complaint because of the love of his country is phenomenal!! He put his country above all else and Kim Myoung Min did a great job of portraying that!My whole family, kids and all, watched this with me and loved it!I can see why Yi Soon Shin is Korea's hero and why other countries teach his methods
Edge Of Your Seat. I saw this in the theater when it first came out. Had to have a copy because it is so gripping. Look at world events in the middle east today and you will appreciate this film even more
Adrift on the Prairie. In 1958, a kill-happy Charlie Starkweather and his 13 year-old girlfriend Caril Ann Fugate came boiling out of high plains Nebraska to terrorize a section of the country that seldom appears on the 6 o'clock news. Behind, they left a trail of 11 dead bodies. If Charlie saw you, he killed you with no more thought than throwing away a gum wrapper. In the slumberland of 1950's suburbia, it was almost as if Beaver Cleaver had gone mad. So what  was the point of all the merciless blood-letting. Malick's terrific little movie makes the point that in fact there was no point. It really amounted to something to do. A way to escape a dead-end job with no prospects, no respect, and who knows, maybe other teen-agers would make a comparison with that reel rebel idol James Dean. In a bit of cultural perversity, it seems Starkweather succeeded. The night of his execution, young people gathered outside the prison gates. In his own way, he did make the movies, just like his idol.This is a disturbing film that thoroughly deglamorizes the two fugitives and is a long, long way from Penn's "Bonnie and Clyde". Kit (Martin Sheen) and Holly (Sissy Spacek) are not just callow kids; they're dull, unimaginative, and barely aware of the gravity or consequences of what they do. Holly lives in a detached world, where her story-book narration contrasts vividly with the mayhem that surrounds them. She shows no tears or remorse for her slain father, creating instead little fantasies about a rollercoaster ride with a "hell-bent type boy". It's all really just a fairy-tale dream, after which she'll wake up and go to the prom. Boyfriend Kit Carruthers has all the moral sensibility of a happy-go-lucky clam. He kills because he really can't think of anything else to do. Besides, how else could such a hopeless dead-ender  become an outlaw legend in his own time, marking the spot of his capture with an improvised rock pile. There's absolutely nothing here to romanticize, and it's to Malick's credit that he doesn't.Too bad Malick disappeared from movie-making. He had a rare alertness as to how the natural world shapes people's behavior. Here, Holly and Kit are adrift on the vast empty prairie of the horizonless Midwest (actually, southeastern Colorado). The dreary landscape stretches out to a nowhere that mirrors the fugitives' own inner emptiness and existential void. At least the act of fleeing provides proverbial "meaning" to an otherwise barren existence. There are many nice touches. Notice how Kit and Alan Vint's police deputy develop a budding friendship-- just a couple of good- ole'-boys who might have gone hunting together, except one of them doesn't shoot rabbits. In fact, the states of Nebraska and Wyoming treated the spree like a Soviet invasion, calling out the National Guard to reassure panicked civilians. Malick brings in the Guard formations casually and impressively at film's end, when the real impact trailing behind these two malt-shop fugitives is finally revealed. In 1958, wholesale killing was still the prerogative of adults only.Over the years a number of films have been based on this mindless binge. In my book, Malick's remains the most compelling
Pretty Pretty.... I love this movie. Maybe it's because it seemed so risque as a kid, or maybe it's because Jane hates it. Whatever, it's great fun. Sure the script leaves much to be desired. And yea, the special effects suck. It was 1968, what do you want? But that only adds to its charm. It's a funny movie, more on the silly side. This is true camp and if you like campy flicks, this one has to be in your collection
Never explain, never apologise..... This is yet one more brilliant film in the Lynch universe.  I've loved everything he's done (even Twin Peaks: Firewalk With Me), and he seems to get better with each film.  This film was originally a TV pilot (!), but it was rejected by ABC as "too weird".  That really isn't too surprising.  So David got additional funds, and made into one of his best films.  I don't want to hear any explanations of what actually occured in the film.  All I know is that it did occur, and I felt it, whatever it was.  That's good enough for me and the rest of the world.  Even Roger Ebert liked this film, even though I think it was because the majority of critics adored it, and Ebert didn't want to be in constrast to the crowd (Ebert has always been hostile to Lynch's work).  The performances are superb all around, with kudos going to Justin Theroux as "the director", who has a great scene with studio heads about "the girl".  Love the golf club!  I'm looking forward to Inland Empire, a 3 hour helping from Mr. Lynch.  Lovely.
"I luuurve it, I loave it, I luff it",. This story of three sisters, their lives, loves, and struggles is delight from the beginning to the end. Along with three unforgettable women, Hannah (Mia Farrow, the eldest sister, a devoted wife and mother, a loyal sister to sensual Lee (Barbara Hershey) and artistic, neurotic and clueless Holley (Diane Wiest, a perfect match to Allen's characters), we meet their actors parents. Maureen O'Sullivan, "Tarzan's Jane", Mia Farrow's real life mother plays the flirting and drinking mother of three sisters. There are also three men in the sisters' lives: Elliot (Michael Caine), Hannah's husband who understands how great Hannah is but he is lusting after Lee, who is with a much older, wiser, talented but misanthropic and isolated artist Frederick. Here is also Mickey (Woody Allen) Mickey, the former husband of Hannah, a hypochondriac TV producer who lives in constant fear of death and tries to find meaning of life. All stories interweave effortlessly and seamlessly showing Allen's unique writing gift. As almost always in Allen's films, there are two important characters, his favorite place on Earth, Manhattan, NY and the music he adores. And as always, they add to the many many delights of this wonderful, sparkling, clever, ironic, sweet, funny and dramatic miracle.Excellent!
Lighten up, people. .C'mon, people. Lighten up. I'm not a big fan of musicals, but this is a good movie. I do agree the use of colored filters was grossly overworked. It's like garlic: a little is a little good; a lot is not a lot of good, and the director definitely over-did it. But to criticize Rossano Brazzi's accent because it was Italian instead of French is being quite picky. He was supposed to lend a certain "continental" air to his role, and he did. And musicals are supposed to be fantasies of a sort, so you have to use some imagination. If you want realism, you shouldn't look to a musical, after all, how many times have you been around a group of people in real life who suddenly broke into song and dance, all perfectly choreographed, of course?The thing I found absolutely DUMB, DUMB, DUMB was the anti-racism message. I thought it was hokey in 1959 when I first saw this movie, and I still do. Neither incident made sense. First, we have sweet and petite Nellie Forbush from Little Rock, AR, falling in love with a Frenchman; but when she finds out he was once married to a native woman (now deceased) and the two kids she adores were the native woman's, a racist streak a mile wide goes up her spine. Kinda hard to believe, even for 1959.Then there is Lt. Joe Cable from Philadelphia, PA. He meets and falls instantly (if not sooner) in love with an absolutely gorgeous native girl. He sweeps her into his arms, sings "Younger Than Springtime", and kisses her. Later he makes other visits to her, and they swim in a swimming hole, hugging and kissing underwater. There not being any jewelry stores on the islands, he gives her his family heirloom watch that his father and grandfather carried in prior wars. Now, one would naturally think this was leading up to a marriage proposal, and it did, but not by Cable  . . .  by Liat's mother. He suddenly realizes  . . . guess what!!! . . . HER EYES ARE SLANTED and their children will have slanted eyes! Dang that racist streak!Although these inconsistencies don't make sense to me, perhaps I should use my imagination; after all it is a musical.The one thing I found offensive is the notion that only whites can be racists. But that's Hollywood . . . always beating up on its own who made it rich.I checked this movie out of the local library. You might check yours if you decide to watch it. I'm not sure I'd buy it.
Still lovely. I love this little story of the relationship between two sisters. The performances are heartfelt and the score is haunting. It still gets me :
Absolutely riveting!. No this isn't Courtney of Friends, but once you get past that - this is MUST WATCH TV!  While the show has content that can be shocking, it is so well written and edited it all fits.  It is definitely a sequential drama and makes much more sense watching the episodes back to back.  That fleshes out the characters so you start to care about and understand them.  Courtney shows her acting chops best at those moments when she is silent and lets her expressions say it all because sometimes her dialog is a bit stilted.  The best character is the functional schizophrenic photographer, Don Konkey.  He is exhibits an endearing combination of weirdness, loyalty, insight and sweetness to become the break-out star of this series.  If you only watched one episode and wrote this one off - go back and watch a few back to back and you may just find yourself addicted.
Excellant Collection. This is excellent DVD video collection. Very good picture quality and sounds. Worth to purchase it. Do not think twice
hot, hot, hot. Jeremy Irons has an affair with his son's fiancee Juliette Binoche, and becomes obsessed with her. Great erotic scenes, though not a lot of skin is shown, follow his obsession which leads to their affair being discovered, then tragedy.  The ending sees Irons' character as withdrawn and alienated from everyone, wondering: was it worth it?
The other side of Love. This is a pretty amazing movie, that does get graphic in nature and crosses the line in parts of what is art and what is not. Very good story in which Caroline Ducey goes out looking for love when her boyfriend, Sagamore Stevenin refuses to pay any attention to her. Caroline's character finds love in many different forms, men and means. From picking up a lover at a bar (Rocco Siffredi), to finding an older man into S&M, to having a quickie on a set of stairs by a total stranger (which I think is the best segment). A great film from Catherine Breillat. Also check out her 2003 masterpiece, 'Anatomy of Hell', which also stars Rocco Siffredi.
Great book plot adapted to video. I had read "The Winds of War" before I saw the miniseries. It is not usual for a movie script to convey what makes a book great but this not the case with "The Winds of War". Robert Mitchum plays a great role as a naval officer who sees himself, due to incredible multi-language capability, serving in naval intelligence in Europe and visiting the hot spots of that continent during the late 1930`s; like Nazi Germany, Fascist Italy, Soviet Union, United Kingdom ect. His younger son`s role plays out like the young are and how blinded they can be by love. His wife and her uncle roles are well played and show us those people who still think that a river will not be flooded even though they can hear the water rushing down its course. All the roles are well played. A good miniseries.
Karloff shines in duo role. Karloff once again shows us what an incredible actor he was in playing both brothers in this classic. Well thought out story and good supporting cast make this one a classic. Rivals Universal's monster movies of the same era
A very great Film: The Live Performers are Excellent ! *****. This film takes you back to a time you have lived in before or wished you had. The groups and performers in this film are simply outstanding * Little Richard is at his all time best !! He may have never looked any better than when he was in this film * Of course Jane Mansfield is perfect for the role. She was quite the presence throughout and captures your heart with her warm down home character that only wants to settle down and have a home. If your nostalgic though - This is the film for you - The soundtrack is a real 5 star production !! Highly recommend you view this and draw your own opinion. It isnt really a dramatic masterpiece but it is like A Hard Days Night was for it's capture of time - for the Fab four - This film allows a similar feeling of nostalgia in that sense - A place in history when the performers are on - Thank you ****
Probably the Best Drama Series Ever Made. I came across the Immortal Yi Soon Shin by accident while flicking through some satellite channels. Up to this time I had never heard of it, but immediately I was intrigued by the martial art fight scenes and directing. As I continued to watch (it had English subtitles fortunately) I became enthralled by the acting, plot and historical theme. With a little detective work, I learned that I had caught one of the early episodes of a series with over 100 episodes. I told my wife how good it was, and after we watched an episode together, she and I both became die-hard fans and tried to never miss one night of watching it. We managed to watch nearly all of the episodes and we both agree that it is the greatest thing we have ever seen on television. Nearly every episode was better than 90% of the Hollywood movies out there. If you like, action, drama, amazing three-dimensional characters with incredible actors, intersting history, and some of the best writing I have seen on television, or anywhere for that matter, check this out
A Very Good And Suspenseful Thriller!. I remember watching this film when it first came out in a theatre in Manhattan Beach, California. [During a time when you got two films for the price of one] I remember how fascinating the film was, and wondering if microbes were that bad. Not understanding everything the film discussed, I did know that something terrible had happened in a town in New Mexico. Everybody but a baby and an old man had been killed. But why did these two humans survive? [No Spoilers]Moreover, when the Doctors who are assembled at a secret bio-hazard facility, courtesy of the U.S. Air Force, try and figure out what danger Earth is in due to this new microbe, I sat riveted to my seat. I was thrilled at how the directors and special effects people were able to make a film that even a young teenager could enjoy. In their race to contain a microbe that has been picked up by a satellite falling back to earth, the actors as scientists in the film created an atmosphere of suspense and dread that stayed with me even after I had left the theatre with my older brothers.The way in which the film is handled is intelligent. There is no silly dialogue and used up time. These scientists make you feel as if the entire human race is going to be determined by either their success or failure. And that is why this film has stood the test of time. There is no CGI in this film, yet when you see the microbe and the computer systems at work, you get a feeling that this is really happening. At least it felt that way as a young boy. This film is highly recommended. [Stars: 4.5
Informative. Nice little video for my Zen during my long wait at the doctor's office.  Confucius overcame many difficulties
Funny,Funny,Funny. Even though this is about 4 years old, it is extremely halarious.  I've been waiting to see a good stand up comedy. The first 15 min is just one hilarious hit after another. I love this guy
"How's Jesus look to you now Bob?". This is a classic western and one of Sam Peckinpah's greatest. I found the dialouge and the chemistry between James Coburns Pat Garrett and Kris Kristoffersons Billy the Kid to be mesmerizing. Kristofferson was very young in this part and fairly inexperienced as an actor but it doesn't show one bit. The costumes and the period are portrayed perfectly. The characters are dirty, crash, and wild. There are many colorful characters portrayed by a lot of famous character actors that you have probably seen in a ton of movies. Slim Pickens is also here in a brief but memorable role. The Kid and Garretts friendship is what holds the movie together and even though they don't show their early outlaw years together they don't have to. You can feel that the two have a long relationship and that their friendship runs very deep.Check this movie out if you want to see a great western and just a plain great piece of movie making
Is Rob Schneider Funny? Yes, he's very very funny. Rob Schneider and his sense of the absurd really resonatewith me.. some people might not find him funny or findhis comedy to be somewhat degrading... to me... this justmakes him that much funnier!!
tati looks like a 1950s chuck jones cartoon -- but thats good!. jacques tati takes on the modern world in his second sally as the perpetually bewildered mr hulot. while the movie is very funny in its pokes at modernism (highlighted by the house of hulots sister with its newfangled "conveniences" and its hilarious spouting dolphin fountain), it drags some of its jokes out a tad too long, and several scenes (notably the garden party) would have benefited by judicious paring. still, the movie demands to be seen by anyone who is a fan of classic comedy.
Awesome. The Lord of the Rings movies made superstars out of dozens of actors and actresses.  Many have gone on to star in movies that made lots of money, but without the awards and critical recognition of the LOTR movies.  Not so with Viggo Mortensen.  Right after LOTR he followed with this awesome adventure story by Disney.  Coming out the summer after Pirates of the Caribbean, this was supposed to be Disney's next big live-action, summer adventure hit.  Unfortunately, it flopped at the box office.  Luckily, it has made a comeback on the DVD market, which is where this reviewer saw it.  All in all, it is a great movie, and probably one of the best live-action movies Disney has produced in a long while; judging from its ratings here on amazon and on imdb.com.In short, this movie is about Frank Hopkins, half-white, half-native american horserider who is mired in middle-age guilt and self remorse.  Along comes an opportunity for a change in scenery - a trip to the Arabian desert for a race.  Frank takes the challenge with his horse Hidalgo and of they go.  The race across the Arabian desert tests both rider and horse, and introduces them to a cast of characters that only an accomplished movie studio like Disney could have created.  We have the strong-willed girl full of innocence and inner strength, a fierce father and tribe leader who suffers no insults to his honor or intelligence, a backstabbing fellow racer who smiles until the final death, a seductive beauty willing to win at any costs, an arrogant prince with no moral bounds, etc, etc...  It all reminds our protagonist of his days in Montana!  During the course of the race, which Frank and Hidalgo win of course; both of them are tested to the limit.  The movie ends on a triumphal note for both.  The rider redeems his guilt by freeing Hidalgo from human ownership forever, and freeing his consciensce of past betrayals.The soundtrack is awesome, the cinematography is great, the dialogue is realistic, and for once, a movie set in a foreign land that actually uses actors from that area speaking the language of that area!  My compliments to Disney and the cast and crew of this movie.  I highly recommend it to all audiences from teenagers on up
The One N Only -Gigglez. I love this movie i can relate to it in soo many ways...thats where i got my nickname(giggles).I can really relate to Sad Girl .My friends and i all love this movie cant stop watching it..we all relate to it, like mousie,sadgirl,whisper,sleepy,ernesto,blueeyes.We enjoy it.Every one should see it because the stuff that happen do happen in real life
Great for kids or adults. This movie was a cute movie for the whole family. I would suggest it to add to your holiday collection
From Angst to Art. Vincent Van Gogh is wildly popular today in ways he could have never imagined:  his work is on post cards, in massive coffee table books, and on T-shirts, and he's even venerated in a pop song by Don MClean.  Thankfully, this film by Paul Cox presents a more realistic view of Van Gogh, reminding us of the artist's anguish and the very great difficulty he had coming to terms with his sadness and inadequacies.  Cox shows Van Gogh's need to give shape to his suffering through art.  Van Gogh's life is rendered through his own words, from his letters, read by John Hurt, and through still imagery of the artist's sketches and paintings.  These still images are interspersed with gorgeous nature shots, interiors, and the occasional effective recreation of spaces that inhabit Van Gogh's paintings.  A really big bonus to this DVD is the interview with Paul Cox, in which you see how Cox's life somewhat parallels Van Gogh's in terms of childhood unhappiness, loneliness, and the need to express himself through imagery.  This interview will appeal especially to artists because it is so inspiring.Cox reminds the viewer what art IS and why it is created and explains to us why there is so much mediocrity in film.  Indeed, Cox's views on the need to rise above mediocrity are very similar to Van Gogh's.
"Hiroshima, Mon Amour" reflects image and sound, past and present; the actual and the remembered. His film was a bit puzzling, but, at the same time, a compromise, a promise, a pledge to human society... It is too daring by its conventional moral standards, distinguished in the way it was done, written, made and executed... Alain Resnais does not neglect the blast of Hiroshima by wrapping it with a simple love-affair."Hiroshima, Mon Amour" is about the fortitude of man, with its mental and physical power... Alain Resnais and his writer-collaborator Marguerite Duras combined a love story with an anti-bomb story... They carry out the horror of Hiroshima and the sorrow of a lost first love...Hiroshima is a tragedy that shocks us, while the story of love in Nevers makes us cry. The story of Nevers does not trivialize the story of Hiroshima... We gasp at the tragedy of Hiroshima as we weep over the tragedy at Nevers... We contemplate a cosmic and a personal problem at the same time."Hiroshima, Mon Amour" is a kind of film that has great technical ability, illustrating hypothesis plus fact...There is a close-up of Emmanuelle Riva , who has just glanced at Eiji Okada, asleep... Suddenly there is a brief flash-cut of the body of a wounded young man lying in approximately the same position in another place. Resnais' camera moves like a stream from the present to the past and back to the present... It cuts back to Riva's face, and then back to Okada asleep, and in that split second the technique of the subliminal flash cut, used to describe a character's state of mind, is born. This cut is the key to the film, for it is the man whom she calls 'Hiroshima' who reminds her of her lover at Nevers. It is the tragedy of his race that reminds her of the small tragedy of her life...This identification is carried through in the most neurotic moments of her recitative, when she looks at the Japanese and speaks to him as if he were her German lover of fourteen years before..."Hiroshima, Mon Amour" reflects image and sound, past and present; the actual and the remembered; Hiroshima (a city of neon) and Nevers (a city of gray stone); the personal and the cosmic; a man and a woman; concern for the individual and concern for mankind... Nice film especially for Duras fans.
A &quot;greatest hits&quot; compilation for Monty Python. This is Monty Python at their very best.  Very little of the amusing but confusing sketch comedy that can be so hit or miss with American audiences.  This is a collection of their  material that appeals to the general  public.  This needs to be re-released so that people can get a chance to  see how delightful this comedy troupe was
A documentary snapshot of Russian military life. Some may be looking for deep symbolism in "100 Days".One reviewer called it surreal.It is very realistic actually, almost a documentaryabout a real problem in Soviet and Russian society:low morale and brutal treatment of recruits in anArmy dogged by a failed war in Afghanistan and thecollapse of the Soviet Union. To this day today'sRussian military has faced accusations of atrocitiescommitted in Grozny, Chechnya, which had beentragic for both Russians and Chechens.There have been Red Army scandals involving thedeaths of young men at the hands of criminallysadistic officers and NCOs. Drug abuse, alcoholand even male prostitution have been known to occuron Army bases.In one incident, commanding officers got recruitsto perform sexual services for a third party whilethe officers took payment. There have been rapesand desertion and suicide is not any surprisingevent.Just to escape the stultifying army environment,recruits had been known to get high off theirboot polish. Many have gone blind from suchdangerous activity.Viewers of "100 Days" who attempt to make sense ofall the nudity and strange broken down landscapeshouldn't trouble themselves too much. Such placesand activities literally did exist and were not suchuncommon sites around 1990.The boys rubbing eachother down nude is not justsome bizarre symbolism. Men of all ages did andstill do rub eachother down in the age old Russiantradition of the "Banya" or communal bath and sauna.To some Westerners it may look "gay" but it reallyis a traditional Russian cultural phenomenon.The broken down, abandoned looking landscape wasnot a surreal movie set designed for effect. Sovietarmy bases were horribly dilapidated as much of Sovietsociety was at the point of collapse.The translations are indeed peculiar as one review pointsout.The original Russian title "Sto Dnej Do Prikaza" shouldactually be translated as "A Hundred Days 'Til Orders Arrive"(i.e. Orders to get discharged or move on to anotherplace)The producers maybe should have prefaced the film with somebackground on Soviet/Russian society and culture back in 1990so the realistic episodes of the film would not seem meaninglessand "surreal.
Gable Rules as Ford Looks On. Great to have MOGAMBO on DVD. It looks good. Not your usual John Ford film from my view. Clark Gable is the man and really he seems to have more effect on the look of this film.  Good loves story flows tailored for Gable no doubt. Good one in all.
Good clean fun. Boy, let me tell you, if you are trippin on some good acid, this movie will make perfect sense.  I was a little confused until Ben Franklin made his amazing cameo and tied the whole movie together.  With not-so-subtle references to child slavery and sexual abuse appearing all to often, it keeps the watcher guessing.  In closing, the only thing I enjoy more than watching this movie, is watching this movie on shrooms.  Thanks to this movie, I now know the true meaning of newyears
Un box Revisited. This Amazon unbox is not fully developed or has a lot of bugs in it. They should pull it until they get the bugs ironed out. Could not download all of the movie i ordered and now it is gone from my computer and I don't see how to download it again.Update: Most of the problems I experienced were with my Sattelite connection. After 175 MB they start to throttle the speed way down. I upgraded and this helped. I can now download large movies but only in 350mb bites each 4 hours. If you are having trouble read your sattelite "fair access" policy
VERY CLOSE. After watching this video I examined the Bible and it is very close to the scriptures in accuracy.  It helps give the Bible life so that you can see the reality of creation, and vividly picture these true events that occured thousands of years ago in our history.  This is truly a video the whole family can enjoy together
Quinn and Hayworth's Pasadoble remains one of the movie's best remembered moments... 'The Mark of Zorro' and 'Blood and Sand' confirmed Rouben Mamoulian's enduring concern with drama conveyed through movement of characters and camera... The former was a rousing, deliciously ironic swashbuckler; the latter an adaptation of Ibaez's story about a simple country boy whose success as a matador leads him into temptation and towards a violent early death... Rudolph Valentino had scored one of his biggest success with 'Blood and Sand' in 1922, and the same story served as a Tyrone Power vehicle nineteen years later...Color, and Mamoulian's almost choreographic direction, turned the motion picture into an exquisite melodrama, where all the passes and swirls of the bullring were vividly depicted: The parade of the bullfighters and their entourage, the race of the vicious predator into the arena, the matadors flashing their yellow and pink capes...Rita Hayworth blood-red lips and scarlet fingernails, contrast the cool colors of her Spanish mansion, and show her off to glittering advantage...In her sensuous screen Pasadoble with Anthony Quinn, she looks sensational in her rose evening gown, symbolic of the Spanish bullfight flavor...The arrogant and passionate dance, based on Flamenco dancing that characterizes the man as the matador and the lady as his red cape, is performed with style and surety... The colors, rose and green, are blended to perfection with the amazing prowess of an appealing couple in tune with the balanced perfection of shapes and the sweeping movements of Rita Hayworth...Quinn is perfect for redoing old Valentino roles... He always demonstrated his grace and remarkable agility on the dance floor... This sequence remains one of the movie's best remembered moments...Mamoulian begins the film with a 30 minute prologue, establishing the characters ten years before the main narrative...Juanillo, just a little boy with fire, vigorously illiterate but possessing his father's passion for bullfighting, is seen by night currently taking the bullfighting world by storm... Not least for his exceptional brave and agile style of fighting but also for his age... Juanillo adores the art of bullfighting... Hr runs off to Madrid with his boyhood friends, Manolo, Nacional Pablo and La Pulga...After winning a certain reputation as a 'flat-footed novillero,' Juan (Tyrone Power) returns years later to Seville to marry his childhood sweetheart, Carmen Espinosa (Linda Darnell - a voluptuous beauty with perfect complexion), and brings her to live in his luxurious home where he has installed his mother (Alla Nazimona) and his sister, Encarnacion (Lynn Bari).Then he goes on to become the 'first matador in Spain' showing his individual personality by the combination and variations of his passes... Juan brings the bull past his body with the elegance of a premier ballet dancer, making it seem effortless and beautiful...As his popularity climbs Juan's entourage of hangers-on increases joining his boyhood friends Nacional (John Carradine), Manolo de Palma (Anthony Quinn), La Pulga (Michael Morris), Pablo Gomez (Charles Stevens), Sebastian (William Montague), and his loyal dresser, Garabato (J. Carrol Naish) who left the ring just as he came in to it, 'without a peseta.'But all is not so perfect in the ranks of Juan's cuadrilla... Nacional is anxious to leave bullfighting for politics, and Manolo, jealous of Juan's success, wants to make his own name in the ring... And then there is the on-going feud Juan has been engaging in with Natalio Curro (Laird Cregar), the famous bullfight critic who had insulted the memory of his father...When Juan established himself as Spain's most important matador, Curro opportunistically affirms: 'At last Sevilla has a matador. The greatest matador of all history. The first man of the world. The day he was born, there was salt in the air, a great quantity of salt.'And at one of Juan's 'great afternoon', we are introduced to the stunning Doa Sol des Muire (Rita Hayworth) whose chief passion is bullfighting and, in particular, handsome matadors...The torrid Spanish beauty had little difficulty, in luring the new risen star away from his home...Falling under her tempting beauty, Juan begins an affair with her at the expense of both his faithful wife and his career... His skills as a matador go downhill and his bad attitude loses him all his once loyal friends...'Blood and Sand' is sensitively directed by Mamoulian and might be considered one of the greatest examples of Technicolor film-making... The film won an Oscar for Best Color Cinematography, and was nominated for Best Interior Set Decoration...
Refined but difficult. Rating and reviewing movies like these are often difficult for the average critic.  On one hand, they're done absolutely brilliantly done in ways that take one's breath away; on the other hand, how much credit can you give to a movie that is pure propaganda, especially propaganda for something the reviewer doesn't agree with?This "realistic re-enactment" of the events of October 25th, 1917, is actually anything but realism.  Instead, it is a harrowing and amazing Romantic experience.  This is not to say it's bad--it's brilliant!  The direction and editing on this film are much more refined than Eisenstein's previous and much-more-heralded film, Brenonsets Potyemkin (Battleship Potemkin), and it has a whole lot more symbolism and focus on literary devices.  His fast-paced cutting is not as disjunctive as previously; instead, it works to shock the viewer with the juxtapositions.  I don't think I shall ever get the quick back-and-forth cutting between that one soldier's face and the firing machine gun ever out of my mind.  It's just that powerful.This movie is so good, in fact, that it makes me proud to be a Bolshevik... and I'm not, not in any way or form!  How's that for being a powerful, well-done movie?  The Birth of a Nation didn't effectively make me proud to be a Klansman, for a comparison...Because of its intense political alignment, I can't see everyone appreciating this film.  There will always be those out there who say, "Ah, it's only Communist propaganda" (which is right) "so it's not even worth watching..." (which is wrong).  For those who are looking for a magnificent cinematic experience, however, this movie is a fine choice indeed.--PolarisDi
Rule of Law determines whether a Soldier is a barbarous or civilized. Defense argued, "Law does not exist in the Confederate prison.  Therefore, the Raiders are not guilty of breaking any law", "these are desperate times and desperate measures are required to survive", "only rebel law applies in the prison".   Outcries from other Union soldiers were heard, "we suffered the same hardships and did not yield to survival tactics.  What about us?"  Prosecution deflected the rebel law argument by appealing to justice stating there were certain rights and protections guaranteed to all men: 1. protection against murder 2. protection against theft.    The military jury found the six Raider leader guilty and the punishment affixed as death by hanging.  The union soldiers lived by law and law made the men civilized.  Mob rule only works while the majority tolerates the theft;  however, once intolerance levels are hit,  a violent revolution transpires.  The raiders could not fight the majority and probably would have all been murdered with out a trial.  However, the majority gained their whit and requested and were granted a trial to prosecute the Raiders.The "Great Escape" with McQueen probably took its plot from Andersonville.  The story line had a ton of similarities.Andersonville has a fair share of violence.   At one point the directors portrays the prisoners as Zoombies, in the land, of the walking dead.   Scurvy symptoms increased the graphic repulsiveness, in an attempt to balance the audience sympathy, abhorrence of the injustices, and despair of the troops.  Heroism abounds, leaders reject traitorous offers to defect, form their regiment, about face, and march away from on looking Confederate Admiral making offer.  Factually, 45,000 men were imprisoned and about 13,000 died from starvation, disease, and crime.  Inhuman treatment of prisoner included lack of drinkable water, over crowding of the prisoners, no prisoner exchange, and looting.  Andersonville has a fairly high entertainment value, as a civil war movie.  The characters were passionate, compelling, and captivating.
action, romance a winner. Bridget Fonda is outstanding in this role.  Good mix of action and romance.   I have recommended it to several friends and they all love it too.I also "love Nina".
AT LAST!!!. AT LAST!!! ( The Devils )is now available on DVD UNCUT!!!.You can buy it at www.xploitedcinema.com Enjoy!!!!UPDATEIN MY LAST REVIEW I STATED YOU CAN BUY (THE DEVILS) UNCUTAT XPLOITEDCINEMA.COM. SENSE I WROTE THAT I UNDERSTAND THEYMAY NO LONGER SELL IT. HOWEVER YOU CAN BUY IT AT www.dvdhorror.com  ENJOY!!!!
A pirate you can't help but love. This movie entertained me as a child and still does today. Suzanne Pleshette & Dean Jones are great, but the constant scene stealing (as always) is done by Peter Ustinov. His dialogue works well with the special effects that were available at the time. You might forget for a moment that he's a ghost and then the movie shows the perspective from everyone else. Suzanne Pleshette's character is trying her best not to fall in love with someone that might be crazy and can't help herself. If you enjoy Disney movies, this one will entertain everyone. I love it.
Funny,Funny,Funny. Even though this is about 4 years old, it is extremely halarious.  I've been waiting to see a good stand up comedy. The first 15 min is just one hilarious hit after another. I love this guy
Great video!. Another great Richard Scarry video.  This video teaches kids in a way that is interesting and fun for them...without being obnoxious for their parents!  We love it
"I need dogs". Free spirit Molly De Mora (Paula Marshall) is about to settle down and marry the conservative Keith Marks (James Denton) son of Senator Marks.There is just one caveat or maybe two. Molly wants to elope and warns Keith that the last thing he wants to do is to invite her feuding parents who have been divorced for 14 years.Warning not headed both father (Dennis Farina) and mother (Bette Midler) are forced to gather and nature takes it course. After an explosive confrontation we find where Molly gets her free spirit.This is where the fun begins as all the characters meet and mix to confront the situation.
Guaranteed to be one of the most thought-provoking films you've ever watched. There is little a reviewer can say about Ingmar Bergman's 1957 film DET SJUNDE INSEGLET ("The Seventh Seal") that hasn't already been said. Its plot of a knight playing chess with Death has been so widely alluded to or parodied that it securely has a place in the canon of classic films, and enough praise has been heaped on it that it's quite obviously a masterpiece.In spite of the inevitability of repetition, the film invites effusive comment. The struggles of the knight Antonius Block (Max von Sydow) to find meaning in his doomed life stands in the spotlight for most viewers on the first run throug, but Bergman's script is of such depth that there's always more thought-provoking facets to be found. Block is gripped by an existential crisis at the thought of death. His squire Jons (Gunnar Bjrnstrand) and the traveling couple and acting partners Jof and Mia (Nils Poppe and Bibi Andersson), on the other hand, each react differently to the mortal fate common to all. Which one should the viewer identify with? Or is it possible to find some other way of confronting the inevitable? Bergman claims that filming DET SJUNDE INSEGLET let him find peace, and if the film won't give comfort to all, it surely confronts all with a question that must be answered.Acting here is of the highest order. Gunnar Bjornstrand was commonly cast in severe, upright roles, for example as a priest in Bergman's later chamber film NATTVARDSGAESTERNA ("Winter Light"). Here, however, he plays a bawdy commoner who lives for wine, women, and song. While Bengt Ekerot generally continues the traditional portrayal of Death as a dark, threatening character, he adds just the right amount of droll humour to the role to comment on the Knight's search for meaning in an absurd world.And the climax, where the straightforward narrative fades and the theoretical musings of each character are made real, the Knight praying in torment and the Squire acting as his foil one last time but more convincingly than ever... well, it's a tour de force. One of the most memorable films I've ever seen, just like for so many of the rest of the reviewers here, DET SJUNDE INSEGLET is a must-see film
sound and picture quality is awful. buyers beware. I don't want to discuss about the movie. but the quality of the DVD was awfull. sound and picture both. picture quality was like that screener bootleg movies. criterion group unfortunately didn't do any restoration in this matter! and there is no special featues either. only movie perhaps direct from the original negavie and an english subtitle. that's all
Another underrated Billy Wilder sex comedy delight. I saw Billy Wilder's neglected KISS ME, STUPID (1964) two weeks ago on letterboxed DVD and cannot get it out of my head.  I have a special fondness for this movie that was panned by critics originally and condemned by the Catholic Legion of Decency.  So some of my readers will find this sex farce smutty and unfunny; it has a PG-13 rating.You can probably tell from these sentences whether you will enjoy KISS ME, STUPID, which was filmed in B&W Panavision:  in the desert town of Climax, Nevada, Orville J. Spooner (Ray Walston) and Barney Milsap (Cliff Osmond) run the local gas station, give piano lessons, and are failed songwriters; Felicia Farr is Orville's likeable and patient wife.  Walston and especially Osmond are riotously funny.  And Kim Novak (in one of her best roles) plays waitress (and prostitute) Polly the Pistol at the Belly Button Cafe.  Location filming, for all of my Department of Defense friends, was done at Twentynine Palms, California one or two years after Stanley Kramer and company tore up the place for IT'S A MAD, MAD, MAD,MAD WORLD.Many of Wilder's best comedies are adult masquerade sex farces, which is what this one also is.  Dean Martin (in a devastating self parody) basically plays himself to perfection.  His "Dino" is a Vegas entertainer with car trouble who gets waylaid in Climax and forced to listen to failed Gershwin songs (which are quite good, including "Oh the Live Long Day and the Long Lonely Night" and "Oh, Sophia, Be Mine") from Orville and Barney.The action gets hilarious (for me) when Polly becomes Dino's sex customer of sorts for the night, but later Dino ends up in Polly's trailer, where Mrs. Spooner is posing as Polly.  Unlike Wilder's flawed THE SEVEN YEAR ITCH (1955), where we don't believe Tom Ewell really sleeps with Marilyn Monroe, the sexual overtures are more satisfying here.  I believe that Dino does sleep with both Polly (at the Spooner home) and Mrs. Spooner (inside Polly's trailer).  In the cold light of dawn, as in the best Ernst Lubitsch masquerade farces, everyone goes back to their right partner and all eventually seems forgiven.Something about KISS ME, STUPID appeals to me, makes me laugh out loud as I watch it and listen to both Dean Martin's wisecracks and to the underrated (and previously unpublished) Gershwin songs, and especially enjoy Cliff Osmond's screwball dialogue.  All of the actors are wonderful and the script, by Wilder and Diamond, is refreshingly adult.  1964 was a time when the censorship board was starting to crumble.  The masquerade motif is skillfully handled, and the wide-screen compositions on DVD are excellent.KISS ME, STUPID is a wonderful and underrated comedy that certainly won't appeal to everyone, but I as least love it.  And if I make it sound funny, then it is probably an enjoyable Netflicks rental for you.
Sadness and Beauty. The Princess of Death loved one man - which is not allowed. Beautiful sounds enhance the beautiful scenes and lead you into the world consists of love, death, and life. The Princess of Death sacrificed herself for Orphee in the end. I cannot forget the final scene that she leaves
...When I was very small... This episode of Star Trek, "The Man Trap" is my earliest memory of what would become a lifelong enjoyment of the franchise. Truthfully, "The Man Trap" terrified me (I was maybe two, or three, although I am sure by that time the series was limping along in it's third season and I was seeing a repeat for the first time); Star Trek was considered "adult programming", and as such I was not allowed to watch it - I used to sneak behind the couch while my grandfather watched it on nights I stayed at their house, then would lay awake in my bed scared by what I'd seen, but excited just the same. Like another space show I enjoyed and was terrified by (Lost in Space), I didn't recognize Star Trek as anything but a world I wanted very much to be in, but remained frightened of anyhow (I was, as I said, very young).
A rare genre piece. Simply put, The Other is truly a slow moving story, but has a certain creepiness that tends to open the doorway to the imagination. Don't waste your time on the film until  you have read the book. There is a certain uncomfortable feeling you get while reading The Other, a stirring haunting feeling that starts at the base of your spine then travels upward while all the while building supense. I would have to recommend this book to those who have not experienced it's touch.Beware though, if this book is suddently coming back into print then one has to ask, is another remake on the horizon. Do yourself a favor, read the book, see the original film, and stay away from Hollywood's desire of remaking every classic movie into garbage
Bold, Tragic, and thought-provoking... Oh Nooooooooo!. It's tragic how some of Hollywood's greatest films are doomed from the start, by efforts to conceal the serious subject matter with confusing or misleading box covers, or by presenting subject matter that requires brain matter activity. I agree with all reviews of the well-delivered performances by the then virtually unknown Barton and Rockwell (at  least to me).  Barton's performance, akin to the seemingly natural talent of Dakota (please don't screw Dakota's head up... I'm counting on oscar performances after the awkward years -- but I  digress.) The beauty of the film was in what was not spelled out, like a novel that people still can't figure out why, is better than the movie. Aside from the short-lived ego rush of sharing the fact that you can read, it's the imagery unique to our own life experinces that makes a novel a personal experience, that often conflicts with the director's life experiences (plus he/she has more money for crack and other mind altering substances). Ok, my point! Our society's heinously counterproductive view of sex, sin, and alas child molestor profiling has taken us back at least 100 years. In 1914, the age of consent for sex was 10. NFW you say? Yeah way! Wrong, yes. Geared toward safe sex with kids --- bad. Lawn Dogs reminds us that the human mind is fully developed at age 8, and kids have intelligent, idealistic, regretless, and raw opinions, a need to be heard and understood, and guess what else? They like to touch their peepees, and they know it.  In 2006,  they still like to touch their  peepees, but society (and Mom and Dad) relieve them (to the long-term detriment of their children) of the ability to reason and manipulate their environment until at least 16. In essence, we discredit their abilty for rational thought with regard to sex,  but empower them with the ability to manipulate someone into jail, with the mere mention of the only crime that requires "no intent or forethought", and true or not, a life sentence of "societal periah". This movie struck a nerve -- ya think? We need to stop the "perves"! Mistake not my words for anything short of this. Lawn Dogs dares to go where few film makers dare, even if mostly left to us to conclude that molesters seldom meet our expectations and place of origin. We can get a better handle of what we are up against without the kneejerk reactions, mob thinking, and the removal of the concept of personal accountability for their innocent, but real actions, that can draw an unlikely and previously unblemished molester from his primative "Id-ish" shell. Like this film, it will require thought and above all honesty about what goes on in a child's mind where normal sexual curiousity is alive and well, and  about where we came from to arrive at this "civilized", yet God-alienating society. Ask  yourselves this question. Which is scarier? 28,000 (Ca only) registered sex offenders or "wienee waggers" all waiting to catch you with your guard down, or a few hundred [...] with long lascidious pasts, that you WILL recognize from a mile away clad in trenchcoats,  and  you wouldn't let your daughter have contact with a stranger anyway.  Sex offender is not synonymous with child molestor, except with the network NEWS. You'll remember this when your son or close relative is registered for hanging a BA from a bus on the way to a football game in college. Yaweah.
Heartwarming Family Entertainment. This is another of my childhood favorites. I never thought I would be able to find it on DVD. This is definitely a film to add to your collection
Best Potion for youthfulness. This is one of the most original films I have ever seen. Meryl, Goldie, and Bruce work well off of each other, which is why the film was a success. Helen and Madeline each woman want Earnest. and they each seek eternal life when they find out about it. Helen and Madeline are both viscious women.This movie is a dark comedy. very funny. I reccomend this to everyone
More artistic than historic. Called "A breathtaking journey into the heart of darkness."The cinema tail of the conquest of Don Lope de Aguirre (Klaus Kinski) and how it might have been as they traverse the Amazon river (Filmed in Peru) in search of the mythical lost City of Gold.Some see it as real others see holes you can drive a truck through; Any way you see it this is a good place to start in the New German Cinema movement. A good choice of actors and great visuals. This is also an intense way to learn some German. The victim on the raft is full of arrows and he gets kicked before the revealing statement "er ist tot"
A little hokey, but all the elements were there. Not a great retelling of the story, some of the Hollywood magic gets in the way, but all the elements of Peter and the Wolf are captured.
A very popular Italian film. This review is for the Criterion collection DVD edition of the film."Bicycle Thieves" released in Italy as "Ladri di biciclette" is about a bill poster who's bicycle is stolen. The film chronicles the efforts of him and his young son in recovering the bicycle.This film won an honoary oscar for best foreign laguage film and is considered on of the greatest films ever made.The Criterion DVD edition is a double disc set.Disc one contains the film with an optional English dubbed trackDisc two contains "Working with De Sica" with various interviews with people involved with De Sica and scenes of his other films, "Life as It Is" a docunebtary on neorealism cinema in Italy, and a documentary on longtime DeSica colleague, Cesare Zavattini.The set also includes a booklet with other material.This is a very good film and the best DVD release available
Great Buy!. It was a great buy! Got the movie in great time, and there wasn't a thing wrong with it! =) Thanks
Illuminating Documentary. Run time was 48 minutes.  A stellar documentary.  The download worked perfectly.  Hope the review was helpful.  ty
The last vestiges of the Old West. Steve McQueen is his pentultimate role before succumbing to cancer stars in the somber biographical film "Tom Horn". Horn, a legendary cowboy, Indian scout and wizard with a rifle rides his way into Wyoming territory near the turn of the 20th century.Cattle rancher John Coble played in an effective measured fashion by western veteran Richard Farnsworth recognizes his talent and hires Horn to work on his ranch.  He introduces him to the local cattleman's association which was been plagued by rustling.  They give him free reign and backing by the local marshall Joe Belle to rid the territory of the cattle thieves by whatever means deemed appropriate including death.The association soon tire of Horn's violent techniques and plan to get rid of him.  They railroad him without the backing of Farnsworth by accusing him of the murder of an innocent local youth who had been herding sheep.  A sham trial is convened to convict him of murder.The story of "Tom Horn" is representative of the transformation in our country from the days of the old west.  Horn is symbolic of an era that no longer fits within the shrinking frontier.  Horn love interest, a school teacher played by Linda Evans also forsakes him unwilling to be seduced into his now obsolete violent lifestyle.  The movie serves as a sad commentary on society's unwillingness to allow freedom and equality for those that don't fit a prescribed mold in a changing world.McQueen and Farnsworth were naturals for their respective roles.  Slim Pickens playing sheriff Sam Creedmore, as usual gives an authentic portrayal of a denizen of these times
Fun Film, interesting story to me. This is a fun film.  As long as you don't go into it expecting much, you will find it a good way to occupy your time.
A Flawed Masterpiece - Let's See a Remake. Frank and Julia's forbidden love affair was the focus of Hellraiser, but the cenobites stole the show. This time around the cenobites are given a lot more screen time. Dr. Channard, a man with dark obsessions, devotes his life to researching the infernal netherworld. Kirsty becomes his latest patient at his psychiatric hospital, and after hearing of the events that took place in the first movie, Channard decides to reanimate the evil Julia. He agrees to bring her victims so she can continue regenerating, and in exchange she will be his guide in the labyrinth that is Hell.Christopher Young's music is awesome. Loud, dramatic, and ominous - the movie's theme during the opening credits lets the viewers know what they're getting into. His music is also very significant during the scene when Tiffany solves the puzzle box. The music conveys Tiffany's childlike innocence and her sense of wonder as she handles and studies the box. The tone and speed of the music (as Tiffany manipulates the box) raises the tension to a fever pitch. Then, after a deafening silence, the movie's theme erupts as the gateway to Hell is unlocked, and the cenobites are once again freed to walk the Earth. Their spectacular entrance in this scene was even more impressive than in the first movie when they appeared after Kirsty solved the box. This scene is also when Pinhead delivers the most important line of Hellraiser II: "It is not hands that call us - it is DESIRE." But you need to hear Doug Bradley's delivery of that line for it to have any affect on you. That line may look laughable, but it is powerful and so significant because it speaks volumes about the nature of the cenobites. It seems the cenobites will not slaughter someone who solves the box UNLESS that person has a desire to see what happens when the box is solved - even if that person DOESN'T KNOW WHAT WILL HAPPEN when the box is solved. That would explain why they wanted to torture Kirsty in the first movie. And since Tiffany wanted to solve the box simply for the sake of solving the puzzle, she was spared. She had no idea anything would happen when she solved the box. That raises questions about the nature of the game - since the cenobites obviously knew it was Channard who called them, why didn't they go after him? Or did they think it was Kirsty who called them?Channard has no qualms at all when he has people killed, and yet he is a timid man. It is clear that he expects Julia to protect him from whatever unknown terrors are lurking in Hell. Channard ultimately finds what he is looking for - and pays a painful price. There is a cenobite battle in Hellraiser II, which was disappointing because it was so one-sided. There is a reason for this though, and in case you don't get it when you watch the movie, it's explained on the audio commentary.The DVD has an audio commentary by Ashley Laurence, director Tony Randel and writer Peter Atkins. Their commentary was very descriptive and informative. They gently poke fun at their mistakes, and this makes the commentary more enjoyable. Lord knows there were some glaring mistakes. But did anyone besides me notice the hostility that seems to exist between Randel and Atkins? The thought of them sharing a mutual dislike of each other and grudgingly doing this commentary together gives me perverse pleasure.I LOVED this movie up until Kirsty's reunion with Frank. From that point on this movie goes to hell (in a manner of speaking). It would have been nice if the script had dropped the dumb subplot of Kirsty looking for her father - even if that left no reason for the Kirsty character to be in this movie. It's near the end of the movie when Pinhead delivers his infamous line "Your suffering will be LEGENDARY - even in Hell." But even Pinhead's wit can't uplift the last half hour of this movie. But it was pretty funny to see the patients tearing the hospital apart - and just how did they get their hands on all those puzzle boxes? A different actress plays the Female Cenobite in Hellraiser II - she is less menacing in this movie, but is still entertaining. I was glad to see that she still had the bloodlust that was so evident in the first movie. But I would have preferred it if she didn't sound so nonchalant when she was talking, and I missed the wide-eyed stare of the actress from the first movie. The Chatterer has a different face at one point in Hellraiser II, which confused me until I heard the audio commentary. Personally, I preferred the Chatterer's original face. It was a real surprise when the Chatterer's identity was revealed. Without giving away too much, it involves a shocking scene - the murder of a child. The ending of Hellraiser II made no sense whatsoever, but I'm guessing that the filmmakers wanted to wait until the sequel to explain what's going on in Hell. And yes, as of this writing I have only seen the first two movies in the Hellraiser series.Hellraiser II also reveals Pinhead's background. Needless to say I was disappointed - I preferred to think of the cenobites as having Lovecraftian origins. I even dreamed up a whole history and mythology for the cenobites after seeing the first movie! But I loved the look of dread and despair on Pinhead's face (right before undergoing his `surgery') toward the end of the movie - you know that if someone like him is fearing for his own safety then he must be in serious danger. How the mighty have fallen. Buy the soundtrack and this DVD so that you can properly savour the first two-thirds of this movie
An eye opener. I don't think I've ever just sat and watched a movie and `got' it quite like this.  Maybe it's because every married couple goes through the feelings expressed in this film.  Laura Dern, Mark Ruffalo, Naomi Watts & Peter Krause star as two couples whose relationships are rattled by adultery.  These two couples have very different relationships yet are looking for exactly the same thing.Jack (Ruffalo) is a college professor married to Terry (Dern).  Terry loves Jack but Jack is falling in love with Edith (Watts) who is married to Hank (Krause) who doesn't love her but is attracted to Terry.  Jack and Edith fall into an affair that causes more pain to each of them then to their respective partners.  Watching Jack and Edith react to their mates after they've just been with each other, the tears, the looks, the concern in their eyes.  Hank in the meantime is looking for someone to cure his boredom with his wife, and Terry may be that woman, and since Jack's guilt is tearing him apart he encourages Terry and Hank's relationship in order to justify is infidelity.What Jack never banked on was realizing the love he had for his wife and his children.  After his wife sleeps with Hank, Jack is panged with regret and heartache as he watches his marriage fall apart, the marriage he felt he was tired of but in actuality it's the only thing he wants and needs.This movie is a wake up call for all of us who are falling out of love with our relationships, our lives in general and the ones we share it with.  It's brilliantly scripted and acted and flows wonderfully, delivering its point beautifully.  Watts and Dern are brilliant here and show so much feeling in all their words, in all their actions.  Honestly one of the best movie's I've ever seen and one that will stay with me for all time.
Playing in Charlie Brown Field. I remember when this 1st came out- at 9 years old, I had no idea what Arbor Day was all about (no, it's not &quot;the day all the ships come sailing into the arbor&quot;, as Sally Brown guesses in class and gets  laughed at!).  Peppermint Patty challenges old Chuck to a game at his new  field, which looks more like a garden than a baseball field (not exactly  Peppermint Patty's idea of a perfect field)!  Lucy makes poor Schroeder  promise her a kiss if she hits a home run!  Note: this was Vince Guaraldi's  final Peanuts score as he would pass away the following year
"Rivette?  Who is Jacques Rivette?"  He's a great filmmaker, that's who... The French New Wave is justifiably famous in cinema circles, schools, etc..  It is still talked about today.  When they mention the filmmakers that came from that school of filmmaking, they mention Jean-Luc Godard, Eric Rohmer, and Francois Truffault.  Rarely, if ever, do they mention Jacques Rivette.  When a friend of mine asked me my favorite French directors, I said Robert Bresson, Jean-Luc Godard, and Jacques Rivette.  My friend said "Rivette?"  Jacques Rivette's films stand out from any other French filmmaker of his time.  The other French New Wave filmmakers were prolific, whereas Rivette would make a film every few years.  Rivette's films are generally very long (the most extreme example being the film Out 1, which runs 12 1/2 hours, his other films run on average 3-4 hours), and concern themselves with the artistic process.  This is a 4 hour film (slightly longer than most Rivette films, but not the longest), but it unfolds magisterially and beautifully.  I saw it in a theater (with an intermission), and I was entralled.  It is one of Rivette's best films, and one that really shows the agony of artistic creation.  Creating art is a long and arduous process.  Kubrick compared his art, filmmaking, to trying to write War and Peace in a bumpy car ride, but when you've finished, it's an amazing feeling.  Its pacing is very slow and leisurely, but there isn't anything wrong with that.  I didn't feel bored, and I didn't feel that the film needed to be cut.  It's perfect the way it is.  The title is translated "a pretty nuisance", for those who are curious.  This film really captures that.  On a completely unrelated sidenote, I remember seeing this film with 2 couples in front of me.  The women liked it, but the men were bored out of their minds.  One kept shifting his head back and forth throughout the whole thing.  The men were probably just hoping to get laid afterwards, so that's why they went to see it.  You should really only see this film if you're a committed art cinema person.  Luckily, I am.  This is one of Rivette's best films, and he's a filmmaker that deserves to be better known.
A Film Noir Classic. I'm glad to see that the Sean Penn version of this movie has sparked an interest in the academy award winning original.There are the unmistakable marks of its time in this film.  It was made just after the end of WW II, and drawing analogies to dictatorships and American socialism are right from the times themselves.Broderick Crawford is really good as Willie, although some members of the supporting cast, especially John Ireland, are not up to the roles they play.  I also don't know whether the direction was as good as it could be;  there are some situations where the combination of writer/director is absolutely inspired, but I would not say that here.The ultimate destruction of the old order is, to me, the most fascinating element of this film.  Film Noir was all about that:  a breakdown in an old social order, with nothing but a void seeming to replace it.  That is much in evidence here exemplified, as it was in the book, by "Burden's Landing" and its complex blend of great principles lost, but old prejudices and injustices going away, too.It's a fascinating movie, and still quite watchable today.  I agree with some who say there that it is better than the remake, as good as the remake was..
Husbands & Wives. Woody Allen's 1992 film "Husbands and Wives" was released around the time we first heard the words Soon-Yi, which is ironic considering the subject matter of the film. "Husbands and Wives" is billed as a comedy, but is more of a drama. There are a few jokes, but there's nothing incredibly funny in the film. The movie is told like a documentary, featuring interviews with the characters and handheld cinematography. Allen and Mia Farrow play Gabe and Judy Roth, a couple who have been married for ten years and think everything is well. Then their two friends Jack and Sally (Sydney Pollack & Judy Davis) announce they are getting divorced, which causes Gabe and Judy to question the validity of their own marriage. As Jack and Sally move on (with Jack getting a much hotter younger woman and Sally lusting after Michael, played by Liam Neeson), Gabe and Judy begin to move farther apart. Gabe, a college professor, finds himself falling for a 20-year-old student named Rain (Juliette Lewis) and Judy finds herself, also, lusting after Michael. The movie is 106 minutes, but a lot of stuff happens in the film. This is not one of Woody Allen's best; it's not in the top 5 anyway. It's overwrought and is not his most entertaining. The performances are very good, especially Farrow, Pollack, and Davis. Juliette Lewis, meanwhile, has echoes of Mariel Hemingway in "Manhattan" in her performance. The cinematography and mock-documentary style of the film gets old after a while, with the former getting headache-inducing after a while. "Husbands and Wives" is a good study of marriage and infidelity. One critic (I don't recall which one it was) said that "Husbands and Wives" seemed like Allen trying to come to grips with the Soon-Yi debacle, but the ending here is quite different. "Husbands and Wives" has its merits, it's demerits...But it's a worthy Woody Allen film that's definitely worth watching.GRADE: B
Small-Scale Indie Has Its Charms and Nicely Etched Performances. I am hopeful that Katie Holmes has not forsaken a promising acting career to become tabloid fodder and a Stepford wife for her couch-jumping husband-to-be. It's not that she strikes me as all that brilliant, but she does bring a relatable sense of humanity to her role as April Burns, a rebellious twenty-something girl who has defiantly moved away from her family's upstate home to a tenement in Manhattan's Lower East Side. Encouraged by her new boyfriend Bobby (who happens to be black), she invites her estranged family to Thanksgiving dinner where she will cook the whole meal in her tiny apartment. There is a tragic undertone to the event since her angst-driven mother is dying of breast cancer, and this may be their last meal togetherDirected and written by Peter Hedges (who wrote the equally eccentric "What's Eating Gilbert Grape?"), the story bounces back and forth between April's hazard-ridden preparation of the meal and the Burns family's chaotic journey to the city. While the family trip will remind you somewhat of this year's "Little Miss Sunshine", April's adventure consists mainly of meeting her motley neighbors, all strangers at first, to borrow a working stove for her turkey. Among others, she runs into a friendly black couple, an obsessive vegan and an elderly Chinese couple whom she teaches the origins of the holiday. On top of this is an odd, racially-driven storyline involving Bobby's need to buy a suit while being pursued by some suspicious characters.Shot in digital video by Tami Reiker and running only eighty minutes, the 2003 movie works toward an inevitable conclusion, but Hedges adds enough filmmaking idiosyncrasies to make it all seem more intriguing than it has any right to be. Among the supporting cast, Patricia Clarkson stands out as April's mother Joy, bringing a steely resolve as she crumbles under the surface. Oliver Platt is terrific as her put-upon husband Jim, as are Derek Luke as Bobby and Allison Pill as April's "perfect" little sister Beth. In little more than cameos which could have been excised, Sean Hayes plays a neurotic neighbor with a new stove and a pampered dog, while Dru Hill's Sisqo plays Bobby's friend Latrell. Hedges provides a nice commentary track on the 2004 DVD, which also includes a fifteen-minute making-of featurette
The master is in near top form. OK, I love Japanese film and Kurosawa is my favorite Japanese director, but even a newbie to film will be hooked. I loved every aspect of this film....script, cinematography, acting, score, choreography, sound, and of course - direction! This is the complete Japanese version, includes film not seen in the original US release.Criterion has put together a great package, the quality of this DVD makes it worth the price. Included in the specials feature is a terrific commentary track, one of the best I've heard covering every aspect of the film, Kurosawa, Japanese history and Japanese film history.Only negative I could consider is its somewhat stagy, slow opening act...I loved this scene, especial since most of it was new to me (not in original us release) but someone new to Japanese film might find it dull going and give up on the film before the momentum builds. It builds in the next scene!A great movie, in complete form,  presented in near pristine condition by a film master in top form. This is a 5 star release at any price! For those of you complaining about the price...rent it!
the land girls. Being English, I can relate to the trauma's of this wonderful movie. It is real life of war torn England in the face of defeat.They could not have picked better actors for this movie and the scenery of land and the farm are excellant..One could really &quot;&quot;smell&quot;&quot; the farm house and it's surrounds..wonderful!
GREAT UNDERRATED CLASSIC!. Its so sad that this movie didn't do better at the box office and more people don't know about it. Like most people say here, it should be a regular holiday classic. Despite the langauge which can be cleaned up for the kids and granny.I've seen it 30 times and I love it more and more each time.If you haven't seen it, you need to.... buy it you won't be dissapointed
hans christian andersen. Was a christmas present for my neice she loves the old Danny Kaye movies so it was the perfect addition for her collection
Funny,Funny,Funny. Even though this is about 4 years old, it is extremely halarious.  I've been waiting to see a good stand up comedy. The first 15 min is just one hilarious hit after another. I love this guy
A movie Jack Black was made for. Great movie!!!  I do not think any other actor could have done a better job.  He was perfectly cast for this movie.
CLARK AND KERR. Clark Gable zoomed back to the pre-eminent place he long held in Hollywood with this smash performance of Vic Norman, the attractive "huckster"; a radio advertising go-getter.  He takes with him the lovely English Deborah Kerr, who made her American film debut in this film from 1947.  Nearly everyone read the book by Frederic Wakeman back in the forties; it was very popular.  The Gable-Kerr team is ideal.  Kerr made an impressive bow on the U.S. screen, and the critics took notice.  Sydney Greenstreet is great as Evan Llewellyn Evans, who thinks America as a blank space between New York and Hollywood where people buy soap!   Producer Arthur Hornblow, Jr. garnered top technical talent for this film and Jack Conway's direction is  first-rate.  Ava Gardner is mesmerizingly beautiful as the nightclub singer, Jean Ogilvie.  At the end of the excellent Luther Davis screenplay, Gable gives out with the kind of denunciation of his brow-beating boss that has been standard cinematurgy for years - the script ribs everything in radio of yore from soap operas to Forest Lawn commercials
Very Hilarious. Truely speaking, this is a very hilarious episode. Must see for every one
Brilliant!. As a fan of New Order and Joy Division this was on the top of my list. Fast-paced, witty, and shot in documentary like style, 24 HOUR PARTY PEOPLE is a great movie along side the more traditional narratives like GO, ALL GONE PETE TONG, GROOVE, etc. Winderbottom does a terrific job in satisfying a range of audience and Steve Coogan is terrific. The soundtrack is solid and the produciton value is high. Not to be missed by fans (not ultimate fans) and general movie goers alike
Great for kids. I am an elementary music teacher and bought this to show my students. All of the students LOVED it from K-4. The narration makes it easier to understand and keeps the interest.
"I have enough stories, I want a life!". 28 Days starring Sandra Bullock, she was courageous to take such a challenging role like this. She plays an alcoholic who is placed in a rehab center for, well you guessed it 28 days. I think Bullock is at her best when she does drama, I love her comdies as well but she expands her talent and growth as an actress in dramatic roles. This film does have funny moments from time to time but it is mainly a hard-hitting drama. The scene where Bullock is in the withdrawal period of her addiction is real and heartbreaking. She is and probably will never be recognized as a gifted performer, she should have been nominated for an award, like the golden globes or something. 28 Days is quirky, spunky, and cute just like Sandy
A really well done film. I have to say that I really enjoyed this film.  It is well done and not to mention beautifully shot. It has become one of my favorite films and is much better than most of the drivel that comes out of Hollywood these days.  Most times films are so overhyped that once you sit down to see them you are most often times disappointed.  This film did not receive that much hype and it does not disappoint.  If you love horses, adventure, beautiful scenery and a film about the spirit of man and his horse, then please do see it.  And lets face it (ladies) Viggo Mortensen is just as beautiful as the scenery around him.  He is a very good actor and an underated one at that.  So sit back, pop some corn and enjoy a good adventure.  And admire one of God's most majestic creations...........the horse. (and viggo mortensen!!
Incredibly Alluring. Audrey Hepburn and Gary Cooper make an unlikely pair for a lot of reasons in this film but that does not stop the relationship from working. It sizzles.Audrey is a young Parisian girl, the daughter of a private investigator played by Maurice Chevalier. She is young, beautiful, innocent and plays the cello and is a bit bored. She treats herself to adventure by reading the case files of her father. A good proportion of these case files involve the character played by Gary Cooper. He is a rich American playboy who is always got women. Often, these women are married.Cooper is the single largest source of income for Chevalier and Chevalier cannot help be admire his style. Having gypsy musicians on call to serenade the mark day and night is just one example.When Hepburn learns that an outraged husband plans to kill Cooper, she secretly goes to warn the lovers. In doing so, she falls for Cooper herself and manages to arouse his interest. She knows that any sort of clinging will just turn him off so she tries to play his own strategy against him. She plays the mysterious playgirl with more beaux than she can count. She will not even give him her name.The strategy works. Cooper falls for her in a big way but still she remains silent. In desperation, Cooper hires a private investigator to learn more about her. Naturally, this would be her father.Things do not work out as expected but they do work out well. Hepburn portrays beauty and innocence and not a little female cunning. She is a delight to behold. So are Cooper's fits of uncertainty. Chevalier lends the whole episode a degree of class and dignity. It's a first fate story all around.
Awe-Struck. Camille Claudel, a talented and gifted artist, ends up studying under Rodin.  Rodin, because of his name back then, has his way with Camille (as it is implied with many other mistresses as well).  He leaves Camille for his wife. Camille is ruined.  What follows is her gut-wrenching attempt to continue with her work admist the shame she has brought upon herself and her family.  Her ultimate ruin is left to her brother to carry out
Fantastic drama of Science Fiction. "Slaughterhouse-Five" (1972 - 104 minutes) is a classic drama of science fiction, directed by George Roy Hill from the script of Stephen Geller that was based on the masterpiece of the North American writer Kurt Vonnegut Jr. The film shows the attempt of an American former-soldier (that fought in the Second World War and that witnessed the bombing of the city of Dresden) to write his experience of the war. Billy Pilgrim (the actor Michael Sacks), the protagonist, is a citizen who travels in time, goes to the Tralfamadore planet where he makes contact with aliens and revisits diverse moments of his own life, in the past, in the present and in the future. The crucial point of his existence is the episode where he was made prisoner during the Second War, when he lived the bombing of the German city in which had died 135 thousand people, the double of deaths of Hiroshima. The narrative is marvellous, fantastic, sarcastic, funny, satirical, ironic, sad, overwhelming and full of sense
...When I was very small... This episode of Star Trek, "The Man Trap" is my earliest memory of what would become a lifelong enjoyment of the franchise. Truthfully, "The Man Trap" terrified me (I was maybe two, or three, although I am sure by that time the series was limping along in it's third season and I was seeing a repeat for the first time); Star Trek was considered "adult programming", and as such I was not allowed to watch it - I used to sneak behind the couch while my grandfather watched it on nights I stayed at their house, then would lay awake in my bed scared by what I'd seen, but excited just the same. Like another space show I enjoyed and was terrified by (Lost in Space), I didn't recognize Star Trek as anything but a world I wanted very much to be in, but remained frightened of anyhow (I was, as I said, very young).
A must see. My 12th grade government teacher showed our class this film, and we were all hooked.  If you have ever been in a room of thirty some teenagers, you know that its hard to get their attention and keep them quiet.  So really, if a bunch of teenagers enjoyed this movie, everyone should consider giving it a chance.  It might not be as action packed as some of the movies out today, such as 16 Blocks, but it's gonna keep your attention, so do yourself a favor and atleast rent it, you might find yourself coming back to buy it
I wonder. I wonder why the beautiful Lerner-Loewe meoldies and lyrics and the movie itself are not more popular than they are - I'll go home with Bonnie Jean, The heather on the Hill, Almost like being in love. The movie itself is a serious production, meticulous in costumes, design and choreography.This is a fairy tale, almost a charming ghost story, which is so unreal that it only happens in old places like the Scottish highland. Something beautiful that emerges beneath the fog only once in a while.The story is also rich in Scottish culture - bagpipes, kilts, market place and folklore.I also wonder why Van Johnson, with a big build and yet such a nimble tap dancer, did not have more dancing roles in other movies. And Cyd Charisse ballet dancing is simply an eye candy.The melodies are so sweet and chorus so pure that the movie is worth watching over and over again, even if it is only for the songs.
SAD, BEAUTIFUL AND HYPNOTIZING. Actually I felt I was in love with this film as soon as I saw the very beginning - the opening credits against the background of Chicago seen from high above and provided with beautiful music. "Candyman" could have become another teenage urban legend flick with not much of a sense, but Bernard Rose managed to squeeze everything possible from the story making a brilliant, enchanting and spellbinding film out of it. If you're interested mostly in gore and some physical manifestations of horror you won't find it here (you will, but not in quantities you used to). "Candyman" is more of a psychological horror where atmosphere is what's important, where mood is what matters, where you are given some food for thought. I don't have enough words to describe the whole perfection of this gorgeous film, I can only say it's a great achievement of Bernard Rose as a director besides I guess Tony Todd, Virginia Madsen and Xander Berkeley had their best roles played in this feature.I don't personally think that 90s were fertile regarding the horror genre, but "Candyman" is a true gem which wouldn't be lost among the greatest horror titles of all times.By the way if you don't want to spoil your impression of the film, better don't watch "Candyman" parts 2 and 3. They ARE the average tenage urban legend flicks.
It's Jimmy Carr - Need more be said?!?. Thanks for keeping a Brit sane in a country full of "My wife says..." jokes.Your wife is fat and ugly and I don't care what she says. Because she's ugly. And fat.....and not my wife
This movie is soooooo awesome. Hilary did a great job in the movie. She played Lizzie and Isabella great. She looked great with brown hair. I liked how Lizzie and Isabella sang together. At first I thought she actually had a twin. But hey, This is a great movie. You will love it
"I remember how the meaning of words began to change". "V for Vendetta" is an interesting movie that won't allow you to remain indifferent. Love or hate it, I'm pretty sure that you will have an opinion about this polemic film, based on a comic written by Alan Moore, adapted to the big screen by the Wachowski Brothers, and directed by James McTeigue.The story begins in England, but not in the England we know. McTeigue's England is eerily similar to the country that Orwell's tells us about in "1984". There is a dictator, Chancellor Adam Sutler (John Hurt), that was chosen in free elections, but that afterwards decided to become an absolute ruler, exerting power without any kind of restriction. The citizens do nothing, they have relinquished their right to participate and to decide, and are merely sheep being told what to do and what to think. Their freedom is curtailed, but they feel safe.However someone is prepared to shake their certitude, and make them realize that things are not what they seem to be. That person is V (Hugo Weaving), a man that is willing to risk everything in order to turn meek sheep into citizens, and to wreak havoc on the enemies that destroyed his life a long time ago. Evey (Natalie Portman), a young woman that V rescues from Sutler's minions, is a privileged spectator of V's plans, and the first person to become a fervent follower. That path, though, is not easy, as Evey's new strenght will be forged in the fires of prison.This is a highly controversial movie that delves upon difficult subjects, for example whether the end validates the means, and the power of words. All the same, "V for Vendetta" makes you think, has great actors, an original cinematography and a hectic pace. From my point of view, this film is simply a must see.Belen Alca
U2 Rattle and Hum DVD. I love this movie. I can watch it over and over again and still get the chills. I wish I had been able to see U2 then, when their shows were so full of energy than now when they've really toned it down. The film is fun because you get to see not only performances, but also things behind the scenes: Larry's obsession with Elvis, and interviews where they poke fun at each other.
I passed it on to my minister for reading. It defined for me what we Christians are struggling against; secularism and pluarlism.  Christians don't know they are like the frog in the  tepid water that is heating up with secular thinking to the point of crucifying Christ again and we are like the crowd in Jerusalem that was apathetic.  Scientific thinking has created morality and expunged the law of God as the final truth.   RZ states this very clearly but doesn't give us enough push to act on the knowledge.  Hopefully, my minister will push the facts to our congregation so they know why they need to be Delivered From Evil
Baseball fans will enjoy this one. 'The Curse of the Grebes' is sort of a tribute to the Red Sox return to World Series glory with cameos by Damon, Timlin and Renteria. Timlin actually does a great acting job and even recites a poem by Emily Dickinson with remarkable aplomb. 'Arthur Changes Gears' is also great, he gets a bike he's been coveting for a while but when he finally gets it he's so worried about getting it dirty that he won't ride it
Star Trek At Its Best. Shore Leave is one of the best episodesof the classic series. It uses all thesci fi props but also has a great story,if you don't even care about Star Trekand have to watch one, watch this one.
Very Funny. I saw this on tv and loved it, so i had to buy it
3 stars for the movie, 1 star for Monica Potter. I could write a bunch of stuff here trying to convince you that I'm smarter than you but that's pretty much a waste of my time and yours. I like this movie in spite of a few flaws and glitches, to me the overall product is often more important than the parts it's comprised of. The story line has interesting twists, it has actors in it I like. So I give the movie itself three stars and toss in another star just because I get to watch Morgan Freeman act and Monica Potter be cute as hell (I just REALLY REALLY wish she could act but cute will do). Not a bad way to spend an hour or two
One of the Best Bibically-Based Films. This is one of the very best Bibically-based films ever, and it was also on of the best of the early "sequels."  Taking up the story precisely where The Robe left off, it is an even more exciting tale of the Greek slave, Demetrius, and his quest to protect the robe Jesus wore at His crucifixion.  A must for the Easter season, or for any time one needs reaffirmation of faith.
Engrossing from the first 30 seconds. Clooney is a marvel.  This story was so captivating that I sat on the edge of my seat straining to hear all the dialogue.  Althought the scene shifts make it difficult to track at first, I was drawn in and held spellbound
Feeling sorry for yourself?. Ever feel like life is getting you down? This is the movie that will make you realize that you have NOTHING to complain about.Feeling sorry for yourself? Watch "My Left Foot" You may see your troubles are not so bad after all.Worth getting the Special Edition for all the extra stuff
awesome chicks. If you are a Dixie Chicks fan you will find no better musical experience.The music,vocals,fans and emotions are unbeatable.Also I couldnt help but notice every female in the crowd were gorgeous
One of my Favorite movies!. No, its not classy.  No one uses sharp, flashy camera moves to wow the viewer.  The plot line is neither deep nor inriching for the soul.  Still, Sgt. Bilko is an incredibly funny movie that shows Steve Martin at his height of comedy.  The story, which involves Steve Martin as a sargeant who uses his motor pool as a small casino for the soldiers on the base behind his superior's back, is outrageously funny and sends that viewer from beginning to end without becoming belabored.  Bottom line: This is a great movie that cane be enjoyed by anyone
Enlightening.... What I loved about this movie is that Jeffrey Wright showed the emotional and sensitive side of Basquiat, as well as his creative side. It showed his struggles with his personal life as it overcame his professional. The characters were so real...so human and true to life in that time. I really enjoyed this movie. It pulled me into his life....only I wish I knew more...
I love this movie!!!. I finally bought this movie! Everytime it would air on TCM my 15 yr old daughter and I watched. It's not a scary movie, rather fascinating to see actual freaks of nature, not hollywood actors dressed in prosthetics and makeup. Prince Randian rocks. No arms or legs yet he rolls his own cigarettes, strikes a match, lights up and smokes. WOW! Have you ever seen a real pinhead! Not the freak with pins sticking out of his face, but a real pinhead. This movie has 3.
Wonderful Mother-Daughter movie to watch. This movie was refreshing and gave great values on family traditions, love, self-esteem and friendship! And that growing-up has its difficulties, but with the love and support of those who love us, things can turn out to be very different than what we expect or what is expected of us. My daughter and I loved the movie and we bonded and it was a catalyst for all sorts of conversation. I recommend it!
BS tells it all. I have watched most of the BS series and this is one that shows what is happening to many of our american organizations. Religious control
Vampiers but different. this movie is a must too see., its not made for the kids but its a great movie for the adults, my advice if you dont have it get it add it too you collection. a great movie and a twist of a movie. and it even has David Bowie in it guys. go and get this movie a move to buy. tk
This Has Been...a Love Story. I finally made my first purchase from Amazon's Unbox Video Downloads just to try the service and am happy to report a solid customer experience. For $1.99, I purchased and downloaded one of my favorite episodes of "The Twilight Zone", and it took about twenty minutes to download through a broadband connection. I don't think it's the most ideal way to see full-length motion pictures, but for a 26-minute classic TV program, I think my 17" LCD monitor makes for a suitable viewing experience, and the video quality of the downloaded file is clean.Aired on September 15, 1961 as the show's third season opener, the episode is a Cold War fantasy appropriately called "Two" about the last two survivors on earth, a man and a woman, after an apocalyptic world war in 2109. Written and directed by TV veteran Montgomery Pittman, the simple plot revolves around the complicating fact that he is an American infantryman and she is an invading Russian soldier. Like two feral animals, they glare at each other among the debris of a deserted town destroyed by the war. He even knocks her out her after she aggressively throws pots and pans at him. The reality of their solitary existence, however, gradually dawns on them, especially after they see an evening dress in a shop window inspiring her to speak her only word of dialogue - "Prekrassnyi" - the Russian word for "lovely".What really makes this episode memorable is the unlikely casting. Two years before she twitched her nose on "Bewitched", a brunette Elizabeth Montgomery, looking appropriately ravaged and sporting a deadly ray gun, plays the untrusting Russian soldier with surprising fierceness and vulnerability. The American is played by perennial tough-guy Charles Bronson, fresh from "The Magnificent Seven". Even though he has to spout some inane philosophical lines to describe the futility of war, he leavens his natural sullenness with a determined romanticism. They make an odd couple, but it works splendidly. I also learned that canned fried chicken will become a staple in the 22nd century. Narrated by Rod Serling in his inimitably halting manner, the show ends with my favorite line in his signature postscript: "This has been...a love story." This is classic TV
Seasonal Classic. I'm an avid movie maniac.  I have certain films that I can only watch at certain times of the year, and do, every year.  Other Peoples Money, starts off my fall movie viewing, after Halloween of course.  I love the new England Autumn charm of this film.  The story is good, dialogue clever and the chemistry between Miller and DeVito is scary.  An unlikely romanic couple if ever there was.  A Classic in my book
If you love her, let her go... Sofia Coppola takes on conformity in a black comedy about a house of five young girls who are just trying to reach out and grow up in the world, if their parents would allow them. It is told through the watching, voyeuristic eyes of young boys who obsess over the girls mentally, emotionally, sexually, and even intellectually.It was pretty good, I enjoyed it.  There really isn't much I feel there is to say about it, as it is a pretty self-contained little movie.  Coppola satirizes the clean warmth of suburbia without the self-indulgence of most artists dealing with conformity.  I'm surprised by the cover descriptions and synopses that talk about this film as if it's a mystery; it's about as mysterious as what drives Charles Kane.  However the "haunting lyricism" and "dark humor" aspects are pretty correct.It's a pretty good film.--PolarisDi
Possible inspiration for "Star Wars" Death Star attack?. As another reviewer so astutely observed, the climactic bombing run through a fjord at a specific target evokes the Jedi attack on the Death Star at the conclusion of "Star Wars." While George Lucas has acknowledged Kurasawa's "Hidden Fortress" as a primary influence on "Star Wars," I wonder if he had "633 Squadron" in the back of his mind when designing the end run on the Death Star? Something to ponder.The other reviewers have said some wonderful things about the excellent and authentic aerial combat footage, and the footage of the Mosquito fighters themselves, so I will only add my praise to theirs.The only quibbles I have with the movie are the very fake miniature plane models used in the climactic bombing run, Cliff Robertson's lack of a British accent (he is playing an RAF captain...the only flaw in an otherwise marvelous performance),   and the trite, standard romance that always seems a part of most war movies.Overall, worth owning and watching several times.
Seeing is Believing. I saw this video onboard the sailboat Le Ponant just prior to entering the Panama Canal. The video was incredible and allowed each of us to better understand the magnitude and complexity of the project. David McCullough does a fantastic job of commentary
still burning at the end. Although Lenny was near the end when this performance was filmed, he still puts on a riveting show. He does go on about the legal system a lot but what he says makes so much sense. You almost wish he could have used something like this in some of his courtroom defenses. He always said the prosecutors would do a "bad" Lenny Bruce in court! For people who assume he was constantly harrased and busted for his foul language, get a hold of this film and see how brilliant he was.
a little too loving?. This is a well made and well acted movie.  If you love baseball and tribute movies, you'll be in seventh heaven.  If you don't already love baseball, though, you may get a trifle bored by how slowly this loving tribute lingers over its subject, like a lover caressing the object of his desire.  Family Movie?  My five year-old daughter lasted about fifteen minutes; my nine-year-old daughter made it almost a half an hour before she retired to the den to watch reruns on the Disney channel.
My DVD Video. The DVD that I purchased was in excellent conditiona and the price was very reasonable
Enjoyable, even if it isn't your usual fare... As an American watching a translation, it's sometimes difficult to determine a film-maker's intent. Ever since "Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon," we in the West have had to re-evaluate martial arts cinema--it's not always about revenge. Sometimes, it seems pretty inexplicable. You know-- different culture, different philosophy, etc. (That's what I'm told, anyway. Since I don't speak Chinese, I couldn't exactly say WHAT gets lost in translation.)Regardless of culture or genre, the big question always has to be: did you like the movie?Well, yes, I liked it. I don't know if I get all of it, but I liked it. The action sequences and special effects are soundly executed without taking over the film. The actors are enjoyable to watch, and I actually got the jokes (there were many). At the end of the movie, I felt like I'd watched a story, and not just fluff.  There was a theme and hidden plot behind all those flying people with swords. You gotta like that.
Great Nostalgia Trip!!. I was 7 when I watched these shows.  Great memories.  And Soupy Sales is an added bonus!!  Just amazing how things have changed...Not sure if this set will appeal to the younger crowd, but for us aging baby boomers it's a fun trip
As relevant today as ever. What is at stake here is the kind of government that we, people, want to give ourselves. It's been the same choice since the end of the Roman Republic. Here we have two factions, both are excellent demagogues, both play on the mobs appetites and weaknesses. The heart of the film (or play) is the speeches of Brutus (the Conservative), and of Antony (the Liberal). The interesting thing for the viewer is that we are at the same time part of the mob, who listens intently while at the side of Caesar's corpse, and have the extraordinary advantage of witnessing from closer range the hidden expressions in Antony's face: his true thoughts and intentions. So we are able to distinguish two facts about both orators that will help us balance our vote on one or the other candidates. And these 2 things are: First, Brutus is honest towards his party and to the people. You may agree or disagree -actually, the mob agrees with him concerning the necessary death of the ambitious Caesar-; but he is an honest man, and so Antony, in a side, admits that he is honest. The second thing we discover is that Antony is a deceiver, a deceiver towards Brutus by not fulfilling his word of honor and arousing the populace against Brutus; and a demagogue towards the mob.It always ends the same way: the demagogues wins the day. Sounds familiar? I remember when years ago in Per the foreign candidate, Fujimori won the election against Vargas Llosa, the famous writer. Fujimori stole all the money he laid his eyes on, and when he was found out he left for Japan and solicited -and obtained- assylum (thanks to his Japannese origin).It is true that in this film both parties are corrupt, and only look after their own greedy interests. But some times an honorable man shows up, and begs, cries out for a chance. This is the story of Brutus: the honorable man of all times."Not that I loved Caesar lessbut that I loved Rome more.""Had you rather Caesar were living,and die as slaves?""Who is here so vile that will not love his country?If any, speak, for him have I offended."The only perfect Kingdom is the one our Lord will bring in His second coming. Amen.The 4 stars are because in the second part of the film the interest decreases notably.
What a great movie!. How many movies can you really enjoy with the young people in your life?  This is one of the few.  I watched this with great reluctance, and found myself absolutely loving it!  Believe me, you really won't be nauseated! You will laugh
Tremendous!!. "Put a lot of sex in it; that's always nice," Lorenzo (protagonist of this film) is advised about his novel-in-progress. "Sex and Lucia," which contains stories within stories within stories, unpacks this claim, showing that sex is not always "nice," but that like narrative it can be liberating and transformative.Tragedy and betrayal lie at this film's heart, but because its story bends and twists around as it follows Lorenzo's false starts and revelations as a writer (it has, as it explains, a hole at the center which the audience, like the characters, can fall through) it also offers a way out -- a way to distinguish voyeurism and pornography from love and art, a way to stay faithful to a vision of human trust and imagination.Brilliantly accomplished, "Sex and Lucia" displays the loveliness and ample talent of its stars, especially the beautiful Paz Vega (as Lucia) and Tristan Ulloa (as Lorenzo). A tremdous film
The Wind in the Willows. The Wind in the Willows, by Kenneth Grahame, was originally a series of bedtime stories for Grahame's son.  It is still commonly considered to be a children's book, but it is too difficult for young children to read themselves, and many older children will no longer appreciate the simple themes it covers.  I imagine that its chief appeal is to adults, although children might enjoy having some parts of the book read to them.The characters - Mole, Rat, Badger, and Toad - are wonderful creations.  Mole, Rat, and Badger are conspicuously brave and loyal creatures.  They love the comforts of home and hearth, yet they constantly set off on one rescue mission or another without a thought to their own safety.  Toad, on the other hand, is a boastful nitwit, and it is amusing to the reader to see him brought down to size again and again.In reading this book, you get the idea that Grahame had thought for a long time about what it is like to be an animal.  He understands how their energy ebbs and wanes with the seasons, and he writes that it is a great breach of animal courtesy to ask a favor during the winter, when everyone wants to stay inside and doze during most of the day.  In summer, though, the animals are often abroad throughout the night, and they may see the sky grow bright again before they return home.  Grahame also has wonderful intuition about animal senses:"We others, who have long lost the more subtle of the physical senses, have not proper terms to express an animal's intercommunications with his surroundings, living or otherwise, and have only the word `smell,' for instance, to include the whole range of delicate thrills which murmur in the nose of the animal night and day, summoning, warning, inciting, repelling.  It was one of these mysterious fairy calls from out the void that suddenly reached Mole in the darkness, making him tingle through and through with its very familiar appeal, even while as yet he could not clearly remember what it was."What calls out to Mole in the darkness is his home, and a great deal of this book is an enumeration of the pleasures of home: the snugness and familiarity, the comfort of a well-used chair in front of the fire, and the simple pleasures of the table.  Highly recommended
James Stewart Preserves Our Freedoms with Conviction. This is a very good film from director Anthony Mann starring James Stewart and June Allyson. The film focuses on the operations of post-war America's modern Airforce and the lives of the men and women who lived it. It is beautifully photographed by William Daniels and Tom Tutwiler. We slept much sounder at night knowing the Strategic Air Command was above us protecting our freedoms around the clock. James Stewart's performance is one of honor and conviction
Holy. Like the review I just read, Tarkovskies' ANDRE RUBLEV is the movie that I keep coming back to over the years. It is my favorite film and has been until something as special comes along.More than any filmmaker in any country, in any language, this movie has imparted and impressed it's viewpoint into my perception. I have incorporated it into my vision. I resonate with it... It plays me like a bell.It is not an entertainment really though much of it is entertaining.  This film transcends both entertainment and mere artistic success -  the images and themes are so spiritually charged and archetypically strong that one may have the sense while watching it, that he or she is remembering half forgotten dreams.Like the person whose review I just read, I often pause in simple wonder after a chapter just to let it ring.The film chronicles the life and spiritual development of Russian artist, Icon painterAndre Rublev.  The epic unfolds in 6 chapters the last of which introduces another artist, a young Church bell maker. The chapter reveals aspects and components of the creative process both literally and in allegory ...one senses that the filmmaker Tarkovsy and the young bell-maker may have a great deal in common and that he may have written himself into this section....this last chapter "Spring" is shot through with a narrative vitality, an energetic quality to the expression that is simply colossal -  there is a joy in the unfolding and discovery of this bell-makers  own creative powers...all of which is witnessed by the aging jaded Andre Rublev who is, as a witness, transformed by what he sees, as will be anyone who has eyes to see and apprehend the naked wonder of this last chapter.Andre Tarkovsky made this film in what used to be the USSR  during a period of rigid and scrutinizing censorship. He used the artistic restraints and the hoops he had to jump through to a brilliant advantage carefully codifying individual artistic and spiritual themes into the chapters of this epic.  The constraints seem to have served to discipline and streamline the narrative...the result is golden ...more truth per foot of film than any I can compare it to.I saw it first on video in college in a russian art history class, later bought the dvd, and more recently attended a screening at Disney Studios that  colleague was given the invite to but couldn't make.  I brought someone who just didn't get it.Tarkovsy  is not for everyone though you should give yourself the benefit of the doubt because, if he IS for you, you may very well be changed and touched  and rewarded again and again by this truly timeless gem
There is nothing wrong with the picture quality !. After reading other reviews that state poor quality "transfer" I will disagree. The video quality on the DVD and VHS is the same as the original broadcast. This teleplay was originally recorded on videotape not film. Early videotape recordings do not have near the quality of film or todays video recordings.I do prefer the VHS version over the DVD as the VHS sound is analog. Since this is a musical I especially do not want the sound ruined by converting it to digital, I want to hear all of the great soundtrack as originally recorded.
The Effects of Ignorance. Errol Morris, via The Fog of War, proved that he is one of the most talented documentary filmmakers of our day. This film directly proceeded the McNamera classic but much of his skill at the genre is on display. The interplay of music and camera, and the way in which he captures onscreen the unsuspecting and pathetic Fred Leuchter is artful-this is true even the close-ups of coffee pots and electrical currents emanating from his head during the opening.That viewers feel sympathy for this confused, broken man who is devoid of social skills and social comprehension is an unintended consequence of the vehemence in which the forces of political correctness attacked him. He definitely had no idea as to the way he would be vilified simply by appearing at the Zundel trial. Leuchter, an engineer in deed only, with no scientific academic background whatsoever, conducted a middle school like science experiment at Birchenau and believed, based on some shoddy chemical analysis, that no cyanide gas was used there. The result was that his life was ruined.Personally, as a life long learner who has never been, and will never be, a historical revisionist, the destruction of Fred Leuchter is appalling. I completely believe and know that the holocaust occurred, but am aghast that certain "activists" think they have the right to destroy of the lives of those who disagree with them. Why didn't these brave activists respond to his arguments rather than conduct a campaign of hate? His positions are juvenile. Leuchter knew nothing about chemical tests, history, or society in general. He was an easy mark, but their emotionalizing the issue had the reverse effect. It made people think they had no answers to his arguments. It legitimizes revisionism. By squashing this non-entity they made him a martyr. What they should have done was publish vigorous refutations, instead they made Leuchter appear a champion of free inquiry; which, by the way, he is in comparison to shrieking critics and the Canadian government. This is the way in which political correctness and reckless emotion have damaged our intellects and degraded our culture. Bullying, shaming, and forcing guilt upon others is exactly how you vile personas like Ernst Zundel were created in the first place. Zundel is a reaction to such attempts.
Takes me back to my childhood. I love this movie.  And I don't have anything bad to say about it.  But if you get the DVD be prepared because the movie and the audio tracks do not match.  So you hear an actor speak before their mouths move.  This drove me crazy but I still enjoyed the movie
Clever, Creative and Funny!. Lilly Tomlin is hysterical in this movie. She makes this movie. It' fun, and your rooting for the women all the way. One specific part is not for the kids. My kids were bored with it. But I enjoyed it from the release date and it's still entertaining
A Real Treasure!. I ordered this DVD when it first came out and I've been enjoying it ever since. All the performances are enjoyable- some more than others, but they are all wonderful nonetheless. Some of my pesonal favorites include:Patti Lupone bringing down the house along with Mandy Patinkin and Bob Gunton doing the song "A New Argentina" from Evita. This is definately one of my top 5 favorites on this DVD.Anegela Lansbury providing a hilarious performance in "The worst Pies in London" from Sweeny Todd: The Demon Barber of Fleet StreetCarol Channing singing the nothing-less-than inspirational "Before the Parade Passes By" from Hello, Dolly!Yul Brynner performing "Shall We Dance?" with his co-star (not sure of her name). This performance is priceless and so is that dress!John Raitt's beautiful baritone voice soars in this song-"Hey There" from The Pajama GamePaul Lynde delivers a ton of laughs in "Kids" from Bye Bye BirdieJoel Grey and cast perform the spectacle that is Cabaret in the song "Willkommen". This song never gets out of your head!Gwen Verdon and Chita Rivera- two of Broadway's top leading ladies come together and perform two wonderful songs from Chicago: "All That Jazz" and "Nowadays". Bob Fosse's coreography can never get old and is dispalyed in this performance for your full enjoyment.Jerry Orbach. His death was a tragic loss to the theater. That's why these DVD's are so remarkable. This is another top performance- the song "Lullaby of Broadway" from 42nd Street. It was this performance that inspired me to save up and go to NYC to see my very first broadway show- 42nd Street.Andrea McArdle and the orphans perform "Tomorrow" and "You're Never Fully Dressed Without a Smile" from Annie. This is just superb. There's absolutely no flaws.Betty Buckley and cast perform two songs from Cats-"Jellicle Songs" and the classic "Memory". It is stunning to watch.Any performance with Patti LuPone in it is a gem in itself. This one- "Buenos Aires" from Evita shows off her powerful set of pipes and shows the other side of the character of Eva Peron.Bonnie Franklin and cast are hilarious in the song"Applause" from the show Applause. The whole theme to the song is 100% true and kind of "hits home" for every actor. Plus, it has parodies of other classic musicals that will have you rolling on the floor in laughter if you're a big fan of musicals.All in all, this DVD is totally worth buying! And after you're through with this one and have memorized all the songs, check out Broadway's Lost Treasures II. I have yet to receive III, but I am looking forward to it!
Holly Hunter great actress, beatifull bodie. HiNice and interesting drama , but the best part is Holly Hunter naked, long scene, a rare appearance for this actress.So if you are her fan or just a collector like me this movie is for you.RegardsAv
A Mystery Solved . . . Vampire-enthusiasts who have read Strieber's novel, had a bit of a surprise when they saw Scott's "The Hunger." There were several liberties taken with the film. Still, on many occasions, adaptation for screen often includes sacrifices: especially for time and budget. We accept this. But . . . there was always something a little "off" here . . .Let's start from the beginning. This film is exquisitely shot. The framing is simple and beautiful. In fact, the composition is almost breath-taking (still frames could appear as individual photographs suitable for display). Likewise, the acting is beyond reproach. Pitch-perfect. The costumes . . . unforgettable (the glasses alone)! The soundtrack is lush . . . in fact, when I first rented the film in middle-school I was inspired to explore classical music. Today, I have an extensive collection . . . and "Bach: Cello Suites 1-6" remains my favorite (thank you, Mr. Scott for such a wonderful gift).The tale is both sensual and heart-breaking. **SPOILER (STOP READING NOW IF YOU HAVE NOT SEEN THIS FILM)**: Interestingly, Susan Sarandon describes the film as a metaphor for addiction. In the director's commentary she explains that her character would rather commit suicide than to live with an addiction to blood . . . with an addiction to death . . . to be a conduit of death. Does that comment sound odd considering how the film concludes?? Here is what happened . . .The film was intended to end with the powerful death of Dr. Sarah Roberts. It was to be a story of sacrifice. BUT, as Scott and Sarandon reveal, "the powers that be" (their words) (meaning, the studio executives) demanded the tag at the end. You see, the studio was hoping for a sequel (and, obviously more money). So, the entire message of the film was destroyed . . . not to mention the attention to continuity was left in ruins. The bitterness in this commentary is justified. By insisting on a nonsensical ending ("So, how did Miriam's lovers decompose if she is still alive?!"), the film did not achieve the box-office success predicted . . . and the sequel was shelved.So, why grant this film five stars? No matter what . . . this film is nearly as engrossing as the first time I saw it. It is, in my opinion, one of the most inventive, captivating vampire films ever made. And seeing Peter Murphy made me feel thirteen all over again . . . I think I'll break out some Bauhaus  . . . right . . . now.Suggested Reading: Hanson, Ellis. "Vampires Who Bite." Out Takes Essays on Queer Theory and Film. Ed. Ellis Hanson. Durham: Duke UP, 1999. 183-222.This essay explores lesbian vampirism in film history with particular attention to "Dracula's Daughter," "Vampyres," and "The Hunger."
A WINNING ELECTION. Rarely has a film captured the essence of adolescence, teenage angst, sexual confusion and school politics as richly as this marvelous movie from Alexander Payne.  Reese Witherspoon breaks out with a performance of incredible range and emotional complexity and established herself as an actress of great range.  Matthew Broderick gives perhaps his most richly realized performance as the straightlaced teacher with his own sexual drives and confusion over his feelings for Witherspoon's often times obnoxious but undeniably strong personality.  In his screen debut, Chris Klein brings a rare depth and humor to the cliched role of the school jock coerced into running against Witherspoon, and Jessica Campbell is great as his sexually confused sister whose honest campaign excites the students and astonishes the faculty.  One of the most painfully honest and funny sequences involves the prayers of the candidates on the night before the election.  Reese prays to an unfamiliar God and beseeches him to let her win so she "can carry out his divine plan."  Campbell prays that she finds a lesbian lover at the Catholic all girls school she deliberately caused her parents to send her to, while goofy Klein shows the most depth by thanking God for all of his blessings (especially his large penis) and telling God he knows the best candidate will win.ELECTION is a very entertaining look at teenagers and one of the best of its kind.  Enjoy
Shakespeare Would Be Proud. When it comes to film adaptations, most films fail in some way.  To think that a Japanese film director could transform one of the greatest plays written in the English language and mke it his own, is quite tremendous. To think that he could use Japanese Noh theater images to enhance the adpatation is a stroke of genius.  Mifune is one of the greatest actors to play Macbeth, and dare say maybe the best.  Akira Kurosawa directed a masterpiece and proves why he is at the top of the pantheon of great world directors.And, of course, The Criterion Collection folk out do themselves, again.  Thank goodness for them, because of it wasn't for them, we all would be missing out on great films.
Woody's First Great Movie. Allen's talent grew in leaps and bounds in the late 60's and early 70's.  Sleeper was only his fifth directorial effort and is still considered one of his best. Personally, my favorite "pure" comedy of Allen's entire career.  In Sleeper, he best combines stand-up material with physical comedy to make hilarious and biting social satire. Only Allen would compliment, albeit sardonically, the Nazi's for their single positive contribution to society: the Volkswagon Bug. The Third Reich may not have lasted longer than fifteen years but that's a great little car. Along the way, he lampoons everything from repressive Orwellian societies to sex toys.  A great starting point for newcomers to Woody Allen films
As scary as it was so many years ago. this movie is a great example of movie making at its finest. The eerie atmosphere makes dialogue unecessary and the creepy black and white tones complement this as well. Note: many versions of this movie are available, many which include 20 minutes of more film. The alpha film versions states it ontains 85 or so minutes but the case claims only 64.
Not sissy stuff: important gay avant garde. The gay condition, this is the glory and the gutter, the heavenly and the hellish,a juxtaposition of the rich interior of gay desire and the shoddy conditions of "actual" gay existence. Look, young man, and be afraid. Be very afraid
I cannot not lie about this movie: It rocked!. This is a majestic, genre-defying delve into three disparate (and desperate) women. Whoopi's performance is at least as strong as her  roles in Jumpin' Jack Flash, Fatal Beauty and Burglar. And if you liked those films, I hope you're not raising any small children or corporate management of any type.Anyway, Drew Barrymore is thoroughly convincing as a trashy, loose and unintelligent woman. It didn't even feel like she was acting to me.And Parker Posey looked a little differently than I remembered her, but she was good as the sick girl who we all feel sorry for because she came from an abusive home ... maybe if she tried listening once in a while it wouldn't have been so bad.
what a shock!. Michael Caine gives a great performance in this movie as he was passed over for a promotion. He plays by the rules only to get trampled by those less deserving of said promotion. Then he takes matters into his own hands and makes power moves that gets him his much deserved promotion by any means necessary
Straight talking Frankie with demure Kim. A great movie. I liked this movie because I like the way Sinatra talks and sings. He is a natural actor always ready with a 'tough-guy' quip delivered with perfect pace and vocal variety. Kim Novak for me is a fabulous actress. Not only is she beautiful but she plays the part of a shy and hesitant starlet perfectly. The songs and the story are great both of which I have transfered to my i-pod to listen to over and over again.
One of those movies that should never be re-made. Well, finally this is on DVD.  Like "Miracle on 34th St.", "Christmas Carol", etc., this movie has one definitive version, and should never have been touched again.  Wallace Beery is Long John Silver, for anyone else to play his part should condemn them to the lower reaches where they have to watch Green Acres re-runs for eternity, the very idea makes me physically ill.  Jackie Cooper's role here is absolutely brilliant, upon my soul!  And the movie itself is really quite well done, very exciting and interesting, well acted in all the parts.  But matey, when it comes to parrots perching on shoulders, the digital Wallace Beery will live forever.  An essential movie, probably top 100 all time
Super DI, Aye, aye. Here's a message to Hollywood.  There are perhaps a million former Marines out there that will buy The D.I. on DVD as soon as its released.I saw The DI as a 12 year old on television in 1960.  I was petrified by the movie and never thought I'd join the Marines because of it.  Well, in 67 I did join and went through bootcamp in San Diego, almost within sight of my house.I think Full Metal Jacket is more realistic but doesn't deliver the positive message served up in The DI.  Webb does a magnificent job depicting the stoic drill instructor.  The intensity of the training in bookcamp, the concern for details (as depicted in the breaking down and reassembly of an M1) that make up a recruits world are dead on.The DI is a classic.  Like other reviewers before me I find it puzzling that this film hasn't made the transition to DVD when so much garbage has.  But then Hollywood and the people that populate show biz haven't a clue about being a Marine.  Its been almost 40 years and I still remember the names of my drill instructors.  Sgt. Alley where are you?Semper Fi
A Christmas Classic. For every season, there is a classic movie.  In our house, "A Christmas Story" tops the list when Christmas rolls around.  Without a doubt this movie is a classic!  Ralphie and his quest for the Red Ryder BB gun -- I do love this movie.
Nice and awesome. I absolutely love Atlantis. From Ronon Dex, to Sheppard, and to all the faces. I'd cry if Atlantis was cancelled. Seriously though, Steve should have never have died, he should also have been put in command of SG1. Can you imagine that..."Why Steve, welcome to Earth...you're welcome to live out your life, if you only feed in self defense on enemies...'kay? Oh, you're also in charge of Sg1. :P" But seriously, the Wraith make this show so awesome. From Steve to Bob to Edward, to Gordon and Alexander, to Michael and Eric (by far James's best performance yet).The Wraith make this show what it is. But one thing??? Why don't we have Before I Sleep? Seriously, you have no idea how irked I am at that, since I began watching in S.2.12.Anyways, I think Atlantis totally pwns SG1
Halloween fans love them all!. Sure it is no where near being as good as the original, but as a fan of the Halloween's I love them all including this somewhat cheesy attempt to keep the story going.  If you are going to believe that a man can be shot and blown up and all that other stuff and can still live on then you cannot complain about this flick.  Plus it has great comedic one liners that will make you laugh.  My opinion is that is still better than half the crap they make nowadays
PESCI'S PHILOSOPHY. WITH HONORS is a thoughtful and well done little "slice of life" with a moral we've all heard before:  do what makes you happy and take time to live your life.  Director Alex Keshishian and screenwriter William Mastrosimone, however, don't knock you over the head with its theme and/or morals.  There are some scenes where you're expecting the probable to happen and they don't:  e.g., after Simon cooks Gorky, the rooster, you expect his master to be furious---when Simon finally meets up with the son he abandoned, you expect some kind of tearful reunion----and you certainly think Monty is going to graduate with honors.  The end results of these scenes, however, avoid the usual cliche.  Joe Pesci is delightfully understated in his role, and although he never really becomes coochy coo loveable, you understand his pains and shortcomings; Brendan Fraser starts out pretty snooty and insufferable but as he matures in his relationship with both Pesci and Moira Kelly (who is delightful as Courtney), Fraser becomes a more sympathetic character; Patrick Dempsey adds some lightweight humor as Gorky's master, and Josh Hamilton eschews the usual pain in the butt role with a believable and touching change of heart.The movie is definitely manipulative, but its heart is in the right place and its cast takes it seriously, so it ends up being a charming little film with a strong reaffirmation of the human spirit
Good,but not better than the original. This was a good sequel,but not better than the first one.He plays Kurts brother and fights Tong Po.Van Damne is way better though
I LIKED this movie!!!!. I don't know WHY this movie is getting so poo pooed, I'm not a big Adam Sandler fan but I found this movie to be cute, funny & sweet!It's a cartoon for God's sake!I thought the animation was great and I adore Whitey! Sue me but I for one LIKED THIS MOVIE! Rasberries to those who OVER analized and critisized it
Light hearted. A light and breezy production of Shakespeare's most renown light and breezy play. The cast and director make this look fun and easy, which is of course a sure sign of just how much hard work they must have put it into it. The sets, costumes, locations and music are terrific. Kline steals the show. People unfamiliar with Shakespeare may find the dialogue difficult at first, my advice ignore it, sit back, enjoy the show and it will magically work it's charm
I need to stop laughing, it hurts too much!. This movie is downright hilarious the whole way through. In this story, Ralphie, who is 9 years old, must convince his parents and teacher what the perfect gift for christmas is. At first, he hesitates, and when he asks, its always the same answer: "Oh, no. you'll shoot you're eye out!" Raphie stops at nothing to get what he wants. He would not even listen to the teacher when she gave him a C on his "what i want for christmas" paper and told him it's a bad idea. He didnt even listen to who he thought was the real santa.The funniest scenes in this movie are :1. when ralphie and his friends get chased by 2 bullies2. when his father gets a lamp shaped like a leg and ralphie's mother "accidentally" breaks it,3. when the dogs next door take the dinner turkey4. when raphie find out what the little orphan annie code was only a commercial for ovaltine5. when ralphie gets soap put in his mouth when he says the F-dash-dash-dash word(it is censored by fudge)6. when santa pushes him down the slide of doom.My whole family always said, "it isnt Christmas without watching this movie". If you're dying for christmas to come, why not spend time watching this on tv? You'll never miss it, it comes on all day both on christmas and christmas eve
beautiful movie. mccabe & mrs. miller is often talked about as one in a list of director robert altman's seventies films that takes on a cinematic genre (namely the western) and subverts it to the point of making it seem like an attack on its cinematic precedents. the traditional western's gung-ho heroism is nowhere in evidence and, it seems, mccabe is a mere parody of a hero that director invites the audience to laugh at.if this was the case, than mccabe and mrs. miller would, at best, be looked upon as a satirical look-back at cinematic tastes of the fifties. a self-congratulatory "how far we've come..." negation of the western's romance in favour of a neo-realist version of the west populated with a cast of ambiguous charaters that are anything but heroic. if altman's "the long goodbye" transported the hopelessly out-of-date phillip marlowe into the californian seventies than "mccabe and mrs. miller" inverts this and transposes the typically indecisive modern man(californian or otherwise) into the context of the mythical west.but this is to do both "mccabe and mrs. miller" and it's western precedents a disservice. the film works best not as a suberversion of a genre, which in the end is just satire, but as a subervsion or, more correctly, deconstruction of myth (regardless of individual and singular genre) which is much grander. if elements of subverting the western seem implicit in this than it is true to the point of having pre-conceived notions of the archetypal western hero and that would be ignoring the moral complexities of john wayne's character in "the searchers" or william holden in "the wild bunch", to name a couple.at the outset, we are presented with the figure of mccabe, newly entered into presbyterian church society. brash, intent on playing cards and buying rounds, the impression of bravura western confidence we have is solidified by the circulating rumour of his killing a man in days gone by. skip to the film's end and our initial impressions have been justified. the myth has been confirmed and has flourished and is ready to continue.it is in the movie's middle acts where the myth is subverted. warren beatty is exceptional as the indecisive businessman whose assertiveness is whittled away by the scene. not in any western since "johnny guitar" has a female taken such an authoritive role as julie christy here. she is decidedly the dominant partner, in both their business and their relationship. decidedly, this is subversion but it is the film's focus of the business and the relationships which ultimately makes it more. when it comes to the point where another character asserts that mccabe has never killed a man, the audience is in accord.yet, the myth comes to be. it is all the stronger and more romantic for its being rooted in the work-a-day realities. in this, it is as much a comment on art as it is on the western and has little to do with ultra-realism. there is myth of its own in the making of the myth and altman and vilmos zsigmond's stunning cinematography realize this beautifully here. "mccabe & mrs. miller" is one of the great films of the seventies and a personal favorite
Memphis Belle. One of my favorite movies, particularly if you're a WWII buff.  I watch it at least once a year
